   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TP26BH

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MQQMGF

   Advertisement

     * plos.org
     * create account
     * sign in

PLOS ONE

     * Publish
          + Submissions
               o Getting Started
               o Submission Guidelines
               o Figures
               o Tables
               o Supporting Information
               o LaTeX
               o Preprints
               o Revising Your Manuscript
               o Submit Now
               o Calls for Papers
          + Policies
               o Best Practices in Research Reporting
               o Human Subjects Research
               o Animal Research
               o Competing Interests
               o Disclosure of Funding Sources
               o Licenses and Copyright
               o Data Availability
               o Materials and Software Sharing
               o Ethical Publishing Practice
               o Authorship
               o Downloads and Translations
          + Manuscript Review and Publication
               o Criteria for Publication
               o Editorial and Peer Review Process
               o Editor Center
               o Guidelines for Reviewers
               o Accepted Manuscripts
               o Corrections and Retractions
               o Comments
               o Article-Level Metrics

Submit Your Manuscript
       Discover a faster, simpler path to publishing in a high-quality
       journal. PLOS ONE promises fair, rigorous peer review, broad scope,
       and wide readership – a perfect fit for your research every time.
       Learn More Submit Now
     * About
          + Why Publish with PLOS ONE
          + Journal Information
          + Staff Editors
          + Editorial Board
          + Section Editors
          + Advisory Groups
          + Find and Read Articles
          + Publishing Information
          + Publication Fees
          + Press and Media
          + Contact
     * Browse
     *

       Search

       Search
       ____________________ (BUTTON)

       advanced search

   Browse Subject Areas
   ?

   Click through the PLOS taxonomy to find articles in your field.

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.

     * Loading metrics

   Open Access

   Peer-reviewed

   Research Article

Marriage, parenthood and social network: Subjective well-being and mental
health in old age

     * Christoph Becker ,
       Contributed equally to this work with: Christoph Becker, Isadora
       Kirchmaier, Stefan T. Trautmann
       Roles Validation, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Alfred-Weber-Institute for Economics, University of
       Heidelberg, Heidelberg, Germany
       ⨯
     * Isadora Kirchmaier ,
       Contributed equally to this work with: Christoph Becker, Isadora
       Kirchmaier, Stefan T. Trautmann
       Roles Formal analysis, Methodology, Software, Writing – original
       draft
       Affiliation Alfred-Weber-Institute for Economics, University of
       Heidelberg, Heidelberg, Germany
       ⨯
     * Stefan T. Trautmann
       Contributed equally to this work with: Christoph Becker, Isadora
       Kirchmaier, Stefan T. Trautmann
       Roles Conceptualization, Methodology, Writing – original draft
       * E-mail: trautmann@uni-hd.de
       Affiliations Alfred-Weber-Institute for Economics, University of
       Heidelberg, Heidelberg, Germany, Department of Economics, Tilburg
       University, Tilburg, The Netherlands
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0002-0094-8841
       ⨯

Marriage, parenthood and social network: Subjective well-being and mental
health in old age

     * Christoph Becker,
     * Isadora Kirchmaier,
     * Stefan T. Trautmann

   PLOS
   x
     * Published: July 24, 2019
     * https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704

     * Article
     * Authors
     * Metrics
     * Comments
     * Media Coverage

     * Reader Comments (0)
     * Media Coverage
     * Figures

Figures

   Fig 1
   Table 1
   Table 2
   Fig 2
   Table 3
   Table 4
   Table 5

Abstract

   Parenthood, marital status and social networks have been shown to
   relate to the well-being and mental health of older people. Using a
   large sample of respondents aged 50 and older from 16 European
   countries, we identify the associations of well-being and mental health
   with family status. Making use of detailed social network data of the
   respondents, we also identify how different social support networks
   correlate with the well-being and health indicators. We observe
   positive associations for all network types, over and beyond any direct
   associations of family status with well-being. Results suggest that
   non-residential children are important providers of social support for
   their parents at older age.

   Citation: Becker C, Kirchmaier I, Trautmann ST (2019) Marriage,
   parenthood and social network: Subjective well-being and mental health
   in old age. PLoS ONE 14(7): e0218704.
   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704

   Editor: Oliver Gruebner, University of Zurich, SWITZERLAND

   Received: July 9, 2018; Accepted: June 8, 2019; Published: July 24,
   2019

   Copyright: © 2019 Becker et al. This is an open access article
   distributed under the terms of the Creative Commons Attribution
   License, which permits unrestricted use, distribution, and reproduction
   in any medium, provided the original author and source are credited.

   Data Availability: The data underlying the results of this study are
   available at: https://doi.org/10.11588/data/RNHJTE.

   Funding: The SHARE data collection has been primarily funded by the
   European Commission through FP5 (QLK6-CT-2001-00360), FP6 (SHARE-I3:
   RII-CT-2006-062193, COMPARE: CIT5-CT-2005-028857, SHARELIFE:
   CIT4-CT-2006-028812) and FP7 (SHARE-PREP: N°211909, SHARE-LEAP:
   N°227822, SHARE M4: N°261982), with additional funding from the German
   Ministry of Education and Research, the Max Planck Society for the
   Advancement of Science, the U.S. National Institute on Aging
   (U01_AG09740-13S2, P01_AG005842, P01_AG08291, P30_AG12815,
   R21_AG025169, Y1-AG-4553-01, IAG_BSR06-11, OGHA_04-064,
   HHSN271201300071C) and from various national funding sources (see
   www.share-project.org). We also acknowledge financial support by
   Deutsche Forschungsgemeinschaft within the funding programme Open
   Access Publishing, by the Baden-Württemberg Ministry of Science,
   Research and the Arts and by Ruprecht-Karls-Universität Heidelberg. The
   Friedrich-Ebert-Foundation provided support for CB in the form of a
   grant.

   Competing interests: The authors have declared that no competing
   interests exist.

Introduction

   The link between family status (marital status and parenthood),
   well-being, and mental health is widely discussed in academic and
   popular discourses. Evidence suggests that being married or living with
   a partner can have a positive effect on life satisfaction [1] and is
   associated with higher well-being, better mental health and fewer
   depressive symptoms in old age [2–4].

   Parenthood, on the other hand, does not appear to be associated with
   enhanced mental health [5–7]. The risk of depression is especially
   pronounced for women with parenting stress and poor physical health,
   but less pronounced for those being supported by the partner [8].
   Repeated cross-sectional data on US parents and non-parents shows a gap
   in subjective well-being between these two groups, which, however,
   becomes smaller over the period 1973 through 2008 due to decreased
   happiness of non-parents [9]. A cross-country comparison finds only
   weak associations between life satisfaction and having children, with
   unclear direction [1]. However, there is also evidence that the
   relationship between children and well-being becomes more positive for
   older respondents [1,10]. Depending on the life-cycle stage, the
   aspects of parenthood may thus differ, suggesting that the positive
   aspects of parenthood dominate when getting older. Amongst others, the
   role of children as a form of social support may become important in
   the later stages of a person’s life [10].

   But what constitutes social support? One of the most cited definitions
   stems from Cobb [11], describing social support as “information leading
   the subject to believe that he is cared for and loved, esteemed and a
   member of mutual obligations”. The U.S. National Cancer Institute [12],
   defines social support as “a network of family, friends, neighbors, and
   community members that is available in times of need to give
   psychological, physical, and financial help”. In general, a social
   network consists of a “set of actors and the ties amongst them” [13],
   while the term social support further describes the quantity and
   quality of these ties from an individual perspective. While there exist
   multiple definitions of social support, most of them encompass factors
   for the size and structure of the network, as well as including
   measures for physical distance to other network members, length of the
   relationships, frequency of contact or function of each relationship
   [14]. Evidence suggests that such social support networks are related
   to less loneliness and more happiness [15,16] and act as important
   buffer against stressful events [11,14].

   While results on parenthood might be controversial and depend on the
   age of the studied population, there is widespread agreement that
   social support is associated with higher life satisfaction, and that
   social networks are an important factor for well-being [17]. Bringing
   these two branches of the literature together, we aim to shed light on
   the link between a person’s family status, the resulting
   characteristics of their social networks, and their well-being and
   mental health, using a large sample of 55.000 middle-aged and older
   adults from 16 European countries. This sample was taken from the
   Survey of Health, Ageing and Retirement in Europe (SHARE). For people
   aged 60 and older in Mediterranean and non-Mediterranean countries in
   the first wave of the data set, there is some evidence that the number
   of residential children is associated with more depressive symptoms
   [18]. We aim to expand and generalize these findings using recently
   collected, detailed network data, across European countries.
   Parenthood, marital status and different types of social networks might
   help to sustain well-being and mental health in old age. Our objective
   in the current study is to analyze the role of marital status,
   parenthood and social networks deriving from these family backgrounds
   as potential sources of social support, for well-being and mental
   health in old age. We consider four distinct measures, used in
   different fields such as economics or psychology, to obtain a
   comprehensive picture of well-being and mental health. These are the
   CASP-12 scale for quality of life, the EURO-D scale for depressive
   symptoms, and one question each for life and social support network
   satisfaction.

   We use the full range of the SHARE data set, which includes people aged
   50 and older. At this point in the life cycle, parents may have
   resident children, children living away from home, and grandchildren,
   allowing us to separate their associations with well-being. We use
   network composition measures in order to determine network types, and
   control for network size and relational dynamics separately.
   Additionally, we calculate the network types for each country
   separately, taking cultural differences in network compositions into
   account.

   Based on the current literature we test the following three hypotheses
   for the well-being and mental health of people aged 50 and older: i) A
   positive association with being married, ii) a positive association
   with the number of children and grandchildren not living at home, and
   iii) a positive association with having a strong social network implied
   by family background. We proceed as follows: Section 2 describes the
   data used and our methods to measure well-being, mental health and the
   characteristics of social support networks in detail. In Section 3 we
   present the results of our analysis. We first analyze the association
   of family status with well-being and mental health measures without
   taking the social network into account. We then take the network
   composition as criterion variables and use hierarchical clustering to
   determine social network types which differ mainly in their main source
   of social support. We then assess the relationship between the
   resulting social support network types and outcome measures,
   controlling for family status, network size, and relational dynamics.
   Section 4 discusses our findings, and Section 5 provides concluding
   remarks.

Data and methods

Respondents

   We use data from the cross-national panel database Survey of Health,
   Ageing and Retirement in Europe (SHARE), release 6.0.0., managed by the
   Munich Center for the Economics of Aging, Max Planck Institute for
   Social Law and Social Policy [19–21]. The cross-national panel database
   provides extensive data on health and socio-economic status. The target
   population is people of age 50 or older having their regular domicile
   in the respective country. Current partners are interviewed regardless
   of their age. We make use of SHARE wave 4 [22] that was administered
   between 2010 and 2012 in 16 European countries, and includes a module
   on social network. We update missing constants with data from waves 1
   and 2 [23,24]. We include respondents age 50 and older not living in a
   nursing home. The number of respondents differs by country. Over all
   countries, there are about 55.000 observations available. For an
   overview of the total number of observations of each country, see the
   supporting S1 Table.

Demographic factors

   The SHARE data set contains detailed data on demographics. Summary
   statistics of all demographic variables used in the analyses can be
   found in S2 Table. The demographic factor of interest is the family
   status, which we measure by the marital status, total number of
   children, children living at home, and grandchildren. Over all
   countries 70% of the respondents are married and 91% have children.

   The marital status of each respondent is classified into the categories
   (1) married and living together with spouse, (2) registered
   partnership, (3) married and living separated from spouse, (4) never
   married, (5) divorced, (6) widowed. For the regression analysis we
   construct the dummy variables married which takes the value of one if
   the respondent is married or in a registered partnership, the dummy
   variable divorced, which takes the value of one if the respondent is
   divorced or living separated from spouse, and a dummy variable widowed.
   We include respondents living separately from their spouse in the dummy
   divorced, as living separately is often a preceding step to a divorce.

   Parenthood is measured by the number of children alive and the number
   of resident children, including fostered, adopted and stepchildren. We
   define the four-category measure children with categories no children,
   one child, two children, and three or more children, and create the
   respective dummy variables for each category. We further construct the
   variables resident children and grandchildren which report for each
   respondent the number of children living with the family and the number
   of grandchildren.

   Further demographics are used as controls. The set Controls A consist
   of gender, age (of the respondent at the time of the interview), age
   squared, and a dummy variable indicating the country of residence of
   the respondent to control for cultural differences. The set Controls B
   additionally includes dummies for urban character of residence, being
   employed, self-employment, level of education according to the
   international classification of education ISCED-97 [25],an indicator
   for the average monthly household income, and the aforementioned
   dummies for divorced and widowed. In SHARE wave 4, each household
   respondent is asked to state the overall after-tax income of the entire
   household in an average month of last year. If a respondent refuses to
   answer, the interviewer asks whether the respondent earns more, less or
   approximately the amount in certain bracketed values, which represent
   country-specific 25^th, 50^th, and 75^th percentiles of the reported
   household incomes from SHARE wave 2. We use the information from the
   stated household income and the unfolding brackets and define four
   categories for the average monthly household income: (1) Low income [0
   to 25^th percentile], (2) Middle income [25^th to 50^th percentile],
   (3) Upper middle income [50^th percentile to 75^th percentile], and (4)
   High income [75^th percentile and higher]. The boundaries of the
   intervals are the country-specific bracket values of SHARE wave 4
   (details and summary statistics in S2 Table).

   In order to control for health, we include a measure of self-assessed
   physical health (Would you say your health is: (1) poor, (2) fair, (3)
   good, (4) very good, and (5) excellent), and whether drugs for sleeping
   problems, anxiety or depression are taken.

Well-being and mental health indicators

   Well-being can be defined as the psychological balance point between
   individually available resources and challenges [26] and may be linked
   to many different aspects of life. In order to develop national
   well-being measures, the Office for National Statistics in the UK ran a
   public debate on the question through various platforms [27]. The three
   most frequent answers to the question “What things matter most in your
   life? What is Well-being?” were “Health”, “Having good connections with
   friends and relatives”, and “Job satisfaction (and economic security)”
   [28]. Many empirical studies report a link between socioeconomic
   status, quality and quantity of social contacts, and well-being [17].
   In our study, we use a broad set of measures to map respondents’
   well-being: a simple single-item question regarding life satisfaction;
   the CASP-12 multi-item quality of life scale; a single-item question on
   social support network satisfaction; and the EURO-D depressive symptoms
   scale. In the following, we will discuss the three measures in more
   detail. We also use measures of health, education, and financial status
   as controls in our analyses [29,30].

   The first measure concerns a general feeling about the quality of life,
   the stated Life satisfaction. It is extracted by a single-item question
   in which respondents indicate on a scale from 0 (low satisfaction) to
   10 (high satisfaction) how satisfied they are with their life. This
   scale has acceptable reliability and validity [31,32].

   The second measure is the CASP-12, quality of life scale, which is
   designed to capture quality of life in old age [33]. Participants
   indicate for twelve statements whether they apply on a scale from 1
   (often) to 4 (never). The twelve questions concern four dimensions of
   quality of life, control, autonomy, pleasure and self-realization,
   resulting in an aggregate index ranging from 12 (low quality of life)
   to 48 (high quality of life). We normalize it such that it ranges from
   0 (low quality of life) to 10 (high quality of life).

   The third measure concerns the stated Network satisfaction. Respondents
   indicate on a scale from 0 (low satisfaction) to 10 (high satisfaction)
   how satisfied they are with their social network. If respondents
   indicated that there is no person with whom they discuss matters or
   there is no one who is important to them, they were asked how satisfied
   they were with this fact.

   The fourth measure is the EURO-D depression score [34]. It is an
   indicator for depressive symptoms and captures aspects of mental health
   in late life. It has been demonstrated to provide a valid comparison of
   depressive symptoms across European countries [35,36]. The EURO-D
   depression score is generated from questions on 12 dimensions:
   Depression, pessimism, suicidality, guilt, sleep, interest,
   irritability, appetite, fatigue, concentration, enjoyment, and
   tearfulness. Respondents are asked whether there is an indication for
   each of these dimensions. It results in an aggregate index ranging from
   0 (not depressed) to 12 (very depressed). We normalize it such that it
   ranges from 0 (very depressed) to 10 (not depressed) and call it Lack
   of depressive symptoms.

   Fig 1 presents the average of the well-being measures at each age until
   91 (see S1 Fig for the age distribution). While network satisfaction
   and life satisfaction remain relatively stable, the quality of life
   index and lack of depressive symptoms index decline beyond age 65. The
   graphs for male and female respondents are rather similar, except for
   the lack of depressive symptoms index; male respondents have on average
   a 0.73 points higher index (p<0.01, Mann-Whitney-U test; S2 Fig).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 1. Average well-being and mental health measure.

   Average well-being and mental health measure for all ages from 50 to 90
   years. After age 91 the number of available observations drops to less
   than 50.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.g001

Social support networks

   A social support network can be characterized by its size and
   composition (percentage of partner, children, other relatives, and
   friends in the network) and relational dynamics. In Wave 4, the SHARE
   respondents are asked to answer questions about their social support
   network along the dimensions (1) size, (2) relationship, (3) contact
   frequency, (4) proximity, and (5) closeness.

   In order to identify the members of their social support network, the
   respondents were asked to mention the name of persons with whom they
   discuss important matters. The total number of persons in the social
   support network is its size. It is possible to mention up to seven
   persons, however this boundary is only mentioned if it is reached. Only
   3% of the respondents reach this boundary. Most respondents state one,
   two or three persons as members of their social support network (28%,
   25%, and 20% of the respondents, respectively). Evidence suggests that
   the number of network members is positively linked with life
   satisfaction [37], but that in old age the network is reduced to
   members with close contact [38]

   The composition of a network refers to the relationship type between
   each member. A person who has daily contact with two children and a
   person who has daily contact with two friends have a social support
   network of equal size and contact frequency, however, they have a
   different main source of social support. In a meta-analysis, Pinquart
   and Sörensen [17] provide evidence that the quantity of social contacts
   with friends is more strongly related with subjective well-being than
   the quantity of social contacts with family. They argue that friends
   are voluntary relationships, and they are typically members of the same
   age group or share similar preferences. Still, especially in older age,
   spouses and children are a crucial part of networks. Later in life,
   parents desire open communication, but low interference in each other’s
   lives thereby maintaining independence in old age and minimizing
   intergenerational conflicts [39]. Brandt et al. [40] analyzed the type
   of support between older parents, their children and professional
   providers. They found that children play a central role in providing
   help for their parents in the household and with paperwork. In Southern
   Europe, they are more likely to also take over regular medical care.
   There can also be differences within family structures. Shanas [41]
   provides evidence that the immediate family (partner and children) is
   the major social support during illness, and the extended family
   (children, siblings, and other relatives) is the tie to the community.

   There are different ways to determine these different types of
   networks. One way is to construct network types, in which people are
   similar along family status (e.g. marital status, number of children
   and close relatives) and network measures (e.g. number of close
   friends, frequency of contact with family and friends, and frequency of
   attending social events). Commonly, there are four to five network
   types identified which differ in their relationship with well-being and
   mental health [15,42–44]. Another way to determine network types is to
   use only characteristics of the social network as criterion variables
   and control for family status separately. Litwin and Stoeckel [16] use
   size, composition and relational dynamic measures of the network and
   identify six networks (Spouse, Children, Spouse and Children, Other
   Family, Friend, and Other). They show that the network types are
   related differently to quality of life and that the frequency of the
   network types differs across European countries. We will follow a
   different approach, using only network composition to determine network
   types (i.e., the relative relevance of spouses, children, friends and
   others). We calculate network types for each country separately, taking
   cultural differences in network compositions into account. We chose
   this approach, because we want our network types to be directly linked
   to the family background variables whose associations with well-being
   we are interested in, and we control separately for contact frequency,
   emotional closeness and geographical proximity. In this way, we aim to
   identify how, for example, a Children network relates to well-being
   compared to a Friends network, conditional on controlling for frequency
   and closeness etc.

   We classify the possible relationships into five categories: (1)
   Partner, (2) Children, (3) Other Relatives, (4) Friends, and (5)
   Others. Each of these categories comprises all types of relationships
   related to the category itself, i.e. the category Partner also includes
   the relationship “mother/father in law”. The relationship share of each
   category in the network of a respondent is measured by the sum of the
   occurrence of the category divided by the network size. For each
   respondent, the relationship shares of all relationship categories sum
   to one. We use the relationship share to determine country-specific
   support network types according to the main source of social support.
   The respondents who indicate that there is no person with whom they
   discuss important matters are excluded. For the remaining respondents,
   we use hierarchical clustering with the Ward [45] method to determine
   clusters which are similar with respect to the relationship shares. We
   choose to cut at six clusters and label them Partner, Children, Other
   Relatives, Family, Friends, and Diverse network. Using five clusters
   would not allow us to distinguish between the Friends and the Diverse
   network. Using more than six clusters does not provide an additional
   distinct network type for all countries for the five relationship
   categories used.

   For each country, a cluster is labelled as Partner, Children, Other
   Relatives, Friends or Diverse network if the mean of the relationship
   share (averaged over all people in the cluster) of the category
   Partner, Children, Other Relatives, Friends and Other is higher in that
   cluster than in all other clusters, respectively. The labeling of the
   clusters would mostly be unaffected if it were instead determined by
   the highest mean relationship share (averaged over all people in the
   cluster) within a cluster, i.e., comparing across relationship type.
   Additionally, we include a cluster for Family networks. The Family
   network is the cluster with the highest sum of Partner share plus
   Children share plus Other Relatives share, excluding the clusters which
   are defined as Partner, Children, or Other Relatives network.

   Apart from size and composition, a network is also characterized by
   relational dynamics such as geographical proximity, contact frequency
   and interpersonal closeness. Frequent contact with one’s children
   appears to be associated with less depressive symptoms, albeit
   irrelevant of geographical proximity [4]. Closeness with the support
   network member affects the quality of the relationship. The number of
   close network members with frequent contact is positively related to
   less depressive symptoms [46]. Especially elderly people rely on
   members of their immediate family (partner and children) during illness
   [41]. SHARE provides different questions for these relational dynamics,
   which we use as controls in our analysis.

   For contact frequency, the respondent is asked about the amount of
   contact with each person in his social support network over the last 12
   months. The possible answers are (1) daily, (2) several times a week,
   (3) about once a week, (4) about every two weeks, (5) about once a
   month, (6) less than once a month, and (7) never. We recode such that
   the measure ranges from 0 (never) to 6 (daily). As an overall measure
   of the amount of network contact of a respondent, we take the average
   over the answers for each person in his network and call it contact
   index. E.g., if the result is 6 it means that the respondent has daily
   contact with all persons in his network. If it is less than 6, he must
   have less than daily contact with at least some member of the network.

   Similar measures are constructed for proximity and closeness. The
   respondent is asked how far the person lives and how close he feels to
   the person. The categories for closeness are (0) not very close (1)
   somewhat close (2) very close (3) extremely close; and for proximity
   (0) more than 500km, (1) 100km to 500km, (2) 25km to 100km, (3) 5km to
   25km, (4) 1km to 5km, and (5) less than 1km. The averages over the
   respective answers for each person in the respondent’s network are the
   closeness index and proximity index. Information on the correlation of
   marriage, the number of children, social network dimensions and
   well-being measures is given in S3 Table. We observe that the
   correlations between features of the family status (e.g., married) and
   the respective network is positive but far from perfect. That is, both
   people with and without children may indicate that their social support
   network may predominantly consist of their partner (and similarly for
   the other network types).

Results

Association of marital status and parenthood with well-being and mental
health

   We present results in an aggregated way to illustrate the relevant
   patterns, and the robustness of the results with regards to confounding
   factors. Table 1 shows the associations of the three dimensions of
   well-being and mental health with family status (number of children,
   number of resident children, number of grandchildren and marital
   status) for all respondents (Panel I), male respondents (Panel II), and
   female respondents (Panel III), over all countries including country
   fixed effects (further country specific analyses are reported below).
   The table shows the raw means for each well-being measure conditional
   on each explanatory variable. Comparing the raw mean values for the
   well-being measures gives an impression of the effects sizes of each
   explanatory variable. However, we indicate the significance of each
   comparison based on regression analyses of the dependent measure on the
   explanatory variables; the excluded category in the regression analyses
   is indicated in italics in the table. We show the significance level of
   the variable and the direction of the association, for the regressions
   including controls A and B, respectively. For each set of analyses, we
   also indicate the sample size of the raw means, which varies across
   analyses because of the variation in the number of respondents in the
   different modules of the SHARE surveys. We use ordinary least squares
   for all four measures for its ease of interpretation. Detailed results
   for each regression are in S4–S6 Tables.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 1. Regressing well-being and mental health on family status for
   all countries.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.t001

   Overall we observe that marriage is consistently positively correlated
   with well-being and lack of depressive symptoms, which already provides
   evidence in favor of hypothesis i) from the introduction. We find that
   children are positively correlated with well-being and lack of
   depressive symptoms. However, our analyses show that this overall
   positive association is due to children after they left home: we find
   negative effects for the number of resident children. This pattern is
   consistent with the prediction of hypothesis ii) concerning the effect
   of non-resident children. Grandchildren correlate positively with life
   satisfaction and network satisfaction, but negatively with quality of
   life and lack of depressive symptoms, which gives us a mixed picture on
   the overall role of grandchildren compared to the prediction in
   hypothesis ii). While there are some differences in specific
   correlations, the overall picture is very similar for male and female
   respondents. Controlling for differences between the countries by
   conducting separate regressions for each country individually also does
   not qualitatively change the results (see S7 Table). However, there is
   clearly heterogeneity in the sense that we observe many null effects
   next to those effects replicating the overall effects shown in Table 1.

   Taken together, the results of Table 1 confirm findings of previous
   studies [1–4,10,47] for the current large multi country SHARA data set.
   Focus on the age cohort of people 50 years old and older allows us to
   identify different associations for children at home, children who left
   home already, and grandchildren. Given the consistency with previously
   observed patterns for the direct family status measures, we have a
   solid foundation for studying the broader role of family in through
   social networks corresponding to the different family background
   measures.

Distribution of social network types

   Table 2 presents the means of the network size, the composition
   measures, and relational dynamic measure of each category. For the
   distribution of the network size for each network type see S3 Fig. The
   Partner network is a rather distinct type. It consists only of the
   partner, i.e. has a size of one, and on average has a contact index
   close to the maximum. Respondents which are associated with a partner
   network typically feel extremely or very close with their partner,
   resulting in the highest closeness index of all network types.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 2. Network characteristics by social network types.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.t002

   The share of children in the network is highest for the Children
   network and the Family network. In both networks the second main source
   of support is the partner, emphasizing the importance of marital
   status. The Children and Family network differ in terms of the means of
   the relationship indices and network size, while the average contact
   and closeness shares are quite similar. The Other Relatives, Friends,
   and Diverse network types appear to be similar in terms of average
   contact, closeness and proximity.

   We have shown that network size, as well as contact, proximity, and
   closeness indices differ across network types on average (see Table 2).
   Fig 2 presents the full distribution of the contact index for each
   network type (for the corresponding graphical representations of the
   proximity and closeness indices, see S4 and S5 Figs). Even network
   types which are rather similar with respect to the average contact
   index such as the children and family networks, are rather different
   with respect to the individual distribution of the network contact
   index. This means that the actual composition of the different contact
   categories in the individual social network is different for each
   network type. Furthermore, the impact of contact, closeness, and
   proximity could differ, depending on the composition of a given network
   type: Higher self-reported closeness might, for example, denote a
   different depth of emotional connection in a Partner, compared to a
   Friends network. We therefore include the contact, closeness, and
   proximity indices as individual controls.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 2. Distribution of the contact index by network type.

   Each value of the network contact index is represented by a line. The
   height of each line represents the percentage of the index having the
   respective value for a network type.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.g002

   Table 3 presents the means of gender, age and family status and the
   number of observations for the different network types. There are 3% of
   the respondents who report to have no network. The No network type and
   Children network type are associated with the lowest share of
   respondents who are married. Most respondents who have no children are
   associated with the Other Relatives, the Friends, or the No network
   type. For the means of further demographic variables see S12 Table.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 3. Family status by social network types.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.t003

Association of social networks with well-being and mental health

   We can now turn to the relationship between network characteristics and
   well-being and mental health measures. Table 4 compares well-being and
   mental health for respondents who have a social support network, and
   those who have no network at all. We use the different network types as
   explanatory variable, and include network size, family status variables
   (as in Table 1), and socioeconomic variables as controls. We do not
   control for relational dynamics, because these measures are not defined
   for those who have no social support network. For the detailed
   regression results see S8–S10 Tables and for the raw means conditional
   on network size see S11 Table.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 4. Regressing well-being and mental health on social support
   network types; controlling for network size and family status for all
   countries.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.t004

   In accordance with hypothesis iii), all network types relate positively
   to measures of well-being, for both males and females, even after
   controlling for family structure. The effect is consistently observed
   for Life satisfaction and Network satisfaction. For CASP-12 the effect
   is observed for Partner and Friends network types for male respondents
   and for Partner, Family and Friends network types for female
   respondents. Interestingly, the positive relationship with Children
   network and Lack of depressive symptoms mostly emerges only after
   inclusion of the full set of controls. Network size is positively
   related to all measures of well-being [37]. The results obtained in
   this network analysis support the broader relevance of family through
   the resulting networks for well-being and mental health as postulated
   in hypotheses i) and ii).

   We next compare the different network types with each other, accounting
   for variation of the relational indices across the different network
   types. Table 5 shows the results confined to respondents who indicated
   the presence of some social support network. For the detailed
   regression results see S12–S14 Tables. The excluded category of the
   network type is the Partner network, which had consistently strong and
   significant associations in Table 4, and is taken as a benchmark here.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 5. Regressing well-being and mental health on social support
   network types (only for respondents with a social network); controlling
   for network size, relational dynamic measures, and family status for
   all countries.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.t005

   We find that for Life satisfaction, CASP-12, and Lack of depressive
   symptoms, the more diverse networks have typically weaker associations
   than the Partner network, with the exception of the Friends network for
   CASP-12. In contrast, Network satisfaction is consistently higher for
   all other networks, except for the Diverse network. Note, that this
   emerges despite controlling for network size, contact, closeness and
   proximity index. Fiori et al. [42] pointed out that support quality is
   an important factor for depressive symptoms. We find consistently that
   the closeness and contact measure is positively correlated with mental
   health and well-being. However, we observe a negative relationship of
   mere proximity with well-being and mental health. While for the
   associations with family status no relevant gender differences were
   observed, we observe that associations with network types differ for
   male and female respondents. For male respondents in most cases the
   effects of the network types are not significantly different from the
   Partner network. For the females, the above discussed associations show
   up significantly.

Discussion

   Reflecting the results presented in the previous section in terms of
   our three research hypotheses, the following implications for the
   well-being and mental health of people aged 50 and above emerge: i)
   There appears to be a strong positive association of being
   married/having a partner as part of a social network. ii)
   Non-residential children also relate positively to well-being and
   mental health. On the other hand, the effect of grandchildren in
   general appears to be mixed. While they may be associated with higher
   life and network satisfaction, the same does not appear to hold for
   depressive symptoms and perceived quality of life. iii) We find clear
   evidence of positive relationhips of all types of social networks with
   our measures of well-being, over and beyond the respective underlying
   family status indicators. Hence, a simple focus on family status
   measures, not accounting for the resulting network structures, misses
   important aspects of the relationship of family and well-being and
   mental health.

   In contrast to negative associations reported in many studies (for an
   overview see Hansen [7], or the discussion in Nelson et al. [48] and
   Herbst and Ifcher [9]), we find that children are indeed positively
   correlated with well-being and lack of depressive symptoms, when
   controlling for residential status (resident children are negatively
   associated with well-being). This result is consistent with
   age-dependence in the correlation of children with well-being [1,10]
   and mental health [4,47]. The results suggest that the finding of a
   negative link between children and well-being and mental health may not
   generalize to older people whose children have often left home already.
   As stress associated with balancing the competing demands of childcare,
   work and personal life decreases, once people get older and their
   children leave house, the importance of children as caregivers and
   social contacts might prevail. The mixed effect of grandchildren is
   more difficult to explain. Potentially, there are positive effects of
   having grandchildren in terms of social support that might coincide
   with negative aspects, such as having to care for these grandchildren
   [49,50]. As the SHARE data set only provides us with rudimentary
   information about grandchildren (there is for example no information
   about the residency of them), we cannot shed more light on the relation
   between grandchildren and well-being, as well as mental health.

   We observe that all types of networks have positive associations with
   our dependent measures. Network characteristics such as size,
   closeness, contact frequency and proximity are also relevant indicators
   of well-being and mental health. For male respondents in most cases the
   effects of the network types are not significantly different from the
   Partner network. For female respondents, on the other hand, we observe
   more cases where associations of well-being and mental health with the
   Partner network type are significantly different from those for the
   other network types. Overall we find that especially the Partner
   network is consistently positively correlated with well-being and
   mental health, despite the small network size of 1. This is in contrast
   to Litwin and Stoeckel [16,51], who found that the Spouse network is
   not significantly related to well-being. However, importantly, because
   we control for network size separately, positive associations with size
   are captured by this variable. A remarkable feature of the findings in
   Table 4 is that network characteristics are positively associated with
   well-being and mental health even after controlling for the above-shown
   associations with family status indicators. That is, a healthy partner
   network captures more than just being married, as do other types of
   networks. This fits previous results, suggesting that it is not being
   married per se, but being satisfied with the relationship that is
   associated with less depressive symptoms [47,52]. Kim and McKenry also
   report both, a positive relationship of well-being with being married,
   and an additional role for the perceived quality of the marriage on top
   of that [53]. Our research extends these previous studies, by
   demonstrating the role of both the presence of a partner and the
   associated network, where the partner actively provides social support.
   As the size of a social network seems to be an important driver of
   subjective well-being [54], this could indicate that a small partner
   network can offset the lack of a larger social network. Unfortunately,
   a limitation of our present study is that besides general network
   satisfaction, the SHARE data set has no more fine-grained questions for
   the quality of marriages/partnerships.

   Taken together, our results suggest that social networks may be
   important for well-being and mental health in old age. Spouses,
   partners and children are often the basis of long-lasting social
   networks, which can provide social support to elderly people. However,
   different forms of network may have similar effects, as our data
   especially for male respondents suggests. As discussed above, this
   might derive from a level of trust and reciprocity implicit in all
   forms of networks. A remaining limitation of our study is of course
   that the results are correlational in nature. Further studies,
   comparing for example well-being and mental health before and after the
   formation of partnerships or social networks in longitudinal data are
   needed to establish which factors cause the positive effects found here
   and in the literature. Furthermore, research suggests that there is an
   important link between social support obtained from social networks and
   subjective well-being [54,55]. Subjective well-being is commonly
   measured with questions concerning life satisfaction, positive affect
   (experiencing positive emotions), and negative affect (experiencing
   negative emotions). As the SHARE data set only measures life
   satisfaction, we cannot draw a complete picture of the effects of
   family status and social networks on broader measures of subjective
   well-being.

   Networks may exert an influence on the person’s life beyond the mere
   role of the corresponding family status, for example by moderating
   influences of the environment on well-being. The direct association of
   family status with well-being and mental health may not capture such
   effects. Importantly, the current insights need to guide further
   research, with the next step being the assessment of the causal
   direction of the reported associations. This will allow moving towards
   making recommendations for public policy to maintain the well-being and
   mental health of the elderly through social networks.

Supporting information

S1 Fig. Age distribution.

   Percent of male (female) respondents for each age.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s001

   (TIF)

S2 Fig. Average well-being and mental health measure, by gender.

   Average well-being and mental health measure for all ages from 50 to 90
   years for male and female respondents. Male: black lines, Female: grey
   lines. After age 91 the number of available observations drops to less
   than 50.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s002

   (TIF)

S3 Fig. Network size by network type.

   The size of a bar reflects the share of respondents in a network type
   having a network of size 0 to 7.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s003

   (TIF)

S4 Fig. Distribution of the proximity index by network type.

   Each value of the network contact index is represented by a line. The
   height of each line represents the percentage of the index having the
   respective value for a network type.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s004

   (TIF)

S5 Fig. Distribution of the closeness index by network type.

   Each value of the network contact index is represented by a line. The
   height of each line represents the percentage of the index having the
   respective value for a network type.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s005

   (TIF)

S1 Table. Number of observations and unfolding income brackets per country.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s006

   (DOCX)

S2 Table. Summary statistics of demographic variables.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s007

   (DOCX)

S3 Table. Correlation of family status, social network characteristics,
well-being and mental health.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s008

   (DOCX)

S4 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on family status for all
countries, all respondents.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s009

   (DOCX)

S5 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on family status for all
countries, male respondents.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s010

   (DOCX)

S6 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on family status for all
countries, female respondents.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s011

   (DOCX)

S7 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on family status for each
country.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s012

   (DOCX)

S8 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on network types
controlling for network size and family status for all countries, all
respondents.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s013

   (DOCX)

S9 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on network types
controlling for network size and family status for all countries, male
respondents.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s014

   (DOCX)

S10 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on network types
controlling for network size and family status for all countries, female
respondents.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s015

   (DOCX)

S11 Table. Well-being and mental health measures conditional on network size
over all countries.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s016

   (DOCX)

S12 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on network types
controlling for network size, relational dynamics and family status for all
countries, all respondents with social support network.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s017

   (DOCX)

S13 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on network types
controlling for network size, relational dynamics and family status for all
countries, male respondents with social support network.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s018

   (DOCX)

S14 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on network types
controlling for network size, relational dynamics and family status for all
countries, female respondents with social support network.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s019

   (DOCX)

Acknowledgments

   This paper uses data from SHARE Waves 1, 2, and 4, (DOIs:
   10.6103/SHARE.w1.600, 10.6103/SHARE.w2.600, 10.6103/SHARE.w4.600), see
   Börsch-Supan et al. [19] for methodological details. For funding of
   SHARE, see the Funding section.

   We thank Luisa Kling for her excellent research assistance, as well as
   Christian König-Kersting and Martin Vollmann for comments that greatly
   improved the manuscript.

References

    1. 1. Mastekaasa A. Marital Status, Distress, and Well-Being: An
       International Comparison. Journal of Comparative Family Studies.
       1994;25: 183–205.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    2. 2. Bures RM, Koropeckyj-Cox T, Loree M. Childlessness, parenthood,
       and depressive symptoms among middle-aged and older adults. Journal
       of Family Issues. 2009;30: 670–687.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    3. 3. Gibney S, Delaney L, Codd M, Fahey T. Lifetime Childlessness,
       Depressive Mood and Quality of Life Among Older Europeans. Social
       Indicators Research. 2017;130: 305–323.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    4. 4. Buber I, Engelhardt H. Children’s impact on the mental health of
       their older mothers and fathers: findings from the Survey of
       Health, Ageing and Retirement in Europe. European Journal of
       Ageing. 2008;5: 31–45. pmid:28798560
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    5. 5. Evenson RJ, Simon RW. Clarifying the Relationship between
       Parenthood and Depression. Journal of Health and Social Behavior.
       2005;46: 341–358. pmid:16433280
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    6. 6. Hansen T, Slagsvold B, Moum T. Childlessness and Psychological
       Well-Being in Midlife and Old Age: An Examination of Parental
       Status Effects across a Range of Outcomes. Social Indicators
       Research. 2009;94: 343–362.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    7. 7. Hansen T. Parenthood and Happiness: a Review of Folk Theories
       Versus Empirical Evidence. Social Indicators Research. 2012;108:
       29–64.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    8. 8. Manuel JI, Martinson ML, Bledsoe-Mansori SE, Bellamy JL. The
       influence of stress and social support on depressive symptoms in
       mothers with young children. Social Science & Medicine. 2012;75:
       2013–2020. pmid:22910191
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    9. 9. Herbst CM, Ifcher J. The increasing happiness of US parents.
       Review of Economics of the Household. 2016;14: 529–551.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   10. 10. Margolis R, Myrskylä M. A Global Perspective on Happiness and
       Fertility. Population and Development Review. 2011;37: 29–56.
       pmid:21714198
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   11. 11. Cobb S. Social support as a moderator of life stress.
       Psychosomatic medicine. 1976;
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   12. 12. Definition of social support—NCI Dictionary of Cancer
       Terms—National Cancer Institute [Internet]. 23 Oct 2018 [cited 6
       Nov 2018]. Available:
       https://web.archive.org/web/20181023124317/https://www.cancer.gov/p
       ublications/dictionaries/cancer-terms/def/social-support
   13. 13. Wasserman S, Faust K. Social network analysis: Methods and
       applications. Cambridge university press; 1994.
   14. 14. Pearson JE. The Definition and Measurement of Social Support.
       Journal of Counseling & Development. 1986;64: 390–395.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   15. 15. Litwin H, Shiovitz-Ezra S. Social Network Type and Subjective
       Well-being in a National Sample of Older Americans. The
       Gerontologist. 2011;51: 379–388. pmid:21097553
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   16. 16. Litwin H, Stoeckel KJ. Confidant Network Types and Well-Being
       Among Older Europeans. The Gerontologist. 2014;54: 762–772.
       pmid:23749390
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   17. 17. Pinquart M, Sörensen S. Influences of Socioeconomic Status,
       Social Network, and Competence on Subjective Well-Being in Later
       Life: A Meta-Analysis. Psychology and Aging. 2000;15: 187–224.
       pmid:10879576
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   18. 18. Litwin H. Social Networks and Well-being: A Comparison of Older
       People in Mediterranean and Non-Mediterranean Countries. The
       Journals of Gerontology Series B: Psychological Sciences and Social
       Sciences. 2010;65B: 599–608. pmid:20008485
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   19. 19. Börsch-Supan A, Brandt M, Hunkler C, Kneip T, Korbmacher J,
       Malter F, et al. Data Resource Profile: The Survey of Health,
       Ageing and Retirement in Europe (SHARE). International Journal of
       Epidemiology. 2013;42: 992–1001. pmid:23778574
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   20. 20. Börsch-Supan A, Brandt M, Litwin H, Weber G (Eds). Active
       ageing and solidarity between generations in Europe: first results
       from SHARE after the economic crisis 2013. De Gruyter: Berlin;
       2015.
   21. 21. Malter F, Börsch-Supan A (Eds). SHARE Wave 4: Innovations &
       Methodology. Munich: MEA, Max Planck Institute for Social Law and
       Social Policy. 2013;
   22. 22. Börsch-Supan A. Survey of Health, Ageing and Retirement in
       Europe (SHARE) Wave 4. Release version: 6.0.0. SHARE-ERIC. 2017;
       https://doi.org/10.6103/SHARE.w4.600
   23. 23. Börsch-Supan A. Survey of Health, Ageing and Retirement in
       Europe (SHARE) Wave 1. Release version: 6.0.0. SHARE-ERIC. 2017;
       https://doi.org/10.6103/SHARE.w1.600
   24. 24. Börsch-Supan A. Survey of Health, Ageing and Retirement in
       Europe (SHARE) Wave 2. Release version: 6.0.0. SHARE-ERIC. 2017;
       https://doi.org/10.6103/SHARE.w2.600
   25. 25. Hoffmeyer-Zlotnik JHP, Wolf C, editors. International Standard
       Classification of Education, ISCED 1997. Advances in Cross-National
       Comparison: A European Working Book for Demographic and
       Socio-Economic Variables. Boston, MA: Springer US; 2003. pp.
       195–220. https://doi.org/10.1007/978-1-4419-9186-7_10
   26. 26. Dodge R, Daly A, Huyton J, Sanders L. The challenge of defining
       wellbeing. International Journal of Wellbeing. 2012;2: 222–235.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   27. 27. Matheson J. Measuring What Matters: National Statistician‘s
       Reflections on the National Debate on Measuring National
       Well-being. London: Office for National Statistics. 2011;
   28. 28. Evans J. Findings from the National Well-being Debate. London:
       Office for National Statistics. 2011;
   29. 29. Diener E, Suh E. Measuring Quality of Life: Economic, Social,
       and Subjective Indicators. Social Indicators Research. 1997;40:
       189–216.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   30. 30. Knesebeck OVD, Wahrendorf M, Hyde M, Siegrist J. Socio-economic
       position and quality of life among older people in 10 European
       countries: results of the SHARE study. Ageing and Society. 2007;27:
       269–284.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   31. 31. Pavot W, Diener E. The Affective and Cognitive Context of
       Self-Reported Measures of Subjective Well-Being. Social Indicators
       Research. 1993;28: 1–20.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   32. 32. Beckie TM, Hayduk LA. Measuring Quality of Life. Social
       Indicators Research. 1997;42: 21–39.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   33. 33. Hyde M, Wiggins RD, Higgs P, Blane DB. A measure of quality of
       life in early old age: The theory, development and properties of a
       needs satisfaction model (CASP-19). Aging & Mental Health. 2003;7:
       186–194. pmid:12775399
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   34. 34. Prince MJ, Reischies F, Beekman ATF, Fuhrer R, Jonker C, Kivela
       S-L, et al. Development of the EURO–D scale–a European Union
       initiative to compare symptoms of depression in 14 European
       centres. British Journal of Psychiatry. 1999;174: 330–338.
       pmid:10533552
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   35. 35. Castro-Costa E, Dewey M, Stewart R, Banerjee S, Huppert F,
       Mendonca-Lima C, et al. Ascertaining late-life depressive symptoms
       in Europe: an evaluation of the survey version of the EURO-D scale
       in 10 nations. The SHARE project. International Journal of Methods
       in Psychiatric Research. 2008;17: 12–29. pmid:18286461
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   36. 36. Prince MJ, Beekman ATF, Deeg DJH, Fuhrer R, Kivela S-L, Lawlor
       BA, et al. Depression symptoms in late life assessed using the
       EURO–D scale. Effect of age, gender and marital status in 14
       European centres. British Journal of Psychiatry. 1999;174: 339–345.
       pmid:10533553
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   37. 37. Tomini F, Tomini SM, Groot W. Understanding the value of social
       networks in life satisfaction of elderly people: a comparative
       study of 16 European countries using SHARE data. BMC Geriatrics.
       2016;16. pmid:27905902
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   38. 38. Fung HH, Carstensen LL, Lang FR. Age-Related Patterns in Social
       Networks among European Americans and African Americans:
       Implications for Socioemotional Selectivity across the Life Span.
       The International Journal of Aging and Human Development. 2001;52:
       185–206. pmid:11407486
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   39. 39. Blieszner R, Mancini JA. Enduring Ties: Older Adults’ Parental
       Role and Responsibilities. Family Relations. 1987;36: 176.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   40. 40. Brandt M, Haberkern K, Szydlik M. Intergenerational Help and
       Care in Europe. European Sociological Review. 2009;25: 585–601.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   41. 41. Shanas E. The Family as a Social Support System in Old Age. The
       Gerontologist. 1979;19: 169–174. pmid:263596
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   42. 42. Fiori KL, Antonucci TC, Cortina KS. Social Network Typologies
       and Mental Health Among Older Adults. The Journals of Gerontology
       Series B: Psychological Sciences and Social Sciences. 2006;61:
       25–32. pmid:16399938
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   43. 43. Li T, Zhang Y. Social network types and the health of older
       adults: Exploring reciprocal associations. Social Science &
       Medicine. 2015;130: 59–68. pmid:25681715
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   44. 44. Litwin H. Social network type and health status in a national
       sample of elderly Israelis. Social Science & Medicine. 1998;46:
       599–609.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   45. 45. Ward JH. Hierarchical Grouping to Optimize an Objective
       Function. Journal of the American Statistical Association. 1963;58:
       236.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   46. 46. Oxman TE, Hull JG. Social Support, Depression, and Activities
       of Daily Living in Older Heart Surgery Patients. The Journals of
       Gerontology Series B: Psychological Sciences and Social Sciences.
       1997;52B: P1–P14. pmid:9008671
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   47. 47. Hank K, Wagner M. Parenthood, Marital Status, and Well-Being in
       Later Life: Evidence from SHARE. Social Indicators Research.
       2013;114: 639–653.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   48. 48. Nelson SK, Kushlev K, English T, Dunn EW, Lyubomirsky S. In
       Defense of Parenthood: Children Are Associated With More Joy Than
       Misery. Psychological Science. 2013;24: 3–10. pmid:23201970
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   49. 49. Gerard JM, Landry-Meyer L, Roe JG. Grandparents raising
       grandchildren: The role of social support in coping with caregiving
       challenges. The International Journal of Aging and Human
       Development. 2006;62: 359–383. pmid:16739469
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   50. 50. Leder S, Grinstead LN, Torres E. Grandparents raising
       grandchildren: Stressors, social support, and health outcomes.
       Journal of Family Nursing. 2007;13: 333–352. pmid:17641112
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   51. 51. Litwin H, Stoeckel KJ. Social networks and subjective wellbeing
       among older Europeans: does age make a difference? Ageing and
       Society. 2013;33: 1263–1281.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   52. 52. Gove WR, Hughes M, Style CB. Does marriage have positive
       effects on the psychological well-being of the individual? Journal
       of health and social behavior. 1983; 122–131. pmid:6886367
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   53. 53. Kim HK, McKenry PC. The relationship between marriage and
       psychological well-being: A longitudinal analysis. Journal of
       family Issues. 2002;23: 885–911.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   54. 54. Wang X. Subjective well-being associated with size of social
       network and social support of elderly. Journal of health
       psychology. 2016;21: 1037–1042. pmid:25104778
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   55. 55. Siedlecki KL, Salthouse TA, Oishi S, Jeswani S. The
       Relationship Between Social Support and Subjective Well-Being
       Across Age. Soc Indic Res. 2014;117: 561–576. pmid:25045200
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar

   Download PDF

     * Citation
     * XML

   Print
     * Print article
     * EzReprint

   Share
     * Reddit Reddit
     * Google+ Google+
     * Facebook Facebook
     * LinkedIn LinkedIn
     * Mendeley Mendeley
     * PubChase PubChase
     * Twitter Twitter
     * Email Email

     [CROSSMARK_BW_horizontal.svg]
   Advertisement

Subject Areas

   ?

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.
   We want your feedback. Do these Subject Areas make sense for this
   article? Click the target next to the incorrect Subject Area and let us
   know. Thanks for your help!
     * Mental health and psychiatry
       Is the Subject Area "Mental health and psychiatry" applicable to
       this article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Social networks
       Is the Subject Area "Social networks" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Children
       Is the Subject Area "Children" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Human families
       Is the Subject Area "Human families" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Depression
       Is the Subject Area "Depression" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Quality of life
       Is the Subject Area "Quality of life" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Behavioral and social aspects of health
       Is the Subject Area "Behavioral and social aspects of health"
       applicable to this article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Socioeconomic aspects of health
       Is the Subject Area "Socioeconomic aspects of health" applicable to
       this article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.

Archived Tweets

   Load more
   View all tweets

     * Publications
     * PLOS Biology
     * PLOS Medicine
     * PLOS Computational Biology
     * PLOS Genetics
     * PLOS Pathogens
     * PLOS ONE
     * PLOS Neglected Tropical Diseases

     * Home
     * Blogs
     * Collections
     * Give feedback
     * LOCKSS

     * Privacy Policy
     * Terms of Use
     * Advertise
     * Media Inquiries
     * Contact

   PLOS is a nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation, #C2354500, based in San
   Francisco, California, US
   PLOS
   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TP26BH

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MQQMGF

   Advertisement

     * plos.org
     * create account
     * sign in

PLOS ONE

     * Publish
          + Submissions
               o Getting Started
               o Submission Guidelines
               o Figures
               o Tables
               o Supporting Information
               o LaTeX
               o Preprints
               o Revising Your Manuscript
               o Submit Now
               o Calls for Papers
          + Policies
               o Best Practices in Research Reporting
               o Human Subjects Research
               o Animal Research
               o Competing Interests
               o Disclosure of Funding Sources
               o Licenses and Copyright
               o Data Availability
               o Materials and Software Sharing
               o Ethical Publishing Practice
               o Authorship
               o Downloads and Translations
          + Manuscript Review and Publication
               o Criteria for Publication
               o Editorial and Peer Review Process
               o Editor Center
               o Guidelines for Reviewers
               o Accepted Manuscripts
               o Corrections and Retractions
               o Comments
               o Article-Level Metrics

Submit Your Manuscript
       Discover a faster, simpler path to publishing in a high-quality
       journal. PLOS ONE promises fair, rigorous peer review, broad scope,
       and wide readership – a perfect fit for your research every time.
       Learn More Submit Now
     * About
          + Why Publish with PLOS ONE
          + Journal Information
          + Staff Editors
          + Editorial Board
          + Section Editors
          + Advisory Groups
          + Find and Read Articles
          + Publishing Information
          + Publication Fees
          + Press and Media
          + Contact
     * Browse
     *

       Search

       Search
       ____________________ (BUTTON)

       advanced search

   Browse Subject Areas
   ?

   Click through the PLOS taxonomy to find articles in your field.

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.

     * Loading metrics

   Open Access

   Peer-reviewed

   Research Article

An assessment of acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL) of chemical
pesticides used on agricultural land in the United States

     * Michael DiBartolomeis ,
       Contributed equally to this work with: Michael DiBartolomeis, Susan
       Kegley
       Roles Conceptualization, Data curation, Formal analysis,
       Investigation, Methodology, Validation, Writing – original draft,
       Writing – review & editing
       * E-mail: mjd@toxicologistint.com
       Affiliation Toxicology Research International, Haiku, Hawaii,
       United States of America
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0003-0618-2581
       ⨯
     * Susan Kegley ,
       Contributed equally to this work with: Michael DiBartolomeis, Susan
       Kegley
       Roles Conceptualization, Data curation, Formal analysis,
       Investigation, Methodology, Writing – original draft
       Affiliation Pesticide Research Institute, Inc., Santa Rosa,
       California, United States of America
       ⨯
     * Pierre Mineau,
       Roles Conceptualization, Data curation, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Department of Biology, Carleton University, Ottawa,
       Ontario, Canada
       ⨯
     * Rosemarie Radford,
       Roles Data curation
       Affiliation Pesticide Research Institute, Inc., Santa Rosa,
       California, United States of America
       ⨯
     * Kendra Klein
       Roles Funding acquisition, Project administration, Resources,
       Supervision
       Affiliation Friends of the Earth US, Berkeley, California, United
       States of America
       ⨯

An assessment of acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL) of chemical
pesticides used on agricultural land in the United States

     * Michael DiBartolomeis,
     * Susan Kegley,
     * Pierre Mineau,
     * Rosemarie Radford,
     * Kendra Klein

   PLOS
   x
     * Published: August 6, 2019
     * https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029

     * Article
     * Authors
     * Metrics
     * Comments
     * Media Coverage

     * Reader Comments (0)
     * Media Coverage
     * Figures

Figures

   Fig 1
   Table 1
   Fig 2
   Table 2
   Fig 3
   Fig 4
   Fig 5
   Fig 6
   Fig 7
   Fig 8
   Fig 9
   Table 3

Abstract

   We present a method for calculating the Acute Insecticide Toxicity
   Loading (AITL) on US agricultural lands and surrounding areas and an
   assessment of the changes in AITL from 1992 through 2014. The AITL
   method accounts for the total mass of insecticides used in the US,
   acute toxicity to insects using honey bee contact and oral LD[50] as
   reference values for arthropod toxicity, and the environmental
   persistence of the pesticides. This screening analysis shows that the
   types of synthetic insecticides applied to agricultural lands have
   fundamentally shifted over the last two decades from predominantly
   organophosphorus and N-methyl carbamate pesticides to a mix dominated
   by neonicotinoids and pyrethroids. The neonicotinoids are generally
   applied to US agricultural land at lower application rates per acre;
   however, they are considerably more toxic to insects and generally
   persist longer in the environment. We found a 48- and 4-fold increase
   in AITL from 1992 to 2014 for oral and contact toxicity, respectively.
   Neonicotinoids are primarily responsible for this increase,
   representing between 61 to nearly 99 percent of the total toxicity
   loading in 2014. The crops most responsible for the increase in AITL
   are corn and soybeans, with particularly large increases in relative
   soybean contributions to AITL between 2010 and 2014. Oral exposures are
   of potentially greater concern because of the relatively higher
   toxicity (low LD[50]s) and greater likelihood of exposure from residues
   in pollen, nectar, guttation water, and other environmental media.
   Using AITL to assess oral toxicity by class of pesticide, the
   neonicotinoids accounted for nearly 92 percent of total AITL from 1992
   to 2014. Chlorpyrifos, the fifth most widely used insecticide during
   this time contributed just 1.4 percent of total AITL based on oral
   LD[50]s. Although we use some simplifying assumptions, our screening
   analysis demonstrates an increase in pesticide toxicity loading over
   the past 26 years, which potentially threatens the health of honey bees
   and other pollinators and may contribute to declines in beneficial
   insect populations as well as insectivorous birds and other insect
   consumers.

   Citation: DiBartolomeis M, Kegley S, Mineau P, Radford R, Klein K
   (2019) An assessment of acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL) of
   chemical pesticides used on agricultural land in the United States.
   PLoS ONE 14(8): e0220029. https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029

   Editor: Simone Tosi, University of California San Diego, UNITED STATES

   Received: June 27, 2018; Accepted: July 8, 2019; Published: August 6,
   2019

   Copyright: © 2019 DiBartolomeis et al. This is an open access article
   distributed under the terms of the Creative Commons Attribution
   License, which permits unrestricted use, distribution, and reproduction
   in any medium, provided the original author and source are credited.

   Data Availability: All relevant data are within the paper, its
   Supporting Information files, and or can be accessed with the URLs
   (E.g., USGS data) provided in the reference section.

   Funding: This study was funded by Friends of the Earth U.S. (FOE). MD,
   SK, RR, and PM received research fees as contractors to FOE. KK is a
   staff scientist at FOE. SK and RR are paid employees of the Pesticide
   Research Institute (PRI). The specific roles of these authors are
   articulated in the “author contributions.” The funders did not have any
   additional role in the study design, data collection and analysis,
   decision to publish, or preparation of the manuscript.

   Competing interests: KK is a staff scientist at Friends of the Earth.
   MD is the Principal Scientist of Toxicology Research International
   (TRI), which is a Sole Proprietorship. SK is the Principal Scientist
   and CEO of Pesticide Research Institute (PRI) and RR is a Staff
   Scientist at PRI. This does not alter adherence to PLOS ONE policies on
   sharing data and materials. There are no patents, products in
   development, or marketed products to declare.

Introduction

   Insects form the basis of the food web that sustains life on Earth.
   They are critical to ecosystem success, providing food for amphibians,
   fish, birds, reptiles, and mammals. Insects play a role in decomposing
   animal wastes and dead vegetation, recycling the nutrients in these
   materials and returning them to the soil. Insects also contribute to
   the agricultural production of crops that feed humankind, both as the
   primary pollinators of many plants and as natural controls of pest
   insects that feed on crops important to human survival. A diverse
   population of insects benefits agriculture by keeping a balance between
   predatory and pest insects and providing pollination services [1].

   Insecticides targeting crop-damaging pests reduce both the number and
   diversity of insects in an ecosystem [2]. With conventional farming
   practices relying primarily on chemical insecticides for pest insect
   management, ecosystems comprising US agricultural lands are highly
   impacted through both direct effects on insects and direct and indirect
   effects on other species [3]. Although many members of the ecosystem
   may not be exposed to sufficient doses of insecticides to suffer
   acutely lethal poisonings, sublethal and indirect adverse effects have
   been demonstrated to occur [4].

Insecticide use patterns in the US

   The types of synthetic insecticides applied to agricultural lands have
   fundamentally shifted over the last two decades from predominantly
   organophosphorus and N-methyl carbamate insecticides to substantially
   lower amounts of organophosphorus compounds along with a substantial
   increase in neonicotinoids and a modest increase in pyrethroids (Fig
   1). Petroleum derivatives such as mineral oil and inorganics such as
   kaolin clay, lime-sulfur, cryolite, and borates remain as some of the
   primary lower-toxicity chemical classes of insecticides in current use,
   with little change over time.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 1. Change in use of insecticide chemical classes in the US
   (1992–2014).

   Data source: US Geological Survey pesticide use estimates for the US
   [5–7].

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g001

   These changes in use patterns reflect the outcome of US Environmental
   Protection Agency (US EPA) re-registration of pesticides mandated by
   the Food Quality Protection Act of 1996 and the development of new
   pesticide chemistries targeting different receptors in insect
   physiology to combat resistance in pest species [8]. These changes have
   almost certainly altered the toxicity landscape for insects. In
   general, systemic pesticides, in particular the neonicotinoids, are now
   one of the preferred or most readily available and economically
   efficient class of insecticides used in conventional agriculture
   practices in rotation with carbamate, pyrethroid, and
   organophosphorus-containing pesticide products, many of which are still
   registered for use in the US. The organophosphorus and N-methyl
   carbamate classes of pesticides are highly toxic to insects but are not
   especially persistent in the environment, with half-lives ranging from
   several days to several weeks [9, 10]. Neonicotinoids, like
   organophosphates and N-methyl carbamates, are neurotoxicants that
   target the central nervous system by binding to nicotinic acetylcholine
   receptors leading to overstimulation and paralysis. However,
   neonicotinoids generally pose lower acute hazards to mammals and
   greater toxicity to insects due to their differential binding abilities
   to invertebrate and vertebrate cholinergic receptors (Table 1) [11].
   The nitro-substituted neonicotinoids, including imidacloprid,
   thiamethoxam, and clothianidin (which is also a metabolite of
   thiamethoxam), are the most frequently used neonicotinoids and tend to
   have measurably greater persistence than the organophosphorus,
   carbamate, and pyrethroid insecticides, with half-lives of 39 to 174
   days in soils (see S1 Appendix for the source information of these
   data). In addition, the neonicotinoids exhibit higher water solubility,
   leading to greater exposure potential for insects consuming pollen,
   nectar, guttation water, or plant tissue or aquatic insects exposed to
   runoff containing these pesticides [12]. On the other hand, lipophilic
   chemicals would tend to accumulate more in the lipid components of
   pollen and bee bread [13].
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 1. Top ten most acutely toxic insecticides to honey bees by the
   oral route.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.t001

   Although the neonicotinoids are highly toxic to insects, their effects
   are not confined to insects. For example, recent analyses indicate that
   insectivorous bird declines observed in the Netherlands and France
   appear to be associated with the use of neonicotinoid insecticides in
   the field or as seed treatments [14, 15]. Another review of the direct
   and indirect ecosystem effects of insecticides linked impaired growth
   in fish to reductions in invertebrate prey due to imidacloprid and
   fipronil use and linked reductions in lizard species to the effects of
   fipronil on termite prey [3]. Surface waters in agricultural areas have
   been shown to contain concentrations of neonicotinoids that exceed
   acute and chronic “invertebrate aquatic life benchmarks” and toxicity
   thresholds (e.g., no observed effect concentrations or NOEC) for
   aquatic life [16, 17].

   Long-term pest control often suffers from pesticide application since
   beneficial predatory insects that consume pest insects are susceptible
   to insecticide exposure and often not as quick to rebound [18–20].
   Prophylactic use of neonicotinoids as seed treatments in corn, soy, and
   other crops has risen in recent years; research has shown that this use
   has potentially damaged predatory beneficial insect populations and
   disrupted integrated pest management (IPM) programs [21].

Honey bees as an indicator species of ecotoxicity

   Honey bees are the most well studied indicator of insect health in US
   agricultural lands and surrounding areas. Because they are economically
   important for crop pollination, honey production, and wild plant
   pollination, the National Agricultural Statistics Service (NASS) tracks
   colony counts and honey production in the US [22]. The honey bee (Apis
   mellifera) is generally considered to be relatively sensitive to
   pesticides when compared to other bee species [23] and has historically
   been used as an indicator for ecotoxicological testing. However, there
   has also been some concern that the honey bee is not a good indicator
   for other bees or other beneficial insects because of species
   differences in autecology and sensitivity [24]. Information is being
   developed on the toxicity of insecticides to pollinators other than
   honey bees, notably bumble bees (Bombus species) and several solitary
   bee species. However, to date, data are only available for a small
   proportion of active ingredients, and tests have not been standardized.
   Heard et al. developed a “standardized” toxicity test system to compare
   the relative sensitivity between bee species in terms of a pesticide’s
   toxic potency and the time needed for the onset of toxicity [24].
   Although there were significant inter-species differences that varied
   through time, overall, the magnitude of these differences was generally
   within an acceptable two-fold range.

   A recent meta-analysis of paired toxicity data from the same sources
   demonstrated a high variability of sensitivity among bee species
   (Max/Min ratio from 0.001 to 2085.7) [23]. However, an extrapolation
   factor of 10 applied to honey bee toxicity endpoints was sufficiently
   protective in 95 percent of cases, and the honey bee tended (as shown
   by a median value of ratios) to be slightly more sensitive than the
   paired test species. Sanchez-Bayo and Goka regressed Bombus LD[50]
   values against Apis LD[50] values and concluded that the susceptibility
   of both genera was similar when exposed by the oral route [25].
   However, the honey bee was found to be more sensitive than bumble bees
   by the contact route even after correcting for weight. It is clear that
   the susceptibility of any one insect species could be substantially
   different from another.

   In our work, we use honey bee toxicity as an indicator for other bees
   and beneficial insects in US agricultural land because the available
   data appear to demonstrate that the honey bee is sensitive to the
   toxicity of chemical pesticides and has the most comprehensive data set
   available for insects. Until more data on other insects become
   available, the use of the honey bee as an indicator for other species
   is a reasonable approach to show how insecticide toxicity loadings have
   changed over time.

   The toxicity database on honey bees is compiled from test results
   submitted by pesticide manufacturers (“registrants”), academic
   researchers, and other independent research institutes. In order to
   register (license) a pesticide product in the US, applicants for
   registration must satisfy several criteria specified in the Federal
   Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (FIFRA) including but not
   limited to the product’s toxicity in a variety of biological systems,
   its fate and impact on the environment, and for certain pesticide
   products, proof of its performance (efficacy) [26]. Acute lethality
   (LD[50]) testing in honey bees is required under FIFRA, however, field
   tests are only required on a rarely invoked case-by-case basis. Despite
   these limitations and data gaps, the acute toxicity data base (LD[50]s)
   for honey bees is sufficient to allow for a comparative screening
   analysis of acute insecticide toxicity loading in the environment.

Assessing the acute toxicity loading of insecticides on US agricultural land
and surrounding areas

   An assessment of changes in the types and amounts of insecticides used
   over time and consideration of potential environmental impacts is
   illuminating. We present here a method for assessing the Acute
   Insecticide Toxicity Loading (AITL) on US agricultural lands and
   surrounding areas for terrestrial insects using toxicity data for the
   honey bee as an indicator for all arthropods. We developed the AITL
   method in order to allow for a screening level analysis of the
   historical loading of pesticides onto agricultural land and surrounding
   areas over the past two decades and as a metric for evaluating their
   potential for causing detrimental impacts on beneficial insects such as
   pollinators and other non-target species.

   Recently, researchers in Great Britain published a comparable method
   [27]. In this work, the authors investigated the occurrence of changes
   in the mass of pesticides used, the area sprayed, and the total number
   of honey bees that could potentially be killed in Great Britain in the
   period covering 1990 to 2015. Our AITL analysis is an internally
   consistent estimate, which accounts for the total mass of toxic
   pesticides applied in the US and to specific crops and the acute
   toxicity of each pesticide to the honey bee. However, unlike the
   previously published method, the AITL also accounts for pesticide
   persistence in the environment (i.e. dissipation rate in field). The
   AITL values were calculated by chemical class, by individual chemical
   for the top chemicals contributing to the loading, and by crop groups
   as defined in the US Geological Survey (USGS) pesticide use database
   [5–7].

   We believe the incorporation of persistence (e.g., as measured by
   half-life in the field and/or soil) of pesticides in this analysis is
   crucial to understanding the long-term and cumulative ecosystem
   toxicity beyond the initial pesticide application to a crop. For
   example, although organophosphorus insecticides are highly toxic to
   insects, they generally have half-lives less than 30 days and do not
   present a long-term hazard for insects. This characteristic allows for
   the mitigation of the risk to pollinators through application timing
   that avoids periods of bloom. In contrast, neonicotinoid residues from
   seed treatments may be found in the soil for months or even years after
   planting [12, 28]. For example, neonicotinoid insecticides applied on
   coated seeds [18], mature citrus trees [29], or as soil drenches [12]
   on annual crops have been found to be effective at killing insects more
   than 50 days from treatment or planting of treated seeds. For perennial
   crops such as trees and vines, insecticidal efficacy can last for
   months up to a few years under certain conditions [30].

   To account for persistence, similar to the methods used to estimate the
   dose of a drug [31], we estimated pesticide loading to the US
   agricultural land and surrounding areas as the area under the curve of
   degradation/dissipation of pesticides over time. We assumed typical
   first-order kinetics, which is used by US EPA to estimate pesticide
   degradation (see Methods).

   The AITL analysis does not account for toxicity effects other than
   lethality or for synergistic effects from co-application of different
   active ingredients. The analysis also does not provide specific
   information on actual exposures experienced by insects in the
   environment nor on the timing and mode of pesticide application or the
   dissipation of the pesticide into the environment. Therefore, the AITL
   is not a standard risk assessment method (i.e., estimating the
   probability of harm) based on quantified actual or predicted exposure.

   We propose that the AITL could be used as a screening tool by providing
   year-to-year comparison of toxicity loading over time, measuring change
   in the potential toxicity of chemicals released into the environment,
   predicting potential impacts of new insecticides being considered for
   registration, and for surveying insecticide use and impacts on
   agricultural land. In this paper, we apply our AITL methodology to
   analyze how acute toxicity loading for insects in US agricultural land
   and surrounding areas changed between 1992 and 2014 and to identify the
   pesticidal chemical classes, the specific chemical active ingredients,
   and the crops that contributed most to these changes.

Methods

Pesticide use data

   Pesticide use data were obtained from USGS and include foliar, soil,
   and seed treatment uses of pesticides [5–7] from 1992–2014. USGS
   reports agricultural pesticide use at the county level, which are based
   on farm surveys of pesticide use and estimates of harvested crop acres.
   Data collected after 2014 were not included, since the data collection
   methods no longer incorporate pesticides used as seed treatments. USGS
   developed two estimates: the “EPest High” estimate that interpolated
   for missing data and the “EPest Low” estimate which simply assumed zero
   use if data were missing. We used the EPest High data for our
   assessment because it provides a more complete and realistic
   quantitative description of pesticide use in the US. It should be noted
   that data are missing from this data set for insecticides used on
   soybean crops between 1998 and 2003 because this question was omitted
   in grower surveys (USGS, personal communication). Also, pesticides for
   which no environmental half-life or either oral or contact honey bee
   LD[50] values were available were not included in the analysis.

   Nationwide, data on acres treated with different pesticides do not
   exist for the time period in question, but approvals for new use of
   systemic insecticides on cropland can be tracked via tolerance
   decisions published in the Federal Register [32]. We determined acres
   that could legally be treated using the USDA National Agricultural
   Statistics Service acres planted data from the Census of Agriculture
   (Fig 2) [22]. By this measure, the acres of US cropland that could be
   treated with neonicotinoids have increased every year, with large
   increases in potential use when approvals were obtained for
   high-acreage commodity crops like corn, soybeans, cotton, wheat, and
   alfalfa. As noted previously, seed coatings comprise the largest
   contribution to increasing use [33], although studies do not
   consistently demonstrate economic benefits to farmers from insecticidal
   seed treatments [34].
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 2. Crop acreage in the US on which neonicotinoid insecticides could
   legally be used based on 2007 data for acres planted.

   Data source: US Federal Register notices, US Environmental Protection
   Agency 1992–2017 [32].

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g002

Toxicity and environmental persistence data

   In calculating the AITL, we used honey bee contact (often referred to
   in the literature as topical) and oral LD[50] values as an indicator
   for pesticide toxicity to insects, referred to as AITL[C] and AITL[O],
   respectively. Honey bee LD[50] values for registered insecticides were
   obtained from a variety of sources and are provided in the supporting
   materials that accompany this publication (S1 Appendix). The database
   for LD[50]s is a compilation of data publicly available from several
   databases managed by government agencies, academic institutions, and
   independent research institutes worldwide. Values generated for the
   technical grade active ingredient were used preferentially, although
   data obtained with formulations were used if technical grade active
   ingredient LD[50]s were not available. Toxic degradates were included
   in the analysis if the degradate was also a registered pesticide and
   the AITL[C] of the parent pesticide was greater than or equal to (≥)
   0.1 percent of the total AITL[C] for the period 1992–2014. In practice,
   this criterion excluded all but clothianidin produced from the
   degradation of thiamethoxam, where 35.6 percent of applied thiamethoxam
   degrades to clothianidin within 90 days [35]. This portion of
   clothianidin was analyzed separately for source clarity.

   Excluded from the analysis were known low acute toxicity inorganic
   pesticides (e.g., cryolite, sulfur), low acute toxicity petroleum
   derivatives (e.g., mineral oil), microbial pesticides (e.g., Bacillus
   thuringiensis), and low-use (<5,000 kg over the time period 1992–2014)
   pesticides. The only high-use, potentially higher toxicity pesticide
   for which LD[50] values could not be found is phostebupirim
   (tebupirimphos), which excluded it from the analysis [36]. A range of
   LD[50] values for honey bees has been reported for some pesticide
   active ingredients, and for some we have concerns over the quality of
   the data. In order to consistently and comparably select LD[50]s to use
   in our analysis, we developed a set of explicit rules which we applied
   in the selection process (Table 2). These rules were used independently
   for both contact and oral toxicity values.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 2. Guidelines used in selecting LD[50] values from multiple
   sources of data.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.t002

   Aerobic half-lives for pesticide chemicals were obtained from several
   sources. The preferred source was the Pesticide Properties Database
   (PPDB) field half-life [37]. If a field half-life value was not
   available in the PPDB, we used the soil half-life from this database.
   If any half-life value for a chemical was not available from the PPDB
   database, the aerobic half-life from the California Department of
   Pesticide Regulation Status Reports for the Pesticide Contamination
   Prevention Act [9] was used.

Acute toxicity loading for insects

   Our approach provides a general measure of acute toxicity loading of
   insecticides on US agricultural land and surrounding areas, assuming
   insects are exposed to pesticides released to the environment through
   direct contact with contaminated surfaces, water, or food or through
   ingestion of contaminated food or water. Different insects will have
   different exposures depending on their habitat, behaviors, and food
   sources; however, across years, exposures for different types of
   insects will be comparable. However, as noted previously, this analysis
   does not include actual or estimated exposure doses, nor does it factor
   in timing and mode of pesticide application. Therefore, the AITL method
   would best be described as a screening analysis that can identify or
   predict potential environmental impacts.

   Honey bee lethality is the measure of toxicity used to assess AITL.
   This analysis was developed for both contact toxicity (AITLc) and oral
   toxicity (AITLo). The AITL[C] calculation provides the number of
   toxicity loading units (TLU) applied to a crop for each pesticide by
   dividing the mass of chemical applied (in μg) by the honey bee contact
   LD[50] (in μg/bee) (the first term in Eq 1 below) to give the number of
   honey bee LD[50]’s released to the environment. This value is then
   modified by the half-life of the chemical (in days), assuming exposure
   continues as long as the chemical is present, with degradation governed
   by the half-life of the chemical and the dose expressed as the area
   under the curve of concentration versus time (second term in Eq 1).
   Because the AITL values obtained are on the order of 10^12–10^18, a
   scaling factor of 10^−15 is included to scale the values for plotting
   the results. The same method of calculation is applied for AITLo (Eq
   2).
   [journal.pone.0220029.e001] (1) [journal.pone.0220029.e002] (2)

   Toxic degradates are known for some pesticide active ingredients.
   However, because environmental half-lives were not available for most
   of these compounds they were not included in the analysis. Those
   degradates with known toxicity (e.g., malaoxon, the degradate of
   malathion) might contribute to overall acute toxicity, although we
   determined that most known degradates would contribute only a
   negligible amount to the overall toxicity loading of the parent
   compound. The one exception as noted previously is clothianidin, which
   is a metabolite of thiamethoxam; our analysis accounts for this
   conversion in the environment because it contributes a measurable level
   of toxicity relative to the parent compound.

   We estimated pesticide loading on agricultural land and surrounding
   areas as the area under the curve of degradation/dissipation of
   pesticides over time, assuming typical first-order kinetics, as
   recommended by US EPA in its guidance [38]. While degradation rates
   vary depending on a number of factors, the first-order assumption is
   widely used for estimating pesticide concentrations in the environment
   over time, and this appears to be an appropriate assumption for the
   neonicotinoid insecticides [39, 40]. An example theoretical degradation
   curve for imidacloprid, with a half-life of 174 days, is shown in Fig
   3. In this example, on Day Zero (application day), the available dose
   is 150 honey bee LD[50]s. On Day One, 149 honey bee LD[50]s still
   remain, with the potential for concomitant toxic effects to insects. On
   Day 174, 75 honey bee LD[50]s remain in the environment. Ninety-seven
   percent of the imidacloprid is degraded at five half-lives (870 days or
   2.4 years). The total integrated environmental toxicity loading level
   over time can be calculated as the area under the curve. Therefore, we
   define AITL as the area under the curve in number of honey bee
   LD[50]-days, representing the total exposure potential for arthropods
   (both terrestrial and aquatic) over the degradation period.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 3. Theoretical degradation curve for imidacloprid following
   first-order kinetics with a half-life of 174 days.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g003

   For pesticides used as seed treatments, our analysis assumes that
   insect exposure from contact with treated crops would include dust
   drift to field-side plants during seed planting (which can be
   considerable) resulting in both contact and oral exposure, and oral
   exposure from consuming pollen, nectar, guttation droplets, or plant
   tissue from the treated crop [12]. In addition, application of the
   seeds to soil would result in exposure of the soil entomofauna and
   migration to waterways would result in exposures for aquatic insects.
   This is a simplifying assumption, which may or may not overestimate
   actual insecticide doses received by honey bees and other beneficial
   insects from seed treatments, depending on the specific circumstances.
   Based on a “residue per unit dose” estimation, it appears that seeding
   results in higher contamination of insects than an equivalent spray
   application but, due to the lower per hectare (or acre) rates of
   application for seed treatments, a comparable level of contamination in
   non-target arthropods can be expected [41]. Because the AITL is
   intended to be used as a screening level assessment for comparative and
   surveillance purposes, the inclusion of seed treatment applications is
   a reasonable approach. Further refinement of this method or other
   analyses would be required before making policy or regulatory decisions
   based on seed insecticide treatments alone.

Results

AITL calculations by chemical class

   A comparison of AITLs calculated for different pesticide groupings
   demonstrates that insecticides contribute nearly 100 percent of the
   acute toxicity loading on honey bees and other beneficial insects of
   pesticides applied to agricultural land and surrounding areas in the US
   compared to herbicides, fungicides, and others (results not shown).
   Based on these preliminary calculations, we determined that the
   insecticides as a class represent the primary acute toxicity loading to
   insects in the environment. Therefore, no further analysis was
   conducted on the other pesticide groups.

Acute contact toxicity.

   AITL values were calculated for insecticidal active ingredients
   comprising several chemical classes for both acute contact (AITL[C])
   and acute oral (AITL[O]) toxicity on agricultural land and surrounding
   areas in the US. Fig 4 presents the relative AITL[C] values from 1992
   to 2014 for six chemical classes as well as a miscellaneous category
   for contact acute toxicity (LD[50]s). From 1992, the first year
   included in our assessment, to 2014, the acute toxicity loading of
   pesticides in US agricultural land and surrounding areas based on
   AITL[C] increased by 3.8-fold.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 4. Contact acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL[C]) by chemical
   class, 1992–2014.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g004

   In the first decade of analysis, between 1992 and 2003, the AITL[C] is
   the result of predominantly four classes of chemicals, the
   organophosphorus (43.4 percent on average), pyrethroid (28.5 percent on
   average), pyrazole (9.4 percent on average), and neonicotinoid (11.1
   percent on average) insecticides. Although neonicotinoids had been
   introduced in 1994, our analysis indicates that the relative loading of
   this group of insecticides into the environment began to increase
   dramatically starting in about 2004 when the relative loading of the
   organophosphorus insecticides began to decrease. In 2004, the relative
   contribution of the neonicotinoids (27.8 percent) based on AITL[C]
   surpassed that of the organophosphorus insecticides (22.0 percent) for
   the first time. By 2014, the relative contribution of neonicotinoids on
   the environmental toxicity loading via contact was 6.5 times greater
   than that of the organophosphorus insecticides. Pyrethroid insecticides
   contributed to the overall AITL[C] relatively consistently from 1992 to
   2014 (28.5 percent on average, range of 26.5 to 36.1 percent). Pyrazole
   insecticides (fipronil) contributed a smaller proportion of overall
   acute contact toxicity loading between 1992 and 2014 (6.2 percent) with
   the largest contribution occurring in a 12-year span from 1998 to 2010
   (11.7 percent on average, range of 4.4 to 23.0 percent)[42], when its
   use on corn was cancelled [42]. The other insecticide classes analyzed
   contributed relatively small amounts to the overall AITL[C] of
   insecticide use on the environment.

Acute oral toxicity.

   On the basis of the acute oral toxicity loading (AITL[O]), the acute
   toxicity loading of insecticides in agricultural land and surrounding
   areas in the US was 48 times higher in 2014 compared to 1992. The
   AITL[O] shows a vastly different trend in terms of relative chemical
   classes over the same 23 year time period compared to AITL[C] (Fig 5).
   Although the organophosphorus insecticides comprised the majority of
   the acute toxicity loading between 1992 and 1994 (69 percent on
   average), from 1995 to 2014 the neonicotinoids comprise the majority
   (greater than 55 percent) of the overall AITL[O] on the environment.
   The pyrazoles contributed on average 7 percent of the total AITL[O]
   between 1998 and 2010 (range of 27 percent in 2002 to 1.7 percent in
   2010), which is consistent with the analysis for acute contact toxicity
   (Fig 4). The relatively greater potential impact of the neonicotinoids
   on the environment based on the oral toxicity data is due to the
   relatively long environmental persistence of these chemicals and their
   high level of toxicity (i.e., relatively low LD[50]s) to honey bees and
   other insects via the oral route (Table 1).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 5. Oral acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL[O]) by chemical
   class, 1992–2014.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g005

Overall toxicity.

   In terms of absolute toxicity loading, the combined AITL[C] for all
   chemical classes for acute contact toxicity increased by a factor of
   about 3.9 between 1992 and 2014 with the neonicotinoids contributing 60
   percent of the total toxicity loading in 2014. However, the potential
   impact of the neonicotinoids is far more dramatic when looking at the
   absolute toxicity loading of all classes of insecticides based on the
   oral route of exposure. As noted above, the combined AITL[O] for acute
   oral toxicity from all classes of insecticides increased by 48-fold
   from 1992 to 2014, with the neonicotinoids representing nearly 99
   percent of the total acute oral toxicity loading in 2014.

AITL calculations for active ingredients

   In order to determine which active ingredients contributed the majority
   of acute toxicity loading on agricultural land and surrounding areas in
   the US between 1992 and 2014, we calculated AITLs for individual
   chemicals representing the most toxic, persistent, and heavily used
   active ingredients in several chemical classes. AITL[C] and AITL[O]
   calculations for individual chemicals are presented in Figs 6 and 7,
   respectively.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 6. Contact acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL[C]) by active
   ingredient, 1992–2014.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g006
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 7. Oral acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL[O]) by active
   ingredient, 1992–2014.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g007

Acute contact toxicity.

   With respect to AITL[C] from 1992 to 2014, imidacloprid (20.0 percent)
   and chlorpyrifos (18.6 percent) comprise the two individual active
   ingredients with the most potential impact (Fig 6) over the 23-year
   period. Other individual insecticide active ingredients contributing a
   large proportion to the overall acute contact toxicity loading include:
   bifenthrin (11.2 percent), clothianidin (7.6 percent), cypermethrin
   (6.0 percent), fipronil (5.5 percent), cyfluthrin (3.8 percent),
   permethrin (2.7 percent, not shown in Fig 6), thiamethoxam (2.5
   percent), spinosad (1.7 percent, not shown in Fig 6), and clothianidin
   from thiamethoxam (1.5 percent). The remaining “other” insecticide
   active ingredients combined comprise 11.6 percent of the total acute
   contact toxicity loading over the 23-year period.

   The AITL[C] for imidacloprid from 1995 to 2014 appears to demonstrate
   three defined time periods where there is stepwise increase in relative
   AITL[C] contribution. Prior to 1995, imidacloprid does not contribute
   relevant TLU to the overall total. The first phase from 1995 to 2003
   indicates that imidacloprid contributed an average of 1,595 ± 344 TLU
   per year for an average contribution of 11.5 percent. The second phase
   from 2004 to 2009 indicates that imidacloprid contributed an average of
   3,441 ± 765 TLU per year for an average contribution of 18.5 percent.
   Finally, the third phase of increased imidacloprid use (2010–2014)
   indicates that this active ingredient contributed an average of 10,288
   ± 1,140 TLU per year for an average contribution of 32.6 percent. The
   other two neonicotinoids that contribute to the total AITL[C]
   (summation of TLU for all active ingredients for all years) in the
   23-year period are thiamethoxam and clothianidin (both as a registered
   active ingredient and as a degradation product). The increasing trend
   in use and contribution to the total AITL[C] begins in about 2004 for
   both chemicals, peaking in 2014 (the last year in our analysis) at 9.1
   and 2.5 percent contribution to the total, respectively. The post-2004
   increases in TLU described above is consistent with the increase in use
   of neonicotinoids for seed treatment at that time.

   On the other hand, the chlorpyrifos AITL[C] remains relatively constant
   from year-to-year over the 23 year time period with an average of 3,490
   ± 810 TLU. However, when computing the contribution of chlorpyrifos to
   the total AITL[C] from year-to-year, there is a steady downward trend
   of relative contribution. The peak contribution of chlorpyrifos to the
   total AITL[C] is in 1993 (42.3 percent) and the lowest relative
   contributions occur from 2011 to 2014 (approximately 8 percent per
   year), with a gradual decline over the 23 year period.

   Fipronil, a pyrazole insecticide, contributed a large proportion to the
   overall AITL[C] from 1998 to 2005, with an average contribution of 14.5
   ± 3.0 percent over this time period. After 2005, the use and
   contribution of fipronil declined rapidly because its conditional
   registration for use on corn was cancelled in 2010 [42], so that by
   2012, the contribution was minimal (less than 0.5 percent). Four
   pyrethroid active ingredients bifenthrin, permethrin, zeta
   cypermethrin, and cyfluthrin, also contribute to the overall AITL[C],
   contributing 11.2, 2.7, 6.0, and 3.8 percent over the 23-year period
   respectively. Individually, these active ingredients show some
   consistency of use and toxicity loading over the time period.
   Permethrin shows a steady downward trend after 2001, whereas cyfluthrin
   and zeta cypermethrin remain somewhat consistent from year-to-year.
   Bifenthrin, on the other hand, shows a large jump in use and toxicity
   loading contribution after 2009, with average percent contributions
   from 1992 to 2009 of 6.3 ± 2.6 and from 2010 to 2014 of 17.0 ± 2.4.
   This increase is largely due to increases in use of bifenthrin on corn,
   cotton, and soybeans[5–7].

Acute oral toxicity.

   With respect to AITL[O], chlorpyrifos follows a similar trend from 1992
   to 2014 as seen for acute contact toxicity with a more dramatic
   decrease in relative contribution over this time period (Fig 7). Over
   the 23-year period, the AITL[O] for chlorpyrifos averaged 676 ± 157 TLU
   per year with more toxicity contribution from 1992 to 2000 (841 ± 94
   TLU) per year than from 2001–2014 (569 ±76 TLU) per year. However, the
   relative AITL[O] shows a steady decrease from the peak contribution of
   28.6 percent in 1993 to the lowest contributions of less than 0.5
   percent from 2010 to 2014. After 2003, the relative contribution of
   chlorpyrifos to the total AITL[O] averaged only 0.8 percent per year.
   For all 23 years combined, chlorpyrifos contributed 1.4 percent (15,545
   TLU) to the overall AITL[O].

   The trend in AITL[O] from 1992 to 2014 for the neonicotinoids (Fig 7)
   is more complicated than seen for the AITL[C] (Fig 6). The contribution
   of imidacloprid begins in 1994 and continues through 2014, loading
   502,699 TLU (46.0 percent of the total TLU loading for all
   insecticides) into the ecosystem over this time period. In the 21-year
   period of imidacloprid use, there is a steady and marked increase in
   the absolute contribution of this active ingredient from year-to-year.
   In 1994, the AITL[O] was 750 TLU, by 2003 it was 10,124 TLU and in 2014
   it was 69,831 TLU. The relative contribution of imidacloprid to the
   total annual AITL[O] over the same 21-year time period shows more
   variation. From 1995 through 2004, the average relative contribution of
   imidacloprid to AITL[O] was 64.1 ±7.8 percent followed by a decrease in
   relative contribution from 2005 to 2014 to 43 ± 6 percent.

   The decline in the relative contribution of imidacloprid after 2004 is
   the result of the introduction of two other neonicotinoids,
   thiamethoxam and clothianidin, after 2000 and 2003, respectively. As
   the use of these two neonicotinoids increased, the relative
   contribution of imidacloprid to the total AITL[O] decreased. However,
   it is important to understand that the absolute contribution of the sum
   of these active ingredients has actually increased dramatically over
   this time period, and the trend suggests that this increase in acute
   toxicity loading on US agricultural land and surrounding areas will
   continue after 2014 as more acres of cropland and additional crops are
   treated with these insecticides. The absolute AITL[O] of thiamethoxam
   increased from 315 TLU in 2002, to 3,882 TLU in 2008, to 7,700 TLU in
   2014. The absolute toxicity loading of clothianidin is more pronounced,
   with a steady and sharp annual increase observed from 2004 to 2014.
   Clothianidin as an active ingredient contributed 8,928 TLU in 2004,
   23,352 in 2008, and 80,083 TLU in 2014. Total clothianidin toxicity
   loading (active ingredient plus degradation product) is 10,632 TLU in
   2004, 28,949 TLU in 2008, and 91,185 TLU in 2014. The absolute
   contribution of thiamethoxam and clothianidin (total) to the total
   AITL[O] of all insecticides from 1992 to 2014 was 500,527 TLU or 45.8
   percent of the total.

   The three neonicotinoid insecticide active ingredients combined
   accounted for 1,003,226 TLU from 1994 to 2014, and for the entire
   23-year period, contributed 91.8 percent of the total AITL[O] of all
   insecticides in the US. By contrast, fipronil, which is the next most
   widely used insecticide active ingredient from 1992 to 2014,
   contributed 3.1 percent. As noted earlier, chlorpyrifos, which is the
   fifth most widely used insecticide active ingredient, contributed only
   1.4 percent of the total AITL[O] in the US over the 23-year period.

AITL calculations on the basis of agricultural crops

   The primary crops responsible for the preponderance of AITL[C] summed
   over the 23-year period are corn (33.3 percent) and soybeans (15.2
   percent), followed by cotton (13.9 percent), vegetables and fruit (12.9
   percent), orchards and grapes (11.4 percent), alfalfa (4.5 percent),
   and wheat (4.0 percent) (Fig 8). Comparably, for AITL[O], the primary
   crops of importance are corn (43 percent) and soybeans (19.3 percent),
   followed by vegetables and fruit (13.3 percent), cotton (9.0 percent),
   orchards and grapes (9.0 percent), and wheat (3.9 percent) (Fig 9).
   Collectively, crops other than those listed above (“other” crops)
   comprise 4.7 and 2.6 percent of the AITL[C] and AITL[O], respectively.
   Although there is some consistency in the relative contributions of the
   crops to the acute contact and oral toxicity loading, the absolute
   toxicity loading is much greater for oral acute toxicity. Overall, the
   total AITL[O] for crops is 1,094,226 TLU whereas for AITL[C] the total
   is 383,456 TLU, or approximately one-third of the AITL[O], which is
   likely due to the greater toxicity of these insecticides via the oral
   route.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 8. Contact acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL[C]) by crop,
   1992–2014.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g008
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 9. Oral acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL[O]) by crop,
   1992–2014.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g009

   The USGS data set includes pesticides used as foliar sprays, seed
   treatments, and soil applications, but does not provide a breakdown of
   pounds used via different application methods. For corn, soy, and
   cotton, seed treatments are a primary route of application and comprise
   the largest contribution to increasing use [33]. Foliar uses are
   increasing. In 2014, there were 33 registered pesticide products
   containing imidacloprid for use on corn in the US; four of them
   approved for foliar uses [32]. For soybeans, there were 85 currently
   registered imidacloprid products with 54 approved for foliar uses. For
   cotton, there were 93 currently registered imidacloprid products with
   63 approved for foliar uses.

   According to the USGS, between 1998 and 2003, the survey methods used
   to collect the raw data for pesticide use on crops did not include a
   field for collecting data on insecticide application to soybean crops.
   Therefore, the data between 1998 and 2003 for soybeans are for
   herbicide application only. In 2004, USGS resumed surveying insecticide
   use on soybeans because it became a higher priority. The impact of this
   data gap is not known, but it likely would lead to a quantifiable
   underestimate of the relative total toxicity loading of insecticide use
   on soybean crops from 1992 to 2014. Interpolating the missing data is
   beyond the scope of our work.

Discussion and conclusions

Potential impacts of insecticide loading

   A decline of pollinating insects is occurring worldwide [43], with
   negative effects for pollination of many domestic crops [44]. Several
   interacting factors appear to be involved, including declines in
   natural and diverse habitat and food supplies resulting from
   agricultural land use intensification, the prevalence of parasites and
   pathogens, exposure to chemical pesticides used predominantly in
   agriculture, and environmental impacts due to changes in climate [43,
   45]. The impact of pesticides, in particular the neonicotinoids, on
   pollinator declines has received the most attention recently. For
   example, researchers in Great Britain used a comparable methodology to
   ours to show that potential honey bee deaths (the total number of
   LD[50]doses applied to arable farmland) has increased six-fold to
   approximately 3 x 10^16 bees over the past two decades in that country
   [27]. The authors attributed this result to the increasing use of
   neonicotinoids from 1994 to 2016. Likewise, despite its simplicity, the
   AITL analysis presented in this paper provides additional information
   in support of the hypothesis that the use of neonicotinoids on
   agricultural land and surrounding areas may play a primary role in the
   decline of insects in the US.

   The AITL calculations might also be used as an analytic tool to predict
   future impacts of newly registered pesticide products by inputting
   anticipated pesticide use and toxicity to insects, then accounting for
   the half-life to estimate the relative potential increase in toxic
   loading to beneficial insects and other non-target species in the
   ecosystem before the product is registered. As a predictive tool, the
   AITL could be helpful in identifying regrettable substitutions before
   products are registered. In agriculture, a regrettable substitution
   might occur when a new pesticide product, which is developed to replace
   a presumably more toxic and more risky product already on the market,
   actually causes greater harm to the environment and non-target species
   than the product it is meant to replace. The AITL analysis presented
   here introduces the concern that the increased use of the neonicotinoid
   class of insecticides, presumably to replace the organophosphorus,
   carbamate, and pyrethroid classes of insecticides could be a case of
   regrettable substitution in relation to the health of beneficial
   insects at least and potentially to other non-target species in the
   environment as well. In other words, this toxicity loading analysis
   indicates that the neonicotinoids are potentially more harmful to
   pollinators and other beneficial insects than originally predicted
   relative to the insecticides it they are presumably replacing.

   We have shown that the introduction and increasing use of the
   neonicotinoids from 1992 to 2014 is the primary reason for the dramatic
   increase in toxicity loading, in relation to pollinators and other
   beneficial insects and non-target arthropod species on US agricultural
   lands and surrounding areas. This is the result of a combination of
   increased use, relative toxicity, and greater persistence of
   neonicotinoids compared to chemical active ingredients used two decades
   ago. For example, in the US, imidacloprid is registered for use to
   control sucking insects, some chewing insects including termites, soil
   insects, and fleas on pets [46]. It may be applied to structures,
   crops, soil, and as a seed treatment as well as a topical treatment for
   animals. In 2016, there were 134 approved residue tolerances for
   imidacloprid, including crops and other applications [47]. In the
   21-year period of imidacloprid use (starting in 1994), there is a
   steady and marked increase in the absolute contribution of this active
   ingredient from year-to-year reflecting its increased use over this
   time span (see Results). In 1994, the AITL[O] was 750 TLU, by 2003 it
   was 10,124 TLU and in 2014 it was 69,831 TLU. If the use of
   neonicotinoids continues to increase as the use of other chemical
   insecticides decreases, then the absolute acute toxicity loading of
   imidacloprid would likely also continue to increase beyond 2014,
   particularly if there is approval of new crop uses of these
   insecticides.

   Although acute insecticide toxicity loading from topical expoures
   (AITL[C]) presents a potential threat to beneficial insects and other
   nontarget species, the acute insect toxicity loading from oral
   exposures (AITL[O]) might present an even greater potential threat.
   This is due to the higher level of toxicity (i.e., lower LD[50]s),
   increased persistence (i.e., longer half-lives), and the potential for
   greater relative exposure via the oral route. In absolute terms, over
   the time period from 1992 to 2014, the total AITL[C] is 383,456 TLU,
   whereas the total AITL[O] is 1,094,226 TLU, which is nearly three times
   greater than the AITL[C.] We found that three neonicotinoid insecticide
   active ingredients (imidacloprid, thiamethoxam, and clothianidin)
   combine to contribute 91.8 percent of the total AITL[O] of all
   insecticides in the US. As noted earlier, chlorpyrifos, which is the
   fifth most widely used insecticide active ingredient, contributed only
   1.4 percent of the total AITL[O] in the US from 1992–2014.

Limitations of the AITL method

   Pesticide use by pounds (kilograms) applied or acres treated does not
   provide a comprehensive estimate of toxicity loading to an ecosystem.
   Factors such as persistence, toxicity, application methods and timing,
   exposure routes, and mechanisms of dissipation from the application
   site all influence the net toxicity experienced by insects in the
   ecosystem. The data needed to do an analysis that incorporates all of
   these factors is largely unavailable.

   As noted previously, the AITL analysis does not account for trends in
   pesticide application in seed treatments nor does it quantify the
   actual or estimated exposure dose of an insecticide after seed
   treatment. In a risk-based approach, omitting these factors may result
   in an overestimation of hazard potential to pollinators and other
   non-target species from exposure to insecticides applied as seed
   treatments. Therefore, a more refined approach would be required to
   estimate actual hazard impacts from seed treatments, in particular for
   the use of neonicotinoids. This level of refinement is difficult but it
   would provide a more accurate assessment of the impact of these
   insecticides on US agricultural land and surrounding areas.
   Furthermore, other factors that contribute to toxicity loading, such as
   the application method and the change in the types of application
   methods used over time, were not evaluated in this analysis. Different
   pesticide application methods (e.g., spray, soil drench, granules,
   coated seeds) result in different exposure potential for aquatic versus
   terrestrial ecosystems, which is not assessed in this analysis. Because
   our analysis does not account for the timing of insecticide
   application, the AITL does not identify “peaks” and “ebbs” in toxicity
   over time relative to the exact time and mode of application. Instead,
   our analysis assumes a steady state from one application to another.
   This simplifying assumption does not affect comparisons of insecticide
   toxicity loading from year-to-year but it does diminish the method’s
   ability to identify specific time periods when toxicity loading might
   be the most damaging to the ecosystem in US agricultural land and
   surrounding areas.

   As is, on the one hand the AITL analysis likely overestimates acute
   toxicity hazard to pollinators and other beneficial insects because of
   the simplifying assumptions used. On the other hand, the AITL analysis
   likely underestimates actual toxicity hazard because it does not
   account for sublethal effects, movement of pesticides offsite, or
   potential synergistic impacts of pesticides used in combination in the
   field. Nevertheless, as a screening tool, the results of an AITL can
   assist regulators in identifying chemicals of concern for further
   evaluation.

Other toxicity concerns

Sublethal toxicity.

   We were limited to using acute lethal toxicity (LD[50]) as an endpoint
   in our AITL analysis because sublethal toxicity studies of pesticides
   in honey bees are currently not required for registration in the US,
   although US EPA has published guidance [48]. Therefore, the LD[50]
   dataset on honey bees is the only insect toxicity data available for a
   large number of pesticides registered for use in the US, which allowed
   us to compare historical trends for all relevant insecticide classes.
   Lethality is at the extreme end of the toxicity spectrum and using
   mortality as the endpoint for the AITL analysis or for risk assessment
   is a blunt instrument for evaluating the impact of pesticides on the
   ecosystem. Because actual toxicity risks to pollinators and other
   non-target species would be higher using sublethal toxicity doses, the
   impacts of pesticides on beneficial insect populations and other
   non-target species is underestimated when limited to using lethal
   doses.

   The AITL analysis can be modified for the input of sublethal toxicity
   doses when data exist. For some of the neonicotinoids, the dataset for
   sublethal effects is adequate to allow for a comparison of the toxic
   effects of these insecticides at high dose levels to the more sensitive
   sublethal effects at lower doses. However, the availability of a robust
   database for pesticide active ingredients is the exception, not the
   rule. Very few studies are available regarding the sublethal effects of
   organophosphorus, carbamate, and organochlorine pesticides on insects,
   so it is difficult to do a comparative analysis with these chemicals.

   In the case of honey bees, reported sublethal effects from
   neonicotinoid exposure in laboratory and field studies include impaired
   reproduction, altered immune function, inability to navigate
   effectively, and behavioral changes in essential colony activities
   leading to decreased colony health and survival [4]. We present a
   listing of sublethal toxicity values (in units of ng/bee) taken from
   representative laboratory and field studies in the published literature
   of neonicotinoids in honey bees in the supporting materials that
   accompany this paper (S2 Appendix). The dose levels reported for
   lethality (LD[50]) when compared to the lowest observed effect
   concentration (LOEC) for sublethal toxicity are noticeably higher
   (Table 3). For imidacloprid, the most heavily used of this class of
   insecticides, the lethal dose for the oral route is 37 times the
   sublethal LOEC and for contact toxicity the lethal dose is 320 times
   the sublethal LOEC. In addition, imidacloprid is also one of the more
   environmentally persistent pesticide active ingredients used today,
   enhancing the potential for sublethal exposures.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 3. Comparison of honey bee LD50’s with sublethal lowest observed
   effect concentrations (LOEC) for neonicotinoids and related compounds.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.t003

   The results of an insecticide toxicity loading analysis of sublethal
   toxicity would likely demonstrate that the absolute sublethal TLU for
   the neonicotinoids would be noticeably higher than the AITL, indicating
   a greater overall toxicity loading on agricultural land and surrounding
   areas when compared to the acute TLU calculated from using the LD[50]
   values. The relative toxicity loading contribution of the different
   neonicotinoids might also change, although it would be difficult to
   predict the outcome without doing the calculations. When sublethal
   toxicity data exist, the calculation of the toxicity loading using
   these values rather than LD[50]s would be informative.

Pesticide movement offsite.

   One of the limitations of our AITL analysis is that, while we account
   for total pesticides applied to agricultural land using pesticide use
   estimates published by USGS (see Methods), we cannot quantify
   insecticide toxicity loading in the impact zone beyond the boundaries
   of agricultural land or indeed the greater likelihood of in-field
   exposure to highly systemic and persistent insecticides such as
   neonicotinoids. This omission will tend to underestimate the toxicity
   loading of pesticides on land surrounding agricultural fields and in
   surface water and other waterways distal to the fields. Including
   persistence in this evaluation of overall toxicity is important because
   persistent pesticides have a greater potential and tendency to move
   offsite unchanged into surrounding fields, land, surface water, and
   other waterways outside of the agricultural fields where they are
   directly applied [12, 49].

   Insects in an ecosystem can be exposed to insecticides through a number
   of different routes. Pesticides run off into surface waters with
   precipitation or irrigation, leach into groundwater, and drift as dusts
   or on soil particulates from the application site in the air, affecting
   insects both on and near the application site. Direct insecticide
   application exposes insects on the crop being treated as well as those
   in near-field vegetation [50] waterways [16, 17], and pooled surface
   water [51]. Soil-borne larvae or adult insects can be exposed through
   direct sprays, granular or soil-drench applications, or through
   migration of residues remaining in the soil from the planting of coated
   seeds. Insects consuming pollen or nectar, or sucking or chewing
   insects consuming plants both on and near the application site are
   exposed through oral consumption. Aquatic species living a substantial
   distance from the application site can be exposed through drift and
   runoff from treated fields that contaminates waterways [52].

   While the toxic effects of an insecticide are highest at the
   application site where the concentrations are highest, dissipation
   pathways such as irrigation or rainwater runoff to surface waters can
   carry toxicologically significant amounts of pesticides into waterways.
   For example, surface water contamination has been shown to negatively
   impact beneficial insects and other non-target species [14, 53].
   Because the neonicotinoid insecticides are highly water soluble and
   persistent, their potential for off-site impacts on aquatic organisms
   is high.

   Pesticides in airborne field dust, which is generated during and
   shortly after application to agricultural fields, also presents a
   potentially important source of exposure to beneficial insects. In
   particular, neonicotinoid-treated seeds (e.g., soybean) contain high
   concentrations of neonicotinoids, which when mixed with field dust, can
   move offsite in the air depositing on surrounding land, flowers, and
   other vegetation potentially exposing pollinators and other non-target
   insects [52, 54, 55]. Additionally, soils in fields treated with long
   half-life insecticides year after year may increase in toxicity over
   time, as the insecticide accumulates in the soil [56].

Synergistic effects.

   This analysis is also limited by the fact that virtually all
   environmental toxicology data on pesticide active ingredients are for a
   single chemical only and not for a combination of chemicals. However,
   pesticide products applied to agricultural fields in the US are
   frequently used in combination with other products and chemicals with
   the potential for concurrent and/or sequential exposure to more than
   one chemical on a regular basis. Furthermore, environmental exposures
   to chemicals occur via a variety of pathways (e.g., contact with
   wildflowers and other vegetation, water, soil, air, and bioaccumulation
   in the food chain), often with multiple exposure routes (e.g., oral and
   contact). Generally, beneficial insects such as honey bees are exposed
   to combinations of pesticide products when they contact pollen and
   nectar and other vegetation in the fields [57, 58].

   Combinations of active ingredients and other chemicals (the so-called
   “inerts”) in pesticide products have been measured in honey bees, hive
   wax, wildflowers, and pollen in the US and Europe [59–63]. From these
   and other studies it has been shown that mixtures of neonicotinoids in
   combination with a broad range of other pesticide active ingredients
   and other chemicals have been reported in bees, beehive matrices
   (pollen, nectar, honey, wax), and food sources, in some cases with as
   many as 121 to 150 different chemicals. There is also growing evidence
   that mixtures of chemicals such as insecticides, interactions of bee
   pathogens and parasites, and combinations of these stressors can
   interact together in additive or in a synergistic manner to increase
   morbidity and mortality in bees [63–74].

   Generally, the outcome of mixing chemicals and/or biological agents
   together is nearly impossible to predict with the limitations in
   capability and throughput of the currently available toxicity testing
   methods. The lack of information and knowledge about the behavior and
   toxicity of chemical mixtures in biological systems is important to
   acknowledge, as is the specific impact of these synergistic
   relationships to overall bee and colony health as well as other
   beneficial insects and non-target species. The AITL assessment
   presented here is based on the chemical and toxicological properties of
   individual chemical active ingredients and does not account for
   chemical mixtures. Therefore, any interactions of chemicals in a
   mixture, beyond perhaps simple additivity, would be underrepresented in
   our estimates.

Conclusions

   Based on our analysis of the Acute Insecticide Toxicity Loading (AITL)
   of pesticides applied to US agricultural lands and surrounding areas
   from 1992 through 2014, using honey bees as an indicator species to
   assess toxicity to a wide range of terrestrial insects, we conclude:
    1. The toxicity loading of insecticides on agricultural land and
       surrounding areas has increased by approximately 50-fold over the
       last two decades producing both direct and indirect effects on
       associated ecosystems. Although current-use pesticides are applied
       at lower application rates per acre, they are more toxic to insects
       and persist in the environment for up to several weeks or longer,
       thus creating a persistent toxicity load in plants, soils, and
       surface waters that is substantially higher than that experienced
       by insects 20 or more years ago.
    2. The neonicotinoid insecticides, in particular imidacloprid,
       clothianidin, and thiamethoxam, are primarily responsible for this
       increased toxicity loading, accounting for 61percent (via contact
       toxicity) to 99 percent (via oral toxicity) of the total toxicity
       loading of all insecticides in 2014. Oral exposures appear to be of
       greater concern because of the relatively higher toxicity (i.e. low
       LD[50]s) and greater likelihood for exposure from residues in
       pollen, nectar, guttation water, and other environmental media.
       However, because the AITL does not incorporate quantified
       exposures, a statistical comparison of toxicity loading via
       different exposures routes is beyond the scope of this paper.
    3. The crops most responsible for the increase in AITL are corn and
       soybeans, with particularly large increases in relative soybean
       contributions to AITL between 2010 and 2014.
    4. The total oral AITL of all insecticides applied over the 23-year
       period is an order of magnitude greater than the total contact
       AITL.
    5. This increase in toxicity loading is consistent with the reduction
       in beneficial insect and insectivorous bird populations observed in
       recent years. However, a more refined analysis of risk, including
       quantified exposures and factoring of application methods would be
       required to demonstrate a clear association.
    6. The introduction and increased use of the neonicotinoids in the
       late 1990s appears to be an example, in hindsight, of a regrettable
       substitution that might have been avoided had proper predictive
       analytical tools been available and applied prior to the approval
       of the registration of these pesticide products.
    7. FIFRA mandates that an applicant for the registration (licensing)
       of a new pesticide product must show that the use of a pesticide as
       specified “will not generally cause unreasonable adverse effects on
       the environment” [75]. Based on our screening level analysis of
       toxicity loading of insecticides on US agricultural land and
       surrounding areas, it is our scientific opinion that existing
       regulations for the registration of new pesticide active
       ingredients in the US are not yet adequate to effectively prevent
       the introduction of new chemicals that are detrimental to
       beneficial insect species such as the pollinators and other
       non-target species.
    8. Using methodology such as the AITL screening analysis early in the
       registration process of new active ingredients or in approving new
       agricultural uses would provide useful metrics with which to
       predict catastrophic harm to the environment resulting from the
       application of chemical pesticides on agricultural land. Expansion
       of the testing requirement to include sublethal toxicity testing in
       honey bees (or other surrogate arthropods) would provide a more
       refined estimate of the true risk of the introduction of new
       pesticide chemicals. Furthermore, implementation of a comprehensive
       surveillance and use reporting system for pesticides that have the
       potential to disrupt the ecosystems on agricultural lands and
       surrounding areas, including pesticide use as seed coatings would
       additionally enhance regulators’ abilities to assess and prevent
       potential adverse effects before ecosystems are damaged.

Supporting information

S1 Appendix. Environmental half-lives and LD50 values used in AITL
assessment.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.s001

   (PDF)

S2 Appendix. Representative lowest observed effect concentrations (LOEC) for
neonicotinoid sublethal toxicity in honey bees.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.s002

   (PDF)

Acknowledgments

   We thank Lisa Archer, Tiffany Finck-Haynes, Aimee Code, and Jennifer
   Sass for their valuable consultation and timely review of the
   manuscript.

References

    1. 1. Lundgren JG, Fausti SW. Trading biodiversity for pest problems.
       Sci Adv. 2015;1(6):e1500558. Available from:
       https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/26601223. pmid:26601223
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    2. 2. Turnbull L, Hector A. Applied ecology: how to get even with
       pests. Nature 2010;466(7302):36–7. Available from:
       https://doi.org/10.5167/uzh-35625. pmid:20596003
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    3. 3. Gibbons D, Morrissey C, Mineau P. A review of the direct and
       indirect effects of neonicotinoids and fipronil on vertebrate
       wildlife. Environ Sci Pollut Res. 2015;22(1):103–18. Available
       from: https://link.springer.com/article/10.1007/s11356-014-3180-5.
       pmid:24938819
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    4. 4. Alkassab A, Kirchner W. Sublethal exposure to neonicotinoids and
       related side effects on insect pollinators: honeybees, bumblebees,
       and solitary bees. J Plant Dis Prot. 2017;124:1–30.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    5. 5. Baker N. Estimated annual agricultural pesticide use, pesticide
       use maps. USGS Pesticide National Synthesis Project. 2017;Sep 11.
       Available from:
       https://water.usgs.gov/nawqa/pnsp/usage/maps/compound_listing.php.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    6. 6. Baker N, Stone W. Estimated Annual Agricultural Pesticide Use
       for Counties of the Conterminous United States, 2008–12. US
       Geological Survey Data Series 907. 2015. Available from:
       http://pubs.usgs.gov/ds/0907/.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    7. 7. Stone W. Estimated annual agricultural pesticide use for
       counties of the conterminous United States, 1992–2009: 2013; U.S.
       Geological Survey Data Series 752. Available from:
       http://pubs.usgs.gov/ds/752/.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    8. 8. Dorsey J, Fekete G, Fong A, Harris J. Measuring the impact of
       the food quality protection act: challenges and opportunities.
       Evaluation report. Office of Inspector General. August 1, 2006.
       Report No. 2006-P-00028. Available from:
       https://www.epa.gov/sites/production/files/2015-11/…/20060801-2006-
       p-00028.pdf.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    9. 9. CDPR. 2015 Status report, Pesticide Contamination Prevention
       Act. California Environmental Protection Agency, Department of
       Pesticide Regulation, Environmental Monitoring Branch, Sacramento,
       California. Available from:
       http://www.cdpr.ca.gov/docs/emon/pubs/ehapreps.htm?filter=grndwater
       .
   10. 10. Lewis K, Tzilivakis J, Warner D, Green A. An international
       database for pesticide risk assessments and management. Human and
       Ecological Risk Assessment: An International Journal. 2016;22
       (4):1050–64.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   11. 11. Moffat C, Buckland ST, Samson AJ, McArthur R, Chamosa Pino V,
       Bollan KA, et al. Neonicotinoids target distinct nicotinic
       acetylcholine receptors and neurons, leading to differential risks
       to bumblebees. Sci Rep. 2016;6:24764. pmid:27124107
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   12. 12. Bonmatin JM, Giorio C, Girolami V, Goulson D, Kreutzweiser DP,
       Krupke C, et al. Environmental fate and exposure; neonicotinoids
       and fipronil. Environ Sci Pollut Res Int. 2015;22(1):35–67.
       pmid:25096486
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   13. 13. Kaplan M, Karaoglu O, Eroglu N, Silici S. Fatty Acid and
       Proximate Composition of Bee Bread. Food Technol Biotechnol.
       2016;54(4):497–504. pmid:28115909
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   14. 14. Hallmann C, Foppen R, van Turnhout C, de Kroon H, Jongejans E.
       Declines in insectivorous birds are associated with high
       neonicotinoid concentrations. Nature. 2014;511:341–3. pmid:25030173
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   15. 15. Millot F, Decors A, Mastain O, Quintaine T, Berny P, Vey D, et
       al. Field evidence of bird poisonings by imidacloprid-treated
       seeds: a review of incidents reported by the French SAGIR network
       from 1995 to 2014. Environ Sci Pollut Res Int. 2017;24(6):5469–85.
       pmid:28028702
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   16. 16. Hladik M, Kolpin D, Kuivila K. Widespread occurrence of
       neonicotinoid insecticides in streams in a high corn and soybean
       producing region, USA. Environ Pollut. 2014;193:189–96.
       pmid:25042208
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   17. 17. Morrissey C, Mineau P, Devries J, Sanchez-Bayo F, Liess M,
       Cavallaro M, et al. Neonicotinoid contamination of global surface
       waters and associated risk to aquatic invertebrates: A review.
       Environ Int. 2015;74:291–303. pmid:25454246
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   18. 18. Seagraves M, Lundgren J. Effects of neonicotinoid seed
       treatments on soybean aphid and its natural enemies. J Pest Sci.
       2011;85:125–32.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   19. 19. Costamagna A, Landis D. Predators exert top-down control of
       soybean aphid across a gradient of agricultural management systems.
       Ecol Appl. 2006;16:1619–28. pmid:16937822
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   20. 20. Hopwood J, Black S, Vaughan M, Lee-Mader E. Beyond the birds
       and the bees: Effects of neonicotinoid insecticides on
       agriculturally important beneficial invertebrates. The Xerces
       Society for Invertebrate Conservation. 2013. Available from:
       http://www.xerces.org/beyond-the-birds-and-the-bees/.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   21. 21. Douglas M, Rohr J, JF T. Neonicotinoid insecticide travels
       through a soil food chain, disrupting biological control of
       non-target pests and decreasing soya bean yield. J Appl Ecol.
       2015;52:250–60.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   22. 22. USDA. 2012 census of agriculture, United States summary and
       state data. United States Department of Agriculture. 2014; May.
       Available from: https://www.agcensus.usda.gov/Publications/2012/.
   23. 23. Arena M, Sgolastra F. A meta-analysis comparing the sensitivity
       of bees to pesticides. Ecotoxicology. 2014;23(3):324–34.
       pmid:24435220
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   24. 24. Heard MS, Baas J, Dorne JL, Lahive E, Robinson AG, Rortais A,
       et al. Comparative toxicity of pesticides and environmental
       contaminants in bees: Are honey bees a useful proxy for wild bee
       species? Sci Total Environ. 2017;578:357–65. pmid:27847190
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   25. 25. Sanchez-Bayo F, Goka K. Pesticide residues and bees—a risk
       assessment. PLoS One. 2014;9(4):e94482. pmid:24718419
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   26. 26. US EPA. Pesticide Registration Manual. Available from:
       https://www.epa.gov/pesticide-registration/pesticide-registration-m
       anual. Accessed May 23, 2018. In: Agency UEP, editor.
   27. 27. Goulson D, Thompson J, Croombs A. Rapid rise in toxic load for
       bees revealed by analysis of pesticide use in Great Britain. PeerJ.
       2018;6:e5255. pmid:30038870; PubMed Central PMCID: PMC6054864.
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   28. 28. US EPA. Fact sheet: clothianidin. US Environmental Protection
       Agency. EPA Publication 7501C. Available from:
       https://www3.epa.gov/pesticides/chem_search/reg_actions/registratio
       n/fs_PC-044309_30-May-03.pdf.
   29. 29. Byrne FJ, Visscher PK, Leimkuehler B, Fischer D,
       Grafton-Cardwell EE, Morse JG. Determination of exposure levels of
       honey bees foraging on flowers of mature citrus trees previously
       treated with imidacloprid. Pest Manag Sci. 2014;70(3):470–82.
       pmid:23788449
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   30. 30. Hopwood J, Code A, Vaughan M, Biddinger D, Shepherd M, Black S,
       et al. How neonicotinoids can kill bees: The science behind the
       role these insecticides play in harming bees. Second edition
       revised and expanded. The Xerces Society for Invertebrate
       Conservation. Available from:
       https://xerces.org/neonicotinoids-and-bees/. 2016.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   31. 31. Gustafson D, Bradshaw-Pierce E. Fundamental Concepts in
       Clinical Pharmacology. Principles of Anticancer Drug Development:
       Cancer Drug Discovery and Development. Springer, New York, NY2011.
   32. 32. US Government Publishing Office. Federal Register. Available
       from:
       https://wwwfederalregistergov/agencies/government-publishing-office
       .
   33. 33. Douglas M, Tooker J. Large-scale deployment of seed treatments
       has driven rapid increase in use of neonicotinoid insecticides and
       preemptive pest management in U.S. field crops. Environ Sci Technol
       2015;49(8):5088–97. pmid:25793443
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   34. 34. Gaspar AP, Marburger DA, Mourtzinis S, Conley SP. Soybean seed
       yield response to multiple seed treatment components across diverse
       environments. Agron J 2014;106(6):1955–62.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   35. 35. European Union. Thiamethoxam Product-type 18 (Insecticides,
       acaricides and products to control other arthropods) assessment
       report. Directive 98/8/EC concerning the placing biocidal products
       on the market. September 21, 2012. Available from:
       https://circabc.europa.eu/sd/a/94c7a2fe-e407-411e-94cb-eadbb3823cd1
       /CA-Sept12-Doc%203%208a%20-%20AR%20Thiamethoxam%20PT18%20post%20SCB
       .pdf.
   36. 36. US EPA. Registration Review—Problem Formulation for the
       Ecological Risk and Drinking Water Exposure Assessments for
       Tebupirimphos 2009; 2009;Apr 22. (PC Code 129086); D360013. Docket
       # EPA-HQ-OPP-2008-0940-0005. Available from:
       https://www.regulations.gov/document?D=EPA-HQ-OPP-2008-0940-0005.
   37. 37. University of Hertfordshire. The Pesticide Properties Data Base
       (PPDB). Developed by the Agriculture and Environment Research Unit,
       University of Hertfordshire. Version 2017; Nov 30. Available from:
       http://sitem.herts.ac.uk/aeru/ppdb/en/index.htm.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   38. 38. US EPA. Guidance to Calculate Representative Half-life Values
       and Characterizing Pesticide Degradation. Available from:
       https://www.epa.gov/pesticide-science-and-assessing-pesticide-risks
       /guidance-calculate-representative-half-life-values. 2015.
   39. 39. Kurwadkar S, Evans A, DeWinne D, White P, Mitchell F. Modeling
       photodegradation kinetics of three systemic
       neonicotinoids-dinotefuran, imidacloprid, and thiamethoxam-in
       aqueous and soil environment. Environ Toxicol Chem.
       2016;35(7):1718–26. pmid:26660507
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   40. 40. Li Y, Li Y, Liu Y, Ward TJ. Photodegradation of clothianidin
       and thiamethoxam in agricultural soils. Environ Sci Pollut Res Int.
       2018;25(31):31318–25. pmid:30194578
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   41. 41. Mineau P, Callaghan C. Neonicotinoid insecticides and bats: an
       assessment of the direct and indirect risks. Canadian Wildlife
       Federation. Available from:
       http://cwf-fcf.org/assets/reports/1809-014-Bats-and-Neonics-Report-
       high_rez.pdf?src=bats. 2018.
   42. 42. US EPA. Fipronil; Product Cancellation Order and Amendment to
       Terminate Uses. Federal Register, Volume 75 (No. 22), Wednesday,
       February 3, 2010, Page 5584. Available from:
       https://www.federalregister.gov/documents/2010/02/03/2010-2147/fipr
       onil-product-cancellation-order-and-amendment-to-terminate-uses.
   43. 43. Goulson D, Nicholls E, Botias C, Rotheray EL. Bee declines
       driven by combined stress from parasites, pesticides, and lack of
       flowers. Science. 2015;347(6229):1255957. pmid:25721506
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   44. 44. Aizen MA, Garibaldi LA, Cunningham SA, Klein AM. How much does
       agriculture depend on pollinators? Lessons from long-term trends in
       crop production. Ann Bot. 2009;103(9):1579–88. pmid:19339297
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   45. 45. Le Conte Y, Navajas . Climate change: Impact on honey bee
       populations and diseases. 2008; 27(2):485–97. pmid:18819674
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   46. 46. NPIC. Imidacloprid Technical Fact Sheet. National Pesticide
       Information Center. Available from:
       http://npic.orst.edu/factsheets/archive/imidacloprid.html 2011.
   47. 47. Federal Register. Imidacloprid; tolerances for residues.
       Volume: 26, Title: 40. Section 180.472. Code of Federal
       Regulations. Available from:
       https://www.govinfo.gov/content/pkg/CFR-2018-title40-vol26/xml/CFR-
       2018-title40-vol26-sec180-472.xml. 2018.
   48. 48. US EPA. Process for Requiring Exposure and Effects Testing for
       Assessing Risks to Bees during Registration and Registration Review
       US EPA Office of Pesticide Programs, 2016. Available fom:
       https://www.epa.gov/sites/production/files/2016-08/documents/bee_gu
       idance.pdf.
   49. 49. Wood TJ, Goulson D. The environmental risks of neonicotinoid
       pesticides: a review of the evidence post 2013. Environ Sci Pollut
       Res Int. 2017;24(21):17285–325. pmid:28593544
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   50. 50. Mogren CL, Lundgren JG. Neonicotinoid-contaminated pollinator
       strips adjacent to cropland reduce honey bee nutritional status.
       Sci Rep. 2016;6:29608. pmid:27412495
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   51. 51. Samson-Robert O, Labrie G, Chagnon M, Fournier V.
       Neonicotinoid-contaminated puddles of water represent a risk of
       intoxication for honey bees. PLoS One. 2014;9(12):e108443.
       pmid:25438051
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   52. 52. Nuyttens D, Devarrewaere W, Verboven P, Foque D.
       Pesticide-laden dust emission and drift from treated seeds during
       seed drilling: a review. Pest Manag Sci. 2013;69(5):564–75.
       pmid:23456984
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   53. 53. Van Dijk TC, Van Staalduinen MA, Van der Sluijs JP.
       Macro-invertebrate decline in surface water polluted with
       imidacloprid. PLoS One. 2013;8(5):e62374. pmid:23650513
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   54. 54. Krupke C, Hunt G, Eitzer B, Andino G, Given K. Multiple routes
       of pesticide exposure for honey bees living near agricultural
       fields. PLoS ONE. 2012;7(1):e29268. pmid:22235278
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   55. 55. Stewart SD, Lorenz GM, Catchot AL, Gore J, Cook D, Skinner J,
       et al. Potential exposure of pollinators to neonicotinoid
       insecticides from the use of insecticide seed treatments in the
       mid-southern United States. Environ Sci Technol.
       2014;48(16):9762–9. pmid:25010122
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   56. 56. Main AR, Headley JV, Peru KM, Michel NL, Cessna AJ, Morrissey
       CA. Widespread use and frequent detection of neonicotinoid
       insecticides in wetlands of Canada's Prairie Pothole Region. PLoS
       One. 2014;9(3):e92821. pmid:24671127
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   57. 57. Long EY, Krupke CH. Non-cultivated plants present a season-long
       route of pesticide exposure for honey bees. Nat Commun.
       2016;7:11629. pmid:27240870
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   58. 58. Johnson RM, Ellis MD, Mullin CA, Frazier M. Pesticides and
       Honey Bee Toxicity in the United States.: CRC Press-Taylor &
       Francis Group, Boca Raton.; 2012.
   59. 59. Mullin CA, Frazier M, Frazier JL, Ashcraft S, Simonds R,
       Vanengelsdorp D, et al. High levels of miticides and agrochemicals
       in North American apiaries: implications for honey bee health. PLoS
       One. 2010;5(3):e9754. pmid:20333298
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   60. 60. Lambert O, Piroux M, Puyo S, Thorin C, L'Hostis M, Wiest L, et
       al. Widespread occurrence of chemical residues in beehive matrices
       from apiaries located in different landscapes of Western France.
       PLoS One. 2013;8(6):e67007. pmid:23799139
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   61. 61. David A, Botias C, Abdul-Sada A, Nicholls E, Rotheray EL, Hill
       EM, et al. Widespread contamination of wildflower and bee-collected
       pollen with complex mixtures of neonicotinoids and fungicides
       commonly applied to crops. Environ Int. 2016;88:169–78.
       pmid:26760714
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   62. 62. Mullin CA, Chen J, Fine JD, Frazier MT, Frazier JL. The
       formulation makes the honey bee poison. Pestic Biochem Physiol.
       2015;120:27–35. pmid:25987217
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   63. 63. Zhu YC, Yao J, Adamczyk J, Luttrell R. Feeding toxicity and
       impact of imidacloprid formulation and mixtures with six
       representative pesticides at residue concentrations on honey bee
       physiology (Apis mellifera). PLoS One. 2017;12(6):e0178421.
       pmid:28591204
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   64. 64. Zhu W, Schmehl DR, Mullin CA, Frazier JL. Four common
       pesticides, their mixtures and a formulation solvent in the hive
       environment have high oral toxicity to honey bee larvae. PLoS One.
       2014;9(1):e77547. pmid:24416121
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   65. 65. Zhu YC, Yao J, Adamczyk J, Luttrell R. Synergistic toxicity and
       physiological impact of imidacloprid alone and binary mixtures with
       seven representative pesticides on honey bee (Apis mellifera). PLoS
       One. 2017;12(5):e0176837. pmid:28467462
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   66. 66. Johnson RM, Dahlgren L, Siegfried BD, Ellis MD. Acaricide,
       fungicide and drug interactions in honey bees (Apis mellifera).
       PLoS One. 2013;8(1):e54092. pmid:23382869
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   67. 67. Alaux C, Brunet JL, Dussaubat C, Mondet F, Tchamitchan S,
       Cousin M, et al. Interactions between Nosema microspores and a
       neonicotinoid weaken honeybees (Apis mellifera). Environ Microbiol.
       2010;12(3):774–82. pmid:20050872
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   68. 68. Vidau C, Diogon M, Aufauvre J, Fontbonne R, Vigues B, Brunet
       JL, et al. Exposure to sublethal doses of fipronil and thiacloprid
       highly increases mortality of honeybees previously infected by
       Nosema ceranae. PLoS One. 2011;6(6):e21550. pmid:21738706
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   69. 69. Aufauvre J, Biron DG, Vidau C, Fontbonne R, Roudel M, Diogon M,
       et al. Parasite-insecticide interactions: a case study of Nosema
       ceranae and fipronil synergy on honeybee. Sci Rep. 2012;2:326.
       pmid:22442753
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   70. 70. Doublet V, Labarussias M, de Miranda JR, Moritz RF, Paxton RJ.
       Bees under stress: sublethal doses of a neonicotinoid pesticide and
       pathogens interact to elevate honey bee mortality across the life
       cycle. Environ Microbiol. 2015;17(4):969–83. pmid:25611325
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   71. 71. Lopez JH, Krainer S, Engert A, Schuehly W, Riessberger-Galle U,
       Crailsheim K. Sublethal pesticide doses negatively affect survival
       and the cellular responses in American foulbrood-infected honeybee
       larvae. Sci Rep. 2017;7:40853. pmid:28145462
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   72. 72. Gill RJ, Ramos-Rodriguez O, Raine NE. Combined pesticide
       exposure severely affects individual- and colony-level traits in
       bees. Nature. 2012;491(7422):105–8. pmid:23086150
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   73. 73. Raimets R, Karise R, Mand M, Kaart T, Ponting S, Song J, et al.
       Synergistic interactions between a variety of insecticides and an
       ergosterol biosynthesis inhibitor fungicide in dietary exposures of
       bumble bees (Bombus terrestris L.). Pest Manag Sci.
       2018;74(3):541–6. pmid:28991419
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   74. 74. Pettis JS, Lichtenberg EM, Andree M, Stitzinger J, Rose R,
       Vanengelsdorp D. Crop pollination exposes honey bees to pesticides
       which alters their susceptibility to the gut pathogen Nosema
       ceranae. PLoS One. 2013;8(7):e70182. pmid:23894612
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   75. 75. US EPA. Summary of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and
       Rodenticide Act. US Environmental Protection Agency. Available
       from:
       https://www.epa.gov/laws-regulations/summary-federal-insecticide-fu
       ngicide-and-rodenticide-act.

   Download PDF

     * Citation
     * XML

   Print
     * Print article
     * EzReprint

   Share
     * Reddit Reddit
     * Google+ Google+
     * Facebook Facebook
     * LinkedIn LinkedIn
     * Mendeley Mendeley
     * PubChase PubChase
     * Twitter Twitter
     * Email Email

     [CROSSMARK_BW_horizontal.svg]
   Advertisement

Subject Areas

   ?

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.
   We want your feedback. Do these Subject Areas make sense for this
   article? Click the target next to the incorrect Subject Area and let us
   know. Thanks for your help!
     * Toxicity
       Is the Subject Area "Toxicity" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Insecticides
       Is the Subject Area "Insecticides" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Pesticides
       Is the Subject Area "Pesticides" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Honey bees
       Is the Subject Area "Honey bees" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Insect pests
       Is the Subject Area "Insect pests" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Agricultural land
       Is the Subject Area "Agricultural land" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Crops
       Is the Subject Area "Crops" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Oral administration
       Is the Subject Area "Oral administration" applicable to this
       article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.

Archived Tweets

   Load more
   View all tweets

     * Publications
     * PLOS Biology
     * PLOS Medicine
     * PLOS Computational Biology
     * PLOS Genetics
     * PLOS Pathogens
     * PLOS ONE
     * PLOS Neglected Tropical Diseases

     * Home
     * Blogs
     * Collections
     * Give feedback
     * LOCKSS

     * Privacy Policy
     * Terms of Use
     * Advertise
     * Media Inquiries
     * Contact

   PLOS is a nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation, #C2354500, based in San
   Francisco, California, US
   PLOS
   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TP26BH

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MQQMGF

   Advertisement

     * plos.org
     * create account
     * sign in

PLOS ONE

     * Publish
          + Submissions
               o Getting Started
               o Submission Guidelines
               o Figures
               o Tables
               o Supporting Information
               o LaTeX
               o Preprints
               o Revising Your Manuscript
               o Submit Now
               o Calls for Papers
          + Policies
               o Best Practices in Research Reporting
               o Human Subjects Research
               o Animal Research
               o Competing Interests
               o Disclosure of Funding Sources
               o Licenses and Copyright
               o Data Availability
               o Materials and Software Sharing
               o Ethical Publishing Practice
               o Authorship
               o Downloads and Translations
          + Manuscript Review and Publication
               o Criteria for Publication
               o Editorial and Peer Review Process
               o Editor Center
               o Guidelines for Reviewers
               o Accepted Manuscripts
               o Corrections and Retractions
               o Comments
               o Article-Level Metrics

Submit Your Manuscript
       Discover a faster, simpler path to publishing in a high-quality
       journal. PLOS ONE promises fair, rigorous peer review, broad scope,
       and wide readership – a perfect fit for your research every time.
       Learn More Submit Now
     * About
          + Why Publish with PLOS ONE
          + Journal Information
          + Staff Editors
          + Editorial Board
          + Section Editors
          + Advisory Groups
          + Find and Read Articles
          + Publishing Information
          + Publication Fees
          + Press and Media
          + Contact
     * Browse
     *

       Search

       Search
       ____________________ (BUTTON)

       advanced search

   Browse Subject Areas
   ?

   Click through the PLOS taxonomy to find articles in your field.

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.

     * Loading metrics

   Open Access

   Peer-reviewed

   Research Article

Butterfly abundance declines over 20 years of systematic monitoring in Ohio,
USA

     * Tyson Wepprich ,
       Roles Conceptualization, Formal analysis, Methodology,
       Visualization, Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       * E-mail: tyson.wepprich@oregonstate.edu
       Affiliation Department of Botany and Plant Pathology, Oregon State
       University, Corvallis, Oregon, United States of America
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0002-6875-092X
       ⨯
     * Jeffrey R. Adrion,
       Roles Formal analysis, Methodology, Writing – original draft,
       Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Institute of Ecology and Evolution, University of
       Oregon, Eugene, Oregon, United States of America
       ⨯
     * Leslie Ries,
       Roles Conceptualization, Data curation, Methodology, Writing –
       review & editing
       Affiliation Department of Biology, Georgetown University,
       Washington, D.C., United States of America
       ⨯
     * Jerome Wiedmann,
       Roles Data curation, Project administration, Writing – review &
       editing
       Affiliation The Ohio Lepidopterists, Columbus, Ohio, United States
       of America
       ⨯
     * Nick M. Haddad
       Roles Conceptualization, Methodology, Writing – original draft,
       Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Department of Integrative Biology and W.K. Kellogg
       Biological Station, Michigan State University, Hickory Corners,
       Michigan, United States of America
       ⨯

Butterfly abundance declines over 20 years of systematic monitoring in Ohio,
USA

     * Tyson Wepprich,
     * Jeffrey R. Adrion,
     * Leslie Ries,
     * Jerome Wiedmann,
     * Nick M. Haddad

   PLOS
   x
     * Published: July 9, 2019
     * https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270
     * >> See the preprint

     * Article
     * Authors
     * Metrics
     * Comments
     * Media Coverage

     * Reader Comments (0)
     * Media Coverage
     * Figures

Figures

   Fig 1
   Table 1
   Table 2
   Fig 2
   Fig 3
   Fig 4
   Table 3
   Fig 5

Abstract

   Severe insect declines make headlines, but they are rarely based on
   systematic monitoring outside of Europe. We estimate the rate of change
   in total butterfly abundance and the population trends for 81 species
   using 21 years of systematic monitoring in Ohio, USA. Total abundance
   is declining at 2% per year, resulting in a cumulative 33% reduction in
   butterfly abundance. Three times as many species have negative
   population trends compared to positive trends. The rate of total
   decline and the proportion of species in decline mirror those
   documented in three comparable long-term European monitoring programs.
   Multiple environmental changes such as climate change, habitat
   degradation, and agricultural practices may contribute to these
   declines in Ohio and shift the makeup of the butterfly community by
   benefiting some species over others. Our analysis of life-history
   traits associated with population trends shows an impact of climate
   change, as species with northern distributions and fewer annual
   generations declined more rapidly. However, even common and invasive
   species associated with human-dominated landscapes are declining,
   suggesting widespread environmental causes for these trends. Declines
   in common species, although they may not be close to extinction, will
   have an outsized impact on the ecosystem services provided by insects.
   These results from the most extensive, systematic insect monitoring
   program in North America demonstrate an ongoing defaunation in
   butterflies that on an annual scale might be imperceptible, but
   cumulatively has reduced butterfly numbers by a third over 20 years.

   Citation: Wepprich T, Adrion JR, Ries L, Wiedmann J, Haddad NM (2019)
   Butterfly abundance declines over 20 years of systematic monitoring in
   Ohio, USA. PLoS ONE 14(7): e0216270.
   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270

   Editor: Jake Kerby, University of South Dakota, UNITED STATES

   Received: April 16, 2019; Accepted: June 17, 2019; Published: July 9,
   2019

   Copyright: © 2019 Wepprich et al. This is an open access article
   distributed under the terms of the Creative Commons Attribution
   License, which permits unrestricted use, distribution, and reproduction
   in any medium, provided the original author and source are credited.

   Data Availability: Data and code to reproduce the analysis are
   available from Dryad (https://doi.org/10.5061/dryad.cf78420). Raw data
   from the monitoring program are available from the North American
   Butterfly Monitoring Network (www.thebutterflynetwork.org) upon
   request.

   Funding: The authors received no specific funding for this work.

   Competing interests: The authors have declared that no competing
   interests exist.

Introduction

   Defaunation, or the drastic loss of animal species and declines in
   abundance, threatens to destabilize ecosystem functioning globally [1].
   In comparison to studies of vertebrate populations, monitoring of
   changes in insect diversity is more difficult and far less prevalent
   [2,3]. Despite this, a global analysis of long-term population trends
   across 452 species estimated that insect abundance had declined 45%
   over 40 years [1]. Recently, more extreme declines in insect biomass
   have been observed upon resampling after 2–4 decades [4,5]. Losses of
   total biomass or total abundance across all species may be more
   consequential than local declines in species diversity, as common
   insect species contribute the most to ecosystem services, such as
   pollination [6]. However, our knowledge of insect declines is skewed
   towards European monitoring programs, including in global analyses [1].
   In this study, we analyze long-term, region-wide trends in abundance
   across a diversity of species for an entire insect group in North
   America to examine the scope of insect defaunation.

   The best source of data to assess insect defaunation comes from
   large-scale, systematic monitoring programs of multiple species [3].
   Through these efforts, trained volunteers or citizen scientists have
   contributed much of the evidence for biotic responses to anthropogenic
   climate warming such as changes in insect phenology and range
   distributions [7,8]. Unlike citizen science reporting of opportunistic
   observations or species checklists, many insect monitoring programs use
   a systematic protocol developed specifically to track butterfly
   abundances through time, both within and between seasons, and over
   large spatial scales [9]. Pollard-based monitoring programs, modeled
   after the first nationwide Butterfly Monitoring Scheme launched in the
   United Kingdom in 1977 (UKBMS), use weekly standardized counts on fixed
   transects [10]. Their widespread adoption enables regional comparisons
   of insect responses to environmental change or defaunation [11,12]. We
   compare our analysis with exemplary long-term monitoring schemes from
   Europe to test if the rate of insect declines generalizes across
   continents.

   The best source of abundance data for assessment of chronic insect
   decline, and the most prominent source of data in [1], is within the
   butterflies. Due to the relative ease and popularity of monitoring
   butterflies, environmental assessments use them as an indicator taxa
   for the general trajectory of biodiversity, assuming that they
   experience comparable pressures from land-use change, climate change,
   and habitat degradation as other insect taxa [13–15]. Intensive
   long-term monitoring of individual butterfly species has provided
   rigorous, quantitative estimates of declines. Most prominently, the
   Eastern North American Monarch has declined by over 85% [16] and the
   Western North American Monarch by over 95% [17] over the past two
   decades. Severe declines have also been observed in some of the rarest
   butterflies [18,19]. These data from individual species of conservation
   concern may not represent a broader trend across butterflies, which is
   what we aim to document in this study.

   Volunteers, organized and trained by The Ohio Lepidopterists, have
   assembled the most extensive dataset of systematic butterfly counts
   that stands alone in North America in terms of the spatial extent and
   sampling frequency of Pollard walks [9]. Three other monitoring
   programs in the United States have documented long-term, multi-species
   population trends. In Massachusetts, based on species lists from field
   trips, climate-driven community shifts explain how the relative
   likelihood of species observations change over 18 years [20]. Shapiro
   and colleagues have made biweekly presence/absence observations and
   Pollard-based counts on 11 fixed transects along an elevational
   gradient in California over more than 45 years to document species
   richness changes in response to climate and land-use, increasing
   abundance at a high elevation site, and impacts of agricultural
   practices on abundance at low elevation sites [21,22]. Several teams
   have monitored declines in specialist butterflies restricted to native
   prairie patches in the Midwestern states with transect or timed survey
   methods over 26 years [23,24]. The growing number of Pollard-based
   monitoring programs in the United States [9] has the potential to track
   how widespread and consistent butterfly trends are across regions.

   Here, we used 21 years of weekly butterfly surveys across 104 sites to
   assess abundance trends for butterflies in Ohio. We estimate population
   trends for 81 species and test for their association with life-history
   traits and phylogenetic relatedness. We review findings from European
   butterfly monitoring schemes for quantitative comparison with the rate
   of abundance changes in Ohio. This analysis provides evidence of
   widespread insect defaunation and species’ declines from the most
   extensive, systematic monitoring program in North America.

Materials and methods

Study sites

   We studied butterfly population trends across the state of Ohio in the
   Midwestern USA. Over its 116,100 km^2 land area, Ohio has a mosaic of
   habitat types due to its partially glaciated history and its place at
   the confluence of Midwestern prairies, the Appalachian Mountains, and
   the boreal forest [25]. Only remnants of wetland and prairie habitat
   remain in the state due to human modification of the landscape. Some
   rare butterflies have declined due to forest succession following
   suppression of disturbances [26]. Agriculture and pastures (50%),
   forest (30%), and urban development (10%) are the predominant
   land-use/land cover classes [27].

   Monitoring sites have a Northeast to Southwest gradient in their mean
   annual temperatures (mean 18.8°C, range from 14.0°C to 23.6°C) from
   interpolated daily temperatures from Daymet over 1996–2016 [28]. Mean
   annual temperatures at these sites grew at a linear trend of 0.3°C per
   decade and growing season length has increased by 60 degree-days (base
   5°C) per decade from 1980–2016. Monitoring sites span the state but are
   concentrated near cities (Fig 1). On average, within a radius of 2
   kilometers, monitoring sites have 24% cropland and pasture, 34% forest,
   and 30% urban land-use based on the National Land Cover Dataset [29].
   Although not considered in this study, impervious surfaces from urban
   development influence temperature-dependent butterfly phenology in Ohio
   through the urban heat island effect, which may not be fully captured
   in these gridded temperature interpolations [30].
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 1. Transect locations monitored by volunteers with the Ohio
   Lepidopterists.

   Of the 147 sites, this analysis used the 104 sites monitored for three
   or more years.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.g001

Monitoring surveys

   Trained volunteers contributed 24,405 butterfly surveys from 1996 to
   2016 as part of the Ohio Lepidopterists Long-term Monitoring of
   Butterflies program. Volunteers surveyed on fixed paths at
   approximately weekly intervals during the entire growing season from
   April through October (median 23 of 30 weeks surveyed per year per
   site) and count every species within an approximate 5-meter buffer
   around the observer [10]. Surveys are constrained to times of good
   weather to increase the detectability of butterflies and last a mean 85
   minutes in duration. The annual number of monitored sites ranged from
   13 in 1996 to a maximum of 80 in 2012. We limited our analysis of
   abundance trends to the 104 sites with three or more years of
   monitoring data and 10 or more surveys per year at each site (Fig 1).
   We included observations of all sites with at least 5 surveys per year
   in phenology models that we used to interpolate missing counts before
   estimating abundance [31].

   All 102 species with population indices estimated by phenology models
   contributed to the total abundance analysis. We limited
   species-specific analysis to 81 species with sufficient population
   indices for estimating trends (present at five or more sites and for 10
   or more years). Species naming conventions in the monitoring program
   follow those used in [25,32] except for combining all observations of
   Celastrina ladon (Spring Azure) and Celastrina neglecta (Summer Azure)
   as an unresolved species complex.

Population indices

   We estimated population indices for each site x year x species by
   adapting methods established for the UKBMS that account for missing
   surveys and butterfly phenology over the season [31,33]. We used
   generalized additive models for each species to estimate variation in
   counts in order to interpolate missing surveys with model predictions
   [31,34]. To account for seasonal, spatial, and interannual variation in
   species phenology, we extended the regional generalized additive model
   approach (12, Supplement 1) by including spatially-explicit site
   locations and converting calendar dates of observations to degree-days
   [35], which can improve butterfly phenology predictions [36]. We
   calculated the population index by integrating over the weekly counts
   and missing survey interpolations using the trapezoid method [31].

Controlling for confounding factors

   We accounted for differences in sampling across sites and years so that
   our modeled trends would capture changes in abundance rather than
   changes in detection probability [37]. True abundance is confounded
   with detection probability when using counts from Pollard walks [38].
   Butterfly monitoring protocols that account for detection probability
   like distance sampling are commonly used for single-species studies
   [39], but untenable for scaling up to a regional program. Most analyses
   of Pollard walks assume no systematic change in detectability (but see
   [40]) because counts correlate closely with true abundance estimates
   from distance sampling [41,42]. We used two covariates to account for
   variation in sampling and its influence on population indices for each
   site x year [20,37,43]. We tracked the mean number of species reported
   in each survey, or list-length, which is a synthetic measure of factors
   influencing detectability such as weather conditions, site quality, and
   observer effort [20,44,45]. We treated the total duration of surveys in
   minutes as an offset in the models of population trends. Because we
   interpolated missing surveys for the population indices, we projected
   what the total duration would be if all 30 weeks had been surveyed at
   the mean duration reported for that site x year.

   Sampling across the state is nonrandom because participants choose
   transect locations, a common practice in volunteer-based monitoring
   programs. Since sites generally cluster near human population centers
   with a greater proportion of developed land-use and a lesser proportion
   of agriculture, we assumed that population trends at the 104 sites
   across the state sufficiently capture the broader statewide trends
   [37]. Comparisons between the UKBMS volunteer-placed transects and a
   broader survey with stratified, random sampling show congruence between
   species trends estimated from each monitoring strategy [46].

Population trends

   We used generalized linear mixed models to estimate temporal trends in
   relative abundance for 81 species from their population indices [47].
   We modeled population indices at each site and year as an
   over-dispersed Poisson random variable with covariates on the log-link
   scale. [journal.pone.0216270.e001] (1)

   We included the numeric year and mean list length for each population
   index as covariates, which were centered to aid in model fitting and
   interpretation [48]. We used the coefficient for year (β[2]) as the
   annual trend in population indices as our main result. We controlled
   for changes in sampling by using the total duration of surveys as a
   model offset, converting the dependent variable to a rate of
   butterflies counted per minute. Random effects of individual sites and
   years account for spatial and temporal variation in population counts
   deviating from the statewide trend. We accounted for over-dispersion in
   the Poisson-distributed counts with the random effect siteyearID for
   each unique observation [49]. We modeled trends in total abundance
   using the same modeling approach, but summed across 102 species’
   population indices for each site x year observation. We interpreted
   trends as an annual rate by taking the geometric mean rate of change
   between the predicted abundance between two points in time after
   setting the list-length covariate to its mean and excluding the random
   effects [47]. For comparisons with other monitoring programs, we used a
   p-value threshold of 0.05 to classify trends as positive, negative, or
   stable.

   Our approach is similar to that used by the UKBMS and other European
   monitoring programs which use generalized linear models in TRIM
   software [50]. One key difference is that our site and annual
   fluctuations from the temporal trend were derived from random effects
   rather than fixed effects, which reduces spurious detection of trends
   [43]. Another key difference is that TRIM does not allow for continuous
   covariates, which we used to account for sampling variation instead of
   assuming no confounding pattern in sampling effort. To validate that
   our modeling choices did not unreasonably influence the results, we
   used three alternative approaches: (1) a Poisson-based generalized
   linear model (Eq 1 without the random effect siteyearID); (2) a
   nonlinear generalized additive mixed model with a smoothing spline
   replacing the linear temporal trend [43]; and (3) a TRIM model with
   over-dispersion and serial temporal correlation but no sampling
   covariates or offsets [50]. We compared similarity in the total
   abundance trends, the correlation of species’ trends between model
   alternatives, and the classification of species’ trends as positive,
   stable, or negative.

Comparison with other studies

   We compare our findings to three European long-term, regional butterfly
   monitoring programs with systematic Pollard walks that publish regular
   updates on total abundance and species’ trends [40,51,52]. Although all
   programs analyzed counts with Poisson regression, we had to standardize
   them differently depending on the data available and their modeling
   approaches. The UKBMS reports total abundance indicators as the
   geometric mean of species trends from two groups: specialist and
   countryside species [51]. We used the reported smoothed annual index
   values for these indicators because the first year of monitoring is an
   outlier that exaggerates declines (UK Biodiversity Indicators 2018,
   http://jncc.defra.gov.uk/page-4236). We used the Dutch Butterfly
   Monitoring Scheme’s reported cumulative annual trend in total
   butterflies counted across all transects after correction for missing
   surveys [52]. For the Catalan Butterfly Monitoring Scheme, we extracted
   annual population indices from the 2015–2016 annual report [53] with
   WebPlotDigitizer 4.1 [54] and performed a Poisson regression over time
   with annual random effects to obtain a comparable abundance trend. We
   converted total abundance trends into annual percent rates for
   comparison. We tallied the increases and decreases in species’ trends
   for each region reported by the monitoring program, without accounting
   for differences in their statistical approaches.

Species’ traits

   To explore potential mechanisms that might explain species-level
   variation in abundance trends, we modeled the estimates of species’
   temporal trends (β[1]) as a response to life history traits [20,30]. Of
   the 81 species, we classified 14 as migratory species and 67 as
   year-round residents of Ohio. We analyzed traits models both across all
   species and after excluding migratory species, which would have
   population trends driven by factors outside of Ohio. We collected
   traits that relate to insect responses to climate change and habitat
   change, as these are two primary drivers of butterfly community changes
   [7,20,21].

   We tested if butterflies with traits making them more adaptive to a
   warming climate have more positive population trends. We compared
   species with different range distributions, assuming that species
   distributed in warmer, Southern regions would be more likely to
   increase in Ohio as the climate warms. We assigned species’ ranges as
   Southern, core, or Northern by range maps and county records [25,32].
   Voltinism, or the number of generations per year, increases in warmer
   years and warmer regions within many species in Ohio [55], compared
   with obligate univoltine species that do not adjust their lifecycle
   based on changing growing season length. We assigned voltinism observed
   in Ohio as univoltine, bivoltine, or multivoltine (3+ generations per
   year) based on visualization of phenology models and [25]. The life
   stage in which species overwinter, obtained from [25], contributes to
   its ability to respond to warming with shifts in phenology [20,56].

   We would expect more generalist species, in host plant requirements and
   habitat preferences, to have more positive population trends in a
   landscape heavily modified by human use [21,51]. For host plant
   requirements, we gathered two traits from the literature that describe
   host plant category (forb, graminoid, or woody) and whether the
   butterfly’s host plant requirements span multiple plant families or are
   limited to one plant family or genus [25]. Mean wing size from [32] was
   used as a surrogate of dispersal ability between habitats, which is
   expected to increase ability to access resources in a fragmented
   landscape. Three of the authors assigned species as wetland-dependent
   or human-disturbance tolerant species, which we aggregated into two
   binary variables to test if these specialist or generalist habitat
   preferences correlate with abundance trends.

   We used univariate linear models for each life history trait both for
   all 81 species and with the 14 migratory species excluded. To account
   for the phylogenetic relatedness and the non-independence across
   species, we also used phylogenetic generalized least squares models
   that estimated branch length transformations with Pagel’s lambda by
   maximum likelihood [57]. The phylogenetic models excluded three species
   without gene sequences available.

Phylogenetic tree

   We obtained coding sequences for the most widely used DNA barcoding
   locus, the mitochondrial cytochrome c oxidase subunit I gene COI-5P,
   from GenBank [58]. For species not found in GenBank, we obtained coding
   sequences from The Barcode of Life Data System [59]. When possible, we
   obtained sequences from multiple sampling locations in North America.

   Owing to the relatively small size of our multiple-species
   alignment—i.e. a single mtDNA locus, 651 base pairs in length—we
   decided to take both a constrained and unconstrained maximum likelihood
   approach to estimate the genealogical relationships of our samples.
   Some of the species from our analysis, though not all, were recently
   used in a more comprehensive phylogenetic analysis of butterflies [60],
   thus prompting us to constrain the phylogenetic backbone of our tree
   using family-level relationships. We report details of our workflow in
   Supplement 1.

Statistical analysis

   We used R 3.5.2 for analysis [61] and share the data and our code on
   Dryad. We fit generalized additive models with the mgcv package [34],
   generalized linear mixed models with the lme4 package [62], generalized
   additive mixed models with the poptrend package [43], and phylogenetic
   generalized least squares models with the ape and caper packages
   [63,64]. Confidence intervals for the temporal trends were estimated
   with bootstrapped model fits with the merTools and poptrend packages
   [43,65]. For models of population trends, we estimated the goodness of
   fit with R^2 developed for generalized linear mixed models that give
   marginal and conditional R^2 values for the fixed effects and the fixed
   + random effects, respectively [66,67]. For trait models, we reported
   the adjusted R^2 values from the univariate models.

Results

   The statewide relative abundance summed across all species declined at
   an annual rate of 2.0% (β[1] = -0.020, std. err. 0.005, p < 0.001),
   accumulating a 33% decline over 1996–2016 (Table 1, Fig 2). Among
   population trends, more than three times as many species are declining
   than increasing in abundance at our threshold of p < 0.05 (32 versus 9,
   respectively) (Table 2, Fig 3 for migratory species and Fig 4 for
   resident species). Positive and negative species trends are distributed
   across the phylogenetic tree (Figure A in S1 Appendix).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 1. Generalized linear mixed model of total abundance across all
   species.

   The natural logarithm of the total survey duration across the
   monitoring season was an offset in the model. The model’s marginal R^2
   was 0.20 for its fixed effects and its conditional R^2 was 0.61 when
   including variation in sites, years, and over-dispersion with random
   effects parameters.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.t001
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 2. Species’ abundance trends over time.

   Trends are the coefficient of year in our generalized linear mixed
   models with the accompanying standard error and p-value for the
   coefficient (Eq 1). We show the data available for each species’ model:
   total number of butterflies recorded for all years, number of sites,
   number of years, and the number of population indices calculated for
   each species for use in abundance model (Site x year).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.t002
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 2. The statewide relative abundance of butterflies (all species
   aggregated) in Ohio declined by 33% over 1996–2016.

   Plotted are model predictions for each year based on the fixed effects
   of year (solid line) and annual random effects (dots) to show annual
   variation about the trend line. Shading shows the 95% confidence
   interval based on bootstrapped model fits for the temporal trend.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.g002
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 3. Statewide trends of 14 migratory species with annual variation.

   Plotted are model predictions for each year based on the fixed effects
   of year (solid line) and annual random effects (dots) to show annual
   variation about the trend line. Shading shows 95% confidence intervals
   based on bootstrapped model fits in the poptrend package [43] for the
   temporal trend and for the annual random effects. The first year’s
   estimate is set to a value of 1 as a baseline for relative population
   changes.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.g003
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 4. Statewide trends of 67 resident species with annual variation.

   Plotted are model predictions for each year based on the fixed effects
   of year (solid line) and annual random effects (dots) to show annual
   variation about the trend line. Shading shows 95% confidence intervals
   based on bootstrapped model fits in the poptrend package [43] for the
   temporal trend and for the annual random effects. The first year’s
   estimate is set to a value of 1 as a baseline for relative population
   changes.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.g004

   Both in the total trend in abundance and in the proportion of species
   with declines, these results are similar to three European butterfly
   monitoring schemes (Table 3). Although the longer-running programs show
   larger cumulative declines, the annual rate of change in total
   abundance ranges from -2.0% to -2.6% for Ohio, Catalonia, and the
   Netherlands. The United Kingdom total abundance trends are split
   between generalist species (-0.8%) and specialist species (-2.4%).
   Across monitoring programs, declining species outnumber increasing
   species by a factor of two to three (Table 3).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 3. Comparison of this study’s results to European monitoring
   programs for rates of change in total abundance and classification of
   species trends as positive or negative.

   Number of sites represents those reported to contribute to the
   analysis, but may no longer be active. Number of butterflies counted
   per year is an approximation based on the most recent years of
   monitoring described in the references.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.t003

   In general, traits associated with species’ responses to climate were
   more important, based on the predictive ability (adjusted R^2) of
   univariate models, than traits associated with habitat and host plant
   restrictions (Fig 5, Tables A and B in S1 Appendix). Phylogenetic
   signal was included for most traits’ models, so we focus on the
   phylogenetic generalized least squares results. The Monarch (Danaus
   plexippus) was the only migratory species in decline, although the
   others had erratic annual fluctuations that make trend estimation
   difficult (Fig 3). Species with more northern geographic ranges were
   associated with more negative population trends. Univoltine species had
   more negative population trends than bivoltine or multivoltine species.
   Overwintering stage did not have a strong effect on trend. Species
   eating forb host plants had negative trends on average, but there was
   no effect of host plant specialization on population trends. Wing
   length, wetland habitat preference, or human-disturbed habitat
   preference were not associated with trends.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 5. Species’ traits are associated with variation in the statewide
   trends in abundance.

   We plot each species’ trend compared to the six most important traits
   for the 78 species included in the phylogenetic GLS models with full
   results in Table A in S1 Appendix. Squares represent the regression
   coefficients with 95% confidence intervals shown in lines. Dots show
   trend estimates for each species from Table 1 uncorrected for
   phylogeny, jittered for visualization.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.g005

   Our choice of modeling approach did not change the overall evidence of
   defaunation. Generalized linear mixed models with Poisson-distributed
   errors and generalized additive mixed models estimated declines in
   total abundance similar in magnitude at -1.83% and -2.13% annual rates,
   respectively. The annual trend estimate from TRIM, without sampling
   covariates, was half the magnitude at -0.87%. Species’ trends had high
   correlations between pairwise comparisons, but TRIM models estimated
   notably more positive trends compared to the other three approaches
   (Table C in S1 Appendix).

Discussion

   We show that the total butterfly abundance has declined by 33% over 20
   years in Ohio. This rate is faster than the global abundance trend
   estimated for Lepidoptera (35% over 40 years) and corresponds more
   closely to the steeper declines (45% over 40 years) estimated for all
   insects [1]. The Ohio butterfly monitoring program, judged by the
   weekly frequency, 20-year time period, and statewide spatial extent of
   its surveys, is the most extensive systematic insect survey in North
   America and comparable to three exemplary European butterfly monitoring
   schemes. The annualized 2% rate of decline in this study aligns closely
   with trends from European butterfly monitoring, confirming the decline
   of the most closely monitored group of insects in both Europe and North
   America (Table 3). With less known about other insect taxa, butterflies
   provide a necessary, if imperfect, surrogate to understand the
   trajectory and potential mechanisms behind broader insect trends [13].
   Extensive in both time and space, the decline in butterfly abundance
   reported here is the best estimate for the current rate of insect
   defaunation in North America.

   The proportion of butterfly species with population declines compared
   to population increases is similar between Ohio (negative trends three
   times more numerous) and European studies (negative trends 2–3 times
   more numerous) (Table 3). In other taxa, moths in the United Kingdom
   show a similar proportion of species declines [68]. Long-term
   monitoring in protected areas, although less extensive in space, shows
   more positive species trends for moths in Finland (at 67.7° latitude)
   and across pollinators in Spain (at 850–1750 m. elevations) [69,70].
   These counterexamples show how insect communities may shift at
   high-latitude or high-elevation sites with anthropogenic climate
   warming [21] or may persist in more remote areas. However, butterfly
   monitoring in populated areas show a consistency in observed declines
   (Table 3) that we argue would generalize to other landscapes dominated
   by human use.

   We demonstrate abundance declines in species that are generalist,
   widespread, and not considered vulnerable to extinction [25,71].
   Although few may share concern for the most widespread, invasive
   butterfly in the world’s agricultural and urban settings [72], declines
   in Pieris rapae could be indicative of persistent environmental
   stressors that would affect other species as well. Generalist species
   that exploit human-disturbed habitat with annual rates of decline of
   more than 5% include Lycaena phlaeas, Thymelicus lineola (non-native),
   Cercyonis pegala, and Colias eurytheme (Table 2, Fig 4). We would
   expect negative environmental changes to disproportionately affect rare
   species prone to the demographic dangers of small populations or
   specialist species that rely on a narrow range of resources or habitat
   (UKBMS in Table 3, [24]). This pattern of species declines would lead
   to biotic homogenization as rarer species are lost and common,
   disturbance-tolerant species remain [73,74]. However, our study adds
   another example of declines in common butterfly species thought to be
   well-suited to human-modified habitat [11,21,75].

   The Eastern North American migratory Monarch (Danaus plexippus)
   abundance in Ohio is declining by 7% per year. The Monarch is the only
   declining migratory species out of 14 in our analysis. Despite
   disagreements about whether summer abundance trends have tracked winter
   colony declines [76,77], our study shows that the long-term trends
   correspond. However, our study’s first two years have very high Monarch
   population indices which could be outliers (Fig 3) following the two
   largest recorded winter population counts [16,78]. With these two years
   removed, the statewide Monarch trend is a 4% decline per year, showing
   that the magnitude of summer abundance trends are sensitive to the
   years of data included. Our results align with a study using Illinois
   systematic monitoring data that shows a summer abundance decline for
   monarchs over two decades, but only during the period from 1994–2003,
   not from 2004–2013 [79]. A more recent study showed no decline during
   the summer during 2004–2016 using a population index from NABA counts
   [78]. The trend we document comes from the sum of multiple summer
   breeding generations and fall migratory butterflies returning to
   Mexico; estimates of abundance for these separate generations may be
   required to model how different stages of the lifecycle contribute to
   the long-term decline in the winter colonies [78].

   Our statewide analysis has potential limitations when used to evaluate
   individual species for potential conservation interventions or
   forecasts of population trajectories. Even with systematic monitoring,
   accurate estimates of insect abundance are missing from many species—a
   fifth of regularly observed species in Ohio did not meet our minimum
   data requirements to for us to estimate trends. None of these species
   are considered to be of conservation concern, but this also means that
   we would be limited in our ability to determine if their populations
   have reached threatened status. Targeted surveys of selected species,
   non-adult life stages, or rarely-sampled habitats can expand the
   monitoring to data-deficient species commonly excluded by protocols
   designed to monitor many species efficiently [51] and can be used to
   estimate demographic responses to environmental drivers not apparent
   from adult butterfly counts [80]. Additional targeted species
   assessments could inform how worried we should be about the extreme
   population declines estimated for species observed at fewer than 10
   monitoring sites (Table 2). However, more data and more complex
   population models may not always lead to accurate predictions for
   insect population trajectories [81]. Rather than recommending other
   systematic monitoring programs accumulate decades of data before
   assessing insect declines, we would advocate sharing data across
   regional programs to increase statistical power, as in [11], and
   integrating systematic monitoring with historical records and
   opportunistic observations to assess insect vulnerability more rapidly
   by using all potential sources of data [82,83].

   Insect declines have multifaceted causes, and the relative impact of
   these causes is still unknown [84]. Although analysis of the causes of
   site differences in abundance or species trends is beyond the scope of
   this study, we discuss three environmental drivers commonly associated
   with global insect declines: habitat loss and fragmentation, climate
   change, and agricultural intensification [84,85]. If species’ traits
   are associated with population trends, then their relationships may
   suggest which environmental changes affect population responses in
   species sharing these traits [47,84,86]. In this study, life-history
   traits were weakly predictive of population trends, but their
   associations provide hypotheses that could be tested further [47].

Habitat loss and fragmentation

   In Ohio, habitat loss and fragmentation plateaued well before butterfly
   monitoring started, with human population growth slowing by 1970. In
   common with other Midwestern states, Ohio had already lost tallgrass
   prairie species, such as the Regal Fritillary (Speyeria idalia), due to
   habitat conversion to agriculture [25,26]. Land-use has changed slowly
   over the course of the monitoring program; fewer than 10% of monitoring
   sites have had more than 2.5% change in the surrounding (2-km radius)
   developed, agriculture, or forest land cover from 2001–2011 [29]. The
   persistence of butterfly populations in a landscape of habitat
   fragments are mediated by species’ traits that permit them to either
   move between more isolated resources or persist in smaller, localized
   populations [85,87]. Wing size is one life history trait associated
   with dispersal ability, but it had no association with species’
   population trends (Tables A and B in S1 Appendix). However, defining
   habitat patches by land-use classes overlooks how mobile insect
   populations are bound by resources, varying across the lifecycle,
   rather than area [88,89]. Although there has been little wholesale
   habitat conversion around our study transects, degradation of the
   remaining habitat could be a cause of the general decline in butterfly
   abundance.

Climate change

   Species trends are associated with two life-history traits, voltinism
   and range distribution, which suggest that the butterfly community is
   changing with the warming climate. Species that only complete one
   annual generation, or univoltine species, had more negative abundance
   trends. This aligns with obligate univoltine species becoming less
   common in Massachusetts [20], but is the opposite of the findings in
   Spain where multivoltine species are in steeper declines with exposure
   to increasingly dry summers [40]. Multivoltine species may be more
   adaptive to annual and spatial variation in growing season length as
   many have plasticity in the voltinism observed within Ohio [25]. For
   many species with flexible voltinism in Ohio, adding an extra
   generation in warmer summers increases their annual population growth
   rates [55]. Northern-distributed species have more negative population
   trends compared to widely distributed or southern species. This
   corresponds with findings from Massachusetts and Europe that
   warm-adapted species are replacing cool-adapted species as range
   distributions shift [20,90]. Even though these two traits should
   increase abundance for some species as the climate warms, it has not
   been enough to prevent the overall decline in butterfly abundance.

Agricultural intensification

   Cropland and pasture make up half of Ohio’s land area, so we would
   expect agricultural practices to affect statewide insect abundance. One
   assessment of pollinator habitat suitability based on land-use,
   conservation reserve program acreage, and crop type estimated an
   increase in resources in Ohio from 1982 through 2002, followed by a
   stable trend [91]. However, agricultural practices can decrease insect
   abundance with systemic insecticides, herbicide use on host plants or
   nectar resources, and nitrogen fertilization that alters the
   composition of surrounding plant communities.

   In Ohio, the use of neonicotinoids rapidly increased after 2004 when
   they became widely used on corn and soybeans [92,93]. The mechanistic
   link between neonicotinoid insecticides and insect declines is
   established and observational studies have shown widespread impacts of
   their use [94–96]. Even though seed-coatings with neonicotinoids reduce
   broadcast spraying, the mechanical planting of these seeds exposes
   widespread areas around farms to contaminated dust that exposes
   non-target plants and insects to biologically-relevant concentrations
   [97,98]. In the United Kingdom and California, neonicotinoids are
   associated with butterfly declines [22,99] and hinder butterfly larval
   development on host plants [100]. We did not design this study to test
   whether neonicotinoids affect butterfly abundance in Ohio. However, the
   observed declines across common and generalist species, which we
   otherwise would expect to exploit an agricultural or human-altered
   landscape, would be consistent with widespread exposure to
   insecticides.

   Species that eat forbs as larvae have negative population trends (Fig
   5). Both herbicide use and nitrogen deposition may alter plant
   communities to favor grasses over forbs [101]. In Ohio, glyphosate use
   has increased linearly, and is now applied at 6 times the rate it was
   in 1996 [92,93]. Milkweed losses, attributed to increased glyphosate
   use in the Midwest, contribute to declines in Monarch butterfly
   abundance [79,80]. Nitrogen increases, which may come from
   fertilization or atmospheric deposition, have been linked to declines
   in grassland butterfly species adapted to low-nitrogen environments
   [102–104] and to higher mortality during larval development on enriched
   host plants [105].

Conclusions

   Systematic, long-term surveys of butterflies provide the most rigorous
   estimate for the rate of insect declines. This study demonstrates that
   defaunation is happening in North America similarly to Europe. In
   landscapes comprising natural areas amid heavy human land-use,
   butterfly total abundance is declining at 2% per year and 2–3 times
   more species have population trends declining rather than increasing.
   Additional Pollard-based monitoring programs in North America, listed
   in [9], will enable tracking insect trends over larger spatial extents
   as will efforts to integrate data across European monitoring schemes
   [11]. The rates for other insect groups may deviate from this baseline
   and were previously estimated to be declining more rapidly than
   Lepidoptera [1]. Expanded monitoring and support for taxonomists are
   imperative for other taxa and under sampled regions, like the Tropics
   where most insect diversity resides. Besides the evaluation if
   butterfly trends generalize to other insects, the most urgent research
   needs are understanding the causes of decline and testing mitigation
   strategies. As butterflies are the best-monitored insect taxa, they are
   the best indicator of the baseline threat to the 5.5 million insect
   species, the most diverse group of animals on earth.

Supporting information

S1 Appendix. Supplementary methods and results.

   Includes detailed methods for phenology models and phylogenetic trees,
   a figure of species trends plotted on a cladogram, two tables of model
   results from the trait analysis, and a table comparing our trend
   estimates with three other approaches.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.s001

   (DOCX)

Acknowledgments

   We thank the volunteers and directors who contribute their time and
   expertise to the Ohio butterfly monitoring program. The Ohio Department
   of Natural Resources provides support, the Cleveland Museum of Natural
   History provides data entry and archiving, and the Ohio Lepidopterists
   provides training and coordination for the Ohio butterfly monitoring
   program. We thank Marjorie Weber for advice on our phylogenetic
   analysis. The Department of the Interior Southeast Climate Adaptation
   Science Center and North Carolina State University supported TW during
   earlier work with Ohio butterflies that grew into this analysis.

References

    1. 1. Dirzo R, Young HS, Galetti M, Ceballos G, Isaac NJB, Collen B.
       Defaunation in the Anthropocene. Science. 2014;345: 401–406.
       pmid:25061202
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    2. 2. May RM. How many species are there on earth? Science. 1988;241:
       1441–1449. pmid:17790039
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    3. 3. Conrad KF, Fox R, Woiwod IP. Monitoring biodiversity: measuring
       long-term changes in insect abundance. Insect conservation biology.
       2007; 203–225.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    4. 4. Hallmann CA, Sorg M, Jongejans E, Siepel H, Hofland N, Schwan H,
       et al. More than 75 percent decline over 27 years in total flying
       insect biomass in protected areas. Lamb EG, editor. PLOS ONE.
       2017;12: e0185809. pmid:29045418
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    5. 5. Lister BC, Garcia A. Climate-driven declines in arthropod
       abundance restructure a rainforest food web. PNAS. 2018;115:
       E10397–E10406. pmid:30322922
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    6. 6. Winfree RW. Fox J, Williams NM, Reilly JR, Cariveau DP.
       Abundance of common species, not species richness, drives delivery
       of a real-world ecosystem service. Shea K, editor. Ecology Letters.
       2015;18: 626–635. pmid:25959973
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    7. 7. Warren MS, Hill JK, Thomas JA, Asher J, Fox R, Huntley B, et al.
       Rapid responses of British butterflies to opposing forces of
       climate and habitat change. 2001;414: 5.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    8. 8. Parmesan C. Ecological and Evolutionary Responses to Recent
       Climate Change. Annual Review of Ecology, Evolution, and
       Systematics. 2006;37: 637–669.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    9. 9. Taron D, Ries L. Butterfly Monitoring for Conservation. In:
       Daniels JC, editor. Butterfly Conservation in North America.
       Dordrecht: Springer Netherlands; 2015. pp. 35–57.
   10. 10. Pollard E, Yates TJ. Monitoring butterflies for ecology and
       conservation: the British butterfly monitoring scheme. Springer
       Science & Business Media; 1994.
   11. 11. Van Swaay C, Van Strien A, Aghababyan K, Astrom S, Botham M,
       Brereton T, et al. The European Butterfly Indicator for Grassland
       species: 1990–2013. 2015;
   12. 12. Schmucki R, Pe’er G, Roy DB, Stefanescu C, Van Swaay CAM,
       Oliver TH, et al. A regionally informed abundance index for
       supporting integrative analyses across butterfly monitoring
       schemes. Müller J, editor. Journal of Applied Ecology. 2016;53:
       501–510.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   13. 13. Thomas JA. Monitoring change in the abundance and distribution
       of insects using butterflies and other indicator groups.
       Philosophical Transactions of the Royal Society B: Biological
       Sciences. 2005;360: 339–357. pmid:15814349
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   14. 14. Brereton T, Roy DB, Middlebrook I, Botham M, Warren M. The
       development of butterfly indicators in the United Kingdom and
       assessments in 2010. Journal of Insect Conservation. 2011;15:
       139–151.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   15. 15. Dennis EB, Morgan BJT, Roy DB, Brereton TM. Urban indicators
       for UK butterflies. Ecological Indicators. 2017;76: 184–193.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   16. 16. Agrawal AA, Inamine H. Mechanisms behind the monarch’s decline.
       Science. 2018;360: 1294–1296. pmid:29930122
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   17. 17. Schultz CB, Brown LM, Pelton E, Crone EE. Citizen science
       monitoring demonstrates dramatic declines of monarch butterflies in
       western North America. Biological Conservation. 2017;214: 343–346.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   18. 18. Belitz MW, Hendrick LK, Monfils MJ, Cuthrell DL, Marshall CJ,
       Kawahara AY, et al. Aggregated occurrence records of the federally
       endangered Poweshiek skipperling (Oarisma poweshiek). Biodiversity
       data journal. 2018;
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   19. 19. Haddad NM. Resurrection and resilience of the rarest
       butterflies. PLOS Biology. 2018;16: e2003488. pmid:29408908
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   20. 20. Breed GA, Stichter S, Crone EE. Climate-driven changes in
       northeastern US butterfly communities. Nature Climate Change.
       2013;3: 142–145.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   21. 21. Forister ML, McCall AC, Sanders NJ, Fordyce JA, Thorne JH,
       O’Brien J, et al. Compounded effects of climate change and habitat
       alteration shift patterns of butterfly diversity. Proceedings of
       the National Academy of Sciences. 2010;107: 2088–2092.
       pmid:20133854
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   22. 22. Forister ML, Cousens B, Harrison JG, Anderson K, Thorne JH,
       Waetjen D, et al. Increasing neonicotinoid use and the declining
       butterfly fauna of lowland California. Biology Letters. 2016;12:
       20160475. pmid:27531159
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   23. 23. Schlicht D, Swengel A, Swengel S. Meta-analysis of survey data
       to assess trends of prairie butterflies in Minnesota, USA during
       1979–2005. Journal of Insect Conservation. 2009;13: 429–447.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   24. 24. Swengel SR, Schlicht D, Olsen F, Swengel AB. Declines of
       prairie butterflies in the midwestern USA. Journal of Insect
       Conservation. 2011;15: 327–339.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   25. 25. Iftner DC, Shuey JA, Calhoun JV. Butterflies and skippers of
       Ohio. College of Biological Sciences, Ohio State University; 1992.
   26. 26. Shuey JA, Calhoun JV, Iftner DC. Butterflies that are
       endangered, threatened, and of special concern in Ohio. 1987;
   27. 27. Bigelow D, Borchers A. Major uses of land in the United States,
       2012 [Internet]. USDA Economic Research Service; 2017. Report No.:
       EIB-178.
       https://www.ers.usda.gov/publications/pub-details/?pubid=84879
   28. 28. Thornton PE, Running SW, White MA. Generating surfaces of daily
       meteorological variables over large regions of complex terrain.
       Journal of Hydrology. 1997;190: 214–251.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   29. 29. Homer C, Dewitz J, Yang L, Jin S, Danielson P, Xian G, et al.
       Completion of the 2011 National Land Cover Database for the
       conterminous United States–representing a decade of land cover
       change information. Photogrammetric Engineering & Remote Sensing.
       2015;81: 345–354.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   30. 30. Diamond SE, Cayton H, Wepprich T, Jenkins CN, Dunn RR, Haddad
       NM, et al. Unexpected phenological responses of butterflies to the
       interaction of urbanization and geographic temperature. Ecology.
       2014;95: 2613–2621.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   31. 31. Dennis EB, Freeman SN, Brereton T, Roy DB. Indexing butterfly
       abundance whilst accounting for missing counts and variability in
       seasonal pattern. O’Hara RB, editor. Methods in Ecology and
       Evolution. 2013;4: 637–645.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   32. 32. Opler PA, Krizek GO. Butterflies east of the Great Plains: an
       illustrated natural history. Johns Hopkins Univ Pr; 1984.
   33. 33. Dennis EB, Morgan BJT, Freeman SN, Brereton TM, Roy DB. A
       generalized abundance index for seasonal invertebrates: A
       Generalized Abundance Index for Seasonal Invertebrates. Biometrics.
       2016;72: 1305–1314.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   34. 34. Wood SN. Generalized Additive Models: An Introduction with R.
       2nd ed. Chapman and Hall/CRC; 2017.
   35. 35. Cordano EE& E. Interpol.T: Hourly interpolation of multiple
       temperature daily series [Internet]. 2013.
       https://CRAN.R-project.org/package=Interpol.T
   36. 36. Cayton HL, Haddad NM, Gross K, Diamond SE, Ries L. Do growing
       degree days predict phenology across butterfly species? Ecology.
       2015;96: 1473–1479.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   37. 37. Link WA, Sauer JR. Estimating Population Change from Count
       Data: Application to the North American Breeding Bird Survey.
       Ecological Applications. 1998;8: 258.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   38. 38. Pellet J, Bried JT, Parietti D, Gander A, Heer PO, Cherix D, et
       al. Monitoring Butterfly Abundance: Beyond Pollard Walks. Schweiger
       O, editor. PLoS ONE. 2012;7: e41396. pmid:22859980
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   39. 39. Henry EH, Anderson CT. Abundance estimates to inform butterfly
       management: double-observer versus distance sampling. Journal of
       Insect Conservation. 2016;20: 505–514.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   40. 40. Melero Y, Stefanescu C, Pino J. General declines in
       Mediterranean butterflies over the last two decades are modulated
       by species traits. Biological Conservation. 2016;201: 336–342.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   41. 41. Haddad NM, Hudgens B, Damiani C, Gross K, Kuefler D, Pollock K.
       Determining Optimal Population Monitoring for Rare Butterflies:
       Monitoring Rare Butterflies. Conservation Biology. 2008;22:
       929–940.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   42. 42. Isaac NJB, Cruickshanks KL, Weddle AM, Marcus Rowcliffe J,
       Brereton TM, Dennis RLH, et al. Distance sampling and the challenge
       of monitoring butterfly populations: Distance sampling and
       monitoring butterflies. Methods in Ecology and Evolution. 2011;2:
       585–594.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   43. 43. Knape J. Decomposing trends in Swedish bird populations using
       generalized additive mixed models. Siriwardena G, editor. Journal
       of Applied Ecology. 2016;53: 1852–1861.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   44. 44. Szabo JK, Vesk PA, Baxter PWJ, Possingham HP. Regional avian
       species declines estimated from volunteer-collected long-term data
       using List Length Analysis. Ecological Applications. 2010;20:
       2157–2169. pmid:21265449
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   45. 45. van Strien AJ, van Swaay CAM, Termaat T. Opportunistic citizen
       science data of animal species produce reliable estimates of
       distribution trends if analysed with occupancy models. Devictor V,
       editor. Journal of Applied Ecology. 2013;50: 1450–1458.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   46. 46. Roy DB, Ploquin EF, Randle Z, Risely K, Botham MS, Middlebrook
       I, et al. Comparison of trends in butterfly populations between
       monitoring schemes. Journal of Insect Conservation. 2015;19:
       313–324.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   47. 47. Soykan CU, Sauer J, Schuetz JG, LeBaron GS, Dale K, Langham GM.
       Population trends for North American winter birds based on
       hierarchical models. Ecosphere. 2016;7: e01351.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   48. 48. Kraemer HC, Blasey CM. Centring in regression analyses: a
       strategy to prevent errors in statistical inference. International
       Journal of Methods in Psychiatric Research. 2004;13: 141–151.
       pmid:15297898
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   49. 49. Harrison XA. Using observation-level random effects to model
       overdispersion in count data in ecology and evolution. PeerJ.
       2014;2: e616. pmid:25320683
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   50. 50. Pannekoek J, Van Strien A. Trim 3 Manual (TRends & Indices for
       Monitoring data)–Statistics Netherlands. Voorburg; 2001.
   51. 51. Brereton T, Botham M, Middlebrook I, Randle Z, Noble D, Harris
       S, et al. United Kingdom Butterfly Monitoring Scheme report for
       2017 [Internet]. Centre for Ecology & Hydrology & Butterfly
       Conservation; 2018.
       http://www.ukbms.org/docs/reports/2017/UKBMS%20Butterfly%20Ann%20Re
       port%202017_Low%20Res.pdf
   52. 52. Van Swaay CAM, Bos G, Van Grunsven RHA, Kok J, Huskens K, Van
       Deijk JR, et al. Vlinders en libellen geteld: Jaarverslag 2017
       [Internet]. De Vlinderstichting, Wageningen; 2018. Report No.:
       Rapport VS2018.006.
       https://assets.vlinderstichting.nl/docs/6d51f174-b497-4777-b84a-362
       e344c3528.pdf
   53. 53. Stefanescu C. Resum de les temporades 2015 i 2016. Cynthia:
       Butlletí del Butterfly Monitoring Scheme a Catalunya. 2018;14.
       http://www.catalanbms.org/es/cynthia/
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   54. 54. Rohatgi A. WebPlotDigitizer [Internet]. 2019.
       https://automeris.io/WebPlotDigitizer
   55. 55. Wepprich TM. Effects of Climatic Variability on a Statewide
       Butterfly Community. [Internet]. North Carolina State University.
       2017. http://www.lib.ncsu.edu/resolver/1840.20/34345
   56. 56. Diamond SE, Frame AM, Martin RA, Buckley LB. Species’ traits
       predict phenological responses to climate change in butterflies.
       2011;92: 8.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   57. 57. Pagel M. Inferring the historical patterns of biological
       evolution. Nature. 1999;401: 877–884. pmid:10553904
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   58. 58. Clark K, Karsch-Mizrachi I, Lipman DJ, Ostell J, Sayers EW.
       GenBank. Nucleic Acids Res. 2016;44: D67–D72. pmid:26590407
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   59. 59. Ratnasingham S, Hebert PD. BOLD: The Barcode of Life Data
       System (http://www.barcodinglife.org). Molecular ecology notes.
       2007;7: 355–364. pmid:18784790
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   60. 60. Espeland M, Breinholt J, Willmott KR, Warren AD, Vila R,
       Toussaint EFA, et al. A Comprehensive and Dated Phylogenomic
       Analysis of Butterflies. Current Biology. 2018;28: 770–778.e5.
       pmid:29456146
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   61. 61. R Core Team. R: A Language and Environment for Statistical
       Computing [Internet]. Vienna, Austria: R Foundation for Statistical
       Computing; 2018. https://www.R-project.org/
   62. 62. Bates D, Mächler M, Bolker B, Walker S. Fitting Linear
       Mixed-Effects Models Using lme4. Journal of Statistical Software.
       2015;67.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   63. 63. Orme D, Freckleton R, Thomas G, Petzoldt T. The caper package:
       comparative analysis of phylogenetics and evolution in R. R package
       version. 2013;5.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   64. 64. Paradis E, Schliep K. ape 5.0: an environment for modern
       phylogenetics and evolutionary analyses in R. Bioinformatics.
       2018;xx: xxx–xxx.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   65. 65. Knowles JE, Frederick C. merTools: Tools for Analyzing Mixed
       Effect Regression Models [Internet]. 2018.
       https://CRAN.R-project.org/package=merTools
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   66. 66. Nakagawa S, Schielzeth H. A general and simple method for
       obtaining R^2 from generalized linear mixed-effects models. O’Hara
       RB, editor. Methods in Ecology and Evolution. 2013;4: 133–142.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   67. 67. Barton K. MuMIn: Multi-Model Inference [Internet]. 2018.
       https://CRAN.R-project.org/package=MuMIn
   68. 68. Conrad KF, Woiwod IP, Parsons M, Fox R, Warren MS. Long-term
       population trends in widespread British moths. Journal of Insect
       Conservation. 2004;8: 119–136.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   69. 69. Hunter MD, Kozlov MV, Itämies J, Pulliainen E, Bäck J, Kyrö
       E-M, et al. Current temporal trends in moth abundance are counter
       to predicted effects of climate change in an assemblage of
       subarctic forest moths. Global Change Biology. 2014;20: 1723–1737.
       pmid:24421221
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   70. 70. Herrera CM. Complex long-term dynamics of pollinator abundance
       in undisturbed Mediterranean montane habitats over two decades.
       Ecological Monographs. 2019;89: e01338.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   71. 71. Cech R, Tudor G, others. Butterflies of the east coast.
       Princeton University Press; 2005.
   72. 72. Ryan SF, Lombaert E, Espeset A, Vila R, Talavera G, Dincă V, et
       al. Global invasion history of the world’s most abundant pest
       butterfly: a citizen science population genomics study. bioRxiv.
       2018; 506162.
   73. 73. McKinney ML, Lockwood JL. Biotic homogenization: a few winners
       replacing many losers in the next mass extinction. Trends in
       ecology & evolution. 1999;14: 450–453.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   74. 74. Clavel J, Julliard R, Devictor V. Worldwide decline of
       specialist species: toward a global functional homogenization?
       Frontiers in Ecology and the Environment. 2011;9: 222–228.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   75. 75. Van Dyck H, Van Strien AJ, Maes D, Van Swaay CAM. Declines in
       Common, Widespread Butterflies in a Landscape under Intense Human
       Use. Conservation Biology. 2009;23: 957–965. pmid:19637406
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   76. 76. Ries L, Oberhauser K, Taron D, Battin J, Rendon-Salinas E,
       Altizer S, et al. Connecting eastern monarch population dynamics
       across their migratory cycle. Monarchs in a changing world: Biology
       and conservation of an iconic insect Cornell University Press,
       Ithaca, NY. 2015; 268–281.
   77. 77. Pleasants JM, Williams EH, Brower LP, Oberhauser KS, Taylor OR.
       Conclusion of No Decline in Summer Monarch Population Not
       Supported. Ann Entomol Soc Am. 2016;109: 169–171.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   78. 78. Saunders SP, Ries L, Neupane N, Ramírez MI, García-Serrano E,
       Rendón-Salinas E, et al. Multiscale seasonal factors drive the size
       of winter monarch colonies. Proceedings of the National Academy of
       Sciences. 2019; 201805114. pmid:30886097
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   79. 79. Saunders SP, Ries L, Oberhauser KS, Thogmartin WE, Zipkin EF.
       Local and cross-seasonal associations of climate and land use with
       abundance of monarch butterflies Danaus plexippus. Ecography.
       2018;41: 278–290.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   80. 80. Pleasants JM, Oberhauser KS. Milkweed loss in agricultural
       fields because of herbicide use: effect on the monarch butterfly
       population: Herbicide use and monarch butterflies. Insect
       Conservation and Diversity. 2013;6: 135–144.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   81. 81. Oliver TH, Roy DB. The pitfalls of ecological forecasting.
       Biological Journal of the Linnean Society. 2015;115: 767–778.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   82. 82. Dennis EB, Morgan BJ, Brereton TM, Roy DB, Fox R. Using citizen
       science butterfly counts to predict species population trends.
       Conservation biology. 2017;31: 1350–1361. pmid:28474803
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   83. 83. Pagel J, Anderson BJ, O’Hara RB, Cramer W, Fox R, Jeltsch F, et
       al. Quantifying range-wide variation in population trends from
       local abundance surveys and widespread opportunistic occurrence
       records. McMahon S, editor. Methods in Ecology and Evolution.
       2014;5: 751–760.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   84. 84. Fox R. The decline of moths in Great Britain: a review of
       possible causes: The decline of moths in Great Britain. Insect
       Conservation and Diversity. 2013;6: 5–19.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   85. 85. Thomas JA. Butterfly communities under threat. Science.
       2016;353: 216–218. pmid:27418487
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   86. 86. Wong MKL, Guénard B, Lewis OT. Trait-based ecology of
       terrestrial arthropods. Biological Reviews. 2018;0. pmid:30548743
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   87. 87. Habel JC, Schmitt T. Vanishing of the common species: Empty
       habitats and the role of genetic diversity. Biological
       Conservation. 2018;218: 211–216.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   88. 88. Dennis RLH, Shreeve TG, Dyck HV. Towards a Functional
       Resource-Based Concept for Habitat: A Butterfly Biology Viewpoint.
       Oikos. 2003;102: 417–426.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   89. 89. Curtis RJ, Brereton TM, Dennis RLH, Carbone C, Isaac NJB.
       Butterfly abundance is determined by food availability and is
       mediated by species traits. Diamond S, editor. Journal of Applied
       Ecology. 2015;52: 1676–1684.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   90. 90. Parmesan C, Ryrholm N, Stefanescu C, Hill JK, Thomas CD,
       Descimon H, et al. Poleward shifts in geographical ranges of
       butterfly species associated with regional warming. Nature.
       1999;399: 579–583.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   91. 91. Daniel Hellerstein, Claudia Hitaj, David Smith, Amerlie Davis.
       Land Use, Land Cover, and Pollinator Health: A Review and Trend
       Analysis [Internet]. USDA Economic Research Service; 2017 Jun p.
       47. https://ageconsearch.umn.edu/record/263074
   92. 92. Baker NT, Stone WW. Estimated annual agricultural pesticide use
       for counties of the conterminous United States, 2008–12: U.S.
       Geological Survey Data Series 907 [Internet]. US Geological Survey;
       p. 9. https://dx.doi.org/10.3133/ds907.
   93. 93. Stone WW. Estimated annual agricultural pesticide use for
       counties of the conterminous United States, 1992–2009. US
       Geological Survey; 2013.
   94. 94. Goulson D. REVIEW: An overview of the environmental risks posed
       by neonicotinoid insecticides. Kleijn D, editor. Journal of Applied
       Ecology. 2013;50: 977–987.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   95. 95. Hallmann CA, Foppen RPB, van Turnhout CAM, de Kroon H,
       Jongejans E. Declines in insectivorous birds are associated with
       high neonicotinoid concentrations. Nature. 2014;511: 341–343.
       pmid:25030173
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   96. 96. Pisa L, Goulson D, Yang E-C, Gibbons D, Sánchez-Bayo F,
       Mitchell E, et al. An update of the Worldwide Integrated Assessment
       (WIA) on systemic insecticides. Part 2: impacts on organisms and
       ecosystems. Environ Sci Pollut Res. 2017; pmid:29124633
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   97. 97. Douglas MR, Tooker JF. Large-Scale Deployment of Seed
       Treatments Has Driven Rapid Increase in Use of Neonicotinoid
       Insecticides and Preemptive Pest Management in U.S. Field Crops.
       Environmental Science & Technology. 2015;49: 5088–5097.
       pmid:25793443
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   98. 98. Krupke CH, Holland JD, Long EY, Eitzer BD. Planting of
       neonicotinoid-treated maize poses risks for honey bees and other
       non-target organisms over a wide area without consistent crop yield
       benefit. Diamond S, editor. Journal of Applied Ecology. 2017;54:
       1449–1458.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   99. 99. Gilburn AS, Bunnefeld N, Wilson JM, Botham MS, Brereton TM, Fox
       R, et al. Are neonicotinoid insecticides driving declines of
       widespread butterflies? PeerJ. 2015;3: e1402. pmid:26623186
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   100. 100. Basley K, Goulson D. Effects of Field-Relevant Concentrations
       of Clothianidin on Larval Development of the Butterfly Polyommatus
       icarus (Lepidoptera, Lycaenidae). Environ Sci Technol. 2018;52:
       3990–3996. pmid:29553241
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   101. 101. Kleijn D, Snoeijing GIJ. Field Boundary Vegetation and the
       Effects of Agrochemical Drift: Botanical Change Caused by Low
       Levels of Herbicide and Fertilizer. Journal of Applied Ecology.
       1997;34: 1413–1425.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   102. 102. Weiss SB. Cars, cows, and checkerspot butterflies: nitrogen
       deposition and management of nutrient-poor grasslands for a
       threatened species. Conservation Biology. 1999;13: 1476–1486.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   103. 103. Öckinger E, Hammarstedt O, Nilsson SG, Smith HG. The
       relationship between local extinctions of grassland butterflies and
       increased soil nitrogen levels. Biological Conservation. 2006;128:
       564–573.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   104. 104. WallisDeVries MF, van Swaay CAM. A nitrogen index to track
       changes in butterfly species assemblages under nitrogen deposition.
       Biological Conservation. 2017;212: 448–453.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   105. 105. Kurze S, Heinken T, Fartmann T. Nitrogen enrichment in host
       plants increases the mortality of common Lepidoptera species.
       Oecologia. 2018;188: 1227–1237. pmid:30288608
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar

   Download PDF

     * Citation
     * XML

   Print
     * Print article
     * EzReprint

   Share
     * Reddit Reddit
     * Google+ Google+
     * Facebook Facebook
     * LinkedIn LinkedIn
     * Mendeley Mendeley
     * PubChase PubChase
     * Twitter Twitter
     * Email Email

     [CROSSMARK_BW_horizontal.svg]
   Advertisement

Subject Areas

   ?

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.
   We want your feedback. Do these Subject Areas make sense for this
   article? Click the target next to the incorrect Subject Area and let us
   know. Thanks for your help!
     * Moths and butterflies
       Is the Subject Area "Moths and butterflies" applicable to this
       article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Insects
       Is the Subject Area "Insects" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Ohio
       Is the Subject Area "Ohio" applicable to this article? (BUTTON) Yes
       (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Europe
       Is the Subject Area "Europe" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Plants
       Is the Subject Area "Plants" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Climate change
       Is the Subject Area "Climate change" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Habitats
       Is the Subject Area "Habitats" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Species diversity
       Is the Subject Area "Species diversity" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.

Archived Tweets

   Load more
   View all tweets

     * Publications
     * PLOS Biology
     * PLOS Medicine
     * PLOS Computational Biology
     * PLOS Genetics
     * PLOS Pathogens
     * PLOS ONE
     * PLOS Neglected Tropical Diseases

     * Home
     * Blogs
     * Collections
     * Give feedback
     * LOCKSS

     * Privacy Policy
     * Terms of Use
     * Advertise
     * Media Inquiries
     * Contact

   PLOS is a nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation, #C2354500, based in San
   Francisco, California, US
   PLOS
   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TP26BH

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MQQMGF

   Advertisement

     * plos.org
     * create account
     * sign in

PLOS Biology

     * Browse
          + Current Issue
          + Journal Archive
          + Collections
          + Find and Read Articles
     * Publish
          + Submissions
               o Submission Guidelines
               o Figures
               o Tables
               o Supporting Information
               o LaTeX
               o Other Article Types
               o Preprints
               o Revising Your Manuscript
               o Submit Now
          + Policies
               o Best Practices in Research Reporting
               o Human Subjects Research
               o Animal Research
               o Competing Interests
               o Disclosure of Funding Sources
               o Licenses and Copyright
               o Data Availability
               o Materials and Software Sharing
               o Ethical Publishing Practice
               o Authorship
               o Downloads and Translations
          + Manuscript Review and Publication
               o Editorial and Peer Review Process
               o Guidelines for Reviewers
               o Accepted Manuscripts
               o Corrections and Retractions
               o Comments
               o Article-Level Metrics

Submit Your Manuscript
       PLOS Biology provides an Open Access platform to showcase your best
       research and commentary across all areas of biological science.
       Submit Now
     * About
          + Journal Information
          + Staff Editors
          + Editorial Board
          + Publishing Information
          + Publication Fees
          + Press and Media
          + Contact
     *

       Search

       Search
       ____________________ (BUTTON)

       advanced search

     * Loading metrics

   Open Access

   Peer-reviewed

   Research Article

Mismatch Between Birth Date and Vegetation Phenology Slows the Demography of
Roe Deer

     * Floriane Plard,
       Affiliation Laboratoire “Biométrie et Biologie Évolutive,” Unité
       Mixte de Recherche 5558, Université Claude Bernard Lyon 1, Lyon,
       France
       ⨯
     * Jean-Michel Gaillard ,
       * E-mail: jean-michel.gaillard@univ-lyon1.fr
       Affiliation Laboratoire “Biométrie et Biologie Évolutive,” Unité
       Mixte de Recherche 5558, Université Claude Bernard Lyon 1, Lyon,
       France
       ⨯
     * Tim Coulson,
       Affiliation Department of Zoology, The Tinbergen Building,
       University of Oxford, Oxford, United Kingdom
       ⨯
     * A. J. Mark Hewison,
       Affiliation INRA, UR035 CEFS, B.P. 52627, Castanet-Tolosan cedex,
       France
       ⨯
     * Daniel Delorme,
       Affiliation Centre National d'Études et de Recherches Appliquées
       Cervidés-Sangliers, Office National de la Chasse et de la Faune
       Sauvage, Paris, France
       ⨯
     * Claude Warnant,
       Affiliation Centre National d'Études et de Recherches Appliquées
       Cervidés-Sangliers, Office National de la Chasse et de la Faune
       Sauvage, Paris, France
       ⨯
     * Christophe Bonenfant
       Affiliation Laboratoire “Biométrie et Biologie Évolutive,” Unité
       Mixte de Recherche 5558, Université Claude Bernard Lyon 1, Lyon,
       France
       ⨯

Mismatch Between Birth Date and Vegetation Phenology Slows the Demography of
Roe Deer

     * Floriane Plard,
     * Jean-Michel Gaillard,
     * Tim Coulson,
     * A. J. Mark Hewison,
     * Daniel Delorme,
     * Claude Warnant,
     * Christophe Bonenfant

   PLOS
   x
     * Published: April 1, 2014
     * https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828

     * Article
     * Authors
     * Metrics
     * Comments
     * Media Coverage

     * Reader Comments (0)
     * Media Coverage
     * Figures

Figures

   Figure 1
   Figure 2
   Figure 3

Abstract

   Marked impacts of climate change on biodiversity have frequently been
   demonstrated, including temperature-related shifts in phenology and
   life-history traits. One potential major impact of climate change is
   the modification of synchronization between the phenology of different
   trophic levels. High phenotypic plasticity in laying date has allowed
   many bird species to track the increasingly early springs resulting
   from recent environmental change, but although changes in the timing of
   reproduction have been well studied in birds, these questions have only
   recently been addressed in mammals. To track peak resource
   availability, large herbivores like roe deer, with a widespread
   distribution across Europe, should also modify their life-history
   schedule in response to changes in vegetation phenology over time. In
   this study, we analysed the influence of climate change on the timing
   of roe deer births and the consequences for population demography and
   individual fitness. Our study provides a rare quantification of the
   demographic costs associated with the failure of a species to modify
   its phenology in response to a changing world. Given these fitness
   costs, the lack of response of roe deer birth dates to match the
   increasingly earlier onset of spring is in stark contrast with the
   marked phenotypic responses to climate change reported in many other
   mammals. We suggest that the lack of phenotypic plasticity in birth
   timing in roe deer is linked to its inability to track environmental
   cues of variation in resource availability for the timing of
   parturition.

Author Summary

   Climate change can alter the synchronization of life cycles between
   organisms at different points in the food chain. If species do not
   respond to climate change, the timing of peak resource availability may
   fail to match the timing of peak energy expenditure. Many bird species
   have been able to advance their laying date to match a change in the
   timing of caterpillar abundance. Herbivores are similarly expected to
   track changes in the timing of vegetation growth. In this study, we
   combine statistical analysis with demographic modeling to analyze the
   influence of a climate-driven shift in the timing of the spring
   vegetation flush on the birth date and demography of roe deer. In
   recent years, climate change has generated a marked increase in local
   temperatures and a progressively earlier vegetation flush. Despite
   these changes, we observed no shift in timing of the birth date of roe
   deer over the 27-year study period. This failure to track environmental
   change resulted in a mismatch between vegetation flush and birth date,
   which in turn caused a decrease in survival of the young, and hence a
   reduction in roe deer fitness. Birth date was under strong directional
   selection, but was not strongly heritable, suggesting that any
   evolutionary response of birth date to climate change might be limited.
   We suggest that a plastic response in birth date did not occur because
   reproduction is triggered by day length rather than resource
   availability in roe deer.

   Citation: Plard F, Gaillard J-M, Coulson T, Hewison AJM, Delorme D,
   Warnant C, et al. (2014) Mismatch Between Birth Date and Vegetation
   Phenology Slows the Demography of Roe Deer. PLoS Biol 12(4): e1001828.
   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828

   Academic Editor: Georgina M. Mace, University College London, United
   Kingdom

   Received: August 30, 2013; Accepted: February 19, 2014; Published:
   April 1, 2014

   Copyright: © 2014 Plard et al. This is an open-access article
   distributed under the terms of the Creative Commons Attribution
   License, which permits unrestricted use, distribution, and reproduction
   in any medium, provided the original author and source are credited.

   Funding: The sources of funding that supported the work presented in
   this paper include grants from the Office National de la Chasse et de
   la Faune Sauvage (to FP, JMG, CB, DD, and CW), from the Institut
   National de la Recherche Agronomique (to MH), from the Centre National
   de la Recherche Scientifique (to CB and JMG), and from the European
   Research Council (TC). The funders had no role in study design, data
   collection and analysis, decision to publish, or preparation of the
   manuscript.

   Competing interests: The authors have declared that no competing
   interests exist.

   Abbreviations: IPM, Integral Projection Model

Introduction

   Marked impacts of climate change on biodiversity have frequently been
   demonstrated, including temperature-related shifts in phenology and
   life-history traits [1]. Species living at high altitudes or latitudes
   are particularly affected by climate change [2],[3], but widespread
   species inhabiting temperate areas are also responding [4]. Global
   temperatures have risen by 0.89°C since 1901 [5], and this has led to
   an advance in the timing of key life-history events by, on average, 2.8
   d per decade [6]. Earlier springs have caused phenological
   modifications in most taxonomic groups [1],[7]. The phenology of
   vegetation, particularly trees, has advanced with time (by 3.3 d per
   decade [6]). A failure of species to track these changes may have
   important demographic consequences that, in turn, could impact
   conservation and management issues. Changes in the timing of
   reproduction have been well studied in birds [8]–[10], but have only
   recently been considered in mammals [3],[4],[11]. These studies suggest
   that a change in the timing of peak resource availability typically
   generates a change in median laying or breeding date [9],[12],[13].
   This response ensures that individuals can synchronize their energetic
   demands for offspring production and provisioning [14] with the period
   when environmental conditions are the most favorable [15].

   A key question about the consequences of global change is which species
   can respond and how [16]. Although most studied species have responded
   to match resource availability with energy requirements, the response
   is not always exact or immediate [17],[18]. Phenotypic plasticity may
   play a major role in the adjustment of reproductive timing to earlier
   springs [19]. In a population of great tits, those individuals that
   could vary their reproductive timing the most had higher fitness [20].
   But for individuals to shift their reproductive cycle in order to track
   environmental modifications, they require a reliable environmental cue
   [21],[22]. The timing of breeding is influenced by photoperiod in many
   species of birds and mammals [23]–[25], a cue that is clearly
   unaffected by climate change. Nonetheless, some species, including the
   great tit and red deer, rely on temperature [26],[27] to minimize the
   mismatch between birth timing and the peak resource availability. If
   earlier breeding increases fitness, selection could also drive a
   micro-evolutionary change in terms of advanced reproductive timing [8]
   as long as birth date is heritable. The relative role of phenotypic
   plasticity and micro-evolutionary change remains largely unquantified
   [28], although Réale et al. [4] showed that the advance in birth timing
   in red squirrel was mostly due to phenotypic plasticity rather than
   micro-evolution. Although some species have advanced their birth timing
   in response to increasing temperature, some species have not [29]
   whereas others have delayed their reproductive phenology [1]. For
   instance, Columbian ground squirrels have delayed their breeding
   phenology by 0.47 d per year over a period of 20 y, leading to a
   reduction in fitness by a half between 1993 and 2003 [3]. On the other
   hand, birth timing in caribou advanced at a much slower rate than the
   vegetation flush over a period of 33 years, so that the mismatch
   between birth timing and peak resource availability increased, causing
   calf production to decline [30],[31].

   Births are highly seasonal and synchronous in most large herbivores
   [32], including roe deer [33],[34], in which more than 90% occur within
   1 mo [35]. Roe deer females are income breeders and selectively feed on
   highly digestible and nutritious young shoots, especially during early
   lactation when energetic demand peaks [14]. Synchrony between births
   and the peak availability of high-quality vegetation is expected to be
   crucial for successful recruitment. The reproductive cycle of roe deer
   is unique among ungulates, including a phase of embryonic diapause that
   appears not to vary in duration among females [36]. As in reindeer
   where reproductive timing may be driven by day length [37], both
   ovulation and conception dates appear to be under the control of
   photoperiod [38], which could explain the lack of variation in
   parturition date across years for a given female [33],[35].

   Focusing on the mismatch between birth date and plant phenology, we
   investigate how climate change is currently affecting roe deer fitness.
   Our study on the intensively monitored roe deer population at Trois
   Fontaines, eastern France, spans 27 y, from 1985 to 2011. We tested the
   three following predictions: (i) As most mammals studied so far have
   shown a response to climate change, we expected that roe deer births
   should occur earlier in response to the advance in vegetation
   phenology. (ii) Because parturition date varies little across years for
   a given roe deer female [35], indicating limited phenotypic plasticity,
   but because it has been shown to be heritable in mammals [39],[40], and
   markedly influences early offspring survival [40], we expected any
   change in birth timing to be mainly the result of natural selection.
   And (iii) because such micro-evolutionary responses are often delayed,
   we expected that despite any advance in birth timing, the mismatch
   between peak energetic demand and peak resource availability should
   likely increase over time, leading to negative impacts on roe deer
   performance. Our study provides a unique quantification, to our
   knowledge, of the demographic costs associated with the failure of a
   species to modify its phenology in response to a warming world.

Results

Climate Change and Birth Date

   Analysis of local weather variables revealed a strong local impact of
   climate change that translated into increasingly earlier and warmer
   springs over time. Annual spring (April to June) temperature increased
   by 0.07°C per year (SE = 0.02, p = 0.001, Figure 1) at Trois Fontaines
   over the study period. Analysis of flowering date in the vineyards of
   the Champagne region indicated that annual timing of plant phenology in
   the region had advanced by 0.6 d per year (SE = 0.18, p = 0.002, Figure
   1) over this period, so that the peak in availability of high-quality
   resources for roe deer was increasingly early from 1985 to 2011. Spring
   mean temperature and flowering date in the Champagne region were
   negatively correlated over this period (ρ = −0.89, p<0.001). We
   therefore used flowering date as a proxy of the vegetation flush and
   compared it to annual variation in the timing of roe deer births. Roe
   deer give birth about 1 mo before the onset of flowering in Champagne
   because they preferentially feed on leaves and young shoots that become
   available before flowering. The mismatch between median birth date and
   vegetation phenology was estimated from the difference between median
   birth date and annual flowering date in the Champagne vineyards. We
   standardized this measure (by subtracting the observed value of
   mismatch in the first year (1985) from this variable) to obtain a
   relative measure of mismatch ranging from 0 in 1985 to 36 d in 2011.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Figure 1. Temporal variation in spring temperature (A), flowering date
   in the vineyards of the Champagne region (B), the observed population
   mean of the mismatch between flowering date and median parturition date
   (C), and mean individual fitness predicted from the IPM (D) in the roe
   deer population of Trois Fontaines, France from 1985 to 2011.

   The mismatch was estimated as the difference between median birth date
   and annual flowering date in the Champagne vineyards. We standardized
   this measure (by subtracting the observed value of the mismatch in the
   first year of study (1985) from this variable) to obtain a relative
   measure of mismatch ranging from 0 in 1985 to 36 d in 2011. Predicted
   trends are presented as black lines with 95% confidence intervals
   (dashed lines). Geometric means of mean individual fitness were
   calculated over periods of 4 y (black squares).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.g001

   In contradiction with our first prediction, annual median birth date
   did not occur earlier over time. Both the mean and median birth dates
   of roe deer at Trois Fontaines remained remarkably stable among years
   (based on 1,095 birth dates, mean = 136.1, SE = 8.56; time trend,
   t = −0.82, p = 0.421; and median = 136, the 16th of May, t = −1.23,
   p = 0.232 for mean and median birth dates, respectively, Figure S4A).
   Neither the spring mean temperature nor flowering date in the Champagne
   region had a detectable influence on median birth date (Pearson's
   product moment, ρ = −0.07, p = 0.730 and ρ = 0.11, p = 0.575 for spring
   mean temperature and flowering date, respectively). Consequently, the
   mismatch between median birth date and vegetation phenology increased
   by 0.54 d per year (SE = 0.20, p = 0.011, Figure 1) between 1985 and
   2011. We did not find any correlation between median birth date and
   other environmental drivers (Table S1), suggesting that roe deer
   females are unable to track these potential environmental cues.

Parturition Date, a Trait Under Strong Selection Pressure

   We investigated whether birth date of roe deer fulfilled the three
   necessary conditions for evolutionary change to occur: variability,
   heritability, and a selection pressure [41]. First, variation in
   parturition date among roe deer females has been recently quantified
   and found to be consistently high within several populations [35], with
   long-lived and/or heavier females (i.e., high-quality individuals)
   giving birth earlier than low-quality females [42]. Second, we found no
   strong statistical support for heritability in parturition date when
   estimated from the parent–offspring relationship based on 28
   daughter–mother pairs (β = 0.234, SE = 0.13, p = 0.094, h^2 = 0.127).
   Third, we identified directional selection favoring early births, with
   a strong negative relationship between individual birth date and
   individual early survival from May 12th onwards (on a logit scale
   β = −0.06, SE = 0.01, p<0.001, Figure S1). Note that year was included
   as a categorical variable in this model to control for interannual
   variation in environmental conditions affecting early survival. A model
   including a threshold effect of individual birth date on individual
   early survival provided a better fit than a linear (ΔAIC = 6.12) or a
   quadratic (ΔAIC = 0.50) model. Thus, a fawn born before May 12th had,
   on average, a 50% chance of surviving to 8 mo of age, whereas a fawn
   born on May 31st had, on average, only a 24% chance of surviving to
   that age. Adding a term describing interactive effects between birth
   date and year did not improve the fit of the model (ΔAIC = 9.28),
   indicating that the response of individual early survival to individual
   birth date was consistent across cohorts. Taken together these results
   suggest that we should not expect a strong micro-evolutionary response
   of parturition date in roe deer.

Demographic Consequences

   At the population level, cohort-specific survival (measured as the
   proportion of fawns that survived to the onset of winter each year) was
   negatively correlated with our index of mismatch (arcsine-square root
   transformation: β = −0.009, SE = 0.003, p = 0.012). Adding a quadratic
   term (ΔAIC = 1.95) or a threshold effect (ΔAIC = 1.86) of mismatch did
   not improve model fit. Early cohort-specific survival of juveniles
   decreased by 40% with an increase in mismatch of 1 mo (Figure 2).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Figure 2. Variation in mean cohort-specific early survival in relation
   to the mismatch between annual median birth date and vegetation
   phenology in the roe deer population of Trois Fontaines, France.

   The predicted relationship is represented by a black line with 95%
   confidence intervals (dashed lines). Data used to fit the models are
   represented by black squares whose size is proportional to the standard
   error of mean cohort-specific early survival.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.g002

   At the individual level, the mismatch was a better predictor of early
   survival (R^2 = 0.037) than birth date (R^2 = 0.025) (ΔAIC = 8.90,
   Table S2; note that year was not included in these models because
   interannual variation was integrated within the mismatch variable).
   Individual early survival was constant when the mismatch was 16 d or
   less, but then decreased linearly beyond 16 d of mismatch (Table S2,
   Figure 3). When birth occurred at least 1 mo (35 d) before flowering
   date in Champagne's vineyards, a fawn had an expected probability of
   0.5 of surviving to 8 mo of age, whereas this probability was only 0.25
   when birth occurred 2 wk prior to flowering (Figure 3).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Figure 3. Influence of the mismatch (measured as the difference in days
   between individual birth date and flowering date in Champagne) on
   individual early survival in the roe deer population of Trois
   Fontaines, France.

   The predicted values are presented after back-transformation from a
   logit scale with 95% confidence intervals (dashed lines). Data used to
   fit the model are represented by black squares whose size is
   proportional to the number of observed births within periods of 2.5 d
   (examples in the figures: 1 (in white), 82 fawns; 2 (in white), 115
   fawns).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.g003

   We built an IPM describing the temporal dynamics of parturition date in
   our roe deer population to quantify the impact of this increasing
   mismatch on roe deer fitness. The distribution of parturition date in
   the population at time t+1 depends on the distribution of parturition
   date at time t and on the four relationships linking parturition date
   with survival, recruitment, transition between two successive
   parturition events, and inheritance of parturition date between mother
   and offspring (see Text S1, Tables S2, S3, S4, and Figure S2 for
   further details [43],[44]). Annual flowering date in the vineyards of
   the Champagne region was included in the IPM to model the local shift
   in plant phenology. As most roe deer females give birth to two fawns
   [45] and the sex ratio is close to 0.5 at birth at Trois Fontaines
   [46], the recruitment function linking the number of female offspring a
   mother has successfully weaned given its parturition date was modeled
   by individual early survival (Table S5, Figure 3).

   The IPM predicted mean parturition date to occur on the 17th of May
   each year, with a very slight, but statistically significant, advance
   of just 0.27 d over the whole 27-y study period (β = −0.010,
   SE = 0.003, p = 0.006, Figure S4B). The model also predicted earlier
   parturition as females aged, with 2-y-old females giving birth, on
   average, 5 d later than older females (Figure S5). The estimated
   population growth rate, and so the mean fitness of females in the
   population, decreased by 6% on average over the study period
   (β = −0.003, SE = 0.001, p = 0.008, Figure 1), from 1.23 in 1985 to
   1.06 in 2011. Marked variability in environmental conditions between
   successive years often leads to a decrease in the arithmetic mean
   population growth rate [47]. Consequently, we estimated the geometric
   mean of population growth rate for successive periods of 4 y. The
   geometric mean population growth rate also decreased over the study
   period (β = −0.009, SE = 0.002, p = 0.002). Thus, the IPM allowed us to
   demonstrate a clear impact of the mismatch between energy demand and
   peak resource availability on mean fitness, which declined in this
   population of roe deer over the entire study period. In accordance with
   these results, we also observed a decrease in mean annual female
   reproductive success over the study period (β = −0.027, SE = 0.005,
   p<0.001; note that these data are independent of those used to build
   the IPM, see Figure S3).

Discussion

   This study has demonstrated that mean fitness is currently decreasing
   in this roe deer population due to the lack of response in parturition
   date to the increasingly early availability of high-quality resources
   induced by climate change. Warming at Trois Fontaines over the last 27
   y (0.46°C per decade) was more than threefold greater than the average
   global expectation from the 2013 IPCC report on climate change (0.12
   [0.08–0.14] per decade since 1951, [5]). This local warming has led to
   an advance in spring plant phenology [48] demonstrated by the advance
   in flowering date in Champagne's vineyards. In contrast to most other
   studied mammals that have been able to track resource availability by
   advancing their birth timing [3],[4],[13],[49], the median birth date
   of roe deer remained constant over years. This generated an increased
   mismatch between mean birth date and phenology of the vegetation such
   that at the end of the study period fawns were born relatively later
   with respect to the peak in availability of high quality resources.
   Post and Forchhammer [30] were the first to describe a negative impact
   of a mismatch between resource availability and birth timing on calf
   production in Greenland caribou. In our study, climate change over
   recent decades has had a similarly negative impact on early survival
   (i.e., a “climatic debt” [16]), both at the individual and at the
   population levels. Furthermore, we were able to show that this mismatch
   between parturition and the availability of highly digestible forage
   led to a decline in mean fitness of 6% over the study period, and of
   14% between 1985 and those years when the vegetation flush was
   particularly early (2007 and 2011). This link between plant phenology
   and roe deer population dynamics, mostly driven through recruitment, is
   the likely mechanism for the observed decrease in population growth
   rate over time [50].

   Our study provides an illustration of the probable fitness costs for
   species which do not respond to climate change. Indeed, the increasing
   mismatch between the peak of roe deer births and the onset of the
   vegetation flush in recent years had a negative impact on both early
   survival and mean fitness. Previous studies have reported an impact of
   climate change on recruitment [30],[51],[52]. However, the influence of
   mismatch on fitness and population dynamics has received much less
   attention. IPMs allow the phenotypic consequences of climate change to
   be explored (see also [49]), which is not possible using classical
   statistical methods. In contrast to a recent study on birds [53], we
   found that population growth rate of roe deer was not buffered against
   phenological mismatch. Mean fitness was most strongly affected during
   years when plant phenology was particularly early, for example, in 2007
   and 2011 (λ = 1.07 versus λ = 1.23 for the first year of the study). We
   can therefore predict that this increasing mismatch will further
   increase the energetic costs of breeding for females [54] as spring
   phenology continues to advance in the future.

   The lack of response in roe deer birth date to climate change provides
   a stark contrast with the previous findings on most mammalian species
   studied to date, which have shown phenotypic responses to climate
   change [3],[4],[13],[49]. Despite the clear selection pressure that we
   demonstrated, which should favor earlier births over time, we showed
   that a strong evolutionary change is not expected in roe deer. Indeed,
   we found no strong statistical support for heritability of birth date,
   despite the fact that parent–offspring regressions are known to
   overestimate heritabilities [55]. However, as the number of
   mother–daughter pairs (N = 28) available to assess heritability of
   birth date was low, further work on a much larger sample size is
   required to explore this question. Nonetheless, both the classical
   statistical approach and the IPM provided similar results and clearly
   indicated no change in roe deer reproductive timing. Although roe deer
   did not exhibit an evolutionary response to climate change, why have
   they not responded plastically [4],[20]?

   Roe deer females appear unable to track environmental cues such as
   temperature to time their birth event. Birth timing in mammals is
   mainly driven by the date of conception and gestation length. Ovulation
   and, thereby, conception date is mainly under the control of
   photoperiod in roe deer [38]. Gestation begins with a phase of
   embryonic diapause that probably originally evolved to increase
   gestation length [56], but we expected this historical selection
   pressure for delayed birth to be counterbalanced by selection for
   earlier birth date in response to climate change over recent times.
   However, diapause appears to be triggered by an intrinsic mechanism
   involving the mother or even the embryo itself, and the 5-mo duration
   appears not to vary among females [36]. In many species, adaptive
   phenotypic plasticity has generated a response to changes in phenology
   (great tit [57], red squirrel [4]). In red deer, a species related to
   roe deer that is able to track earlier plant phenology [13], gestation
   length decreased with increasing average temperature in March [58]. In
   contrast, in roe deer, we have shown that parturition timing is
   independent of changes in temperature and in the onset of the
   vegetation flush, suggesting this lack of phenotypic plasticity in
   birth timing is associated with an inability to track environmental
   cues of variation in resource availability for the timing of
   parturition.

   Earlier plant phenology is likely the main cause of the observed
   decrease in early survival, and thereby in mean fitness, in this roe
   deer population. Although the roe deer population consistently
   displayed positive growth over the 27-y study period (i.e., λ
   consistently higher than 1), population growth rate (and therefore
   average individual fitness) decreased in a continuous fashion by 6%
   over this period. Moreover, temperatures are expected to increase
   further in the future, causing the phenology of vegetation to advance
   still further. We suggest that these combined effects could impose a
   brake on the demographic and geographical expansion of roe deer, a
   common and previously successful species across all Europe [59].

Materials and Methods

Studied Site and Population

   Trois Fontaines (48°43N, 2°61W) is an enclosed 1,360 ha forest located
   near Saint-Dizier, at the border of Marne and Haute-Marne counties in
   north-eastern France. In spring (from mid-March to mid-June), the
   number of rainy days averaged 31.5 (ranging between 18 and 52 d during
   the study period 1985–2011) and the temperature averaged 10.4°C
   (ranging between −6.06°C and 15.00°C). The forest is dominated by oak
   (Quercus sp.) and beech (Fagus sylvatica). Roe deer feed mainly on
   coppice and the understory is dominated by hornbeam (Carpinus betulus),
   ivy (Hedera helix), and bramble (Rubus sp.).

Data Collection

   The roe deer population at Trois Fontaines has been intensively
   monitored for more than 35 y by the Office National de la Chasse et de
   la Faune Sauvage based on a detailed Capture-Mark-Recapture program.
   Roe deer are individually marked using numbered collars and ear-tags. A
   systematic search for newborn fawns was conducted every year from late
   April to mid-June between 1985 and 2010 [60]. In 2011, searches ended
   earlier and the last fawn was found on May 20th. Fawns were handled by
   experienced people, ear-tagged, and weighed. Their sex was recorded and
   their age estimated to the nearest day using umbilicus characteristics
   and behaviour at marking [61]. Birth dates were back-calculated using
   these estimated ages and the day of capture. The average age at marking
   was about 5 d, and all fawns were marked within 20 d. The identity of
   the mother for a given fawn was established, when possible, through
   direct observations of lactating behavior or by the identification of
   an escaping female in the vicinity of the fawn. From January to March,
   annual capture sessions took place, with capture of more than 50% of
   the roe deer population each year, providing reliable information on
   the fate of animals marked at birth. Individual early survival was
   defined as the probability of survival of a fawn from birth to the next
   winter (see [62] for further details). At Trois Fontaines, fawn
   mortality was most likely associated with shortage of high-quality food
   because this population is not subject to marked predation or hunting
   pressure. At the population level, mean cohort-specific early survival
   was estimated using Capture-Recapture analyses [63] from 1985 to 2011.
   Cohort-specific early survival could not be estimated with accuracy for
   2012 (see [62]), so these data were not included here. Data are
   available from Table S6.

Climate Change and Parturition Date

   The local daily temperature was collected from the Météo-France weather
   station of Saint-Dizier located at less than 5 km from the study site.
   Spring temperature (April to June) was used to assess the magnitude of
   climate warming at the local scale. To measure annual changes in
   vegetation phenology, we used the mean flowering date of vineyards in
   the Champagne region collected by the Comité Interprofessionnel du Vin
   de Champagne and available on the website of the French Observatoire
   National sur les Effets du Réchauffement Climatique
   (http://www.developpement-durable.gouv.fr/-Impacts-et-adaptation-ONERC-
   .html). Flowering date is little influenced by human activity and
   reliably reflects the phenology of the vegetation of that year.
   Moreover, flowering date in Champagne is highly correlated with the
   local sum of degree-days (ρ = −0.61, p<0.001), which is often used to
   index vegetation growth [13],[64], with spring temperature (ρ = −0.83,
   p<0.001) and with annual mean temperature (ρ = −0.57, p<0.001). As a
   consequence, flowering date in Champagne reliably indexes the overall
   changes in plant phenology over years. When flowering date in Champagne
   was early in the year, we assumed that the availability of high-quality
   resources for roe deer provided by spring vegetation was also early.
   Consequently, we used the difference between birth date and flowering
   date in Champagne as a measure of the mismatch between birth date and
   peak resource availability.

   To assess temporal trends in local temperature, vegetation phenology,
   and birth date, we fitted linear regressions with a Gaussian error.
   Subsequently, we examined the relationships of cohort-specific median
   birth date with mean spring temperature and with flowering date in
   Champagne to test whether birth date tracked climate change. To
   quantify the mismatch between median birth date and the vegetation
   flush at the population level, we subtracted the median birth date from
   the annual flowering date.

Birth Date: A Trait Under Selection?

   Available data were not detailed enough to build pedigrees, so we
   measured heritability using the weighted regression of the median
   parturition date of each daughter against the median parturition date
   of her mother [65]. To assess whether roe deer birth date was under
   selection, we analyzed the relationship between birth date and early
   survival at the level of the individual with a generalized linear model
   and a logit link. We included year in the model to control for
   interannual variation in environmental conditions. We tested for
   linear, quadratic, and threshold effects of birth date on individual
   early survival. Finally, we tested for an interaction between birth
   date and year to investigate whether the selection pressure was similar
   over time.

Demographic Consequences of the Mismatch

   To assess whether roe deer exhibited a phenotypic response to climate
   change, both at the population and individual levels, we used mean
   cohort-specific early survival after an arcsine-square root
   transformation; we investigated the relationships between
   cohort-specific early survival and the mismatch, testing for linear,
   quadratic, and threshold effects of the mismatch. Each point of the
   regression was weighted (using the inverse of the variance of
   cohort-specific early survival) to account for uncertainty in the
   estimates of cohort-specific survival. Then, we investigated whether
   the mismatch was a better predictor of early survival than birth date
   at the individual level. We did not include year in this model as
   among-year variations were integrated within the mismatch variable. We
   tested for linear, quadratic, and threshold effects of birth date or
   the birth date–vegetation phenology mismatch on individual early
   survival with a generalized linear model and a logit link. We compared
   the relative fit of the different models using the Akaike Information
   Criterion (AIC).

   To investigate the influence of plant phenology on mean fitness, we
   built an Integral Projection Model (IPM, [43],[44]) describing the
   dynamics of parturition date in the population. Selection and
   estimations for the models describing the four functions defining the
   IPM (survival, recruitment, transition, and inheritance) are detailed
   in the Supporting Information section. This IPM allowed us to
   investigate the influence of the timing of peak resource availability
   on the outputs of the model: the annual asymptotic population growth
   rate, in other words, annual mean fitness over the study period. As
   previous studies in this population have revealed no effect of density
   dependence on any of the demographic parameters, we did not include
   density in our demographic analysis (supplementary material of [50]).

Supporting Information

Figure S1.

   Influence of individual birth date (expressed as the day of year
   between 110 (20th April) and 161 (10th June)) on individual early
   survival in the roe deer population of Trois Fontaines, France. The
   predicted values are presented after back-transformation from a logit
   scale with 95% confidence intervals (dashed lines). Data used to fit
   the model are represented by black squares whose size is proportional
   to the number of observed births within periods of 2 d.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s001

   (EPS)

Figure S2.

   Recruitment, survival, transition, and inheritance functions in the roe
   deer population of Trois Fontaines, France, used to build the IPM.
   Parturition date varies between the days of the year of 110 (20th
   April) and 161 (10th June).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s002

   (EPS)

Figure S3.

   Temporal variation in mean annual reproductive success (measured in
   fall) of roe deer females in the population of Trois Fontaines from
   1985 to 2010. Reproductive success was estimated by direct observations
   of the maternal group (mother and fawns) between September and December
   to determine the number of fawns successfully weaned. Predicted trends
   are presented as black lines with 95% confidence intervals (dashed
   lines). The size of the circle is proportional to the number of females
   for which reproductive success was recorded each year.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s003

   (EPS)

Figure S4.

   Annual median parturition dates in the population of roe deer from
   Trois Fontaines, France, from 1985 to 2011. (A) Observed and (B)
   predicted (from the IPM) parturition dates. Standard errors of median
   observed and mean predicted parturition dates are provided.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s004

   (EPS)

Figure S5.

   Stable distribution of parturition date (A) and mean parturition date
   in relation to age (B) predicted from the IPM in the population of roe
   deer from Trois Fontaines, France. Parturition date varies between the
   days of the year of 91 (1st April) and 181 (30th June).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s005

   (EPS)

Table S1.

   Influence of environmental variables on annual median birth date. We
   investigated the influence of flowering date in the vineyards of the
   Champagne region (Flow. date), annual mean temperature (Annual T), mean
   spring (April, May, and June) temperature (Spring T), sum of spring
   precipitation (Spring Prec), sum of degree-days above 7°C before the
   birth season (SDD), mean winter (January, February, March) temperature
   (Winter T), sum of winter precipitation (Winter Prec), mean fall
   (October, November, December) temperature (Fall T), sum of fall
   precipitation (Fall Prec), mean summer (July and August) temperature
   (Summer T), and sum of summer precipitation (Summer Prec). These
   periods where chosen in relation to the reproductive cycle of roe deer:
   births occur in spring, true gestation occurs during winter, embryonic
   diapause occurs in fall, and the rut takes place in summer. *The
   correlation between median birth date and sum of degree-days was
   performed excluding the outlier year of 1986.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s006

   (PDF)

Table S2.

   Individual early survival (recruitment function) in the roe deer
   population of Trois Fontaines, France.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s007

   (PDF)

Table S3.

   Transition function between two successive parturition dates in the roe
   deer population of Trois Fontaines, France.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s008

   (PDF)

Table S4.

   Inheritance function of parturition date between mother and daughter in
   the roe deer population of Trois Fontaines, France.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s009

   (PDF)

Table S5.

   Models of the functions used to build the IPM describing the
   distributions of parturition date (PD). M, Mother; D, Daughter.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s010

   (PDF)

Table S6.

   Datafile. Year of birth, sex (1, male; 2, female), birth date (day of
   the year), family (0, single fawns; >0, identity of the twin pair) and
   early survival (0, died; 1, survived until 8 mo of age).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s011

   (XLSX)

Text S1.

   Integral Projection Model on parturition date.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s012

   (DOC)

Acknowledgments

   We thank the Office National de la Chasse et de la Faune Sauvage and
   the many volunteers and colleagues who participated in catching and
   monitoring fawns on the study site of Trois Fontaines. We are grateful
   to the Comité Interprofessionnel du Vin de Champagne for collecting the
   data on the flowering date of the vineyards in the Champagne region and
   we thank Jean-Luc Dupouey for consultation during the analysis design.

Author Contributions

   The author(s) have made the following declarations about their
   contributions: Conceived and designed the experiments: JMG TC MH CB FP.
   Performed the experiments: DD CW. Analyzed the data: FP. Contributed
   reagents/materials/analysis tools: JMG TC MH CB FP DD CW. Wrote the
   paper: JMG TC MH CB FP DD CW.

References

    1. 1. Root TL, Price JT, Hall KR, Schneider SH, Rosenzweig C, et al.
       (2003) Fingerprints of global warming on wild animals and plants.
       Nature 421: 57–60.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    2. 2. Post E, Forchhammer MC, Bret-Harte MS, Callaghan TV, Christensen
       TR, et al. (2009) Ecological dynamics across the Arctic associated
       with recent climate change. Science 325: 1355–1358.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    3. 3. Lane JE, Kruuk LEB, Charmantier A, Murie JO, Dobson FS (2012)
       Delayed phenology and reduced fitness associated with climate
       change in a wild hibernator. Nature 489: 554–557.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    4. 4. Réale D, McAdam AG, Boutin S, Berteaux D (2003) Genetic and
       plastic responses of a northern mammal to climate change. Proc R
       Soc B 270: 591–596.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    5. 5. IPCC (2013) Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change: Fifth
       Assessment Report.
    6. 6. Parmesan C (2007) Inuences of species, latitudes and
       methodologies on estimates of phenological response to global
       warming. Glob Chang Biol 13: 1860–1872.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    7. 7. Parmesan C, Yohe G (2003) A globally coherent fingerprint of
       climate change impacts across natural systems. Nature 421: 37–42.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    8. 8. Price T, Kirkpatrick M, Arnold SJ (1988) Directional selection
       and the evolution of breeding date in birds. Science 240: 798–799.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    9. 9. Dunn PO, Winkler DW (1999) Climate change has affected the
       breeding date of tree swallows throughout North America. Proc R Soc
       B 266: 2487–2490.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   10. 10. Crick HQP (2004) The impact of climate change on birds. Ibis
       146: 48–56.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   11. 11. Coulson T, Kruuk LEB, Tavecchia G, Pemberton JM, Clutton-Brock
       TH (2003) Estimating selection on neonatal traits in red deer using
       elasticity path analysis. Evolution 57: 2879–2892.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   12. 12. Reed TE, Warzybok P, Wilson AJ, Bradley RW, Wanless S, et al.
       (2009) Timing is everything: exible phenology and shifting
       selection in a colonial seabird. J Anim Ecol 78: 376–387.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   13. 13. Moyes K, Nussey DH, Clements MN, Guinness FE, Morris A, et al.
       (2011) Advancing breeding phenology in response to environmental
       change in a wild red deer population. Glob Chang Biol 17:
       2455–2469.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   14. 14. Clutton-Brock TH, Albon SD, Guinness FE (1989) Fitness costs of
       gestation and lactation in wild mammals. Nature 337: 260–262.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   15. 15. Van Noordwijk AJ, McCleery RH, Perrins CM (1995) Selection for
       the timing of great tit breeding in relation to caterpillar growth
       and temperature. J Anim Ecol 64: 451–458.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   16. 16. Devictor V, van Swaay C, Brereton T, Brotons L, Chamberlain D,
       et al. (2012) Differences in the climatic debts of birds and
       butteries at a continental scale. Nature Clim Change 2: 121–124.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   17. 17. Stenseth NC, Mysterud A (2002) Climate, changing phenology, and
       other life history traits: nonlinearity and matchmismatch to the
       environment. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA 99: 13379–13381.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   18. 18. Visser ME, Both C, Lambrechts MM, A Moller WF (2004) Global
       climate change leads to mistimed avian reproduction. Adv Ecol Res
       35: 89–110.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   19. 19. Przybylo R, Sheldon BC, Merilä J (2000) Climatic effects on
       breeding and morphology: evidence for phenotypic plasticity. J Anim
       Ecol 69: 395–403.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   20. 20. Nussey DH, Postma E, Gienapp P, Visser M (2005) Selection on
       heritable phenotypic plasticity in a wild bird population. Science
       310: 304–306.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   21. 21. Visser ME, Both C (2005) Shifts in phenology due to global
       climate change: the need for a yardstick. Proc R Soc B 272:
       2561–2569.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   22. 22. Reed TE, Waples RS, Schindler DE, Hard JJ, Kinnison MT (2010)
       Phenotypic plasticity and population viability: the importance of
       environmental predictability. Proc R Soc B 277: 3391–3400.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   23. 23. Lambrechts MM, Blondel J, Maistre M, Perret P (1997) A single
       response mechanism is responsible for evolutionary adaptive
       variation in a birds laying date. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA 94:
       5153–5155.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   24. 24. Goldman BD (2001) Mammalian photoperiodic system: formal
       properties and neuroendocrine mechanisms of photoperiodic time
       measurement. J Biol Rhythm 16: 283–301.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   25. 25. Dawson A, King VM, Bentley GE, Ball GF (2001) Photoperiodic
       control of seasonality in birds. J Biol Rhythm 16: 365–380.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   26. 26. Visser ME, Schaper SV, Holleman LJM, Dawson A, Sharp P, et al.
       (2011) Genetic variation in cue sensitivity involved in avian
       timing of reproduction. Funct Ecol 25: 868–877.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   27. 27. Caro SP, Schaper SV, Hut RA, Ball GF, Visser ME (2013) The case
       of the missing mechanism: how does temperature influence seasonal
       timing in endotherms? PLoS Biol 11: e1001517.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   28. 28. Gienapp P, Teplitsky C, Alho JS, Mills JA, Merilä J (2008)
       Climate change and evolution: disentangling environmental and
       genetic responses. Mol Ecol 17: 167–178.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   29. 29. Visser ME, van Noordwijk AJ, Tinbergen JM, Lessells CM (1998)
       Warmer springs lead to mistimed reproduction in great tits (Parus
       major). Proc R Soc B 265: 1867–1870.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   30. 30. Post E, Forchhammer MC (2008) Climate change reduces
       reproductive success of an Arctic herbivore through trophic
       mismatch. Philos Trans R Soc Lond B Biol Sci 363: 2369–2375.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   31. 31. Kerby JT, Post E (2013) Advancing plant phenology and reduced
       herbivore production in a terrestrial system associated with sea
       ice decline. Nat Commun 4: 2514.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   32. 32. Bronson FH (1989) Mammalian reproductive biology. Chicago:
       University of Chicago Press.
   33. 33. Gaillard JM, Delorme D, Jullien JM, Tatin D (1993) Timing and
       synchrony of birth in roe deer. J Mammal 74: 738–744.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   34. 34. Linnell JDC, Andersen R (1998) Timing and synchrony of birth in
       a hider species, the roe deer Capreolus capreolus. J Zool 244:
       497–504.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   35. 35. Plard F, Gaillard JM, Bonenfant C, Hewison AJM, Delorme D, et
       al. (2013) Parturition date for a given female is highly repeatable
       within five roe deer populations. Biol Lett 9: 20120841.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   36. 36. Aitken R (1975) Ultrastructure of blastocyst and endometrium of
       roe deer Capreolus capreolus during delayed implantation. J Anat
       119: 369–384.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   37. 37. Lu W, Meng QJ, Tyler NJC, Stokkan KA, Loudon ASI (2010) A
       circadian clock is not required in an Arctic mammal. Curr Biol 20:
       533–537.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   38. 38. Sempéré AJ, Blanvillain C, Mauget R, Chemineau P (1993) Deer in
       China: biology and management. In N. Ohtaishi and H.I. Sheng eds.
       The role of the photoperiod in the sexual cycle in female roe deer
       (Capreolus capreolus). pp. 364–371.
   39. 39. Réale D, Berteaux D, McAdam AG, Boutin S (2003) Lifetime
       selection on heritable life-history traits in a natural population
       of red squirrels. Evolution 57: 2416–2423.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   40. 40. Feder C, Martin JGA, Festa-Bianchet M, Bérubé C, Jorgenson J
       (2008) Never too late? Consequences of late birthdate for mass and
       survival of bighorn lambs. Oecologia 156: 773–781.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   41. 41. Fisher RA (1930) The genetical theory of natural selection.
       Oxford, UK: The Clarendon Press.
   42. 42. Plard F, Gaillard JM, Coulson T, Hewison AJM, Delorme D, et al.
       (in press) Long-lived and heavier females give birth earlier in roe
       deer. Ecography
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   43. 43. Ellner S, Rees M (2006) Integral projection models for species
       with complex demography. Am Nat 167: 410–428.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   44. 44. Coulson T (2012) Integral projections models, their
       construction and use in posing hypotheses in ecology. Oikos 121:
       1337–1350.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   45. 45. Gaillard JM, Andersen R, Delorme D, Linnell JDC (1998) Family
       effects on growth and survival of juvenile roe deer. Ecology 79:
       2878–2889.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   46. 46. Hewison AJM, Andersen R, Gaillard JM, Linnell JDC, Delorme D
       (1999) Contradictory findings in studies of sex ratio variation in
       roe deer (Capreolus capreolus). Behav Ecol Sociobiol 45: 339–348.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   47. 47. Tuljapurkar S (1989) An uncertain life: demography in random
       environments. Theor Popul Biol 35: 227–294.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   48. 48. Schwartz MD, Ahas R, Aasa A (2006) Onset of spring starting
       earlier across the Northern Hemisphere. Glob Chang Biol 12:
       343–351.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   49. 49. Ozgul A, Childs DZ, Oli MK, Armitage KB, Blumstein DT, et al.
       (2010) Coupled dynamics of body mass and population growth in
       response to environmental change. Nature 466: 482–485.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   50. 50. Gaillard JM, Hewison AJM, Klein F, Plard F, Douhard M, et al.
       (2013) How does climate change influence demographic processes of
       widespread species? Lessons from the comparative analysis of
       contrasted populations of roe deer. Ecol Lett 16: 48–57.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   51. 51. Burthe S, Butler A, Searle KR, Hall SJ, Thackeray SJ, et al.
       (2011) Demographic consequences of increased winter births in a
       large aseasonally breeding mammal (Bos taurus) in response to
       climate change. J Anim Ecol 80: 1134–1144.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   52. 52. Reed TE, Jenouvrier S, Visser ME (2012) Phenological mismatch
       strongly affects individual fitness but not population demography
       in a woodland passerine. J Anim Ecol 82: 131–144.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   53. 53. Reed TE, Grotan V, Jenouvrier S, Saether BE, Visser ME (2013)
       Population growth in a wild bird is buffered against phenological
       mismatch. Science 340: 488–491.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   54. 54. Thomas DW, Blondel J, Perret P, Lambrechts MM, Speakman JR
       (2001) Energetic and fitness costs of mismatching resource supply
       and demand in seasonally breeding birds. Science 291: 2598–2600.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   55. 55. Merilä J, Sheldon BC, Kruuk LEB (2001) Explaining stasis:
       microevolutionary studies in natural populations. Genetica 112–113:
       199–222.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   56. 56. Sandell M (1990) The evolution of seasonal delayed
       implantation. Q Rev Biol 65: 23–42.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   57. 57. Charmantier A, McCleery RH, Cole LR, Perrins C, Kruuk LEB, et
       al. (2008) Adaptive phenotypic plasticity in response to climate
       change in a wild bird population. Science 320: 800–803.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   58. 58. Clements MN, Clutton-Brock TH, Albon SD, Pemberton JM, Kruuk LE
       (2011) Gestation length variation in a wild ungulate. Funct Ecol
       25: 691–703.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   59. 59. Andersen R, Duncan P, Linnell JDC (1998) The European Roe Deer:
       the biology of Success. Oslo, Norway: Scandinavian University
       Press.
   60. 60. Delorme D, Gaillard JM, Jullien JM (1988) Intérêt de l'étude de
       la période juvénile pour le suivi de l'évolution d'une population
       de chevreuils (Capreolus capreolus). Gibier Faune Sauvage 5: 15–26.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   61. 61. Jullien JM, Delorme D, Gaillard JM (1992) Détermination de
       l'âge chez le faon de chevreuil (Capreolus capreolus) dans son
       premier mois de vie. Mammalia 56: 307–311.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   62. 62. Pettorelli N, Gaillard JM, Yoccoz NG, Duncan P, Maillard D, et
       al. (2005) The response of fawn survival to changes in habitat
       quality varies according to cohort quality and spatial scale. J
       Anim Ecol 74: 972–981.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   63. 63. Lebreton JD, Burnham KP, Clobert J, Anderson DR (1992) Modeling
       survival and testing biological hypotheses using marked animals: a
       unified approach with case studies. Ecol Monogr 62: 67–118.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   64. 64. Bonhomme R (2000) Bases and limits to using ‘degree.day’ units.
       Eur J Agron 13: 1–10.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   65. 65. Falconer DS, Mackay TFC (1996) Introduction to quantitative
       genetics. Longman.

   Download PDF

     * Citation
     * XML

   Print
     * Print article
     * EzReprint

   Share
     * Reddit Reddit
     * Google+ Google+
     * Facebook Facebook
     * LinkedIn LinkedIn
     * Mendeley Mendeley
     * PubChase PubChase
     * Twitter Twitter
     * Email Email

     [CROSSMARK_BW_horizontal.svg]

Related PLOS Articles

     * Will Roe Deer Persist in a Warmer World?

   Advertisement

Subject Areas

   ?

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.
   We want your feedback. Do these Subject Areas make sense for this
   article? Click the target next to the incorrect Subject Area and let us
   know. Thanks for your help!
     * Deer
       Is the Subject Area "Deer" applicable to this article? (BUTTON) Yes
       (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Climate change
       Is the Subject Area "Climate change" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Spring (season)
       Is the Subject Area "Spring (season)" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * France
       Is the Subject Area "France" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Mammals
       Is the Subject Area "Mammals" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Population growth
       Is the Subject Area "Population growth" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Birds
       Is the Subject Area "Birds" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Heredity
       Is the Subject Area "Heredity" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.

Archived Tweets

   Load more
   View all tweets

     * Publications
     * PLOS Biology
     * PLOS Medicine
     * PLOS Computational Biology
     * PLOS Genetics
     * PLOS Pathogens
     * PLOS ONE
     * PLOS Neglected Tropical Diseases

     * Home
     * Blogs
     * Collections
     * Give feedback
     * LOCKSS

     * Privacy Policy
     * Terms of Use
     * Advertise
     * Media Inquiries
     * Contact

   PLOS is a nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation, #C2354500, based in San
   Francisco, California, US
   PLOS
   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TP26BH

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MQQMGF

   Advertisement

     * plos.org
     * create account
     * sign in

PLOS ONE

     * Publish
          + Submissions
               o Getting Started
               o Submission Guidelines
               o Figures
               o Tables
               o Supporting Information
               o LaTeX
               o Preprints
               o Revising Your Manuscript
               o Submit Now
               o Calls for Papers
          + Policies
               o Best Practices in Research Reporting
               o Human Subjects Research
               o Animal Research
               o Competing Interests
               o Disclosure of Funding Sources
               o Licenses and Copyright
               o Data Availability
               o Materials and Software Sharing
               o Ethical Publishing Practice
               o Authorship
               o Downloads and Translations
          + Manuscript Review and Publication
               o Criteria for Publication
               o Editorial and Peer Review Process
               o Editor Center
               o Guidelines for Reviewers
               o Accepted Manuscripts
               o Corrections and Retractions
               o Comments
               o Article-Level Metrics

Submit Your Manuscript
       Discover a faster, simpler path to publishing in a high-quality
       journal. PLOS ONE promises fair, rigorous peer review, broad scope,
       and wide readership – a perfect fit for your research every time.
       Learn More Submit Now
     * About
          + Why Publish with PLOS ONE
          + Journal Information
          + Staff Editors
          + Editorial Board
          + Section Editors
          + Advisory Groups
          + Find and Read Articles
          + Publishing Information
          + Publication Fees
          + Press and Media
          + Contact
     * Browse
     *

       Search

       Search
       ____________________ (BUTTON)

       advanced search

   Browse Subject Areas
   ?

   Click through the PLOS taxonomy to find articles in your field.

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.

     * Loading metrics

   Open Access

   Peer-reviewed

   Research Article

Understanding climate change from a global analysis of city analogues

     * Jean-Francois Bastin ,
       Roles Conceptualization, Formal analysis, Methodology, Supervision,
       Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       * E-mail: bastin.jf@gmail.com
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0003-2602-7247
       ⨯
     * Emily Clark,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Thomas Elliott,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Simon Hart,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Plant Ecology, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Johan van den Hoogen,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0001-6624-8461
       ⨯
     * Iris Hordijk,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0002-6302-6254
       ⨯
     * Haozhi Ma,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Sabiha Majumder,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Gabriele Manoli,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Department of Civil, Environmental and Geomatic
       Engineering, Institute of Environmental Engineering, ETH Zürich,
       Zürich, Switzerland
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0002-9245-2877
       ⨯
     * Julia Maschler,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Lidong Mo,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Devin Routh,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Kailiang Yu,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Constantin M. Zohner,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Thomas W. Crowther
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯

Understanding climate change from a global analysis of city analogues

     * Jean-Francois Bastin,
     * Emily Clark,
     * Thomas Elliott,
     * Simon Hart,
     * Johan van den Hoogen,
     * Iris Hordijk,
     * Haozhi Ma,
     * Sabiha Majumder,
     * Gabriele Manoli,
     * Julia Maschler

   PLOS
   x
     * Published: July 10, 2019
     * https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592

     * Article
     * Authors
     * Metrics
     * Comments
     * Media Coverage

     * Reader Comments (3)
     * Media Coverage
     * Figures

Figures

   Fig 1
   Fig 2
   Fig 3
   Fig 4

Abstract

   Combating climate change requires unified action across all sectors of
   society. However, this collective action is precluded by the ‘consensus
   gap’ between scientific knowledge and public opinion. Here, we test the
   extent to which the iconic cities around the world are likely to shift
   in response to climate change. By analyzing city pairs for 520 major
   cities of the world, we test if their climate in 2050 will resemble
   more closely to their own current climate conditions or to the current
   conditions of other cities in different bioclimatic regions. Even under
   an optimistic climate scenario (RCP 4.5), we found that 77% of future
   cities are very likely to experience a climate that is closer to that
   of another existing city than to its own current climate. In addition,
   22% of cities will experience climate conditions that are not currently
   experienced by any existing major cities. As a general trend, we found
   that all the cities tend to shift towards the sub-tropics, with cities
   from the Northern hemisphere shifting to warmer conditions, on average
   ~1000 km south (velocity ~20 km.year^-1), and cities from the tropics
   shifting to drier conditions. We notably predict that Madrid’s climate
   in 2050 will resemble Marrakech’s climate today, Stockholm will
   resemble Budapest, London to Barcelona, Moscow to Sofia, Seattle to San
   Francisco, Tokyo to Changsha. Our approach illustrates how complex
   climate data can be packaged to provide tangible information. The
   global assessment of city analogues can facilitate the understanding of
   climate change at a global level but also help land managers and city
   planners to visualize the climate futures of their respective cities,
   which can facilitate effective decision-making in response to on-going
   climate change.

   Citation: Bastin J-F, Clark E, Elliott T, Hart S, van den Hoogen J,
   Hordijk I, et al. (2019) Understanding climate change from a global
   analysis of city analogues. PLoS ONE 14(7): e0217592.
   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592

   Editor: Juan A. Añel, Universidade de Vigo, SPAIN

   Received: February 14, 2019; Accepted: May 8, 2019; Published: July 10,
   2019

   Copyright: © 2019 Bastin et al. This is an open access article
   distributed under the terms of the Creative Commons Attribution
   License, which permits unrestricted use, distribution, and reproduction
   in any medium, provided the original author and source are credited.

   Data Availability: All relevant data are within the manuscript and its
   Supporting Information files.

   Funding: Author TWC is supported by grant from DOB Ecology. The funders
   had no role in study design, data collection and analysis, decision to
   publish, or preparation of the manuscript. The authors received no
   specific funding for this work.

   Competing interests: The authors have declared that no competing
   interests exist.

Introduction

   The gap between the scientific and public understanding of climate
   change, referred to as the “Consensus Gap”, is largely attributed to
   failures in climate change communication[1]. Often limited to ad-hoc
   reporting of extreme weather events or intangible, long-term climate
   impacts (e.g. changes in average temperature by 2100). Despite an
   exhaustive list of risks associated to climate change [2] (e.g. heat
   stress, air and water quality, food supply, distribution of vectors of
   diseases, social factors), the intangible nature of reporting on
   climate change fails to adequately convey the urgency of this issue to
   a public audience on a consistent basis[3]. It is hard for most people
   to envision how an additional 2°C of warming might affect daily life.
   This ineffective communication of climate change facts, compounded by
   uncertainty about the extent of expected changes, has left the door
   open for widespread misinterpretation about the existence of this
   global phenomenon.

   History has repeatedly shown us that data and facts alone do not
   inspire humans to change their beliefs or act [3]. Increased scientific
   literacy has no correlation with the acceptance of climate change facts
   [4]. A growing body of research demonstrates that visualization—the
   ability to create a mental image of the problem—is the most effective
   approach for motivating behavior change [5,6]. Several studies have
   analyzed ‘geographic shifts’ to better illustrate climate change. For
   example, Seidel and colleagues (2008) [7,8] showed that climate change
   has driven a widening of the tropical belt, by ~2 to 4.8 latitudinal
   degrees in recent decades. Similarly, the changing conditions of cities
   around the world provides another tangible example of shifting climate
   regimes. Given that over 50% of the global population exists within
   cities [9], these urban environments potentially valuable tool to
   visualize the impact of climate change at a global scale. As iconic
   locations, cities are associated with distinct sets of environmental
   conditions. As such, shifts in the climate conditions of these urban
   areas could provide a unique opportunity for people to visualize the
   impacts of climate change, and to establish effective response
   strategies to address the effects.

   Several studies [10–15] and press reports [16,17] have shown that the
   use of ‘cities geographic shift’ or “city analogues” can help to
   understand and visualize the effects of climate change. In particular,
   cities can serve as useful climate analog, enabling people to visualize
   their own climate future via comparison with other cities that
   currently experience those climate conditions. However, until now,
   existing research have been focused on regional- or continent-scale
   analyses in North America or Europe [10–15], and we lack a unifying
   global perspective. These regional trends suggest that cities are
   likely to resemble those at lower latitudes as the climate continues to
   warm. However, it remains unclear if this trend holds at a global
   scale, as other climate drivers such as changing precipitation regimes
   may obscure these latitudinal trends. As such, Southern Hemisphere or
   tropical cities, which already exist in warm conditions and are likely
   to experience considerable changes in precipitation and extreme climate
   variation, may show independent geographic shifts under changing
   climate conditions. Generating a unified understanding of the shifts in
   the climate conditions of the world’s cities is critical if we are
   going to visualize the impacts of climate change in any biogeographic
   region. Generating this understanding requires a global perspective and
   the use of a full range of climate variables to represent the entire
   climate regime of those regions.

   In this study, we evaluate the global shifts in the climate conditions
   of cities by taking current climate data for the world’s 520 major
   cities (Current Cities), and project what they will most closely
   resemble in 2050 (Future Cities). Rather than describing the
   quantitative changes in climate variables [18], we propose to quantify
   city climate analogs at a global scale [10–12], i.e. assessing which
   Current Cities will most closely resemble the climate conditions of
   Future Cities. To tackle previous limitations, we explore these
   patterns at a global scale using 19 bioclimatic variables, to include
   climate variability and seasonality in addition to climate averages.

   Specifically, we aim to test three questions: (i) What proportion of
   the world’s major cities of the future most closely resemble their own
   current climate conditions vs. the climate conditions of other cities
   in different geographic regions? (ii) What proportion of cities will
   experience novel climate conditions that are outside the range
   experiences by cities today? (iii) If cities do shift their climate
   conditions, is this spatial shift uniform in direction across the
   planet?

Materials and methods

Selection of major cities

   We selected these “major” cities of the world from the “LandScan (2016)
   High Resolution global Population Data Set” created by the Oak Ridge
   National Laboratory [19]. By “major” cities, we considered cities that
   are an administrative capital or that account more than 1,000,000
   inhabitants. In total, 520 cities were selected.

The climate database

   To characterize the current climate conditions among these major cities
   of the world, we extracted 19 bioclimatic variables from the latest
   Worldclim global raster layers (Version 2; period 1970–2000) at 30
   arc-seconds resolution [20]. These variables captured various climatic
   conditions, including yearly averages, seasonality metrics, and monthly
   extremes for both precipitation and temperature at every location.

Future data: GCMs, downscaling and future scenarios

   For the future projections, the same 19 bioclimatic variables were
   averaged from the outputs of three general circulation models (GCM)
   commonly used in ecology [21,22]. Two Community Earth System Models
   (CESMs) were chosen as they investigate a diverse set of earth-system
   interactions: the CESM1 BGC (a coupled carbon–climate model accounting
   for carbon feedback from the land) and the CESM1 CAM5 (a community
   atmosphere model) [21]. Additionally, the Earth System component of the
   Met Office Hadley Centre HadGEM2 model family was used as the third and
   final model [22]. To generate the data, we chose Representative Common
   Pathway 4.5 (RCP 4.5) scenario from the Coupled Model Intercomparison
   Project Phase 5 (CMIP5) as the input. It is a stabilization scenario,
   meaning that it accounts for a stabilization of radiative forcing
   before 2100, anticipating the development of new technologies and
   strategies for reducing greenhouse gas emissions [23]. By using this
   optimistic climate change scenario, we represent conservative changes
   in climate conditions that are likely to occur even if substantial
   climate change mitigation occurs. For each output, a delta downscaling
   method developed by the CGIAR Research Program on Climate Change,
   Agriculture and Food Security (CCAFS) was applied to reach a resolution
   of 30 arc-seconds [24], using current conditions Worldclim 1.4 as a
   reference. Downscaling approach were necessary to assess climate
   conditions at the cities’ scale even if it induces a risk of pixel
   mismatch and consequently, a lower level of confidence for local scale
   analyses [25,26].

Summarizing the current climate among the major cities through a principal
component analysis

   The 19 current and future bioclimatic variables were extracted from the
   coordinates of the 520 major cities (i.e., the city centroids), meaning
   each city had two sets of bioclimatic metrics: the current climate data
   for the world’s major cities (Current Cities) and the equivalent 2050
   projection (Future Cities) according to the average of the three RCP
   4.5 GCMs.

   A scaled principal components analysis (PCA) was performed on current
   bioclimatic data in order to account for correlation between climate
   variables and to standardize their contributions to the subsequent
   dissimilarity analysis [27]. As the first four principal components
   accounted for more than 85% of the total variation of climate data
   (40.2%, 26.9%, 10.5% and 7.6%, respectively), the remaining principal
   components were dropped from later analyses. The main contributing
   variables to the four components are the temperature seasonality (axis
   1), the minimum temperature of the coldest month (axis 1), the maximum
   temperature of the warmest month (axis 2), the precipitation
   seasonality (axis 2), the precipitation of the driest (axis 4) and of
   the wettest (axis 3) month, and the temperature diurnal range (axis 4,
   Fig 1).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 1. Distribution of current and future cities along the first 4
   principal component axes.

   The seven major climate variables contributing to the Principal
   Component Analysis (PCA) are superposed on each figure. The figure at
   the top (a) shows the distribution of current (blue) and future (red)
   cities on the space defined by the first two principal components. The
   first two axes explain, respectively, 40.2 and 26.9% of climate
   variations. The first axis is mainly driven by differences in
   temperature seasonality and in minimum temperature of the coldest
   month, while the second axis is mainly driven by differences in
   precipitation seasonality. The figure at the bottom (b) shows the same
   current (green) and future (orange) cities on the space defined by the
   third and fourth principal components. They explain respectively 10.5
   and 7.6% of climate variations. The third axis is mainly driven by
   changes in precipitation of the wet season, while the fourth axis is
   mainly driven by changes in the mean diurnal temperature range.
   Boxplots illustrates the distribution of the points along each of the 4
   axes. The continuous line in the boxes represents the median of the
   distribution, the extremities of the boxes the 1^st and the 3^rd
   quartile and the continuous lines go up to 1.5 times the difference
   between the 3^st and the 1^rd quartile.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592.g001

Calculating the extent of the covered climate domain

   For further interpretation of the results, a convex hull was computed
   from the coordinates of the Current Cities within the multivariate
   space defined by the first four principal components axes [28]. For
   reference, a convex hull of a set of N-dimensional points forms the
   smallest possible hypervolume (in N-dimensions) containing all points
   defined in that set; in this case, it defines the bounds of climatic
   combinations that Earth currently experiences in these 520 cities. All
   Future Cities falling outside the hypervolume of this convex hull
   represent currently non-existent bioclimatic assemblies in these
   cities, i.e. cities with no current climate analog [29].

Pairing cities based on the similarity between current and future climate
conditions

   Euclidean distances (i.e., dissimilarity indices) were calculated for
   every combination of Current and Future City based on their coordinates
   within the multivariate space defined by the first four principal
   components axes, creating a symmetric dissimilarity matrix with
   pairwise comparisons for all cities (S1 Table). The Euclidean distance
   was calculated using the vegan package on R (RCran version 3.3.2) [30].
   Each Future City was then paired with its three closest Current Cities
   based on the dissimilarity values (S1 Table, S2 Table). Three cities
   are kept for each Future city in order to facilitate comparison between
   Current and Future climate, as all cities are not necessarily known by
   the reader. To avoid un-realistic shifts or shifts due to pixel
   mismatch between Current and Future climate conditions, the final
   analysis was performed keeping shift values between the 5^th and the
   95^th percentile, i.e. keeping 477 out of the original 520 cities.

Calculating the absolute latitudinal shift

   To illustrate and summarize the shifts between Current and Future
   Cities, we calculated the importance of absolute latitudinal shift for
   each city. Shifts in latitude were standardized for both hemisphere, so
   that a shift south in the northern hemisphere is equal to a shift north
   in the southern hemisphere, i.e. referred as the absolute latitudinal
   shift. In other words, the absolute latitudinal shift expresses a
   geographic shift in relation to the equatorial line (shifting away from
   or towards the equator).

   Analyses and figures were performed using R, maps were built using
   Q-GIS 3.0.

Results

Analysis of changes between current and future cities from the PCA

   The future climate of each city was projected within the four principal
   components (using the PCA eigenvectors derived from the bioclimatic
   variables of the current climate) to allow for direct comparison
   between Current and Future Cities (Fig 1). On the plane defined by the
   first two components of the PCA (Fig 1A), explaining respectively 40.2
   and 26.9% of climate variations, we observe changes towards less
   temperature seasonality, with higher maximal and minimal temperatures
   during the year, as well as higher precipitation seasonality, with
   higher precipitation in the wettest month but lower precipitation in
   the driest one. While no clear trend can be observed along the third
   axis (10.5% of climate variation), the changes along the fourth axis
   (7.6% of climate variation) show higher temperature diurnal range (Fig
   1B), i.e. the daily difference between cities’ maximum and minimum
   temperatures will increase. In brief, cities of the world become
   hotter, in particular during the winter and the summer. Wet seasons
   become wetter and dry season drier.

What proportion of cities will resemble their own current climate vs. other
cities by 2050?

   We characterized the climate of the world’s 520 major cities using 19
   climatic variables that reflect the variability in temperature and
   precipitation regimes for current and future conditions. Future
   conditions are estimated using an optimistic Representative
   Concentration Pathway (RCP4.5), which considers a stabilization of
   CO[2]emissions by mid-century (see Material and Methods). This model
   was chosen to show the extent of the changes we would be facing even
   considering the implementation of effective mitigation policies. Using
   a multivariate analysis, we analyzed the climate similarity of all
   Current and Future cities to one another (S1 Table). This simple
   analysis enables us to estimate which major cities of the world will
   remain relatively similar, and which will shift to reflect the climate
   of another city by 2050. Overall, our analysis shows that 77% of the
   world’s Current Cities will experience a striking change in climate
   conditions, making them more similar to the conditions of another
   existing city than they are to their own current climate conditions (S1
   Table, S2 Table). The climate conditions of remaining 23% of cities
   remained most closely associated with their current climate conditions.

What proportion of cities will experience novel climate conditions?

   Overall 78% of the 520 Future Cities studied present a climate within
   the hypervolume representing covered combinations of climate
   conditions. Therefore, 22% of the Future Cities’ climate conditions
   would disappear from this current climatic domain (Fig 2A). As such,
   22% of the world’s cities are likely to exist in a climatic regime that
   does current exist on the planet today. The situation is even more
   pronounced in the tropics, with 30% of cities experiencing novel
   climate conditions essentially because the climate will get drier.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 2. Extent of climate changes in major cities of the world by 2050.

   a, b, the extent of change in climate conditions. Cities predicted to
   have climates that no major city has experienced before are colored in
   red (mostly within the tropics). Cities for which future climate
   conditions reflect current conditions in other major cities of the
   world are shown in green. The size of the dots represents the magnitude
   of change between current and future climate conditions. b, The
   proportion of cities shifting away from the covered climate domain
   (concentrated in the tropics). c,d, The extent of latitudinal shifts in
   relation to the equatorial line. Cities shifting towards the equator
   are colored with a blue gradient (mostly outside the tropics), while
   cities shifting away from the equator are colored with a yellow to red
   gradient (mostly within the tropics). d, A summary of the shift by
   latitude is illustrated in a barchart, with shifts averaged by bins of
   5 degrees. The background of the maps are a combination rasters
   available in the public domain, i.e. of USGS shaded relief only and
   hydro cached.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592.g002

Is this spatial shift uniform in direction across the planet?

   The proportion of shifting cities varied consistently across the world.
   Cities in northern latitudes will experience the most dramatic shifts
   in extreme temperature conditions (Fig 2C and Fig 2D). For example,
   across Europe, both summers and winters will get warmer, with average
   increases of 3.5°C and 4.7°C, respectively. These changes would be
   equivalent to a city shifting ~1,000 km further south towards the
   subtropics, i.e. a velocity ~20 km.year^-1, under current climate
   conditions (Fig 2C and Fig 2D). Consequently, by 2050, striking changes
   will be observed across the northern hemisphere: Madrid’s climate in
   2050 will be more similar to the current climate in Marrakech than to
   Madrid’s climate today; London will be more similar to Barcelona,
   Stockholm to Budapest; Moscow to Sofia; Portland to San Antonio, San
   Francisco to Lisbon, Tokyo to Changsha, etc(Fig 3, S2 Table).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 3. Future cities and similar current climate counterpart.

   Difference between future and current climate for four cities and an
   example of their similar current counterpart. Illustration of the
   results of the analysis for London (a; counterpart: Barcelona), Buenos
   Aires (b; counterpart: Sidney), Nairobi (c; counterpart:Beirut) and
   Portland (d; counterpart:San Antonio). The red bar represents the
   difference between the current climate of the city of interest (e.g.
   London in (a)) and the current climate of the city to which the city of
   interest (e.g. London in (a)) will have the most similar climate by
   2050 (e.g. Barcelona in (a)). The yellow bar the difference between the
   current and future climate of the city of interest (e.g. current London
   and London 2050 in (a)). The green bar represents the difference
   between the future climate of the city of interest (London 2050) and
   the current climate of the most similar counterpart (e.g. Barcelona in
   (a)). Images of Barcelona and London were obtained on Pixabay, shared
   under common creative CC0 license.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592.g003

   Cities in the tropical regions will experience smaller changes in
   average temperature, relative to the higher latitudes. However, shifts
   in rainfall regimes will dominate the tropical cities. This is
   characterized by both increases in extreme precipitation events (+5%
   rainfall wettest month) and, the severity and intensity of droughts
   (-14% rainfall driest month). With more severe droughts, tropical
   cities will move towards the subtropics, i.e. towards drier climates
   (Fig 2C and Fig 2D). However, the fate of major tropical cities remains
   highly uncertain because many tropical regions will experience
   unprecedented climate conditions. Specifically, of all 22% of cities
   that will experience novel climate conditions, most (64%) are located
   in the tropics. These include Manaus, Libreville, Kuala Lumpur,
   Jakarta, Rangoon, and Singapore (Fig 2A and Fig 2B, S2 Table).

   In summary, at a global level, we observe a global geographic shift
   towards the subtropics, i.e. towards ~20 degrees of latitude (Fig 2B
   and Fig 4).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 4. Latitudinal shift of cities relative to their distance to the
   equator (in degrees).

   Cities below 20 degrees North/South tend to move away from the equator
   (positive latitudinal shift) while cities beyond 20 degrees North/South
   tend to move closer to the equator (negative latitudinal shift). Cities
   are colored according to the aggregated ecoregion of the world [36] to
   which they belong, with the tropical in red, the subtropical in orange,
   the temperate in green and the boreal in blue.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592.g004

Discussion

   Our analysis reveals consistent global patterns in the climate shifts
   of future major cities around the world over the next 30 years. Despite
   our use of a highly optimistic climate change scenario (i.e. RCP 4.5),
   we show that the climate conditions of over 77% of world’s major cities
   will change to such a great extent that they will resemble more closely
   the conditions of another major city. The projected shifts showed
   consistent biogeographic trends, with all city climates (both southern
   and northern hemisphere) generally shifting towards the conditions in
   warmer, low-latitude regions. The extent and consistency of these
   patterns provides a stark reminder of the global scale of this climate
   change threat and associated risks for human health. In contrast to
   previous analyses, our analysis also reveals that 22% of the world’s
   cities are likely to exist in a climatic regime that does not current
   exist on the planet today. These trends highlight the extreme
   vulnerability of tropical and sub-tropical cities, 30% of which will
   experience shifts into entirely novel climate regimes with no existing
   analogues across the world’s major cities. This lends support to the
   idea of novel climates, which are expected to emerge in many tropical
   and sub-tropical regions [29]. It should be noted that, by defining the
   climate envelope using a convex-hull (i.e. by defining a volume from
   simplices (“triangles”) that form the smallest convex simplicial
   complex of a set of input points in 4-dimensional space), we applied a
   conservative method for evaluating future change. Indeed, because it
   includes the smallest level of extrapolation and generating the
   smallest possible shapes, this approach has a low-risk of incorrectly
   identifying novel climate conditions, relative to a concave-hull
   approach [31]. However, this approach necessarily comes with the high
   likelihood of missing some novel climates. The 22% of cities
   experiencing a novel climate must therefore be seen as a highly
   conservative estimate.

   Our findings also support previous studies conducted in Europe [10,11]
   and north America [13], stressing the current trend of north-to-south
   geographical shift across the northern hemisphere. Yet, using an
   optimistic climate change scenario, we found that the velocity (i.e.
   the speed of geographical shift) risks to be higher in the near future
   than in the second half of the 21th century [10] passing from 15 km
   year^-1 to 20 km year^-1. Our study also allows the extension of such
   observations to the global scale, showing that observations for Europe
   can be generalized for the entire Northern Hemisphere and for a part of
   the southern hemisphere (Fig 2B). At the global scale, our study
   reveals that geographical shift tend to converge towards the subtropics
   (Fig 4), going to warmer climate conditions from boreal and temperate
   regions and to drier conditions from tropical regions. While this lends
   support to previous observations of a “tropical belt widening” due to
   the expected warmer conditions [7,8], it also shows that tropical
   biomes tend to shrink in many areas due to drier conditions. We
   therefore suggest here to refer to a “sub-tropical widening” compared
   to the previous “tropical widening” due to climate change.

   While our findings are necessarily dependent on the methodology used to
   identify the climatic shifts, it is widely recognized that the choice
   of the metric to assess the similarity-dissimilarity of the climate
   conditions between cities has an extremely minor effect, compared to
   the choice of the climate model and scenario[32]. That is, our results
   are unlikely to be affected whatever method we use to calculate
   dissimilarity, as the variation between climate projections is far
   greater. Nonetheless, Mahony and colleagues [31] highlighted the need
   to standardize the contribution of each climate variable to the
   dissimilarity matrix and to account for correlation between them to
   avoid any bias[31]. In the present study, we address this using a
   scaled principal component analysis to summarize the main bioclimatic
   variations among the 520 major cities. This approach simply follows
   classic dissimilarity analysis recommendations for ecological
   studies[27], applying an Euclidean distance matrix on the main
   dimensions of the principal component analysis to assess the similarity
   between cities. This method was preferred to the sigma-dissimilarity
   developed by Mahony and colleagues[31] for its simplicity and it broad
   use in ecological sciences.

   Our analysis allows us to visualize a tangible climate future of the
   world’s major cities. These results enable decision makers from all
   sectors of society, to envision changes that are likely to occur in
   their own city, within their own lifetime. Londoners, for example, can
   start to consider how their 2050 equivalents (e.g. Barcelona today)
   have taken action to combat their own environmental challenges. In
   2008, Barcelona experienced extreme drought conditions, which required
   the importation of €22m of drinking water. Since then, the municipal
   government has implemented a series of ‘smart initiatives‘ to manage
   the city’s water resources (including the control of park irrigation
   and water fountain levels). The Mayor of London has factored drought
   considerations into his Environment Strategy aims for 2050 [33], but
   this study can provide the context to facilitate the development of
   more targeted climate strategies. In addition, this information can
   also empower local citizens to evaluate proposed environmental
   policies. By allowing people to visualize their own climate futures, we
   hope that this information can facilitate efforts to mitigate and adapt
   to climate change.

   Our study is not a novel model revealing updated climate projections or
   expectations by 2050. Instead, our analysis is intended to illustrate
   how complex climate data can be effectively summarized into tangible
   information that can be easily interpreted by anyone. Of course, the
   climate scenarios that we have used are based on predictions from a few
   climate models, run under a single (business as usual) climate
   scenario. We recognize that these models are characterized by huge
   amounts of uncertainty [34], and the predicted Future Cities may change
   as these Earth System Models are refined, in particular in light of
   urban climate specificities [35]. However, our results are likely to
   reflect the qualitative direction of climate changes within cities and
   so meet our primary goal, which is to communicate predicted climate
   changes to a non-specialist audience in order to motivate action. When
   model projections are updated, we would recommend communicating any new
   results with this goal in mind.

Conclusion

   To our knowledge, our study represents the first global analysis of the
   shifts in climate conditions of the world’s major cities under climate
   change. Our analysis revealed that over 77% of the world’s cities are
   likely to experience a shift towards the climate conditions of another
   major city by 2050, while 22% will shift to climate conditions that are
   not currently present for any major cities on the planet. Across the
   globe, the direction of movement is generally trending towards the
   subtropics, providing unifying patterns that support trends observed in
   Europe and North America. In addition, this analysis revealed new
   insights for cities in equatorial regions, many of which are likely to
   move to entirely new climate conditions that are not currently
   experienced by any of the other global cities today. These city
   analogues, and the data we openly share, can help land managers and
   city planners to visualize the climate futures of their respective
   cities, facilitating efforts to establish targeted climate response
   strategies. As well as facilitating our basic understanding of climate
   change effects, our analysis highlights the value of using cities to
   visualize the tangible effects of climate change across the globe.

Supporting information

S1 Table. Dissimilarity between current and future climate of the major
cities of the world.

   The dissimilarity is expressed as the Euclidean distance matrix
   performed on the 4 main axes of the PCA analysis that summarizes the
   climate variation (19 bioclimatic variables) among the major cities of
   the world.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592.s001

   (ODS)

S2 Table. Summary statistics of the global analysis of city analogues.

   The table provides the three cities for which current climate is the
   most similar to the future climate of each city. It also provides the
   associated latitudinal shift for the most similar city and the expected
   changes in climate conditions by 2050 for the mean annual temperature,
   the annual precipitations, the temperature of the warmest month, the
   temperature of the coldest month and the precipitation of the wettest
   month.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592.s002

   (ODS)

Acknowledgments

   This work was supported by grants to T.W.C. from DOB Ecology,
   Plant-for-the-Planet and the German Federal Ministry for Economic
   Cooperation and Development. Images of cities were obtained on Pixabay,
   and openly shared under CC0 common creative license.

References

    1. 1. Nisbet EC, Cooper KE, Garrett RK. The Partisan Brain. Suhay E,
       Druckman JN, editors. Ann Am Acad Pol Soc Sci. SAGE
       PublicationsSage CA: Los Angeles, CA; 2015;658: 36–66.
       https://doi.org/10.1177/0002716214555474
    2. 2. Haines A, Ebi K. The Imperative for Climate Action to Protect
       Health. Solomon CG, editor. N Engl J Med. 2019;380: 263–273.
       pmid:30650330
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    3. 3. Zaval L, Cornwell JFM. Effective education and communication
       strategies to promote environmental engagement. Eur J Educ.
       2017;52: 477–486.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    4. 4. Kahan DM. Climate-Science Communication and the Measurement
       Problem. Polit Psychol. Wiley/Blackwell (10.1111); 2015;36: 1–43.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    5. 5. Marx SM, Weber EU, Orlove BS, Leiserowitz A, Krantz DH, Roncoli
       C, et al. Communication and mental processes: Experiential and
       analytic processing of uncertain climate information. Glob Environ
       Chang. Pergamon; 2007;17: 47–58.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    6. 6. Sheppard SRJ. Visualizing Climate Change. Routledge; 2012.
       https://doi.org/10.4324/9781849776882
    7. 7. Seidel DJ, Fu Q, Randel WJ, Reichler TJ. Widening of the
       tropical belt in a changing climate. Nat Geosci. Nature Publishing
       Group; 2008;1: 21–24.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    8. 8. Lu J. Tropical expansion by ocean swing. Nat Geosci. Nature
       Publishing Group; 2014;7: 250–251.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    9. 9. United Nations. World Urbanization Prospects: The 2018 Revision,
       Key Facts. 2018. (ST/ESA/SER.A/366)
   10. 10. Beniston M. European isotherms move northwards by up to 15 km
       year −1: using climate analogues for awareness-raising. Int J
       Climatol. Wiley-Blackwell; 2014;34: 1838–1844.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   11. 11. Rohat G, Goyette S, Flacke J. Twin climate cities—an
       exploratory study of their potential use for awareness-raising and
       urban adaptation. Mitig Adapt Strateg Glob Chang. Springer
       Netherlands; 2017;22: 929–945.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   12. 12. Rohat G, Goyette S, Flacke J. Characterization of European
       cities’ climate shift–an exploratory study based on climate
       analogues. Int J Clim Chang Strateg Manag. 2018;
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   13. 13. Fitzpatrick MC, Dunn RR. Contemporary climatic analogs for 540
       North American urban areas in the late 21st century. Nat Commun.
       Nature Publishing Group; 2019;10: 614. pmid:30755612
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   14. 14. Kopf S, Ha-Duong M, Hallegatte S. Using maps of city analogues
       to display and interpret climate change scenarios and their
       uncertainty. Nat Hazards Earth Syst Sci. 2008;8: 905–918.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   15. 15. Hallegatte S, Hourcade J-C, Ambrosi P. Using climate analogues
       for assessing climate change economic impacts in urban areas. Clim
       Change. Kluwer Academic Publishers; 2007;82: 47–60.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   16. 16. Vox. Climate change report 2018 cities 2050 [Internet]. 2018.
       Available:
       https://www.vox.com/energy-and-environment/2018/11/30/18117953/clim
       ate-change-report-2018-cities-2050
   17. 17. Central C. Summer temperatures co2 emissions 1001 cities. In:
       2018 [Internet]. Available:
       https://www.climatecentral.org/news/summer-temperatures-co2-emissio
       ns-1001-cities-16583
   18. 18. IPCC. an IPCC special report on the impacts of global warming
       of 1.5°C above pre-industrial levels and related global greenhouse
       gas emission pathways. 2018.
   19. 19. Bright EA, Rose AN, Urban ML, McKee JJ. LandScan 2016
       High-Resolution Global Population Data Set. 2017.
   20. 20. Fick SE, Hijmans RJ. WorldClim 2: new 1-km spatial resolution
       climate surfaces for global land areas. Int J Climatol. 2017;37:
       4302–4315.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   21. 21. Hurrell JW, Holland MM, Gent PR, Ghan S, Kay JE, Kushner PJ, et
       al. The Community Earth System Model: A Framework for Collaborative
       Research. Bull Am Meteorol Soc. American Meteorological Society;
       2013;94: 1339–1360.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   22. 22. Bellouin N, Collins WJ, Culverwell ID, Halloran PR, Hardiman
       SC, Hinton TJ, et al. The HadGEM2 family of Met Office Unified
       Model climate configurations. Geosci Model Dev. 2011;4: 723–757.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   23. 23. Thomson AM, Calvin K V., Smith SJ, Kyle GP, Volke A, Patel P,
       et al. RCP4.5: A pathway for stabilization of radiative forcing by
       2100. Clim Change. 2011;109: 77–94.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   24. 24. Ramirez Villegas J, Jarvis A. Downscaling Global Circulation
       Model Outputs: The Delta Method Decision and Policy Analysis
       Working Paper No. 1. International Center for Tropical Agriculture
       (CIAT); 2010;
   25. 25. Fowler HJ, Blenkinsop S, Tebaldi C. Linking climate change
       modelling to impacts studies: recent advances in downscaling
       techniques for hydrological modelling. Int J Climatol. John Wiley &
       Sons, Ltd; 2007;27: 1547–1578.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   26. 26. Smid M, Costa AC. Climate projections and downscaling
       techniques: a discussion for impact studies in urban systems. Int J
       Urban Sci. Routledge; 2018;22: 277–307.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   27. 27. Legendre P, Legendre L, Legendre L, Legendre P. Numerical
       ecology. Elsevier; 2012.
   28. 28. Barber CB, Dobkin DP, Huhdanpaa H, Huhdanpaa H. The quickhull
       algorithm for convex hulls. ACM Trans Math Softw. ACM; 1996;22:
       469–483.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   29. 29. Williams JW, Jackson ST. Novel climates, no-analog communities,
       and ecological surprises. Front Ecol Environ. John Wiley & Sons,
       Ltd; 2007;5: 475–482.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   30. 30. Cormack RM, Legendre L, Legendre P. Numerical Ecology.
       Biometrics. Elsevier; 2006;40: 280. https://doi.org/10.2307/2530779
   31. 31. Mahony CR, Cannon AJ, Wang T, Aitken SN. A closer look at novel
       climates: new methods and insights at continental to landscape
       scales. Glob Chang Biol. John Wiley & Sons, Ltd (10.1111); 2017;23:
       3934–3955. pmid:28145063
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   32. 32. Grenier P, Parent A-C, Huard D, Anctil F, Chaumont D, Grenier
       P, et al. An Assessment of Six Dissimilarity Metrics for Climate
       Analogs. J Appl Meteorol Climatol. 2013;52: 733–752.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   33. 33. London M of. London Environment Strategy. 2018;
       https://doi.org/10.1016/j.bbabio.2006.11.011
   34. 34. Woldemeskel FM, Sharma A, Sivakumar B, Mehrotra R.
       Quantification of precipitation and temperature uncertainties
       simulated by CMIP3 and CMIP5 models. J Geophys Res Atmos.
       Wiley-Blackwell; 2016;121: 3–17.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   35. 35. Zhao L, Lee X, Smith RB, Oleson K. Strong contributions of
       local background climate to urban heat islands. Nature. Nature
       Publishing Group; 2014;511: 216–219. pmid:25008529
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   36. 36. Olson DM, Dinerstein E, Wikramanayake ED, Burgess ND, Powell
       GVN, Underwood EC, et al. Terrestrial Ecoregions of the World: A
       New Map of Life on EarthA new global map of terrestrial ecoregions
       provides an innovative tool for conserving biodiversity.
       Bioscience. Oxford University Press; 2001;51: 933–938.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar

   Download PDF

     * Citation
     * XML

   Print
     * Print article
     * EzReprint

   Share
     * Reddit Reddit
     * Google+ Google+
     * Facebook Facebook
     * LinkedIn LinkedIn
     * Mendeley Mendeley
     * PubChase PubChase
     * Twitter Twitter
     * Email Email

     [CROSSMARK_BW_horizontal.svg]
   Advertisement

Subject Areas

   ?

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.
   We want your feedback. Do these Subject Areas make sense for this
   article? Click the target next to the incorrect Subject Area and let us
   know. Thanks for your help!
     * Climate change
       Is the Subject Area "Climate change" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Principal component analysis
       Is the Subject Area "Principal component analysis" applicable to
       this article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Northern Hemisphere
       Is the Subject Area "Northern Hemisphere" applicable to this
       article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Latitude
       Is the Subject Area "Latitude" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Europe
       Is the Subject Area "Europe" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Southern Hemisphere
       Is the Subject Area "Southern Hemisphere" applicable to this
       article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * North America
       Is the Subject Area "North America" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Urban areas
       Is the Subject Area "Urban areas" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.

Archived Tweets

   Load more
   View all tweets

     * Publications
     * PLOS Biology
     * PLOS Medicine
     * PLOS Computational Biology
     * PLOS Genetics
     * PLOS Pathogens
     * PLOS ONE
     * PLOS Neglected Tropical Diseases

     * Home
     * Blogs
     * Collections
     * Give feedback
     * LOCKSS

     * Privacy Policy
     * Terms of Use
     * Advertise
     * Media Inquiries
     * Contact

   PLOS is a nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation, #C2354500, based in San
   Francisco, California, US
   PLOS
   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TP26BH

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MQQMGF

   Advertisement

     * plos.org
     * create account
     * sign in

PLOS ONE

     * Publish
          + Submissions
               o Getting Started
               o Submission Guidelines
               o Figures
               o Tables
               o Supporting Information
               o LaTeX
               o Preprints
               o Revising Your Manuscript
               o Submit Now
               o Calls for Papers
          + Policies
               o Best Practices in Research Reporting
               o Human Subjects Research
               o Animal Research
               o Competing Interests
               o Disclosure of Funding Sources
               o Licenses and Copyright
               o Data Availability
               o Materials and Software Sharing
               o Ethical Publishing Practice
               o Authorship
               o Downloads and Translations
          + Manuscript Review and Publication
               o Criteria for Publication
               o Editorial and Peer Review Process
               o Editor Center
               o Guidelines for Reviewers
               o Accepted Manuscripts
               o Corrections and Retractions
               o Comments
               o Article-Level Metrics

Submit Your Manuscript
       Discover a faster, simpler path to publishing in a high-quality
       journal. PLOS ONE promises fair, rigorous peer review, broad scope,
       and wide readership – a perfect fit for your research every time.
       Learn More Submit Now
     * About
          + Why Publish with PLOS ONE
          + Journal Information
          + Staff Editors
          + Editorial Board
          + Section Editors
          + Advisory Groups
          + Find and Read Articles
          + Publishing Information
          + Publication Fees
          + Press and Media
          + Contact
     * Browse
     *

       Search

       Search
       ____________________ (BUTTON)

       advanced search

   Browse Subject Areas
   ?

   Click through the PLOS taxonomy to find articles in your field.

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.

     * Loading metrics

   Open Access

   Peer-reviewed

   Research Article

Marriage, parenthood and social network: Subjective well-being and mental
health in old age

     * Christoph Becker ,
       Contributed equally to this work with: Christoph Becker, Isadora
       Kirchmaier, Stefan T. Trautmann
       Roles Validation, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Alfred-Weber-Institute for Economics, University of
       Heidelberg, Heidelberg, Germany
       ⨯
     * Isadora Kirchmaier ,
       Contributed equally to this work with: Christoph Becker, Isadora
       Kirchmaier, Stefan T. Trautmann
       Roles Formal analysis, Methodology, Software, Writing – original
       draft
       Affiliation Alfred-Weber-Institute for Economics, University of
       Heidelberg, Heidelberg, Germany
       ⨯
     * Stefan T. Trautmann
       Contributed equally to this work with: Christoph Becker, Isadora
       Kirchmaier, Stefan T. Trautmann
       Roles Conceptualization, Methodology, Writing – original draft
       * E-mail: trautmann@uni-hd.de
       Affiliations Alfred-Weber-Institute for Economics, University of
       Heidelberg, Heidelberg, Germany, Department of Economics, Tilburg
       University, Tilburg, The Netherlands
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0002-0094-8841
       ⨯

Marriage, parenthood and social network: Subjective well-being and mental
health in old age

     * Christoph Becker,
     * Isadora Kirchmaier,
     * Stefan T. Trautmann

   PLOS
   x
     * Published: July 24, 2019
     * https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704

     * Article
     * Authors
     * Metrics
     * Comments
     * Media Coverage

     * Reader Comments (0)
     * Media Coverage
     * Figures

Figures

   Fig 1
   Table 1
   Table 2
   Fig 2
   Table 3
   Table 4
   Table 5

Abstract

   Parenthood, marital status and social networks have been shown to
   relate to the well-being and mental health of older people. Using a
   large sample of respondents aged 50 and older from 16 European
   countries, we identify the associations of well-being and mental health
   with family status. Making use of detailed social network data of the
   respondents, we also identify how different social support networks
   correlate with the well-being and health indicators. We observe
   positive associations for all network types, over and beyond any direct
   associations of family status with well-being. Results suggest that
   non-residential children are important providers of social support for
   their parents at older age.

   Citation: Becker C, Kirchmaier I, Trautmann ST (2019) Marriage,
   parenthood and social network: Subjective well-being and mental health
   in old age. PLoS ONE 14(7): e0218704.
   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704

   Editor: Oliver Gruebner, University of Zurich, SWITZERLAND

   Received: July 9, 2018; Accepted: June 8, 2019; Published: July 24,
   2019

   Copyright: © 2019 Becker et al. This is an open access article
   distributed under the terms of the Creative Commons Attribution
   License, which permits unrestricted use, distribution, and reproduction
   in any medium, provided the original author and source are credited.

   Data Availability: The data underlying the results of this study are
   available at: https://doi.org/10.11588/data/RNHJTE.

   Funding: The SHARE data collection has been primarily funded by the
   European Commission through FP5 (QLK6-CT-2001-00360), FP6 (SHARE-I3:
   RII-CT-2006-062193, COMPARE: CIT5-CT-2005-028857, SHARELIFE:
   CIT4-CT-2006-028812) and FP7 (SHARE-PREP: N°211909, SHARE-LEAP:
   N°227822, SHARE M4: N°261982), with additional funding from the German
   Ministry of Education and Research, the Max Planck Society for the
   Advancement of Science, the U.S. National Institute on Aging
   (U01_AG09740-13S2, P01_AG005842, P01_AG08291, P30_AG12815,
   R21_AG025169, Y1-AG-4553-01, IAG_BSR06-11, OGHA_04-064,
   HHSN271201300071C) and from various national funding sources (see
   www.share-project.org). We also acknowledge financial support by
   Deutsche Forschungsgemeinschaft within the funding programme Open
   Access Publishing, by the Baden-Württemberg Ministry of Science,
   Research and the Arts and by Ruprecht-Karls-Universität Heidelberg. The
   Friedrich-Ebert-Foundation provided support for CB in the form of a
   grant.

   Competing interests: The authors have declared that no competing
   interests exist.

Introduction

   The link between family status (marital status and parenthood),
   well-being, and mental health is widely discussed in academic and
   popular discourses. Evidence suggests that being married or living with
   a partner can have a positive effect on life satisfaction [1] and is
   associated with higher well-being, better mental health and fewer
   depressive symptoms in old age [2–4].

   Parenthood, on the other hand, does not appear to be associated with
   enhanced mental health [5–7]. The risk of depression is especially
   pronounced for women with parenting stress and poor physical health,
   but less pronounced for those being supported by the partner [8].
   Repeated cross-sectional data on US parents and non-parents shows a gap
   in subjective well-being between these two groups, which, however,
   becomes smaller over the period 1973 through 2008 due to decreased
   happiness of non-parents [9]. A cross-country comparison finds only
   weak associations between life satisfaction and having children, with
   unclear direction [1]. However, there is also evidence that the
   relationship between children and well-being becomes more positive for
   older respondents [1,10]. Depending on the life-cycle stage, the
   aspects of parenthood may thus differ, suggesting that the positive
   aspects of parenthood dominate when getting older. Amongst others, the
   role of children as a form of social support may become important in
   the later stages of a person’s life [10].

   But what constitutes social support? One of the most cited definitions
   stems from Cobb [11], describing social support as “information leading
   the subject to believe that he is cared for and loved, esteemed and a
   member of mutual obligations”. The U.S. National Cancer Institute [12],
   defines social support as “a network of family, friends, neighbors, and
   community members that is available in times of need to give
   psychological, physical, and financial help”. In general, a social
   network consists of a “set of actors and the ties amongst them” [13],
   while the term social support further describes the quantity and
   quality of these ties from an individual perspective. While there exist
   multiple definitions of social support, most of them encompass factors
   for the size and structure of the network, as well as including
   measures for physical distance to other network members, length of the
   relationships, frequency of contact or function of each relationship
   [14]. Evidence suggests that such social support networks are related
   to less loneliness and more happiness [15,16] and act as important
   buffer against stressful events [11,14].

   While results on parenthood might be controversial and depend on the
   age of the studied population, there is widespread agreement that
   social support is associated with higher life satisfaction, and that
   social networks are an important factor for well-being [17]. Bringing
   these two branches of the literature together, we aim to shed light on
   the link between a person’s family status, the resulting
   characteristics of their social networks, and their well-being and
   mental health, using a large sample of 55.000 middle-aged and older
   adults from 16 European countries. This sample was taken from the
   Survey of Health, Ageing and Retirement in Europe (SHARE). For people
   aged 60 and older in Mediterranean and non-Mediterranean countries in
   the first wave of the data set, there is some evidence that the number
   of residential children is associated with more depressive symptoms
   [18]. We aim to expand and generalize these findings using recently
   collected, detailed network data, across European countries.
   Parenthood, marital status and different types of social networks might
   help to sustain well-being and mental health in old age. Our objective
   in the current study is to analyze the role of marital status,
   parenthood and social networks deriving from these family backgrounds
   as potential sources of social support, for well-being and mental
   health in old age. We consider four distinct measures, used in
   different fields such as economics or psychology, to obtain a
   comprehensive picture of well-being and mental health. These are the
   CASP-12 scale for quality of life, the EURO-D scale for depressive
   symptoms, and one question each for life and social support network
   satisfaction.

   We use the full range of the SHARE data set, which includes people aged
   50 and older. At this point in the life cycle, parents may have
   resident children, children living away from home, and grandchildren,
   allowing us to separate their associations with well-being. We use
   network composition measures in order to determine network types, and
   control for network size and relational dynamics separately.
   Additionally, we calculate the network types for each country
   separately, taking cultural differences in network compositions into
   account.

   Based on the current literature we test the following three hypotheses
   for the well-being and mental health of people aged 50 and older: i) A
   positive association with being married, ii) a positive association
   with the number of children and grandchildren not living at home, and
   iii) a positive association with having a strong social network implied
   by family background. We proceed as follows: Section 2 describes the
   data used and our methods to measure well-being, mental health and the
   characteristics of social support networks in detail. In Section 3 we
   present the results of our analysis. We first analyze the association
   of family status with well-being and mental health measures without
   taking the social network into account. We then take the network
   composition as criterion variables and use hierarchical clustering to
   determine social network types which differ mainly in their main source
   of social support. We then assess the relationship between the
   resulting social support network types and outcome measures,
   controlling for family status, network size, and relational dynamics.
   Section 4 discusses our findings, and Section 5 provides concluding
   remarks.

Data and methods

Respondents

   We use data from the cross-national panel database Survey of Health,
   Ageing and Retirement in Europe (SHARE), release 6.0.0., managed by the
   Munich Center for the Economics of Aging, Max Planck Institute for
   Social Law and Social Policy [19–21]. The cross-national panel database
   provides extensive data on health and socio-economic status. The target
   population is people of age 50 or older having their regular domicile
   in the respective country. Current partners are interviewed regardless
   of their age. We make use of SHARE wave 4 [22] that was administered
   between 2010 and 2012 in 16 European countries, and includes a module
   on social network. We update missing constants with data from waves 1
   and 2 [23,24]. We include respondents age 50 and older not living in a
   nursing home. The number of respondents differs by country. Over all
   countries, there are about 55.000 observations available. For an
   overview of the total number of observations of each country, see the
   supporting S1 Table.

Demographic factors

   The SHARE data set contains detailed data on demographics. Summary
   statistics of all demographic variables used in the analyses can be
   found in S2 Table. The demographic factor of interest is the family
   status, which we measure by the marital status, total number of
   children, children living at home, and grandchildren. Over all
   countries 70% of the respondents are married and 91% have children.

   The marital status of each respondent is classified into the categories
   (1) married and living together with spouse, (2) registered
   partnership, (3) married and living separated from spouse, (4) never
   married, (5) divorced, (6) widowed. For the regression analysis we
   construct the dummy variables married which takes the value of one if
   the respondent is married or in a registered partnership, the dummy
   variable divorced, which takes the value of one if the respondent is
   divorced or living separated from spouse, and a dummy variable widowed.
   We include respondents living separately from their spouse in the dummy
   divorced, as living separately is often a preceding step to a divorce.

   Parenthood is measured by the number of children alive and the number
   of resident children, including fostered, adopted and stepchildren. We
   define the four-category measure children with categories no children,
   one child, two children, and three or more children, and create the
   respective dummy variables for each category. We further construct the
   variables resident children and grandchildren which report for each
   respondent the number of children living with the family and the number
   of grandchildren.

   Further demographics are used as controls. The set Controls A consist
   of gender, age (of the respondent at the time of the interview), age
   squared, and a dummy variable indicating the country of residence of
   the respondent to control for cultural differences. The set Controls B
   additionally includes dummies for urban character of residence, being
   employed, self-employment, level of education according to the
   international classification of education ISCED-97 [25],an indicator
   for the average monthly household income, and the aforementioned
   dummies for divorced and widowed. In SHARE wave 4, each household
   respondent is asked to state the overall after-tax income of the entire
   household in an average month of last year. If a respondent refuses to
   answer, the interviewer asks whether the respondent earns more, less or
   approximately the amount in certain bracketed values, which represent
   country-specific 25^th, 50^th, and 75^th percentiles of the reported
   household incomes from SHARE wave 2. We use the information from the
   stated household income and the unfolding brackets and define four
   categories for the average monthly household income: (1) Low income [0
   to 25^th percentile], (2) Middle income [25^th to 50^th percentile],
   (3) Upper middle income [50^th percentile to 75^th percentile], and (4)
   High income [75^th percentile and higher]. The boundaries of the
   intervals are the country-specific bracket values of SHARE wave 4
   (details and summary statistics in S2 Table).

   In order to control for health, we include a measure of self-assessed
   physical health (Would you say your health is: (1) poor, (2) fair, (3)
   good, (4) very good, and (5) excellent), and whether drugs for sleeping
   problems, anxiety or depression are taken.

Well-being and mental health indicators

   Well-being can be defined as the psychological balance point between
   individually available resources and challenges [26] and may be linked
   to many different aspects of life. In order to develop national
   well-being measures, the Office for National Statistics in the UK ran a
   public debate on the question through various platforms [27]. The three
   most frequent answers to the question “What things matter most in your
   life? What is Well-being?” were “Health”, “Having good connections with
   friends and relatives”, and “Job satisfaction (and economic security)”
   [28]. Many empirical studies report a link between socioeconomic
   status, quality and quantity of social contacts, and well-being [17].
   In our study, we use a broad set of measures to map respondents’
   well-being: a simple single-item question regarding life satisfaction;
   the CASP-12 multi-item quality of life scale; a single-item question on
   social support network satisfaction; and the EURO-D depressive symptoms
   scale. In the following, we will discuss the three measures in more
   detail. We also use measures of health, education, and financial status
   as controls in our analyses [29,30].

   The first measure concerns a general feeling about the quality of life,
   the stated Life satisfaction. It is extracted by a single-item question
   in which respondents indicate on a scale from 0 (low satisfaction) to
   10 (high satisfaction) how satisfied they are with their life. This
   scale has acceptable reliability and validity [31,32].

   The second measure is the CASP-12, quality of life scale, which is
   designed to capture quality of life in old age [33]. Participants
   indicate for twelve statements whether they apply on a scale from 1
   (often) to 4 (never). The twelve questions concern four dimensions of
   quality of life, control, autonomy, pleasure and self-realization,
   resulting in an aggregate index ranging from 12 (low quality of life)
   to 48 (high quality of life). We normalize it such that it ranges from
   0 (low quality of life) to 10 (high quality of life).

   The third measure concerns the stated Network satisfaction. Respondents
   indicate on a scale from 0 (low satisfaction) to 10 (high satisfaction)
   how satisfied they are with their social network. If respondents
   indicated that there is no person with whom they discuss matters or
   there is no one who is important to them, they were asked how satisfied
   they were with this fact.

   The fourth measure is the EURO-D depression score [34]. It is an
   indicator for depressive symptoms and captures aspects of mental health
   in late life. It has been demonstrated to provide a valid comparison of
   depressive symptoms across European countries [35,36]. The EURO-D
   depression score is generated from questions on 12 dimensions:
   Depression, pessimism, suicidality, guilt, sleep, interest,
   irritability, appetite, fatigue, concentration, enjoyment, and
   tearfulness. Respondents are asked whether there is an indication for
   each of these dimensions. It results in an aggregate index ranging from
   0 (not depressed) to 12 (very depressed). We normalize it such that it
   ranges from 0 (very depressed) to 10 (not depressed) and call it Lack
   of depressive symptoms.

   Fig 1 presents the average of the well-being measures at each age until
   91 (see S1 Fig for the age distribution). While network satisfaction
   and life satisfaction remain relatively stable, the quality of life
   index and lack of depressive symptoms index decline beyond age 65. The
   graphs for male and female respondents are rather similar, except for
   the lack of depressive symptoms index; male respondents have on average
   a 0.73 points higher index (p<0.01, Mann-Whitney-U test; S2 Fig).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 1. Average well-being and mental health measure.

   Average well-being and mental health measure for all ages from 50 to 90
   years. After age 91 the number of available observations drops to less
   than 50.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.g001

Social support networks

   A social support network can be characterized by its size and
   composition (percentage of partner, children, other relatives, and
   friends in the network) and relational dynamics. In Wave 4, the SHARE
   respondents are asked to answer questions about their social support
   network along the dimensions (1) size, (2) relationship, (3) contact
   frequency, (4) proximity, and (5) closeness.

   In order to identify the members of their social support network, the
   respondents were asked to mention the name of persons with whom they
   discuss important matters. The total number of persons in the social
   support network is its size. It is possible to mention up to seven
   persons, however this boundary is only mentioned if it is reached. Only
   3% of the respondents reach this boundary. Most respondents state one,
   two or three persons as members of their social support network (28%,
   25%, and 20% of the respondents, respectively). Evidence suggests that
   the number of network members is positively linked with life
   satisfaction [37], but that in old age the network is reduced to
   members with close contact [38]

   The composition of a network refers to the relationship type between
   each member. A person who has daily contact with two children and a
   person who has daily contact with two friends have a social support
   network of equal size and contact frequency, however, they have a
   different main source of social support. In a meta-analysis, Pinquart
   and Sörensen [17] provide evidence that the quantity of social contacts
   with friends is more strongly related with subjective well-being than
   the quantity of social contacts with family. They argue that friends
   are voluntary relationships, and they are typically members of the same
   age group or share similar preferences. Still, especially in older age,
   spouses and children are a crucial part of networks. Later in life,
   parents desire open communication, but low interference in each other’s
   lives thereby maintaining independence in old age and minimizing
   intergenerational conflicts [39]. Brandt et al. [40] analyzed the type
   of support between older parents, their children and professional
   providers. They found that children play a central role in providing
   help for their parents in the household and with paperwork. In Southern
   Europe, they are more likely to also take over regular medical care.
   There can also be differences within family structures. Shanas [41]
   provides evidence that the immediate family (partner and children) is
   the major social support during illness, and the extended family
   (children, siblings, and other relatives) is the tie to the community.

   There are different ways to determine these different types of
   networks. One way is to construct network types, in which people are
   similar along family status (e.g. marital status, number of children
   and close relatives) and network measures (e.g. number of close
   friends, frequency of contact with family and friends, and frequency of
   attending social events). Commonly, there are four to five network
   types identified which differ in their relationship with well-being and
   mental health [15,42–44]. Another way to determine network types is to
   use only characteristics of the social network as criterion variables
   and control for family status separately. Litwin and Stoeckel [16] use
   size, composition and relational dynamic measures of the network and
   identify six networks (Spouse, Children, Spouse and Children, Other
   Family, Friend, and Other). They show that the network types are
   related differently to quality of life and that the frequency of the
   network types differs across European countries. We will follow a
   different approach, using only network composition to determine network
   types (i.e., the relative relevance of spouses, children, friends and
   others). We calculate network types for each country separately, taking
   cultural differences in network compositions into account. We chose
   this approach, because we want our network types to be directly linked
   to the family background variables whose associations with well-being
   we are interested in, and we control separately for contact frequency,
   emotional closeness and geographical proximity. In this way, we aim to
   identify how, for example, a Children network relates to well-being
   compared to a Friends network, conditional on controlling for frequency
   and closeness etc.

   We classify the possible relationships into five categories: (1)
   Partner, (2) Children, (3) Other Relatives, (4) Friends, and (5)
   Others. Each of these categories comprises all types of relationships
   related to the category itself, i.e. the category Partner also includes
   the relationship “mother/father in law”. The relationship share of each
   category in the network of a respondent is measured by the sum of the
   occurrence of the category divided by the network size. For each
   respondent, the relationship shares of all relationship categories sum
   to one. We use the relationship share to determine country-specific
   support network types according to the main source of social support.
   The respondents who indicate that there is no person with whom they
   discuss important matters are excluded. For the remaining respondents,
   we use hierarchical clustering with the Ward [45] method to determine
   clusters which are similar with respect to the relationship shares. We
   choose to cut at six clusters and label them Partner, Children, Other
   Relatives, Family, Friends, and Diverse network. Using five clusters
   would not allow us to distinguish between the Friends and the Diverse
   network. Using more than six clusters does not provide an additional
   distinct network type for all countries for the five relationship
   categories used.

   For each country, a cluster is labelled as Partner, Children, Other
   Relatives, Friends or Diverse network if the mean of the relationship
   share (averaged over all people in the cluster) of the category
   Partner, Children, Other Relatives, Friends and Other is higher in that
   cluster than in all other clusters, respectively. The labeling of the
   clusters would mostly be unaffected if it were instead determined by
   the highest mean relationship share (averaged over all people in the
   cluster) within a cluster, i.e., comparing across relationship type.
   Additionally, we include a cluster for Family networks. The Family
   network is the cluster with the highest sum of Partner share plus
   Children share plus Other Relatives share, excluding the clusters which
   are defined as Partner, Children, or Other Relatives network.

   Apart from size and composition, a network is also characterized by
   relational dynamics such as geographical proximity, contact frequency
   and interpersonal closeness. Frequent contact with one’s children
   appears to be associated with less depressive symptoms, albeit
   irrelevant of geographical proximity [4]. Closeness with the support
   network member affects the quality of the relationship. The number of
   close network members with frequent contact is positively related to
   less depressive symptoms [46]. Especially elderly people rely on
   members of their immediate family (partner and children) during illness
   [41]. SHARE provides different questions for these relational dynamics,
   which we use as controls in our analysis.

   For contact frequency, the respondent is asked about the amount of
   contact with each person in his social support network over the last 12
   months. The possible answers are (1) daily, (2) several times a week,
   (3) about once a week, (4) about every two weeks, (5) about once a
   month, (6) less than once a month, and (7) never. We recode such that
   the measure ranges from 0 (never) to 6 (daily). As an overall measure
   of the amount of network contact of a respondent, we take the average
   over the answers for each person in his network and call it contact
   index. E.g., if the result is 6 it means that the respondent has daily
   contact with all persons in his network. If it is less than 6, he must
   have less than daily contact with at least some member of the network.

   Similar measures are constructed for proximity and closeness. The
   respondent is asked how far the person lives and how close he feels to
   the person. The categories for closeness are (0) not very close (1)
   somewhat close (2) very close (3) extremely close; and for proximity
   (0) more than 500km, (1) 100km to 500km, (2) 25km to 100km, (3) 5km to
   25km, (4) 1km to 5km, and (5) less than 1km. The averages over the
   respective answers for each person in the respondent’s network are the
   closeness index and proximity index. Information on the correlation of
   marriage, the number of children, social network dimensions and
   well-being measures is given in S3 Table. We observe that the
   correlations between features of the family status (e.g., married) and
   the respective network is positive but far from perfect. That is, both
   people with and without children may indicate that their social support
   network may predominantly consist of their partner (and similarly for
   the other network types).

Results

Association of marital status and parenthood with well-being and mental
health

   We present results in an aggregated way to illustrate the relevant
   patterns, and the robustness of the results with regards to confounding
   factors. Table 1 shows the associations of the three dimensions of
   well-being and mental health with family status (number of children,
   number of resident children, number of grandchildren and marital
   status) for all respondents (Panel I), male respondents (Panel II), and
   female respondents (Panel III), over all countries including country
   fixed effects (further country specific analyses are reported below).
   The table shows the raw means for each well-being measure conditional
   on each explanatory variable. Comparing the raw mean values for the
   well-being measures gives an impression of the effects sizes of each
   explanatory variable. However, we indicate the significance of each
   comparison based on regression analyses of the dependent measure on the
   explanatory variables; the excluded category in the regression analyses
   is indicated in italics in the table. We show the significance level of
   the variable and the direction of the association, for the regressions
   including controls A and B, respectively. For each set of analyses, we
   also indicate the sample size of the raw means, which varies across
   analyses because of the variation in the number of respondents in the
   different modules of the SHARE surveys. We use ordinary least squares
   for all four measures for its ease of interpretation. Detailed results
   for each regression are in S4–S6 Tables.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 1. Regressing well-being and mental health on family status for
   all countries.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.t001

   Overall we observe that marriage is consistently positively correlated
   with well-being and lack of depressive symptoms, which already provides
   evidence in favor of hypothesis i) from the introduction. We find that
   children are positively correlated with well-being and lack of
   depressive symptoms. However, our analyses show that this overall
   positive association is due to children after they left home: we find
   negative effects for the number of resident children. This pattern is
   consistent with the prediction of hypothesis ii) concerning the effect
   of non-resident children. Grandchildren correlate positively with life
   satisfaction and network satisfaction, but negatively with quality of
   life and lack of depressive symptoms, which gives us a mixed picture on
   the overall role of grandchildren compared to the prediction in
   hypothesis ii). While there are some differences in specific
   correlations, the overall picture is very similar for male and female
   respondents. Controlling for differences between the countries by
   conducting separate regressions for each country individually also does
   not qualitatively change the results (see S7 Table). However, there is
   clearly heterogeneity in the sense that we observe many null effects
   next to those effects replicating the overall effects shown in Table 1.

   Taken together, the results of Table 1 confirm findings of previous
   studies [1–4,10,47] for the current large multi country SHARA data set.
   Focus on the age cohort of people 50 years old and older allows us to
   identify different associations for children at home, children who left
   home already, and grandchildren. Given the consistency with previously
   observed patterns for the direct family status measures, we have a
   solid foundation for studying the broader role of family in through
   social networks corresponding to the different family background
   measures.

Distribution of social network types

   Table 2 presents the means of the network size, the composition
   measures, and relational dynamic measure of each category. For the
   distribution of the network size for each network type see S3 Fig. The
   Partner network is a rather distinct type. It consists only of the
   partner, i.e. has a size of one, and on average has a contact index
   close to the maximum. Respondents which are associated with a partner
   network typically feel extremely or very close with their partner,
   resulting in the highest closeness index of all network types.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 2. Network characteristics by social network types.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.t002

   The share of children in the network is highest for the Children
   network and the Family network. In both networks the second main source
   of support is the partner, emphasizing the importance of marital
   status. The Children and Family network differ in terms of the means of
   the relationship indices and network size, while the average contact
   and closeness shares are quite similar. The Other Relatives, Friends,
   and Diverse network types appear to be similar in terms of average
   contact, closeness and proximity.

   We have shown that network size, as well as contact, proximity, and
   closeness indices differ across network types on average (see Table 2).
   Fig 2 presents the full distribution of the contact index for each
   network type (for the corresponding graphical representations of the
   proximity and closeness indices, see S4 and S5 Figs). Even network
   types which are rather similar with respect to the average contact
   index such as the children and family networks, are rather different
   with respect to the individual distribution of the network contact
   index. This means that the actual composition of the different contact
   categories in the individual social network is different for each
   network type. Furthermore, the impact of contact, closeness, and
   proximity could differ, depending on the composition of a given network
   type: Higher self-reported closeness might, for example, denote a
   different depth of emotional connection in a Partner, compared to a
   Friends network. We therefore include the contact, closeness, and
   proximity indices as individual controls.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 2. Distribution of the contact index by network type.

   Each value of the network contact index is represented by a line. The
   height of each line represents the percentage of the index having the
   respective value for a network type.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.g002

   Table 3 presents the means of gender, age and family status and the
   number of observations for the different network types. There are 3% of
   the respondents who report to have no network. The No network type and
   Children network type are associated with the lowest share of
   respondents who are married. Most respondents who have no children are
   associated with the Other Relatives, the Friends, or the No network
   type. For the means of further demographic variables see S12 Table.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 3. Family status by social network types.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.t003

Association of social networks with well-being and mental health

   We can now turn to the relationship between network characteristics and
   well-being and mental health measures. Table 4 compares well-being and
   mental health for respondents who have a social support network, and
   those who have no network at all. We use the different network types as
   explanatory variable, and include network size, family status variables
   (as in Table 1), and socioeconomic variables as controls. We do not
   control for relational dynamics, because these measures are not defined
   for those who have no social support network. For the detailed
   regression results see S8–S10 Tables and for the raw means conditional
   on network size see S11 Table.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 4. Regressing well-being and mental health on social support
   network types; controlling for network size and family status for all
   countries.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.t004

   In accordance with hypothesis iii), all network types relate positively
   to measures of well-being, for both males and females, even after
   controlling for family structure. The effect is consistently observed
   for Life satisfaction and Network satisfaction. For CASP-12 the effect
   is observed for Partner and Friends network types for male respondents
   and for Partner, Family and Friends network types for female
   respondents. Interestingly, the positive relationship with Children
   network and Lack of depressive symptoms mostly emerges only after
   inclusion of the full set of controls. Network size is positively
   related to all measures of well-being [37]. The results obtained in
   this network analysis support the broader relevance of family through
   the resulting networks for well-being and mental health as postulated
   in hypotheses i) and ii).

   We next compare the different network types with each other, accounting
   for variation of the relational indices across the different network
   types. Table 5 shows the results confined to respondents who indicated
   the presence of some social support network. For the detailed
   regression results see S12–S14 Tables. The excluded category of the
   network type is the Partner network, which had consistently strong and
   significant associations in Table 4, and is taken as a benchmark here.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 5. Regressing well-being and mental health on social support
   network types (only for respondents with a social network); controlling
   for network size, relational dynamic measures, and family status for
   all countries.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.t005

   We find that for Life satisfaction, CASP-12, and Lack of depressive
   symptoms, the more diverse networks have typically weaker associations
   than the Partner network, with the exception of the Friends network for
   CASP-12. In contrast, Network satisfaction is consistently higher for
   all other networks, except for the Diverse network. Note, that this
   emerges despite controlling for network size, contact, closeness and
   proximity index. Fiori et al. [42] pointed out that support quality is
   an important factor for depressive symptoms. We find consistently that
   the closeness and contact measure is positively correlated with mental
   health and well-being. However, we observe a negative relationship of
   mere proximity with well-being and mental health. While for the
   associations with family status no relevant gender differences were
   observed, we observe that associations with network types differ for
   male and female respondents. For male respondents in most cases the
   effects of the network types are not significantly different from the
   Partner network. For the females, the above discussed associations show
   up significantly.

Discussion

   Reflecting the results presented in the previous section in terms of
   our three research hypotheses, the following implications for the
   well-being and mental health of people aged 50 and above emerge: i)
   There appears to be a strong positive association of being
   married/having a partner as part of a social network. ii)
   Non-residential children also relate positively to well-being and
   mental health. On the other hand, the effect of grandchildren in
   general appears to be mixed. While they may be associated with higher
   life and network satisfaction, the same does not appear to hold for
   depressive symptoms and perceived quality of life. iii) We find clear
   evidence of positive relationhips of all types of social networks with
   our measures of well-being, over and beyond the respective underlying
   family status indicators. Hence, a simple focus on family status
   measures, not accounting for the resulting network structures, misses
   important aspects of the relationship of family and well-being and
   mental health.

   In contrast to negative associations reported in many studies (for an
   overview see Hansen [7], or the discussion in Nelson et al. [48] and
   Herbst and Ifcher [9]), we find that children are indeed positively
   correlated with well-being and lack of depressive symptoms, when
   controlling for residential status (resident children are negatively
   associated with well-being). This result is consistent with
   age-dependence in the correlation of children with well-being [1,10]
   and mental health [4,47]. The results suggest that the finding of a
   negative link between children and well-being and mental health may not
   generalize to older people whose children have often left home already.
   As stress associated with balancing the competing demands of childcare,
   work and personal life decreases, once people get older and their
   children leave house, the importance of children as caregivers and
   social contacts might prevail. The mixed effect of grandchildren is
   more difficult to explain. Potentially, there are positive effects of
   having grandchildren in terms of social support that might coincide
   with negative aspects, such as having to care for these grandchildren
   [49,50]. As the SHARE data set only provides us with rudimentary
   information about grandchildren (there is for example no information
   about the residency of them), we cannot shed more light on the relation
   between grandchildren and well-being, as well as mental health.

   We observe that all types of networks have positive associations with
   our dependent measures. Network characteristics such as size,
   closeness, contact frequency and proximity are also relevant indicators
   of well-being and mental health. For male respondents in most cases the
   effects of the network types are not significantly different from the
   Partner network. For female respondents, on the other hand, we observe
   more cases where associations of well-being and mental health with the
   Partner network type are significantly different from those for the
   other network types. Overall we find that especially the Partner
   network is consistently positively correlated with well-being and
   mental health, despite the small network size of 1. This is in contrast
   to Litwin and Stoeckel [16,51], who found that the Spouse network is
   not significantly related to well-being. However, importantly, because
   we control for network size separately, positive associations with size
   are captured by this variable. A remarkable feature of the findings in
   Table 4 is that network characteristics are positively associated with
   well-being and mental health even after controlling for the above-shown
   associations with family status indicators. That is, a healthy partner
   network captures more than just being married, as do other types of
   networks. This fits previous results, suggesting that it is not being
   married per se, but being satisfied with the relationship that is
   associated with less depressive symptoms [47,52]. Kim and McKenry also
   report both, a positive relationship of well-being with being married,
   and an additional role for the perceived quality of the marriage on top
   of that [53]. Our research extends these previous studies, by
   demonstrating the role of both the presence of a partner and the
   associated network, where the partner actively provides social support.
   As the size of a social network seems to be an important driver of
   subjective well-being [54], this could indicate that a small partner
   network can offset the lack of a larger social network. Unfortunately,
   a limitation of our present study is that besides general network
   satisfaction, the SHARE data set has no more fine-grained questions for
   the quality of marriages/partnerships.

   Taken together, our results suggest that social networks may be
   important for well-being and mental health in old age. Spouses,
   partners and children are often the basis of long-lasting social
   networks, which can provide social support to elderly people. However,
   different forms of network may have similar effects, as our data
   especially for male respondents suggests. As discussed above, this
   might derive from a level of trust and reciprocity implicit in all
   forms of networks. A remaining limitation of our study is of course
   that the results are correlational in nature. Further studies,
   comparing for example well-being and mental health before and after the
   formation of partnerships or social networks in longitudinal data are
   needed to establish which factors cause the positive effects found here
   and in the literature. Furthermore, research suggests that there is an
   important link between social support obtained from social networks and
   subjective well-being [54,55]. Subjective well-being is commonly
   measured with questions concerning life satisfaction, positive affect
   (experiencing positive emotions), and negative affect (experiencing
   negative emotions). As the SHARE data set only measures life
   satisfaction, we cannot draw a complete picture of the effects of
   family status and social networks on broader measures of subjective
   well-being.

   Networks may exert an influence on the person’s life beyond the mere
   role of the corresponding family status, for example by moderating
   influences of the environment on well-being. The direct association of
   family status with well-being and mental health may not capture such
   effects. Importantly, the current insights need to guide further
   research, with the next step being the assessment of the causal
   direction of the reported associations. This will allow moving towards
   making recommendations for public policy to maintain the well-being and
   mental health of the elderly through social networks.

Supporting information

S1 Fig. Age distribution.

   Percent of male (female) respondents for each age.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s001

   (TIF)

S2 Fig. Average well-being and mental health measure, by gender.

   Average well-being and mental health measure for all ages from 50 to 90
   years for male and female respondents. Male: black lines, Female: grey
   lines. After age 91 the number of available observations drops to less
   than 50.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s002

   (TIF)

S3 Fig. Network size by network type.

   The size of a bar reflects the share of respondents in a network type
   having a network of size 0 to 7.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s003

   (TIF)

S4 Fig. Distribution of the proximity index by network type.

   Each value of the network contact index is represented by a line. The
   height of each line represents the percentage of the index having the
   respective value for a network type.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s004

   (TIF)

S5 Fig. Distribution of the closeness index by network type.

   Each value of the network contact index is represented by a line. The
   height of each line represents the percentage of the index having the
   respective value for a network type.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s005

   (TIF)

S1 Table. Number of observations and unfolding income brackets per country.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s006

   (DOCX)

S2 Table. Summary statistics of demographic variables.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s007

   (DOCX)

S3 Table. Correlation of family status, social network characteristics,
well-being and mental health.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s008

   (DOCX)

S4 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on family status for all
countries, all respondents.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s009

   (DOCX)

S5 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on family status for all
countries, male respondents.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s010

   (DOCX)

S6 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on family status for all
countries, female respondents.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s011

   (DOCX)

S7 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on family status for each
country.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s012

   (DOCX)

S8 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on network types
controlling for network size and family status for all countries, all
respondents.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s013

   (DOCX)

S9 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on network types
controlling for network size and family status for all countries, male
respondents.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s014

   (DOCX)

S10 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on network types
controlling for network size and family status for all countries, female
respondents.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s015

   (DOCX)

S11 Table. Well-being and mental health measures conditional on network size
over all countries.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s016

   (DOCX)

S12 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on network types
controlling for network size, relational dynamics and family status for all
countries, all respondents with social support network.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s017

   (DOCX)

S13 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on network types
controlling for network size, relational dynamics and family status for all
countries, male respondents with social support network.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s018

   (DOCX)

S14 Table. Regressing well-being and mental health on network types
controlling for network size, relational dynamics and family status for all
countries, female respondents with social support network.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0218704.s019

   (DOCX)

Acknowledgments

   This paper uses data from SHARE Waves 1, 2, and 4, (DOIs:
   10.6103/SHARE.w1.600, 10.6103/SHARE.w2.600, 10.6103/SHARE.w4.600), see
   Börsch-Supan et al. [19] for methodological details. For funding of
   SHARE, see the Funding section.

   We thank Luisa Kling for her excellent research assistance, as well as
   Christian König-Kersting and Martin Vollmann for comments that greatly
   improved the manuscript.

References

    1. 1. Mastekaasa A. Marital Status, Distress, and Well-Being: An
       International Comparison. Journal of Comparative Family Studies.
       1994;25: 183–205.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    2. 2. Bures RM, Koropeckyj-Cox T, Loree M. Childlessness, parenthood,
       and depressive symptoms among middle-aged and older adults. Journal
       of Family Issues. 2009;30: 670–687.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    3. 3. Gibney S, Delaney L, Codd M, Fahey T. Lifetime Childlessness,
       Depressive Mood and Quality of Life Among Older Europeans. Social
       Indicators Research. 2017;130: 305–323.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    4. 4. Buber I, Engelhardt H. Children’s impact on the mental health of
       their older mothers and fathers: findings from the Survey of
       Health, Ageing and Retirement in Europe. European Journal of
       Ageing. 2008;5: 31–45. pmid:28798560
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    5. 5. Evenson RJ, Simon RW. Clarifying the Relationship between
       Parenthood and Depression. Journal of Health and Social Behavior.
       2005;46: 341–358. pmid:16433280
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    6. 6. Hansen T, Slagsvold B, Moum T. Childlessness and Psychological
       Well-Being in Midlife and Old Age: An Examination of Parental
       Status Effects across a Range of Outcomes. Social Indicators
       Research. 2009;94: 343–362.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    7. 7. Hansen T. Parenthood and Happiness: a Review of Folk Theories
       Versus Empirical Evidence. Social Indicators Research. 2012;108:
       29–64.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    8. 8. Manuel JI, Martinson ML, Bledsoe-Mansori SE, Bellamy JL. The
       influence of stress and social support on depressive symptoms in
       mothers with young children. Social Science & Medicine. 2012;75:
       2013–2020. pmid:22910191
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    9. 9. Herbst CM, Ifcher J. The increasing happiness of US parents.
       Review of Economics of the Household. 2016;14: 529–551.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   10. 10. Margolis R, Myrskylä M. A Global Perspective on Happiness and
       Fertility. Population and Development Review. 2011;37: 29–56.
       pmid:21714198
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   11. 11. Cobb S. Social support as a moderator of life stress.
       Psychosomatic medicine. 1976;
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   12. 12. Definition of social support—NCI Dictionary of Cancer
       Terms—National Cancer Institute [Internet]. 23 Oct 2018 [cited 6
       Nov 2018]. Available:
       https://web.archive.org/web/20181023124317/https://www.cancer.gov/p
       ublications/dictionaries/cancer-terms/def/social-support
   13. 13. Wasserman S, Faust K. Social network analysis: Methods and
       applications. Cambridge university press; 1994.
   14. 14. Pearson JE. The Definition and Measurement of Social Support.
       Journal of Counseling & Development. 1986;64: 390–395.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   15. 15. Litwin H, Shiovitz-Ezra S. Social Network Type and Subjective
       Well-being in a National Sample of Older Americans. The
       Gerontologist. 2011;51: 379–388. pmid:21097553
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   16. 16. Litwin H, Stoeckel KJ. Confidant Network Types and Well-Being
       Among Older Europeans. The Gerontologist. 2014;54: 762–772.
       pmid:23749390
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   17. 17. Pinquart M, Sörensen S. Influences of Socioeconomic Status,
       Social Network, and Competence on Subjective Well-Being in Later
       Life: A Meta-Analysis. Psychology and Aging. 2000;15: 187–224.
       pmid:10879576
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   18. 18. Litwin H. Social Networks and Well-being: A Comparison of Older
       People in Mediterranean and Non-Mediterranean Countries. The
       Journals of Gerontology Series B: Psychological Sciences and Social
       Sciences. 2010;65B: 599–608. pmid:20008485
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   19. 19. Börsch-Supan A, Brandt M, Hunkler C, Kneip T, Korbmacher J,
       Malter F, et al. Data Resource Profile: The Survey of Health,
       Ageing and Retirement in Europe (SHARE). International Journal of
       Epidemiology. 2013;42: 992–1001. pmid:23778574
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   20. 20. Börsch-Supan A, Brandt M, Litwin H, Weber G (Eds). Active
       ageing and solidarity between generations in Europe: first results
       from SHARE after the economic crisis 2013. De Gruyter: Berlin;
       2015.
   21. 21. Malter F, Börsch-Supan A (Eds). SHARE Wave 4: Innovations &
       Methodology. Munich: MEA, Max Planck Institute for Social Law and
       Social Policy. 2013;
   22. 22. Börsch-Supan A. Survey of Health, Ageing and Retirement in
       Europe (SHARE) Wave 4. Release version: 6.0.0. SHARE-ERIC. 2017;
       https://doi.org/10.6103/SHARE.w4.600
   23. 23. Börsch-Supan A. Survey of Health, Ageing and Retirement in
       Europe (SHARE) Wave 1. Release version: 6.0.0. SHARE-ERIC. 2017;
       https://doi.org/10.6103/SHARE.w1.600
   24. 24. Börsch-Supan A. Survey of Health, Ageing and Retirement in
       Europe (SHARE) Wave 2. Release version: 6.0.0. SHARE-ERIC. 2017;
       https://doi.org/10.6103/SHARE.w2.600
   25. 25. Hoffmeyer-Zlotnik JHP, Wolf C, editors. International Standard
       Classification of Education, ISCED 1997. Advances in Cross-National
       Comparison: A European Working Book for Demographic and
       Socio-Economic Variables. Boston, MA: Springer US; 2003. pp.
       195–220. https://doi.org/10.1007/978-1-4419-9186-7_10
   26. 26. Dodge R, Daly A, Huyton J, Sanders L. The challenge of defining
       wellbeing. International Journal of Wellbeing. 2012;2: 222–235.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   27. 27. Matheson J. Measuring What Matters: National Statistician‘s
       Reflections on the National Debate on Measuring National
       Well-being. London: Office for National Statistics. 2011;
   28. 28. Evans J. Findings from the National Well-being Debate. London:
       Office for National Statistics. 2011;
   29. 29. Diener E, Suh E. Measuring Quality of Life: Economic, Social,
       and Subjective Indicators. Social Indicators Research. 1997;40:
       189–216.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   30. 30. Knesebeck OVD, Wahrendorf M, Hyde M, Siegrist J. Socio-economic
       position and quality of life among older people in 10 European
       countries: results of the SHARE study. Ageing and Society. 2007;27:
       269–284.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   31. 31. Pavot W, Diener E. The Affective and Cognitive Context of
       Self-Reported Measures of Subjective Well-Being. Social Indicators
       Research. 1993;28: 1–20.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   32. 32. Beckie TM, Hayduk LA. Measuring Quality of Life. Social
       Indicators Research. 1997;42: 21–39.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   33. 33. Hyde M, Wiggins RD, Higgs P, Blane DB. A measure of quality of
       life in early old age: The theory, development and properties of a
       needs satisfaction model (CASP-19). Aging & Mental Health. 2003;7:
       186–194. pmid:12775399
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   34. 34. Prince MJ, Reischies F, Beekman ATF, Fuhrer R, Jonker C, Kivela
       S-L, et al. Development of the EURO–D scale–a European Union
       initiative to compare symptoms of depression in 14 European
       centres. British Journal of Psychiatry. 1999;174: 330–338.
       pmid:10533552
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   35. 35. Castro-Costa E, Dewey M, Stewart R, Banerjee S, Huppert F,
       Mendonca-Lima C, et al. Ascertaining late-life depressive symptoms
       in Europe: an evaluation of the survey version of the EURO-D scale
       in 10 nations. The SHARE project. International Journal of Methods
       in Psychiatric Research. 2008;17: 12–29. pmid:18286461
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   36. 36. Prince MJ, Beekman ATF, Deeg DJH, Fuhrer R, Kivela S-L, Lawlor
       BA, et al. Depression symptoms in late life assessed using the
       EURO–D scale. Effect of age, gender and marital status in 14
       European centres. British Journal of Psychiatry. 1999;174: 339–345.
       pmid:10533553
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   37. 37. Tomini F, Tomini SM, Groot W. Understanding the value of social
       networks in life satisfaction of elderly people: a comparative
       study of 16 European countries using SHARE data. BMC Geriatrics.
       2016;16. pmid:27905902
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   38. 38. Fung HH, Carstensen LL, Lang FR. Age-Related Patterns in Social
       Networks among European Americans and African Americans:
       Implications for Socioemotional Selectivity across the Life Span.
       The International Journal of Aging and Human Development. 2001;52:
       185–206. pmid:11407486
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   39. 39. Blieszner R, Mancini JA. Enduring Ties: Older Adults’ Parental
       Role and Responsibilities. Family Relations. 1987;36: 176.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   40. 40. Brandt M, Haberkern K, Szydlik M. Intergenerational Help and
       Care in Europe. European Sociological Review. 2009;25: 585–601.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   41. 41. Shanas E. The Family as a Social Support System in Old Age. The
       Gerontologist. 1979;19: 169–174. pmid:263596
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   42. 42. Fiori KL, Antonucci TC, Cortina KS. Social Network Typologies
       and Mental Health Among Older Adults. The Journals of Gerontology
       Series B: Psychological Sciences and Social Sciences. 2006;61:
       25–32. pmid:16399938
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   43. 43. Li T, Zhang Y. Social network types and the health of older
       adults: Exploring reciprocal associations. Social Science &
       Medicine. 2015;130: 59–68. pmid:25681715
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   44. 44. Litwin H. Social network type and health status in a national
       sample of elderly Israelis. Social Science & Medicine. 1998;46:
       599–609.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   45. 45. Ward JH. Hierarchical Grouping to Optimize an Objective
       Function. Journal of the American Statistical Association. 1963;58:
       236.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   46. 46. Oxman TE, Hull JG. Social Support, Depression, and Activities
       of Daily Living in Older Heart Surgery Patients. The Journals of
       Gerontology Series B: Psychological Sciences and Social Sciences.
       1997;52B: P1–P14. pmid:9008671
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   47. 47. Hank K, Wagner M. Parenthood, Marital Status, and Well-Being in
       Later Life: Evidence from SHARE. Social Indicators Research.
       2013;114: 639–653.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   48. 48. Nelson SK, Kushlev K, English T, Dunn EW, Lyubomirsky S. In
       Defense of Parenthood: Children Are Associated With More Joy Than
       Misery. Psychological Science. 2013;24: 3–10. pmid:23201970
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   49. 49. Gerard JM, Landry-Meyer L, Roe JG. Grandparents raising
       grandchildren: The role of social support in coping with caregiving
       challenges. The International Journal of Aging and Human
       Development. 2006;62: 359–383. pmid:16739469
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   50. 50. Leder S, Grinstead LN, Torres E. Grandparents raising
       grandchildren: Stressors, social support, and health outcomes.
       Journal of Family Nursing. 2007;13: 333–352. pmid:17641112
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   51. 51. Litwin H, Stoeckel KJ. Social networks and subjective wellbeing
       among older Europeans: does age make a difference? Ageing and
       Society. 2013;33: 1263–1281.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   52. 52. Gove WR, Hughes M, Style CB. Does marriage have positive
       effects on the psychological well-being of the individual? Journal
       of health and social behavior. 1983; 122–131. pmid:6886367
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   53. 53. Kim HK, McKenry PC. The relationship between marriage and
       psychological well-being: A longitudinal analysis. Journal of
       family Issues. 2002;23: 885–911.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   54. 54. Wang X. Subjective well-being associated with size of social
       network and social support of elderly. Journal of health
       psychology. 2016;21: 1037–1042. pmid:25104778
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   55. 55. Siedlecki KL, Salthouse TA, Oishi S, Jeswani S. The
       Relationship Between Social Support and Subjective Well-Being
       Across Age. Soc Indic Res. 2014;117: 561–576. pmid:25045200
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar

   Download PDF

     * Citation
     * XML

   Print
     * Print article
     * EzReprint

   Share
     * Reddit Reddit
     * Google+ Google+
     * Facebook Facebook
     * LinkedIn LinkedIn
     * Mendeley Mendeley
     * PubChase PubChase
     * Twitter Twitter
     * Email Email

     [CROSSMARK_BW_horizontal.svg]
   Advertisement

Subject Areas

   ?

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.
   We want your feedback. Do these Subject Areas make sense for this
   article? Click the target next to the incorrect Subject Area and let us
   know. Thanks for your help!
     * Mental health and psychiatry
       Is the Subject Area "Mental health and psychiatry" applicable to
       this article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Social networks
       Is the Subject Area "Social networks" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Children
       Is the Subject Area "Children" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Human families
       Is the Subject Area "Human families" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Depression
       Is the Subject Area "Depression" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Quality of life
       Is the Subject Area "Quality of life" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Behavioral and social aspects of health
       Is the Subject Area "Behavioral and social aspects of health"
       applicable to this article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Socioeconomic aspects of health
       Is the Subject Area "Socioeconomic aspects of health" applicable to
       this article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.

Archived Tweets

   Load more
   View all tweets

     * Publications
     * PLOS Biology
     * PLOS Medicine
     * PLOS Computational Biology
     * PLOS Genetics
     * PLOS Pathogens
     * PLOS ONE
     * PLOS Neglected Tropical Diseases

     * Home
     * Blogs
     * Collections
     * Give feedback
     * LOCKSS

     * Privacy Policy
     * Terms of Use
     * Advertise
     * Media Inquiries
     * Contact

   PLOS is a nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation, #C2354500, based in San
   Francisco, California, US
   PLOS
   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TP26BH

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MQQMGF

   Advertisement

     * plos.org
     * create account
     * sign in

PLOS ONE

     * Publish
          + Submissions
               o Getting Started
               o Submission Guidelines
               o Figures
               o Tables
               o Supporting Information
               o LaTeX
               o Preprints
               o Revising Your Manuscript
               o Submit Now
               o Calls for Papers
          + Policies
               o Best Practices in Research Reporting
               o Human Subjects Research
               o Animal Research
               o Competing Interests
               o Disclosure of Funding Sources
               o Licenses and Copyright
               o Data Availability
               o Materials and Software Sharing
               o Ethical Publishing Practice
               o Authorship
               o Downloads and Translations
          + Manuscript Review and Publication
               o Criteria for Publication
               o Editorial and Peer Review Process
               o Editor Center
               o Guidelines for Reviewers
               o Accepted Manuscripts
               o Corrections and Retractions
               o Comments
               o Article-Level Metrics

Submit Your Manuscript
       Discover a faster, simpler path to publishing in a high-quality
       journal. PLOS ONE promises fair, rigorous peer review, broad scope,
       and wide readership – a perfect fit for your research every time.
       Learn More Submit Now
     * About
          + Why Publish with PLOS ONE
          + Journal Information
          + Staff Editors
          + Editorial Board
          + Section Editors
          + Advisory Groups
          + Find and Read Articles
          + Publishing Information
          + Publication Fees
          + Press and Media
          + Contact
     * Browse
     *

       Search

       Search
       ____________________ (BUTTON)

       advanced search

   Browse Subject Areas
   ?

   Click through the PLOS taxonomy to find articles in your field.

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.

     * Loading metrics

   Open Access

   Peer-reviewed

   Research Article

An assessment of acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL) of chemical
pesticides used on agricultural land in the United States

     * Michael DiBartolomeis ,
       Contributed equally to this work with: Michael DiBartolomeis, Susan
       Kegley
       Roles Conceptualization, Data curation, Formal analysis,
       Investigation, Methodology, Validation, Writing – original draft,
       Writing – review & editing
       * E-mail: mjd@toxicologistint.com
       Affiliation Toxicology Research International, Haiku, Hawaii,
       United States of America
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0003-0618-2581
       ⨯
     * Susan Kegley ,
       Contributed equally to this work with: Michael DiBartolomeis, Susan
       Kegley
       Roles Conceptualization, Data curation, Formal analysis,
       Investigation, Methodology, Writing – original draft
       Affiliation Pesticide Research Institute, Inc., Santa Rosa,
       California, United States of America
       ⨯
     * Pierre Mineau,
       Roles Conceptualization, Data curation, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Department of Biology, Carleton University, Ottawa,
       Ontario, Canada
       ⨯
     * Rosemarie Radford,
       Roles Data curation
       Affiliation Pesticide Research Institute, Inc., Santa Rosa,
       California, United States of America
       ⨯
     * Kendra Klein
       Roles Funding acquisition, Project administration, Resources,
       Supervision
       Affiliation Friends of the Earth US, Berkeley, California, United
       States of America
       ⨯

An assessment of acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL) of chemical
pesticides used on agricultural land in the United States

     * Michael DiBartolomeis,
     * Susan Kegley,
     * Pierre Mineau,
     * Rosemarie Radford,
     * Kendra Klein

   PLOS
   x
     * Published: August 6, 2019
     * https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029

     * Article
     * Authors
     * Metrics
     * Comments
     * Media Coverage

     * Reader Comments (0)
     * Media Coverage
     * Figures

Figures

   Fig 1
   Table 1
   Fig 2
   Table 2
   Fig 3
   Fig 4
   Fig 5
   Fig 6
   Fig 7
   Fig 8
   Fig 9
   Table 3

Abstract

   We present a method for calculating the Acute Insecticide Toxicity
   Loading (AITL) on US agricultural lands and surrounding areas and an
   assessment of the changes in AITL from 1992 through 2014. The AITL
   method accounts for the total mass of insecticides used in the US,
   acute toxicity to insects using honey bee contact and oral LD[50] as
   reference values for arthropod toxicity, and the environmental
   persistence of the pesticides. This screening analysis shows that the
   types of synthetic insecticides applied to agricultural lands have
   fundamentally shifted over the last two decades from predominantly
   organophosphorus and N-methyl carbamate pesticides to a mix dominated
   by neonicotinoids and pyrethroids. The neonicotinoids are generally
   applied to US agricultural land at lower application rates per acre;
   however, they are considerably more toxic to insects and generally
   persist longer in the environment. We found a 48- and 4-fold increase
   in AITL from 1992 to 2014 for oral and contact toxicity, respectively.
   Neonicotinoids are primarily responsible for this increase,
   representing between 61 to nearly 99 percent of the total toxicity
   loading in 2014. The crops most responsible for the increase in AITL
   are corn and soybeans, with particularly large increases in relative
   soybean contributions to AITL between 2010 and 2014. Oral exposures are
   of potentially greater concern because of the relatively higher
   toxicity (low LD[50]s) and greater likelihood of exposure from residues
   in pollen, nectar, guttation water, and other environmental media.
   Using AITL to assess oral toxicity by class of pesticide, the
   neonicotinoids accounted for nearly 92 percent of total AITL from 1992
   to 2014. Chlorpyrifos, the fifth most widely used insecticide during
   this time contributed just 1.4 percent of total AITL based on oral
   LD[50]s. Although we use some simplifying assumptions, our screening
   analysis demonstrates an increase in pesticide toxicity loading over
   the past 26 years, which potentially threatens the health of honey bees
   and other pollinators and may contribute to declines in beneficial
   insect populations as well as insectivorous birds and other insect
   consumers.

   Citation: DiBartolomeis M, Kegley S, Mineau P, Radford R, Klein K
   (2019) An assessment of acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL) of
   chemical pesticides used on agricultural land in the United States.
   PLoS ONE 14(8): e0220029. https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029

   Editor: Simone Tosi, University of California San Diego, UNITED STATES

   Received: June 27, 2018; Accepted: July 8, 2019; Published: August 6,
   2019

   Copyright: © 2019 DiBartolomeis et al. This is an open access article
   distributed under the terms of the Creative Commons Attribution
   License, which permits unrestricted use, distribution, and reproduction
   in any medium, provided the original author and source are credited.

   Data Availability: All relevant data are within the paper, its
   Supporting Information files, and or can be accessed with the URLs
   (E.g., USGS data) provided in the reference section.

   Funding: This study was funded by Friends of the Earth U.S. (FOE). MD,
   SK, RR, and PM received research fees as contractors to FOE. KK is a
   staff scientist at FOE. SK and RR are paid employees of the Pesticide
   Research Institute (PRI). The specific roles of these authors are
   articulated in the “author contributions.” The funders did not have any
   additional role in the study design, data collection and analysis,
   decision to publish, or preparation of the manuscript.

   Competing interests: KK is a staff scientist at Friends of the Earth.
   MD is the Principal Scientist of Toxicology Research International
   (TRI), which is a Sole Proprietorship. SK is the Principal Scientist
   and CEO of Pesticide Research Institute (PRI) and RR is a Staff
   Scientist at PRI. This does not alter adherence to PLOS ONE policies on
   sharing data and materials. There are no patents, products in
   development, or marketed products to declare.

Introduction

   Insects form the basis of the food web that sustains life on Earth.
   They are critical to ecosystem success, providing food for amphibians,
   fish, birds, reptiles, and mammals. Insects play a role in decomposing
   animal wastes and dead vegetation, recycling the nutrients in these
   materials and returning them to the soil. Insects also contribute to
   the agricultural production of crops that feed humankind, both as the
   primary pollinators of many plants and as natural controls of pest
   insects that feed on crops important to human survival. A diverse
   population of insects benefits agriculture by keeping a balance between
   predatory and pest insects and providing pollination services [1].

   Insecticides targeting crop-damaging pests reduce both the number and
   diversity of insects in an ecosystem [2]. With conventional farming
   practices relying primarily on chemical insecticides for pest insect
   management, ecosystems comprising US agricultural lands are highly
   impacted through both direct effects on insects and direct and indirect
   effects on other species [3]. Although many members of the ecosystem
   may not be exposed to sufficient doses of insecticides to suffer
   acutely lethal poisonings, sublethal and indirect adverse effects have
   been demonstrated to occur [4].

Insecticide use patterns in the US

   The types of synthetic insecticides applied to agricultural lands have
   fundamentally shifted over the last two decades from predominantly
   organophosphorus and N-methyl carbamate insecticides to substantially
   lower amounts of organophosphorus compounds along with a substantial
   increase in neonicotinoids and a modest increase in pyrethroids (Fig
   1). Petroleum derivatives such as mineral oil and inorganics such as
   kaolin clay, lime-sulfur, cryolite, and borates remain as some of the
   primary lower-toxicity chemical classes of insecticides in current use,
   with little change over time.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 1. Change in use of insecticide chemical classes in the US
   (1992–2014).

   Data source: US Geological Survey pesticide use estimates for the US
   [5–7].

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g001

   These changes in use patterns reflect the outcome of US Environmental
   Protection Agency (US EPA) re-registration of pesticides mandated by
   the Food Quality Protection Act of 1996 and the development of new
   pesticide chemistries targeting different receptors in insect
   physiology to combat resistance in pest species [8]. These changes have
   almost certainly altered the toxicity landscape for insects. In
   general, systemic pesticides, in particular the neonicotinoids, are now
   one of the preferred or most readily available and economically
   efficient class of insecticides used in conventional agriculture
   practices in rotation with carbamate, pyrethroid, and
   organophosphorus-containing pesticide products, many of which are still
   registered for use in the US. The organophosphorus and N-methyl
   carbamate classes of pesticides are highly toxic to insects but are not
   especially persistent in the environment, with half-lives ranging from
   several days to several weeks [9, 10]. Neonicotinoids, like
   organophosphates and N-methyl carbamates, are neurotoxicants that
   target the central nervous system by binding to nicotinic acetylcholine
   receptors leading to overstimulation and paralysis. However,
   neonicotinoids generally pose lower acute hazards to mammals and
   greater toxicity to insects due to their differential binding abilities
   to invertebrate and vertebrate cholinergic receptors (Table 1) [11].
   The nitro-substituted neonicotinoids, including imidacloprid,
   thiamethoxam, and clothianidin (which is also a metabolite of
   thiamethoxam), are the most frequently used neonicotinoids and tend to
   have measurably greater persistence than the organophosphorus,
   carbamate, and pyrethroid insecticides, with half-lives of 39 to 174
   days in soils (see S1 Appendix for the source information of these
   data). In addition, the neonicotinoids exhibit higher water solubility,
   leading to greater exposure potential for insects consuming pollen,
   nectar, guttation water, or plant tissue or aquatic insects exposed to
   runoff containing these pesticides [12]. On the other hand, lipophilic
   chemicals would tend to accumulate more in the lipid components of
   pollen and bee bread [13].
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 1. Top ten most acutely toxic insecticides to honey bees by the
   oral route.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.t001

   Although the neonicotinoids are highly toxic to insects, their effects
   are not confined to insects. For example, recent analyses indicate that
   insectivorous bird declines observed in the Netherlands and France
   appear to be associated with the use of neonicotinoid insecticides in
   the field or as seed treatments [14, 15]. Another review of the direct
   and indirect ecosystem effects of insecticides linked impaired growth
   in fish to reductions in invertebrate prey due to imidacloprid and
   fipronil use and linked reductions in lizard species to the effects of
   fipronil on termite prey [3]. Surface waters in agricultural areas have
   been shown to contain concentrations of neonicotinoids that exceed
   acute and chronic “invertebrate aquatic life benchmarks” and toxicity
   thresholds (e.g., no observed effect concentrations or NOEC) for
   aquatic life [16, 17].

   Long-term pest control often suffers from pesticide application since
   beneficial predatory insects that consume pest insects are susceptible
   to insecticide exposure and often not as quick to rebound [18–20].
   Prophylactic use of neonicotinoids as seed treatments in corn, soy, and
   other crops has risen in recent years; research has shown that this use
   has potentially damaged predatory beneficial insect populations and
   disrupted integrated pest management (IPM) programs [21].

Honey bees as an indicator species of ecotoxicity

   Honey bees are the most well studied indicator of insect health in US
   agricultural lands and surrounding areas. Because they are economically
   important for crop pollination, honey production, and wild plant
   pollination, the National Agricultural Statistics Service (NASS) tracks
   colony counts and honey production in the US [22]. The honey bee (Apis
   mellifera) is generally considered to be relatively sensitive to
   pesticides when compared to other bee species [23] and has historically
   been used as an indicator for ecotoxicological testing. However, there
   has also been some concern that the honey bee is not a good indicator
   for other bees or other beneficial insects because of species
   differences in autecology and sensitivity [24]. Information is being
   developed on the toxicity of insecticides to pollinators other than
   honey bees, notably bumble bees (Bombus species) and several solitary
   bee species. However, to date, data are only available for a small
   proportion of active ingredients, and tests have not been standardized.
   Heard et al. developed a “standardized” toxicity test system to compare
   the relative sensitivity between bee species in terms of a pesticide’s
   toxic potency and the time needed for the onset of toxicity [24].
   Although there were significant inter-species differences that varied
   through time, overall, the magnitude of these differences was generally
   within an acceptable two-fold range.

   A recent meta-analysis of paired toxicity data from the same sources
   demonstrated a high variability of sensitivity among bee species
   (Max/Min ratio from 0.001 to 2085.7) [23]. However, an extrapolation
   factor of 10 applied to honey bee toxicity endpoints was sufficiently
   protective in 95 percent of cases, and the honey bee tended (as shown
   by a median value of ratios) to be slightly more sensitive than the
   paired test species. Sanchez-Bayo and Goka regressed Bombus LD[50]
   values against Apis LD[50] values and concluded that the susceptibility
   of both genera was similar when exposed by the oral route [25].
   However, the honey bee was found to be more sensitive than bumble bees
   by the contact route even after correcting for weight. It is clear that
   the susceptibility of any one insect species could be substantially
   different from another.

   In our work, we use honey bee toxicity as an indicator for other bees
   and beneficial insects in US agricultural land because the available
   data appear to demonstrate that the honey bee is sensitive to the
   toxicity of chemical pesticides and has the most comprehensive data set
   available for insects. Until more data on other insects become
   available, the use of the honey bee as an indicator for other species
   is a reasonable approach to show how insecticide toxicity loadings have
   changed over time.

   The toxicity database on honey bees is compiled from test results
   submitted by pesticide manufacturers (“registrants”), academic
   researchers, and other independent research institutes. In order to
   register (license) a pesticide product in the US, applicants for
   registration must satisfy several criteria specified in the Federal
   Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (FIFRA) including but not
   limited to the product’s toxicity in a variety of biological systems,
   its fate and impact on the environment, and for certain pesticide
   products, proof of its performance (efficacy) [26]. Acute lethality
   (LD[50]) testing in honey bees is required under FIFRA, however, field
   tests are only required on a rarely invoked case-by-case basis. Despite
   these limitations and data gaps, the acute toxicity data base (LD[50]s)
   for honey bees is sufficient to allow for a comparative screening
   analysis of acute insecticide toxicity loading in the environment.

Assessing the acute toxicity loading of insecticides on US agricultural land
and surrounding areas

   An assessment of changes in the types and amounts of insecticides used
   over time and consideration of potential environmental impacts is
   illuminating. We present here a method for assessing the Acute
   Insecticide Toxicity Loading (AITL) on US agricultural lands and
   surrounding areas for terrestrial insects using toxicity data for the
   honey bee as an indicator for all arthropods. We developed the AITL
   method in order to allow for a screening level analysis of the
   historical loading of pesticides onto agricultural land and surrounding
   areas over the past two decades and as a metric for evaluating their
   potential for causing detrimental impacts on beneficial insects such as
   pollinators and other non-target species.

   Recently, researchers in Great Britain published a comparable method
   [27]. In this work, the authors investigated the occurrence of changes
   in the mass of pesticides used, the area sprayed, and the total number
   of honey bees that could potentially be killed in Great Britain in the
   period covering 1990 to 2015. Our AITL analysis is an internally
   consistent estimate, which accounts for the total mass of toxic
   pesticides applied in the US and to specific crops and the acute
   toxicity of each pesticide to the honey bee. However, unlike the
   previously published method, the AITL also accounts for pesticide
   persistence in the environment (i.e. dissipation rate in field). The
   AITL values were calculated by chemical class, by individual chemical
   for the top chemicals contributing to the loading, and by crop groups
   as defined in the US Geological Survey (USGS) pesticide use database
   [5–7].

   We believe the incorporation of persistence (e.g., as measured by
   half-life in the field and/or soil) of pesticides in this analysis is
   crucial to understanding the long-term and cumulative ecosystem
   toxicity beyond the initial pesticide application to a crop. For
   example, although organophosphorus insecticides are highly toxic to
   insects, they generally have half-lives less than 30 days and do not
   present a long-term hazard for insects. This characteristic allows for
   the mitigation of the risk to pollinators through application timing
   that avoids periods of bloom. In contrast, neonicotinoid residues from
   seed treatments may be found in the soil for months or even years after
   planting [12, 28]. For example, neonicotinoid insecticides applied on
   coated seeds [18], mature citrus trees [29], or as soil drenches [12]
   on annual crops have been found to be effective at killing insects more
   than 50 days from treatment or planting of treated seeds. For perennial
   crops such as trees and vines, insecticidal efficacy can last for
   months up to a few years under certain conditions [30].

   To account for persistence, similar to the methods used to estimate the
   dose of a drug [31], we estimated pesticide loading to the US
   agricultural land and surrounding areas as the area under the curve of
   degradation/dissipation of pesticides over time. We assumed typical
   first-order kinetics, which is used by US EPA to estimate pesticide
   degradation (see Methods).

   The AITL analysis does not account for toxicity effects other than
   lethality or for synergistic effects from co-application of different
   active ingredients. The analysis also does not provide specific
   information on actual exposures experienced by insects in the
   environment nor on the timing and mode of pesticide application or the
   dissipation of the pesticide into the environment. Therefore, the AITL
   is not a standard risk assessment method (i.e., estimating the
   probability of harm) based on quantified actual or predicted exposure.

   We propose that the AITL could be used as a screening tool by providing
   year-to-year comparison of toxicity loading over time, measuring change
   in the potential toxicity of chemicals released into the environment,
   predicting potential impacts of new insecticides being considered for
   registration, and for surveying insecticide use and impacts on
   agricultural land. In this paper, we apply our AITL methodology to
   analyze how acute toxicity loading for insects in US agricultural land
   and surrounding areas changed between 1992 and 2014 and to identify the
   pesticidal chemical classes, the specific chemical active ingredients,
   and the crops that contributed most to these changes.

Methods

Pesticide use data

   Pesticide use data were obtained from USGS and include foliar, soil,
   and seed treatment uses of pesticides [5–7] from 1992–2014. USGS
   reports agricultural pesticide use at the county level, which are based
   on farm surveys of pesticide use and estimates of harvested crop acres.
   Data collected after 2014 were not included, since the data collection
   methods no longer incorporate pesticides used as seed treatments. USGS
   developed two estimates: the “EPest High” estimate that interpolated
   for missing data and the “EPest Low” estimate which simply assumed zero
   use if data were missing. We used the EPest High data for our
   assessment because it provides a more complete and realistic
   quantitative description of pesticide use in the US. It should be noted
   that data are missing from this data set for insecticides used on
   soybean crops between 1998 and 2003 because this question was omitted
   in grower surveys (USGS, personal communication). Also, pesticides for
   which no environmental half-life or either oral or contact honey bee
   LD[50] values were available were not included in the analysis.

   Nationwide, data on acres treated with different pesticides do not
   exist for the time period in question, but approvals for new use of
   systemic insecticides on cropland can be tracked via tolerance
   decisions published in the Federal Register [32]. We determined acres
   that could legally be treated using the USDA National Agricultural
   Statistics Service acres planted data from the Census of Agriculture
   (Fig 2) [22]. By this measure, the acres of US cropland that could be
   treated with neonicotinoids have increased every year, with large
   increases in potential use when approvals were obtained for
   high-acreage commodity crops like corn, soybeans, cotton, wheat, and
   alfalfa. As noted previously, seed coatings comprise the largest
   contribution to increasing use [33], although studies do not
   consistently demonstrate economic benefits to farmers from insecticidal
   seed treatments [34].
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 2. Crop acreage in the US on which neonicotinoid insecticides could
   legally be used based on 2007 data for acres planted.

   Data source: US Federal Register notices, US Environmental Protection
   Agency 1992–2017 [32].

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g002

Toxicity and environmental persistence data

   In calculating the AITL, we used honey bee contact (often referred to
   in the literature as topical) and oral LD[50] values as an indicator
   for pesticide toxicity to insects, referred to as AITL[C] and AITL[O],
   respectively. Honey bee LD[50] values for registered insecticides were
   obtained from a variety of sources and are provided in the supporting
   materials that accompany this publication (S1 Appendix). The database
   for LD[50]s is a compilation of data publicly available from several
   databases managed by government agencies, academic institutions, and
   independent research institutes worldwide. Values generated for the
   technical grade active ingredient were used preferentially, although
   data obtained with formulations were used if technical grade active
   ingredient LD[50]s were not available. Toxic degradates were included
   in the analysis if the degradate was also a registered pesticide and
   the AITL[C] of the parent pesticide was greater than or equal to (≥)
   0.1 percent of the total AITL[C] for the period 1992–2014. In practice,
   this criterion excluded all but clothianidin produced from the
   degradation of thiamethoxam, where 35.6 percent of applied thiamethoxam
   degrades to clothianidin within 90 days [35]. This portion of
   clothianidin was analyzed separately for source clarity.

   Excluded from the analysis were known low acute toxicity inorganic
   pesticides (e.g., cryolite, sulfur), low acute toxicity petroleum
   derivatives (e.g., mineral oil), microbial pesticides (e.g., Bacillus
   thuringiensis), and low-use (<5,000 kg over the time period 1992–2014)
   pesticides. The only high-use, potentially higher toxicity pesticide
   for which LD[50] values could not be found is phostebupirim
   (tebupirimphos), which excluded it from the analysis [36]. A range of
   LD[50] values for honey bees has been reported for some pesticide
   active ingredients, and for some we have concerns over the quality of
   the data. In order to consistently and comparably select LD[50]s to use
   in our analysis, we developed a set of explicit rules which we applied
   in the selection process (Table 2). These rules were used independently
   for both contact and oral toxicity values.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 2. Guidelines used in selecting LD[50] values from multiple
   sources of data.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.t002

   Aerobic half-lives for pesticide chemicals were obtained from several
   sources. The preferred source was the Pesticide Properties Database
   (PPDB) field half-life [37]. If a field half-life value was not
   available in the PPDB, we used the soil half-life from this database.
   If any half-life value for a chemical was not available from the PPDB
   database, the aerobic half-life from the California Department of
   Pesticide Regulation Status Reports for the Pesticide Contamination
   Prevention Act [9] was used.

Acute toxicity loading for insects

   Our approach provides a general measure of acute toxicity loading of
   insecticides on US agricultural land and surrounding areas, assuming
   insects are exposed to pesticides released to the environment through
   direct contact with contaminated surfaces, water, or food or through
   ingestion of contaminated food or water. Different insects will have
   different exposures depending on their habitat, behaviors, and food
   sources; however, across years, exposures for different types of
   insects will be comparable. However, as noted previously, this analysis
   does not include actual or estimated exposure doses, nor does it factor
   in timing and mode of pesticide application. Therefore, the AITL method
   would best be described as a screening analysis that can identify or
   predict potential environmental impacts.

   Honey bee lethality is the measure of toxicity used to assess AITL.
   This analysis was developed for both contact toxicity (AITLc) and oral
   toxicity (AITLo). The AITL[C] calculation provides the number of
   toxicity loading units (TLU) applied to a crop for each pesticide by
   dividing the mass of chemical applied (in μg) by the honey bee contact
   LD[50] (in μg/bee) (the first term in Eq 1 below) to give the number of
   honey bee LD[50]’s released to the environment. This value is then
   modified by the half-life of the chemical (in days), assuming exposure
   continues as long as the chemical is present, with degradation governed
   by the half-life of the chemical and the dose expressed as the area
   under the curve of concentration versus time (second term in Eq 1).
   Because the AITL values obtained are on the order of 10^12–10^18, a
   scaling factor of 10^−15 is included to scale the values for plotting
   the results. The same method of calculation is applied for AITLo (Eq
   2).
   [journal.pone.0220029.e001] (1) [journal.pone.0220029.e002] (2)

   Toxic degradates are known for some pesticide active ingredients.
   However, because environmental half-lives were not available for most
   of these compounds they were not included in the analysis. Those
   degradates with known toxicity (e.g., malaoxon, the degradate of
   malathion) might contribute to overall acute toxicity, although we
   determined that most known degradates would contribute only a
   negligible amount to the overall toxicity loading of the parent
   compound. The one exception as noted previously is clothianidin, which
   is a metabolite of thiamethoxam; our analysis accounts for this
   conversion in the environment because it contributes a measurable level
   of toxicity relative to the parent compound.

   We estimated pesticide loading on agricultural land and surrounding
   areas as the area under the curve of degradation/dissipation of
   pesticides over time, assuming typical first-order kinetics, as
   recommended by US EPA in its guidance [38]. While degradation rates
   vary depending on a number of factors, the first-order assumption is
   widely used for estimating pesticide concentrations in the environment
   over time, and this appears to be an appropriate assumption for the
   neonicotinoid insecticides [39, 40]. An example theoretical degradation
   curve for imidacloprid, with a half-life of 174 days, is shown in Fig
   3. In this example, on Day Zero (application day), the available dose
   is 150 honey bee LD[50]s. On Day One, 149 honey bee LD[50]s still
   remain, with the potential for concomitant toxic effects to insects. On
   Day 174, 75 honey bee LD[50]s remain in the environment. Ninety-seven
   percent of the imidacloprid is degraded at five half-lives (870 days or
   2.4 years). The total integrated environmental toxicity loading level
   over time can be calculated as the area under the curve. Therefore, we
   define AITL as the area under the curve in number of honey bee
   LD[50]-days, representing the total exposure potential for arthropods
   (both terrestrial and aquatic) over the degradation period.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 3. Theoretical degradation curve for imidacloprid following
   first-order kinetics with a half-life of 174 days.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g003

   For pesticides used as seed treatments, our analysis assumes that
   insect exposure from contact with treated crops would include dust
   drift to field-side plants during seed planting (which can be
   considerable) resulting in both contact and oral exposure, and oral
   exposure from consuming pollen, nectar, guttation droplets, or plant
   tissue from the treated crop [12]. In addition, application of the
   seeds to soil would result in exposure of the soil entomofauna and
   migration to waterways would result in exposures for aquatic insects.
   This is a simplifying assumption, which may or may not overestimate
   actual insecticide doses received by honey bees and other beneficial
   insects from seed treatments, depending on the specific circumstances.
   Based on a “residue per unit dose” estimation, it appears that seeding
   results in higher contamination of insects than an equivalent spray
   application but, due to the lower per hectare (or acre) rates of
   application for seed treatments, a comparable level of contamination in
   non-target arthropods can be expected [41]. Because the AITL is
   intended to be used as a screening level assessment for comparative and
   surveillance purposes, the inclusion of seed treatment applications is
   a reasonable approach. Further refinement of this method or other
   analyses would be required before making policy or regulatory decisions
   based on seed insecticide treatments alone.

Results

AITL calculations by chemical class

   A comparison of AITLs calculated for different pesticide groupings
   demonstrates that insecticides contribute nearly 100 percent of the
   acute toxicity loading on honey bees and other beneficial insects of
   pesticides applied to agricultural land and surrounding areas in the US
   compared to herbicides, fungicides, and others (results not shown).
   Based on these preliminary calculations, we determined that the
   insecticides as a class represent the primary acute toxicity loading to
   insects in the environment. Therefore, no further analysis was
   conducted on the other pesticide groups.

Acute contact toxicity.

   AITL values were calculated for insecticidal active ingredients
   comprising several chemical classes for both acute contact (AITL[C])
   and acute oral (AITL[O]) toxicity on agricultural land and surrounding
   areas in the US. Fig 4 presents the relative AITL[C] values from 1992
   to 2014 for six chemical classes as well as a miscellaneous category
   for contact acute toxicity (LD[50]s). From 1992, the first year
   included in our assessment, to 2014, the acute toxicity loading of
   pesticides in US agricultural land and surrounding areas based on
   AITL[C] increased by 3.8-fold.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 4. Contact acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL[C]) by chemical
   class, 1992–2014.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g004

   In the first decade of analysis, between 1992 and 2003, the AITL[C] is
   the result of predominantly four classes of chemicals, the
   organophosphorus (43.4 percent on average), pyrethroid (28.5 percent on
   average), pyrazole (9.4 percent on average), and neonicotinoid (11.1
   percent on average) insecticides. Although neonicotinoids had been
   introduced in 1994, our analysis indicates that the relative loading of
   this group of insecticides into the environment began to increase
   dramatically starting in about 2004 when the relative loading of the
   organophosphorus insecticides began to decrease. In 2004, the relative
   contribution of the neonicotinoids (27.8 percent) based on AITL[C]
   surpassed that of the organophosphorus insecticides (22.0 percent) for
   the first time. By 2014, the relative contribution of neonicotinoids on
   the environmental toxicity loading via contact was 6.5 times greater
   than that of the organophosphorus insecticides. Pyrethroid insecticides
   contributed to the overall AITL[C] relatively consistently from 1992 to
   2014 (28.5 percent on average, range of 26.5 to 36.1 percent). Pyrazole
   insecticides (fipronil) contributed a smaller proportion of overall
   acute contact toxicity loading between 1992 and 2014 (6.2 percent) with
   the largest contribution occurring in a 12-year span from 1998 to 2010
   (11.7 percent on average, range of 4.4 to 23.0 percent)[42], when its
   use on corn was cancelled [42]. The other insecticide classes analyzed
   contributed relatively small amounts to the overall AITL[C] of
   insecticide use on the environment.

Acute oral toxicity.

   On the basis of the acute oral toxicity loading (AITL[O]), the acute
   toxicity loading of insecticides in agricultural land and surrounding
   areas in the US was 48 times higher in 2014 compared to 1992. The
   AITL[O] shows a vastly different trend in terms of relative chemical
   classes over the same 23 year time period compared to AITL[C] (Fig 5).
   Although the organophosphorus insecticides comprised the majority of
   the acute toxicity loading between 1992 and 1994 (69 percent on
   average), from 1995 to 2014 the neonicotinoids comprise the majority
   (greater than 55 percent) of the overall AITL[O] on the environment.
   The pyrazoles contributed on average 7 percent of the total AITL[O]
   between 1998 and 2010 (range of 27 percent in 2002 to 1.7 percent in
   2010), which is consistent with the analysis for acute contact toxicity
   (Fig 4). The relatively greater potential impact of the neonicotinoids
   on the environment based on the oral toxicity data is due to the
   relatively long environmental persistence of these chemicals and their
   high level of toxicity (i.e., relatively low LD[50]s) to honey bees and
   other insects via the oral route (Table 1).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 5. Oral acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL[O]) by chemical
   class, 1992–2014.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g005

Overall toxicity.

   In terms of absolute toxicity loading, the combined AITL[C] for all
   chemical classes for acute contact toxicity increased by a factor of
   about 3.9 between 1992 and 2014 with the neonicotinoids contributing 60
   percent of the total toxicity loading in 2014. However, the potential
   impact of the neonicotinoids is far more dramatic when looking at the
   absolute toxicity loading of all classes of insecticides based on the
   oral route of exposure. As noted above, the combined AITL[O] for acute
   oral toxicity from all classes of insecticides increased by 48-fold
   from 1992 to 2014, with the neonicotinoids representing nearly 99
   percent of the total acute oral toxicity loading in 2014.

AITL calculations for active ingredients

   In order to determine which active ingredients contributed the majority
   of acute toxicity loading on agricultural land and surrounding areas in
   the US between 1992 and 2014, we calculated AITLs for individual
   chemicals representing the most toxic, persistent, and heavily used
   active ingredients in several chemical classes. AITL[C] and AITL[O]
   calculations for individual chemicals are presented in Figs 6 and 7,
   respectively.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 6. Contact acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL[C]) by active
   ingredient, 1992–2014.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g006
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 7. Oral acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL[O]) by active
   ingredient, 1992–2014.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g007

Acute contact toxicity.

   With respect to AITL[C] from 1992 to 2014, imidacloprid (20.0 percent)
   and chlorpyrifos (18.6 percent) comprise the two individual active
   ingredients with the most potential impact (Fig 6) over the 23-year
   period. Other individual insecticide active ingredients contributing a
   large proportion to the overall acute contact toxicity loading include:
   bifenthrin (11.2 percent), clothianidin (7.6 percent), cypermethrin
   (6.0 percent), fipronil (5.5 percent), cyfluthrin (3.8 percent),
   permethrin (2.7 percent, not shown in Fig 6), thiamethoxam (2.5
   percent), spinosad (1.7 percent, not shown in Fig 6), and clothianidin
   from thiamethoxam (1.5 percent). The remaining “other” insecticide
   active ingredients combined comprise 11.6 percent of the total acute
   contact toxicity loading over the 23-year period.

   The AITL[C] for imidacloprid from 1995 to 2014 appears to demonstrate
   three defined time periods where there is stepwise increase in relative
   AITL[C] contribution. Prior to 1995, imidacloprid does not contribute
   relevant TLU to the overall total. The first phase from 1995 to 2003
   indicates that imidacloprid contributed an average of 1,595 ± 344 TLU
   per year for an average contribution of 11.5 percent. The second phase
   from 2004 to 2009 indicates that imidacloprid contributed an average of
   3,441 ± 765 TLU per year for an average contribution of 18.5 percent.
   Finally, the third phase of increased imidacloprid use (2010–2014)
   indicates that this active ingredient contributed an average of 10,288
   ± 1,140 TLU per year for an average contribution of 32.6 percent. The
   other two neonicotinoids that contribute to the total AITL[C]
   (summation of TLU for all active ingredients for all years) in the
   23-year period are thiamethoxam and clothianidin (both as a registered
   active ingredient and as a degradation product). The increasing trend
   in use and contribution to the total AITL[C] begins in about 2004 for
   both chemicals, peaking in 2014 (the last year in our analysis) at 9.1
   and 2.5 percent contribution to the total, respectively. The post-2004
   increases in TLU described above is consistent with the increase in use
   of neonicotinoids for seed treatment at that time.

   On the other hand, the chlorpyrifos AITL[C] remains relatively constant
   from year-to-year over the 23 year time period with an average of 3,490
   ± 810 TLU. However, when computing the contribution of chlorpyrifos to
   the total AITL[C] from year-to-year, there is a steady downward trend
   of relative contribution. The peak contribution of chlorpyrifos to the
   total AITL[C] is in 1993 (42.3 percent) and the lowest relative
   contributions occur from 2011 to 2014 (approximately 8 percent per
   year), with a gradual decline over the 23 year period.

   Fipronil, a pyrazole insecticide, contributed a large proportion to the
   overall AITL[C] from 1998 to 2005, with an average contribution of 14.5
   ± 3.0 percent over this time period. After 2005, the use and
   contribution of fipronil declined rapidly because its conditional
   registration for use on corn was cancelled in 2010 [42], so that by
   2012, the contribution was minimal (less than 0.5 percent). Four
   pyrethroid active ingredients bifenthrin, permethrin, zeta
   cypermethrin, and cyfluthrin, also contribute to the overall AITL[C],
   contributing 11.2, 2.7, 6.0, and 3.8 percent over the 23-year period
   respectively. Individually, these active ingredients show some
   consistency of use and toxicity loading over the time period.
   Permethrin shows a steady downward trend after 2001, whereas cyfluthrin
   and zeta cypermethrin remain somewhat consistent from year-to-year.
   Bifenthrin, on the other hand, shows a large jump in use and toxicity
   loading contribution after 2009, with average percent contributions
   from 1992 to 2009 of 6.3 ± 2.6 and from 2010 to 2014 of 17.0 ± 2.4.
   This increase is largely due to increases in use of bifenthrin on corn,
   cotton, and soybeans[5–7].

Acute oral toxicity.

   With respect to AITL[O], chlorpyrifos follows a similar trend from 1992
   to 2014 as seen for acute contact toxicity with a more dramatic
   decrease in relative contribution over this time period (Fig 7). Over
   the 23-year period, the AITL[O] for chlorpyrifos averaged 676 ± 157 TLU
   per year with more toxicity contribution from 1992 to 2000 (841 ± 94
   TLU) per year than from 2001–2014 (569 ±76 TLU) per year. However, the
   relative AITL[O] shows a steady decrease from the peak contribution of
   28.6 percent in 1993 to the lowest contributions of less than 0.5
   percent from 2010 to 2014. After 2003, the relative contribution of
   chlorpyrifos to the total AITL[O] averaged only 0.8 percent per year.
   For all 23 years combined, chlorpyrifos contributed 1.4 percent (15,545
   TLU) to the overall AITL[O].

   The trend in AITL[O] from 1992 to 2014 for the neonicotinoids (Fig 7)
   is more complicated than seen for the AITL[C] (Fig 6). The contribution
   of imidacloprid begins in 1994 and continues through 2014, loading
   502,699 TLU (46.0 percent of the total TLU loading for all
   insecticides) into the ecosystem over this time period. In the 21-year
   period of imidacloprid use, there is a steady and marked increase in
   the absolute contribution of this active ingredient from year-to-year.
   In 1994, the AITL[O] was 750 TLU, by 2003 it was 10,124 TLU and in 2014
   it was 69,831 TLU. The relative contribution of imidacloprid to the
   total annual AITL[O] over the same 21-year time period shows more
   variation. From 1995 through 2004, the average relative contribution of
   imidacloprid to AITL[O] was 64.1 ±7.8 percent followed by a decrease in
   relative contribution from 2005 to 2014 to 43 ± 6 percent.

   The decline in the relative contribution of imidacloprid after 2004 is
   the result of the introduction of two other neonicotinoids,
   thiamethoxam and clothianidin, after 2000 and 2003, respectively. As
   the use of these two neonicotinoids increased, the relative
   contribution of imidacloprid to the total AITL[O] decreased. However,
   it is important to understand that the absolute contribution of the sum
   of these active ingredients has actually increased dramatically over
   this time period, and the trend suggests that this increase in acute
   toxicity loading on US agricultural land and surrounding areas will
   continue after 2014 as more acres of cropland and additional crops are
   treated with these insecticides. The absolute AITL[O] of thiamethoxam
   increased from 315 TLU in 2002, to 3,882 TLU in 2008, to 7,700 TLU in
   2014. The absolute toxicity loading of clothianidin is more pronounced,
   with a steady and sharp annual increase observed from 2004 to 2014.
   Clothianidin as an active ingredient contributed 8,928 TLU in 2004,
   23,352 in 2008, and 80,083 TLU in 2014. Total clothianidin toxicity
   loading (active ingredient plus degradation product) is 10,632 TLU in
   2004, 28,949 TLU in 2008, and 91,185 TLU in 2014. The absolute
   contribution of thiamethoxam and clothianidin (total) to the total
   AITL[O] of all insecticides from 1992 to 2014 was 500,527 TLU or 45.8
   percent of the total.

   The three neonicotinoid insecticide active ingredients combined
   accounted for 1,003,226 TLU from 1994 to 2014, and for the entire
   23-year period, contributed 91.8 percent of the total AITL[O] of all
   insecticides in the US. By contrast, fipronil, which is the next most
   widely used insecticide active ingredient from 1992 to 2014,
   contributed 3.1 percent. As noted earlier, chlorpyrifos, which is the
   fifth most widely used insecticide active ingredient, contributed only
   1.4 percent of the total AITL[O] in the US over the 23-year period.

AITL calculations on the basis of agricultural crops

   The primary crops responsible for the preponderance of AITL[C] summed
   over the 23-year period are corn (33.3 percent) and soybeans (15.2
   percent), followed by cotton (13.9 percent), vegetables and fruit (12.9
   percent), orchards and grapes (11.4 percent), alfalfa (4.5 percent),
   and wheat (4.0 percent) (Fig 8). Comparably, for AITL[O], the primary
   crops of importance are corn (43 percent) and soybeans (19.3 percent),
   followed by vegetables and fruit (13.3 percent), cotton (9.0 percent),
   orchards and grapes (9.0 percent), and wheat (3.9 percent) (Fig 9).
   Collectively, crops other than those listed above (“other” crops)
   comprise 4.7 and 2.6 percent of the AITL[C] and AITL[O], respectively.
   Although there is some consistency in the relative contributions of the
   crops to the acute contact and oral toxicity loading, the absolute
   toxicity loading is much greater for oral acute toxicity. Overall, the
   total AITL[O] for crops is 1,094,226 TLU whereas for AITL[C] the total
   is 383,456 TLU, or approximately one-third of the AITL[O], which is
   likely due to the greater toxicity of these insecticides via the oral
   route.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 8. Contact acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL[C]) by crop,
   1992–2014.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g008
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 9. Oral acute insecticide toxicity loading (AITL[O]) by crop,
   1992–2014.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.g009

   The USGS data set includes pesticides used as foliar sprays, seed
   treatments, and soil applications, but does not provide a breakdown of
   pounds used via different application methods. For corn, soy, and
   cotton, seed treatments are a primary route of application and comprise
   the largest contribution to increasing use [33]. Foliar uses are
   increasing. In 2014, there were 33 registered pesticide products
   containing imidacloprid for use on corn in the US; four of them
   approved for foliar uses [32]. For soybeans, there were 85 currently
   registered imidacloprid products with 54 approved for foliar uses. For
   cotton, there were 93 currently registered imidacloprid products with
   63 approved for foliar uses.

   According to the USGS, between 1998 and 2003, the survey methods used
   to collect the raw data for pesticide use on crops did not include a
   field for collecting data on insecticide application to soybean crops.
   Therefore, the data between 1998 and 2003 for soybeans are for
   herbicide application only. In 2004, USGS resumed surveying insecticide
   use on soybeans because it became a higher priority. The impact of this
   data gap is not known, but it likely would lead to a quantifiable
   underestimate of the relative total toxicity loading of insecticide use
   on soybean crops from 1992 to 2014. Interpolating the missing data is
   beyond the scope of our work.

Discussion and conclusions

Potential impacts of insecticide loading

   A decline of pollinating insects is occurring worldwide [43], with
   negative effects for pollination of many domestic crops [44]. Several
   interacting factors appear to be involved, including declines in
   natural and diverse habitat and food supplies resulting from
   agricultural land use intensification, the prevalence of parasites and
   pathogens, exposure to chemical pesticides used predominantly in
   agriculture, and environmental impacts due to changes in climate [43,
   45]. The impact of pesticides, in particular the neonicotinoids, on
   pollinator declines has received the most attention recently. For
   example, researchers in Great Britain used a comparable methodology to
   ours to show that potential honey bee deaths (the total number of
   LD[50]doses applied to arable farmland) has increased six-fold to
   approximately 3 x 10^16 bees over the past two decades in that country
   [27]. The authors attributed this result to the increasing use of
   neonicotinoids from 1994 to 2016. Likewise, despite its simplicity, the
   AITL analysis presented in this paper provides additional information
   in support of the hypothesis that the use of neonicotinoids on
   agricultural land and surrounding areas may play a primary role in the
   decline of insects in the US.

   The AITL calculations might also be used as an analytic tool to predict
   future impacts of newly registered pesticide products by inputting
   anticipated pesticide use and toxicity to insects, then accounting for
   the half-life to estimate the relative potential increase in toxic
   loading to beneficial insects and other non-target species in the
   ecosystem before the product is registered. As a predictive tool, the
   AITL could be helpful in identifying regrettable substitutions before
   products are registered. In agriculture, a regrettable substitution
   might occur when a new pesticide product, which is developed to replace
   a presumably more toxic and more risky product already on the market,
   actually causes greater harm to the environment and non-target species
   than the product it is meant to replace. The AITL analysis presented
   here introduces the concern that the increased use of the neonicotinoid
   class of insecticides, presumably to replace the organophosphorus,
   carbamate, and pyrethroid classes of insecticides could be a case of
   regrettable substitution in relation to the health of beneficial
   insects at least and potentially to other non-target species in the
   environment as well. In other words, this toxicity loading analysis
   indicates that the neonicotinoids are potentially more harmful to
   pollinators and other beneficial insects than originally predicted
   relative to the insecticides it they are presumably replacing.

   We have shown that the introduction and increasing use of the
   neonicotinoids from 1992 to 2014 is the primary reason for the dramatic
   increase in toxicity loading, in relation to pollinators and other
   beneficial insects and non-target arthropod species on US agricultural
   lands and surrounding areas. This is the result of a combination of
   increased use, relative toxicity, and greater persistence of
   neonicotinoids compared to chemical active ingredients used two decades
   ago. For example, in the US, imidacloprid is registered for use to
   control sucking insects, some chewing insects including termites, soil
   insects, and fleas on pets [46]. It may be applied to structures,
   crops, soil, and as a seed treatment as well as a topical treatment for
   animals. In 2016, there were 134 approved residue tolerances for
   imidacloprid, including crops and other applications [47]. In the
   21-year period of imidacloprid use (starting in 1994), there is a
   steady and marked increase in the absolute contribution of this active
   ingredient from year-to-year reflecting its increased use over this
   time span (see Results). In 1994, the AITL[O] was 750 TLU, by 2003 it
   was 10,124 TLU and in 2014 it was 69,831 TLU. If the use of
   neonicotinoids continues to increase as the use of other chemical
   insecticides decreases, then the absolute acute toxicity loading of
   imidacloprid would likely also continue to increase beyond 2014,
   particularly if there is approval of new crop uses of these
   insecticides.

   Although acute insecticide toxicity loading from topical expoures
   (AITL[C]) presents a potential threat to beneficial insects and other
   nontarget species, the acute insect toxicity loading from oral
   exposures (AITL[O]) might present an even greater potential threat.
   This is due to the higher level of toxicity (i.e., lower LD[50]s),
   increased persistence (i.e., longer half-lives), and the potential for
   greater relative exposure via the oral route. In absolute terms, over
   the time period from 1992 to 2014, the total AITL[C] is 383,456 TLU,
   whereas the total AITL[O] is 1,094,226 TLU, which is nearly three times
   greater than the AITL[C.] We found that three neonicotinoid insecticide
   active ingredients (imidacloprid, thiamethoxam, and clothianidin)
   combine to contribute 91.8 percent of the total AITL[O] of all
   insecticides in the US. As noted earlier, chlorpyrifos, which is the
   fifth most widely used insecticide active ingredient, contributed only
   1.4 percent of the total AITL[O] in the US from 1992–2014.

Limitations of the AITL method

   Pesticide use by pounds (kilograms) applied or acres treated does not
   provide a comprehensive estimate of toxicity loading to an ecosystem.
   Factors such as persistence, toxicity, application methods and timing,
   exposure routes, and mechanisms of dissipation from the application
   site all influence the net toxicity experienced by insects in the
   ecosystem. The data needed to do an analysis that incorporates all of
   these factors is largely unavailable.

   As noted previously, the AITL analysis does not account for trends in
   pesticide application in seed treatments nor does it quantify the
   actual or estimated exposure dose of an insecticide after seed
   treatment. In a risk-based approach, omitting these factors may result
   in an overestimation of hazard potential to pollinators and other
   non-target species from exposure to insecticides applied as seed
   treatments. Therefore, a more refined approach would be required to
   estimate actual hazard impacts from seed treatments, in particular for
   the use of neonicotinoids. This level of refinement is difficult but it
   would provide a more accurate assessment of the impact of these
   insecticides on US agricultural land and surrounding areas.
   Furthermore, other factors that contribute to toxicity loading, such as
   the application method and the change in the types of application
   methods used over time, were not evaluated in this analysis. Different
   pesticide application methods (e.g., spray, soil drench, granules,
   coated seeds) result in different exposure potential for aquatic versus
   terrestrial ecosystems, which is not assessed in this analysis. Because
   our analysis does not account for the timing of insecticide
   application, the AITL does not identify “peaks” and “ebbs” in toxicity
   over time relative to the exact time and mode of application. Instead,
   our analysis assumes a steady state from one application to another.
   This simplifying assumption does not affect comparisons of insecticide
   toxicity loading from year-to-year but it does diminish the method’s
   ability to identify specific time periods when toxicity loading might
   be the most damaging to the ecosystem in US agricultural land and
   surrounding areas.

   As is, on the one hand the AITL analysis likely overestimates acute
   toxicity hazard to pollinators and other beneficial insects because of
   the simplifying assumptions used. On the other hand, the AITL analysis
   likely underestimates actual toxicity hazard because it does not
   account for sublethal effects, movement of pesticides offsite, or
   potential synergistic impacts of pesticides used in combination in the
   field. Nevertheless, as a screening tool, the results of an AITL can
   assist regulators in identifying chemicals of concern for further
   evaluation.

Other toxicity concerns

Sublethal toxicity.

   We were limited to using acute lethal toxicity (LD[50]) as an endpoint
   in our AITL analysis because sublethal toxicity studies of pesticides
   in honey bees are currently not required for registration in the US,
   although US EPA has published guidance [48]. Therefore, the LD[50]
   dataset on honey bees is the only insect toxicity data available for a
   large number of pesticides registered for use in the US, which allowed
   us to compare historical trends for all relevant insecticide classes.
   Lethality is at the extreme end of the toxicity spectrum and using
   mortality as the endpoint for the AITL analysis or for risk assessment
   is a blunt instrument for evaluating the impact of pesticides on the
   ecosystem. Because actual toxicity risks to pollinators and other
   non-target species would be higher using sublethal toxicity doses, the
   impacts of pesticides on beneficial insect populations and other
   non-target species is underestimated when limited to using lethal
   doses.

   The AITL analysis can be modified for the input of sublethal toxicity
   doses when data exist. For some of the neonicotinoids, the dataset for
   sublethal effects is adequate to allow for a comparison of the toxic
   effects of these insecticides at high dose levels to the more sensitive
   sublethal effects at lower doses. However, the availability of a robust
   database for pesticide active ingredients is the exception, not the
   rule. Very few studies are available regarding the sublethal effects of
   organophosphorus, carbamate, and organochlorine pesticides on insects,
   so it is difficult to do a comparative analysis with these chemicals.

   In the case of honey bees, reported sublethal effects from
   neonicotinoid exposure in laboratory and field studies include impaired
   reproduction, altered immune function, inability to navigate
   effectively, and behavioral changes in essential colony activities
   leading to decreased colony health and survival [4]. We present a
   listing of sublethal toxicity values (in units of ng/bee) taken from
   representative laboratory and field studies in the published literature
   of neonicotinoids in honey bees in the supporting materials that
   accompany this paper (S2 Appendix). The dose levels reported for
   lethality (LD[50]) when compared to the lowest observed effect
   concentration (LOEC) for sublethal toxicity are noticeably higher
   (Table 3). For imidacloprid, the most heavily used of this class of
   insecticides, the lethal dose for the oral route is 37 times the
   sublethal LOEC and for contact toxicity the lethal dose is 320 times
   the sublethal LOEC. In addition, imidacloprid is also one of the more
   environmentally persistent pesticide active ingredients used today,
   enhancing the potential for sublethal exposures.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 3. Comparison of honey bee LD50’s with sublethal lowest observed
   effect concentrations (LOEC) for neonicotinoids and related compounds.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.t003

   The results of an insecticide toxicity loading analysis of sublethal
   toxicity would likely demonstrate that the absolute sublethal TLU for
   the neonicotinoids would be noticeably higher than the AITL, indicating
   a greater overall toxicity loading on agricultural land and surrounding
   areas when compared to the acute TLU calculated from using the LD[50]
   values. The relative toxicity loading contribution of the different
   neonicotinoids might also change, although it would be difficult to
   predict the outcome without doing the calculations. When sublethal
   toxicity data exist, the calculation of the toxicity loading using
   these values rather than LD[50]s would be informative.

Pesticide movement offsite.

   One of the limitations of our AITL analysis is that, while we account
   for total pesticides applied to agricultural land using pesticide use
   estimates published by USGS (see Methods), we cannot quantify
   insecticide toxicity loading in the impact zone beyond the boundaries
   of agricultural land or indeed the greater likelihood of in-field
   exposure to highly systemic and persistent insecticides such as
   neonicotinoids. This omission will tend to underestimate the toxicity
   loading of pesticides on land surrounding agricultural fields and in
   surface water and other waterways distal to the fields. Including
   persistence in this evaluation of overall toxicity is important because
   persistent pesticides have a greater potential and tendency to move
   offsite unchanged into surrounding fields, land, surface water, and
   other waterways outside of the agricultural fields where they are
   directly applied [12, 49].

   Insects in an ecosystem can be exposed to insecticides through a number
   of different routes. Pesticides run off into surface waters with
   precipitation or irrigation, leach into groundwater, and drift as dusts
   or on soil particulates from the application site in the air, affecting
   insects both on and near the application site. Direct insecticide
   application exposes insects on the crop being treated as well as those
   in near-field vegetation [50] waterways [16, 17], and pooled surface
   water [51]. Soil-borne larvae or adult insects can be exposed through
   direct sprays, granular or soil-drench applications, or through
   migration of residues remaining in the soil from the planting of coated
   seeds. Insects consuming pollen or nectar, or sucking or chewing
   insects consuming plants both on and near the application site are
   exposed through oral consumption. Aquatic species living a substantial
   distance from the application site can be exposed through drift and
   runoff from treated fields that contaminates waterways [52].

   While the toxic effects of an insecticide are highest at the
   application site where the concentrations are highest, dissipation
   pathways such as irrigation or rainwater runoff to surface waters can
   carry toxicologically significant amounts of pesticides into waterways.
   For example, surface water contamination has been shown to negatively
   impact beneficial insects and other non-target species [14, 53].
   Because the neonicotinoid insecticides are highly water soluble and
   persistent, their potential for off-site impacts on aquatic organisms
   is high.

   Pesticides in airborne field dust, which is generated during and
   shortly after application to agricultural fields, also presents a
   potentially important source of exposure to beneficial insects. In
   particular, neonicotinoid-treated seeds (e.g., soybean) contain high
   concentrations of neonicotinoids, which when mixed with field dust, can
   move offsite in the air depositing on surrounding land, flowers, and
   other vegetation potentially exposing pollinators and other non-target
   insects [52, 54, 55]. Additionally, soils in fields treated with long
   half-life insecticides year after year may increase in toxicity over
   time, as the insecticide accumulates in the soil [56].

Synergistic effects.

   This analysis is also limited by the fact that virtually all
   environmental toxicology data on pesticide active ingredients are for a
   single chemical only and not for a combination of chemicals. However,
   pesticide products applied to agricultural fields in the US are
   frequently used in combination with other products and chemicals with
   the potential for concurrent and/or sequential exposure to more than
   one chemical on a regular basis. Furthermore, environmental exposures
   to chemicals occur via a variety of pathways (e.g., contact with
   wildflowers and other vegetation, water, soil, air, and bioaccumulation
   in the food chain), often with multiple exposure routes (e.g., oral and
   contact). Generally, beneficial insects such as honey bees are exposed
   to combinations of pesticide products when they contact pollen and
   nectar and other vegetation in the fields [57, 58].

   Combinations of active ingredients and other chemicals (the so-called
   “inerts”) in pesticide products have been measured in honey bees, hive
   wax, wildflowers, and pollen in the US and Europe [59–63]. From these
   and other studies it has been shown that mixtures of neonicotinoids in
   combination with a broad range of other pesticide active ingredients
   and other chemicals have been reported in bees, beehive matrices
   (pollen, nectar, honey, wax), and food sources, in some cases with as
   many as 121 to 150 different chemicals. There is also growing evidence
   that mixtures of chemicals such as insecticides, interactions of bee
   pathogens and parasites, and combinations of these stressors can
   interact together in additive or in a synergistic manner to increase
   morbidity and mortality in bees [63–74].

   Generally, the outcome of mixing chemicals and/or biological agents
   together is nearly impossible to predict with the limitations in
   capability and throughput of the currently available toxicity testing
   methods. The lack of information and knowledge about the behavior and
   toxicity of chemical mixtures in biological systems is important to
   acknowledge, as is the specific impact of these synergistic
   relationships to overall bee and colony health as well as other
   beneficial insects and non-target species. The AITL assessment
   presented here is based on the chemical and toxicological properties of
   individual chemical active ingredients and does not account for
   chemical mixtures. Therefore, any interactions of chemicals in a
   mixture, beyond perhaps simple additivity, would be underrepresented in
   our estimates.

Conclusions

   Based on our analysis of the Acute Insecticide Toxicity Loading (AITL)
   of pesticides applied to US agricultural lands and surrounding areas
   from 1992 through 2014, using honey bees as an indicator species to
   assess toxicity to a wide range of terrestrial insects, we conclude:
    1. The toxicity loading of insecticides on agricultural land and
       surrounding areas has increased by approximately 50-fold over the
       last two decades producing both direct and indirect effects on
       associated ecosystems. Although current-use pesticides are applied
       at lower application rates per acre, they are more toxic to insects
       and persist in the environment for up to several weeks or longer,
       thus creating a persistent toxicity load in plants, soils, and
       surface waters that is substantially higher than that experienced
       by insects 20 or more years ago.
    2. The neonicotinoid insecticides, in particular imidacloprid,
       clothianidin, and thiamethoxam, are primarily responsible for this
       increased toxicity loading, accounting for 61percent (via contact
       toxicity) to 99 percent (via oral toxicity) of the total toxicity
       loading of all insecticides in 2014. Oral exposures appear to be of
       greater concern because of the relatively higher toxicity (i.e. low
       LD[50]s) and greater likelihood for exposure from residues in
       pollen, nectar, guttation water, and other environmental media.
       However, because the AITL does not incorporate quantified
       exposures, a statistical comparison of toxicity loading via
       different exposures routes is beyond the scope of this paper.
    3. The crops most responsible for the increase in AITL are corn and
       soybeans, with particularly large increases in relative soybean
       contributions to AITL between 2010 and 2014.
    4. The total oral AITL of all insecticides applied over the 23-year
       period is an order of magnitude greater than the total contact
       AITL.
    5. This increase in toxicity loading is consistent with the reduction
       in beneficial insect and insectivorous bird populations observed in
       recent years. However, a more refined analysis of risk, including
       quantified exposures and factoring of application methods would be
       required to demonstrate a clear association.
    6. The introduction and increased use of the neonicotinoids in the
       late 1990s appears to be an example, in hindsight, of a regrettable
       substitution that might have been avoided had proper predictive
       analytical tools been available and applied prior to the approval
       of the registration of these pesticide products.
    7. FIFRA mandates that an applicant for the registration (licensing)
       of a new pesticide product must show that the use of a pesticide as
       specified “will not generally cause unreasonable adverse effects on
       the environment” [75]. Based on our screening level analysis of
       toxicity loading of insecticides on US agricultural land and
       surrounding areas, it is our scientific opinion that existing
       regulations for the registration of new pesticide active
       ingredients in the US are not yet adequate to effectively prevent
       the introduction of new chemicals that are detrimental to
       beneficial insect species such as the pollinators and other
       non-target species.
    8. Using methodology such as the AITL screening analysis early in the
       registration process of new active ingredients or in approving new
       agricultural uses would provide useful metrics with which to
       predict catastrophic harm to the environment resulting from the
       application of chemical pesticides on agricultural land. Expansion
       of the testing requirement to include sublethal toxicity testing in
       honey bees (or other surrogate arthropods) would provide a more
       refined estimate of the true risk of the introduction of new
       pesticide chemicals. Furthermore, implementation of a comprehensive
       surveillance and use reporting system for pesticides that have the
       potential to disrupt the ecosystems on agricultural lands and
       surrounding areas, including pesticide use as seed coatings would
       additionally enhance regulators’ abilities to assess and prevent
       potential adverse effects before ecosystems are damaged.

Supporting information

S1 Appendix. Environmental half-lives and LD50 values used in AITL
assessment.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.s001

   (PDF)

S2 Appendix. Representative lowest observed effect concentrations (LOEC) for
neonicotinoid sublethal toxicity in honey bees.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0220029.s002

   (PDF)

Acknowledgments

   We thank Lisa Archer, Tiffany Finck-Haynes, Aimee Code, and Jennifer
   Sass for their valuable consultation and timely review of the
   manuscript.

References

    1. 1. Lundgren JG, Fausti SW. Trading biodiversity for pest problems.
       Sci Adv. 2015;1(6):e1500558. Available from:
       https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/26601223. pmid:26601223
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    2. 2. Turnbull L, Hector A. Applied ecology: how to get even with
       pests. Nature 2010;466(7302):36–7. Available from:
       https://doi.org/10.5167/uzh-35625. pmid:20596003
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    3. 3. Gibbons D, Morrissey C, Mineau P. A review of the direct and
       indirect effects of neonicotinoids and fipronil on vertebrate
       wildlife. Environ Sci Pollut Res. 2015;22(1):103–18. Available
       from: https://link.springer.com/article/10.1007/s11356-014-3180-5.
       pmid:24938819
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    4. 4. Alkassab A, Kirchner W. Sublethal exposure to neonicotinoids and
       related side effects on insect pollinators: honeybees, bumblebees,
       and solitary bees. J Plant Dis Prot. 2017;124:1–30.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    5. 5. Baker N. Estimated annual agricultural pesticide use, pesticide
       use maps. USGS Pesticide National Synthesis Project. 2017;Sep 11.
       Available from:
       https://water.usgs.gov/nawqa/pnsp/usage/maps/compound_listing.php.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    6. 6. Baker N, Stone W. Estimated Annual Agricultural Pesticide Use
       for Counties of the Conterminous United States, 2008–12. US
       Geological Survey Data Series 907. 2015. Available from:
       http://pubs.usgs.gov/ds/0907/.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    7. 7. Stone W. Estimated annual agricultural pesticide use for
       counties of the conterminous United States, 1992–2009: 2013; U.S.
       Geological Survey Data Series 752. Available from:
       http://pubs.usgs.gov/ds/752/.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    8. 8. Dorsey J, Fekete G, Fong A, Harris J. Measuring the impact of
       the food quality protection act: challenges and opportunities.
       Evaluation report. Office of Inspector General. August 1, 2006.
       Report No. 2006-P-00028. Available from:
       https://www.epa.gov/sites/production/files/2015-11/…/20060801-2006-
       p-00028.pdf.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    9. 9. CDPR. 2015 Status report, Pesticide Contamination Prevention
       Act. California Environmental Protection Agency, Department of
       Pesticide Regulation, Environmental Monitoring Branch, Sacramento,
       California. Available from:
       http://www.cdpr.ca.gov/docs/emon/pubs/ehapreps.htm?filter=grndwater
       .
   10. 10. Lewis K, Tzilivakis J, Warner D, Green A. An international
       database for pesticide risk assessments and management. Human and
       Ecological Risk Assessment: An International Journal. 2016;22
       (4):1050–64.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   11. 11. Moffat C, Buckland ST, Samson AJ, McArthur R, Chamosa Pino V,
       Bollan KA, et al. Neonicotinoids target distinct nicotinic
       acetylcholine receptors and neurons, leading to differential risks
       to bumblebees. Sci Rep. 2016;6:24764. pmid:27124107
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   12. 12. Bonmatin JM, Giorio C, Girolami V, Goulson D, Kreutzweiser DP,
       Krupke C, et al. Environmental fate and exposure; neonicotinoids
       and fipronil. Environ Sci Pollut Res Int. 2015;22(1):35–67.
       pmid:25096486
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   13. 13. Kaplan M, Karaoglu O, Eroglu N, Silici S. Fatty Acid and
       Proximate Composition of Bee Bread. Food Technol Biotechnol.
       2016;54(4):497–504. pmid:28115909
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   14. 14. Hallmann C, Foppen R, van Turnhout C, de Kroon H, Jongejans E.
       Declines in insectivorous birds are associated with high
       neonicotinoid concentrations. Nature. 2014;511:341–3. pmid:25030173
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   15. 15. Millot F, Decors A, Mastain O, Quintaine T, Berny P, Vey D, et
       al. Field evidence of bird poisonings by imidacloprid-treated
       seeds: a review of incidents reported by the French SAGIR network
       from 1995 to 2014. Environ Sci Pollut Res Int. 2017;24(6):5469–85.
       pmid:28028702
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   16. 16. Hladik M, Kolpin D, Kuivila K. Widespread occurrence of
       neonicotinoid insecticides in streams in a high corn and soybean
       producing region, USA. Environ Pollut. 2014;193:189–96.
       pmid:25042208
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   17. 17. Morrissey C, Mineau P, Devries J, Sanchez-Bayo F, Liess M,
       Cavallaro M, et al. Neonicotinoid contamination of global surface
       waters and associated risk to aquatic invertebrates: A review.
       Environ Int. 2015;74:291–303. pmid:25454246
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   18. 18. Seagraves M, Lundgren J. Effects of neonicotinoid seed
       treatments on soybean aphid and its natural enemies. J Pest Sci.
       2011;85:125–32.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   19. 19. Costamagna A, Landis D. Predators exert top-down control of
       soybean aphid across a gradient of agricultural management systems.
       Ecol Appl. 2006;16:1619–28. pmid:16937822
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   20. 20. Hopwood J, Black S, Vaughan M, Lee-Mader E. Beyond the birds
       and the bees: Effects of neonicotinoid insecticides on
       agriculturally important beneficial invertebrates. The Xerces
       Society for Invertebrate Conservation. 2013. Available from:
       http://www.xerces.org/beyond-the-birds-and-the-bees/.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   21. 21. Douglas M, Rohr J, JF T. Neonicotinoid insecticide travels
       through a soil food chain, disrupting biological control of
       non-target pests and decreasing soya bean yield. J Appl Ecol.
       2015;52:250–60.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   22. 22. USDA. 2012 census of agriculture, United States summary and
       state data. United States Department of Agriculture. 2014; May.
       Available from: https://www.agcensus.usda.gov/Publications/2012/.
   23. 23. Arena M, Sgolastra F. A meta-analysis comparing the sensitivity
       of bees to pesticides. Ecotoxicology. 2014;23(3):324–34.
       pmid:24435220
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   24. 24. Heard MS, Baas J, Dorne JL, Lahive E, Robinson AG, Rortais A,
       et al. Comparative toxicity of pesticides and environmental
       contaminants in bees: Are honey bees a useful proxy for wild bee
       species? Sci Total Environ. 2017;578:357–65. pmid:27847190
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   25. 25. Sanchez-Bayo F, Goka K. Pesticide residues and bees—a risk
       assessment. PLoS One. 2014;9(4):e94482. pmid:24718419
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   26. 26. US EPA. Pesticide Registration Manual. Available from:
       https://www.epa.gov/pesticide-registration/pesticide-registration-m
       anual. Accessed May 23, 2018. In: Agency UEP, editor.
   27. 27. Goulson D, Thompson J, Croombs A. Rapid rise in toxic load for
       bees revealed by analysis of pesticide use in Great Britain. PeerJ.
       2018;6:e5255. pmid:30038870; PubMed Central PMCID: PMC6054864.
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   28. 28. US EPA. Fact sheet: clothianidin. US Environmental Protection
       Agency. EPA Publication 7501C. Available from:
       https://www3.epa.gov/pesticides/chem_search/reg_actions/registratio
       n/fs_PC-044309_30-May-03.pdf.
   29. 29. Byrne FJ, Visscher PK, Leimkuehler B, Fischer D,
       Grafton-Cardwell EE, Morse JG. Determination of exposure levels of
       honey bees foraging on flowers of mature citrus trees previously
       treated with imidacloprid. Pest Manag Sci. 2014;70(3):470–82.
       pmid:23788449
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   30. 30. Hopwood J, Code A, Vaughan M, Biddinger D, Shepherd M, Black S,
       et al. How neonicotinoids can kill bees: The science behind the
       role these insecticides play in harming bees. Second edition
       revised and expanded. The Xerces Society for Invertebrate
       Conservation. Available from:
       https://xerces.org/neonicotinoids-and-bees/. 2016.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   31. 31. Gustafson D, Bradshaw-Pierce E. Fundamental Concepts in
       Clinical Pharmacology. Principles of Anticancer Drug Development:
       Cancer Drug Discovery and Development. Springer, New York, NY2011.
   32. 32. US Government Publishing Office. Federal Register. Available
       from:
       https://wwwfederalregistergov/agencies/government-publishing-office
       .
   33. 33. Douglas M, Tooker J. Large-scale deployment of seed treatments
       has driven rapid increase in use of neonicotinoid insecticides and
       preemptive pest management in U.S. field crops. Environ Sci Technol
       2015;49(8):5088–97. pmid:25793443
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   34. 34. Gaspar AP, Marburger DA, Mourtzinis S, Conley SP. Soybean seed
       yield response to multiple seed treatment components across diverse
       environments. Agron J 2014;106(6):1955–62.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   35. 35. European Union. Thiamethoxam Product-type 18 (Insecticides,
       acaricides and products to control other arthropods) assessment
       report. Directive 98/8/EC concerning the placing biocidal products
       on the market. September 21, 2012. Available from:
       https://circabc.europa.eu/sd/a/94c7a2fe-e407-411e-94cb-eadbb3823cd1
       /CA-Sept12-Doc%203%208a%20-%20AR%20Thiamethoxam%20PT18%20post%20SCB
       .pdf.
   36. 36. US EPA. Registration Review—Problem Formulation for the
       Ecological Risk and Drinking Water Exposure Assessments for
       Tebupirimphos 2009; 2009;Apr 22. (PC Code 129086); D360013. Docket
       # EPA-HQ-OPP-2008-0940-0005. Available from:
       https://www.regulations.gov/document?D=EPA-HQ-OPP-2008-0940-0005.
   37. 37. University of Hertfordshire. The Pesticide Properties Data Base
       (PPDB). Developed by the Agriculture and Environment Research Unit,
       University of Hertfordshire. Version 2017; Nov 30. Available from:
       http://sitem.herts.ac.uk/aeru/ppdb/en/index.htm.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   38. 38. US EPA. Guidance to Calculate Representative Half-life Values
       and Characterizing Pesticide Degradation. Available from:
       https://www.epa.gov/pesticide-science-and-assessing-pesticide-risks
       /guidance-calculate-representative-half-life-values. 2015.
   39. 39. Kurwadkar S, Evans A, DeWinne D, White P, Mitchell F. Modeling
       photodegradation kinetics of three systemic
       neonicotinoids-dinotefuran, imidacloprid, and thiamethoxam-in
       aqueous and soil environment. Environ Toxicol Chem.
       2016;35(7):1718–26. pmid:26660507
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   40. 40. Li Y, Li Y, Liu Y, Ward TJ. Photodegradation of clothianidin
       and thiamethoxam in agricultural soils. Environ Sci Pollut Res Int.
       2018;25(31):31318–25. pmid:30194578
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   41. 41. Mineau P, Callaghan C. Neonicotinoid insecticides and bats: an
       assessment of the direct and indirect risks. Canadian Wildlife
       Federation. Available from:
       http://cwf-fcf.org/assets/reports/1809-014-Bats-and-Neonics-Report-
       high_rez.pdf?src=bats. 2018.
   42. 42. US EPA. Fipronil; Product Cancellation Order and Amendment to
       Terminate Uses. Federal Register, Volume 75 (No. 22), Wednesday,
       February 3, 2010, Page 5584. Available from:
       https://www.federalregister.gov/documents/2010/02/03/2010-2147/fipr
       onil-product-cancellation-order-and-amendment-to-terminate-uses.
   43. 43. Goulson D, Nicholls E, Botias C, Rotheray EL. Bee declines
       driven by combined stress from parasites, pesticides, and lack of
       flowers. Science. 2015;347(6229):1255957. pmid:25721506
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   44. 44. Aizen MA, Garibaldi LA, Cunningham SA, Klein AM. How much does
       agriculture depend on pollinators? Lessons from long-term trends in
       crop production. Ann Bot. 2009;103(9):1579–88. pmid:19339297
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   45. 45. Le Conte Y, Navajas . Climate change: Impact on honey bee
       populations and diseases. 2008; 27(2):485–97. pmid:18819674
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   46. 46. NPIC. Imidacloprid Technical Fact Sheet. National Pesticide
       Information Center. Available from:
       http://npic.orst.edu/factsheets/archive/imidacloprid.html 2011.
   47. 47. Federal Register. Imidacloprid; tolerances for residues.
       Volume: 26, Title: 40. Section 180.472. Code of Federal
       Regulations. Available from:
       https://www.govinfo.gov/content/pkg/CFR-2018-title40-vol26/xml/CFR-
       2018-title40-vol26-sec180-472.xml. 2018.
   48. 48. US EPA. Process for Requiring Exposure and Effects Testing for
       Assessing Risks to Bees during Registration and Registration Review
       US EPA Office of Pesticide Programs, 2016. Available fom:
       https://www.epa.gov/sites/production/files/2016-08/documents/bee_gu
       idance.pdf.
   49. 49. Wood TJ, Goulson D. The environmental risks of neonicotinoid
       pesticides: a review of the evidence post 2013. Environ Sci Pollut
       Res Int. 2017;24(21):17285–325. pmid:28593544
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   50. 50. Mogren CL, Lundgren JG. Neonicotinoid-contaminated pollinator
       strips adjacent to cropland reduce honey bee nutritional status.
       Sci Rep. 2016;6:29608. pmid:27412495
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   51. 51. Samson-Robert O, Labrie G, Chagnon M, Fournier V.
       Neonicotinoid-contaminated puddles of water represent a risk of
       intoxication for honey bees. PLoS One. 2014;9(12):e108443.
       pmid:25438051
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   52. 52. Nuyttens D, Devarrewaere W, Verboven P, Foque D.
       Pesticide-laden dust emission and drift from treated seeds during
       seed drilling: a review. Pest Manag Sci. 2013;69(5):564–75.
       pmid:23456984
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   53. 53. Van Dijk TC, Van Staalduinen MA, Van der Sluijs JP.
       Macro-invertebrate decline in surface water polluted with
       imidacloprid. PLoS One. 2013;8(5):e62374. pmid:23650513
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   54. 54. Krupke C, Hunt G, Eitzer B, Andino G, Given K. Multiple routes
       of pesticide exposure for honey bees living near agricultural
       fields. PLoS ONE. 2012;7(1):e29268. pmid:22235278
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   55. 55. Stewart SD, Lorenz GM, Catchot AL, Gore J, Cook D, Skinner J,
       et al. Potential exposure of pollinators to neonicotinoid
       insecticides from the use of insecticide seed treatments in the
       mid-southern United States. Environ Sci Technol.
       2014;48(16):9762–9. pmid:25010122
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   56. 56. Main AR, Headley JV, Peru KM, Michel NL, Cessna AJ, Morrissey
       CA. Widespread use and frequent detection of neonicotinoid
       insecticides in wetlands of Canada's Prairie Pothole Region. PLoS
       One. 2014;9(3):e92821. pmid:24671127
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   57. 57. Long EY, Krupke CH. Non-cultivated plants present a season-long
       route of pesticide exposure for honey bees. Nat Commun.
       2016;7:11629. pmid:27240870
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   58. 58. Johnson RM, Ellis MD, Mullin CA, Frazier M. Pesticides and
       Honey Bee Toxicity in the United States.: CRC Press-Taylor &
       Francis Group, Boca Raton.; 2012.
   59. 59. Mullin CA, Frazier M, Frazier JL, Ashcraft S, Simonds R,
       Vanengelsdorp D, et al. High levels of miticides and agrochemicals
       in North American apiaries: implications for honey bee health. PLoS
       One. 2010;5(3):e9754. pmid:20333298
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   60. 60. Lambert O, Piroux M, Puyo S, Thorin C, L'Hostis M, Wiest L, et
       al. Widespread occurrence of chemical residues in beehive matrices
       from apiaries located in different landscapes of Western France.
       PLoS One. 2013;8(6):e67007. pmid:23799139
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   61. 61. David A, Botias C, Abdul-Sada A, Nicholls E, Rotheray EL, Hill
       EM, et al. Widespread contamination of wildflower and bee-collected
       pollen with complex mixtures of neonicotinoids and fungicides
       commonly applied to crops. Environ Int. 2016;88:169–78.
       pmid:26760714
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   62. 62. Mullin CA, Chen J, Fine JD, Frazier MT, Frazier JL. The
       formulation makes the honey bee poison. Pestic Biochem Physiol.
       2015;120:27–35. pmid:25987217
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   63. 63. Zhu YC, Yao J, Adamczyk J, Luttrell R. Feeding toxicity and
       impact of imidacloprid formulation and mixtures with six
       representative pesticides at residue concentrations on honey bee
       physiology (Apis mellifera). PLoS One. 2017;12(6):e0178421.
       pmid:28591204
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   64. 64. Zhu W, Schmehl DR, Mullin CA, Frazier JL. Four common
       pesticides, their mixtures and a formulation solvent in the hive
       environment have high oral toxicity to honey bee larvae. PLoS One.
       2014;9(1):e77547. pmid:24416121
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   65. 65. Zhu YC, Yao J, Adamczyk J, Luttrell R. Synergistic toxicity and
       physiological impact of imidacloprid alone and binary mixtures with
       seven representative pesticides on honey bee (Apis mellifera). PLoS
       One. 2017;12(5):e0176837. pmid:28467462
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   66. 66. Johnson RM, Dahlgren L, Siegfried BD, Ellis MD. Acaricide,
       fungicide and drug interactions in honey bees (Apis mellifera).
       PLoS One. 2013;8(1):e54092. pmid:23382869
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   67. 67. Alaux C, Brunet JL, Dussaubat C, Mondet F, Tchamitchan S,
       Cousin M, et al. Interactions between Nosema microspores and a
       neonicotinoid weaken honeybees (Apis mellifera). Environ Microbiol.
       2010;12(3):774–82. pmid:20050872
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   68. 68. Vidau C, Diogon M, Aufauvre J, Fontbonne R, Vigues B, Brunet
       JL, et al. Exposure to sublethal doses of fipronil and thiacloprid
       highly increases mortality of honeybees previously infected by
       Nosema ceranae. PLoS One. 2011;6(6):e21550. pmid:21738706
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   69. 69. Aufauvre J, Biron DG, Vidau C, Fontbonne R, Roudel M, Diogon M,
       et al. Parasite-insecticide interactions: a case study of Nosema
       ceranae and fipronil synergy on honeybee. Sci Rep. 2012;2:326.
       pmid:22442753
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   70. 70. Doublet V, Labarussias M, de Miranda JR, Moritz RF, Paxton RJ.
       Bees under stress: sublethal doses of a neonicotinoid pesticide and
       pathogens interact to elevate honey bee mortality across the life
       cycle. Environ Microbiol. 2015;17(4):969–83. pmid:25611325
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   71. 71. Lopez JH, Krainer S, Engert A, Schuehly W, Riessberger-Galle U,
       Crailsheim K. Sublethal pesticide doses negatively affect survival
       and the cellular responses in American foulbrood-infected honeybee
       larvae. Sci Rep. 2017;7:40853. pmid:28145462
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   72. 72. Gill RJ, Ramos-Rodriguez O, Raine NE. Combined pesticide
       exposure severely affects individual- and colony-level traits in
       bees. Nature. 2012;491(7422):105–8. pmid:23086150
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   73. 73. Raimets R, Karise R, Mand M, Kaart T, Ponting S, Song J, et al.
       Synergistic interactions between a variety of insecticides and an
       ergosterol biosynthesis inhibitor fungicide in dietary exposures of
       bumble bees (Bombus terrestris L.). Pest Manag Sci.
       2018;74(3):541–6. pmid:28991419
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   74. 74. Pettis JS, Lichtenberg EM, Andree M, Stitzinger J, Rose R,
       Vanengelsdorp D. Crop pollination exposes honey bees to pesticides
       which alters their susceptibility to the gut pathogen Nosema
       ceranae. PLoS One. 2013;8(7):e70182. pmid:23894612
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   75. 75. US EPA. Summary of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and
       Rodenticide Act. US Environmental Protection Agency. Available
       from:
       https://www.epa.gov/laws-regulations/summary-federal-insecticide-fu
       ngicide-and-rodenticide-act.

   Download PDF

     * Citation
     * XML

   Print
     * Print article
     * EzReprint

   Share
     * Reddit Reddit
     * Google+ Google+
     * Facebook Facebook
     * LinkedIn LinkedIn
     * Mendeley Mendeley
     * PubChase PubChase
     * Twitter Twitter
     * Email Email

     [CROSSMARK_BW_horizontal.svg]
   Advertisement

Subject Areas

   ?

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.
   We want your feedback. Do these Subject Areas make sense for this
   article? Click the target next to the incorrect Subject Area and let us
   know. Thanks for your help!
     * Toxicity
       Is the Subject Area "Toxicity" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Insecticides
       Is the Subject Area "Insecticides" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Pesticides
       Is the Subject Area "Pesticides" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Honey bees
       Is the Subject Area "Honey bees" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Insect pests
       Is the Subject Area "Insect pests" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Agricultural land
       Is the Subject Area "Agricultural land" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Crops
       Is the Subject Area "Crops" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Oral administration
       Is the Subject Area "Oral administration" applicable to this
       article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.

Archived Tweets

   Load more
   View all tweets

     * Publications
     * PLOS Biology
     * PLOS Medicine
     * PLOS Computational Biology
     * PLOS Genetics
     * PLOS Pathogens
     * PLOS ONE
     * PLOS Neglected Tropical Diseases

     * Home
     * Blogs
     * Collections
     * Give feedback
     * LOCKSS

     * Privacy Policy
     * Terms of Use
     * Advertise
     * Media Inquiries
     * Contact

   PLOS is a nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation, #C2354500, based in San
   Francisco, California, US
   PLOS
   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TP26BH

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MQQMGF

   Advertisement

     * plos.org
     * create account
     * sign in

PLOS ONE

     * Publish
          + Submissions
               o Getting Started
               o Submission Guidelines
               o Figures
               o Tables
               o Supporting Information
               o LaTeX
               o Preprints
               o Revising Your Manuscript
               o Submit Now
               o Calls for Papers
          + Policies
               o Best Practices in Research Reporting
               o Human Subjects Research
               o Animal Research
               o Competing Interests
               o Disclosure of Funding Sources
               o Licenses and Copyright
               o Data Availability
               o Materials and Software Sharing
               o Ethical Publishing Practice
               o Authorship
               o Downloads and Translations
          + Manuscript Review and Publication
               o Criteria for Publication
               o Editorial and Peer Review Process
               o Editor Center
               o Guidelines for Reviewers
               o Accepted Manuscripts
               o Corrections and Retractions
               o Comments
               o Article-Level Metrics

Submit Your Manuscript
       Discover a faster, simpler path to publishing in a high-quality
       journal. PLOS ONE promises fair, rigorous peer review, broad scope,
       and wide readership – a perfect fit for your research every time.
       Learn More Submit Now
     * About
          + Why Publish with PLOS ONE
          + Journal Information
          + Staff Editors
          + Editorial Board
          + Section Editors
          + Advisory Groups
          + Find and Read Articles
          + Publishing Information
          + Publication Fees
          + Press and Media
          + Contact
     * Browse
     *

       Search

       Search
       ____________________ (BUTTON)

       advanced search

   Browse Subject Areas
   ?

   Click through the PLOS taxonomy to find articles in your field.

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.

     * Loading metrics

   Open Access

   Peer-reviewed

   Research Article

Butterfly abundance declines over 20 years of systematic monitoring in Ohio,
USA

     * Tyson Wepprich ,
       Roles Conceptualization, Formal analysis, Methodology,
       Visualization, Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       * E-mail: tyson.wepprich@oregonstate.edu
       Affiliation Department of Botany and Plant Pathology, Oregon State
       University, Corvallis, Oregon, United States of America
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0002-6875-092X
       ⨯
     * Jeffrey R. Adrion,
       Roles Formal analysis, Methodology, Writing – original draft,
       Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Institute of Ecology and Evolution, University of
       Oregon, Eugene, Oregon, United States of America
       ⨯
     * Leslie Ries,
       Roles Conceptualization, Data curation, Methodology, Writing –
       review & editing
       Affiliation Department of Biology, Georgetown University,
       Washington, D.C., United States of America
       ⨯
     * Jerome Wiedmann,
       Roles Data curation, Project administration, Writing – review &
       editing
       Affiliation The Ohio Lepidopterists, Columbus, Ohio, United States
       of America
       ⨯
     * Nick M. Haddad
       Roles Conceptualization, Methodology, Writing – original draft,
       Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Department of Integrative Biology and W.K. Kellogg
       Biological Station, Michigan State University, Hickory Corners,
       Michigan, United States of America
       ⨯

Butterfly abundance declines over 20 years of systematic monitoring in Ohio,
USA

     * Tyson Wepprich,
     * Jeffrey R. Adrion,
     * Leslie Ries,
     * Jerome Wiedmann,
     * Nick M. Haddad

   PLOS
   x
     * Published: July 9, 2019
     * https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270
     * >> See the preprint

     * Article
     * Authors
     * Metrics
     * Comments
     * Media Coverage

     * Reader Comments (0)
     * Media Coverage
     * Figures

Figures

   Fig 1
   Table 1
   Table 2
   Fig 2
   Fig 3
   Fig 4
   Table 3
   Fig 5

Abstract

   Severe insect declines make headlines, but they are rarely based on
   systematic monitoring outside of Europe. We estimate the rate of change
   in total butterfly abundance and the population trends for 81 species
   using 21 years of systematic monitoring in Ohio, USA. Total abundance
   is declining at 2% per year, resulting in a cumulative 33% reduction in
   butterfly abundance. Three times as many species have negative
   population trends compared to positive trends. The rate of total
   decline and the proportion of species in decline mirror those
   documented in three comparable long-term European monitoring programs.
   Multiple environmental changes such as climate change, habitat
   degradation, and agricultural practices may contribute to these
   declines in Ohio and shift the makeup of the butterfly community by
   benefiting some species over others. Our analysis of life-history
   traits associated with population trends shows an impact of climate
   change, as species with northern distributions and fewer annual
   generations declined more rapidly. However, even common and invasive
   species associated with human-dominated landscapes are declining,
   suggesting widespread environmental causes for these trends. Declines
   in common species, although they may not be close to extinction, will
   have an outsized impact on the ecosystem services provided by insects.
   These results from the most extensive, systematic insect monitoring
   program in North America demonstrate an ongoing defaunation in
   butterflies that on an annual scale might be imperceptible, but
   cumulatively has reduced butterfly numbers by a third over 20 years.

   Citation: Wepprich T, Adrion JR, Ries L, Wiedmann J, Haddad NM (2019)
   Butterfly abundance declines over 20 years of systematic monitoring in
   Ohio, USA. PLoS ONE 14(7): e0216270.
   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270

   Editor: Jake Kerby, University of South Dakota, UNITED STATES

   Received: April 16, 2019; Accepted: June 17, 2019; Published: July 9,
   2019

   Copyright: © 2019 Wepprich et al. This is an open access article
   distributed under the terms of the Creative Commons Attribution
   License, which permits unrestricted use, distribution, and reproduction
   in any medium, provided the original author and source are credited.

   Data Availability: Data and code to reproduce the analysis are
   available from Dryad (https://doi.org/10.5061/dryad.cf78420). Raw data
   from the monitoring program are available from the North American
   Butterfly Monitoring Network (www.thebutterflynetwork.org) upon
   request.

   Funding: The authors received no specific funding for this work.

   Competing interests: The authors have declared that no competing
   interests exist.

Introduction

   Defaunation, or the drastic loss of animal species and declines in
   abundance, threatens to destabilize ecosystem functioning globally [1].
   In comparison to studies of vertebrate populations, monitoring of
   changes in insect diversity is more difficult and far less prevalent
   [2,3]. Despite this, a global analysis of long-term population trends
   across 452 species estimated that insect abundance had declined 45%
   over 40 years [1]. Recently, more extreme declines in insect biomass
   have been observed upon resampling after 2–4 decades [4,5]. Losses of
   total biomass or total abundance across all species may be more
   consequential than local declines in species diversity, as common
   insect species contribute the most to ecosystem services, such as
   pollination [6]. However, our knowledge of insect declines is skewed
   towards European monitoring programs, including in global analyses [1].
   In this study, we analyze long-term, region-wide trends in abundance
   across a diversity of species for an entire insect group in North
   America to examine the scope of insect defaunation.

   The best source of data to assess insect defaunation comes from
   large-scale, systematic monitoring programs of multiple species [3].
   Through these efforts, trained volunteers or citizen scientists have
   contributed much of the evidence for biotic responses to anthropogenic
   climate warming such as changes in insect phenology and range
   distributions [7,8]. Unlike citizen science reporting of opportunistic
   observations or species checklists, many insect monitoring programs use
   a systematic protocol developed specifically to track butterfly
   abundances through time, both within and between seasons, and over
   large spatial scales [9]. Pollard-based monitoring programs, modeled
   after the first nationwide Butterfly Monitoring Scheme launched in the
   United Kingdom in 1977 (UKBMS), use weekly standardized counts on fixed
   transects [10]. Their widespread adoption enables regional comparisons
   of insect responses to environmental change or defaunation [11,12]. We
   compare our analysis with exemplary long-term monitoring schemes from
   Europe to test if the rate of insect declines generalizes across
   continents.

   The best source of abundance data for assessment of chronic insect
   decline, and the most prominent source of data in [1], is within the
   butterflies. Due to the relative ease and popularity of monitoring
   butterflies, environmental assessments use them as an indicator taxa
   for the general trajectory of biodiversity, assuming that they
   experience comparable pressures from land-use change, climate change,
   and habitat degradation as other insect taxa [13–15]. Intensive
   long-term monitoring of individual butterfly species has provided
   rigorous, quantitative estimates of declines. Most prominently, the
   Eastern North American Monarch has declined by over 85% [16] and the
   Western North American Monarch by over 95% [17] over the past two
   decades. Severe declines have also been observed in some of the rarest
   butterflies [18,19]. These data from individual species of conservation
   concern may not represent a broader trend across butterflies, which is
   what we aim to document in this study.

   Volunteers, organized and trained by The Ohio Lepidopterists, have
   assembled the most extensive dataset of systematic butterfly counts
   that stands alone in North America in terms of the spatial extent and
   sampling frequency of Pollard walks [9]. Three other monitoring
   programs in the United States have documented long-term, multi-species
   population trends. In Massachusetts, based on species lists from field
   trips, climate-driven community shifts explain how the relative
   likelihood of species observations change over 18 years [20]. Shapiro
   and colleagues have made biweekly presence/absence observations and
   Pollard-based counts on 11 fixed transects along an elevational
   gradient in California over more than 45 years to document species
   richness changes in response to climate and land-use, increasing
   abundance at a high elevation site, and impacts of agricultural
   practices on abundance at low elevation sites [21,22]. Several teams
   have monitored declines in specialist butterflies restricted to native
   prairie patches in the Midwestern states with transect or timed survey
   methods over 26 years [23,24]. The growing number of Pollard-based
   monitoring programs in the United States [9] has the potential to track
   how widespread and consistent butterfly trends are across regions.

   Here, we used 21 years of weekly butterfly surveys across 104 sites to
   assess abundance trends for butterflies in Ohio. We estimate population
   trends for 81 species and test for their association with life-history
   traits and phylogenetic relatedness. We review findings from European
   butterfly monitoring schemes for quantitative comparison with the rate
   of abundance changes in Ohio. This analysis provides evidence of
   widespread insect defaunation and species’ declines from the most
   extensive, systematic monitoring program in North America.

Materials and methods

Study sites

   We studied butterfly population trends across the state of Ohio in the
   Midwestern USA. Over its 116,100 km^2 land area, Ohio has a mosaic of
   habitat types due to its partially glaciated history and its place at
   the confluence of Midwestern prairies, the Appalachian Mountains, and
   the boreal forest [25]. Only remnants of wetland and prairie habitat
   remain in the state due to human modification of the landscape. Some
   rare butterflies have declined due to forest succession following
   suppression of disturbances [26]. Agriculture and pastures (50%),
   forest (30%), and urban development (10%) are the predominant
   land-use/land cover classes [27].

   Monitoring sites have a Northeast to Southwest gradient in their mean
   annual temperatures (mean 18.8°C, range from 14.0°C to 23.6°C) from
   interpolated daily temperatures from Daymet over 1996–2016 [28]. Mean
   annual temperatures at these sites grew at a linear trend of 0.3°C per
   decade and growing season length has increased by 60 degree-days (base
   5°C) per decade from 1980–2016. Monitoring sites span the state but are
   concentrated near cities (Fig 1). On average, within a radius of 2
   kilometers, monitoring sites have 24% cropland and pasture, 34% forest,
   and 30% urban land-use based on the National Land Cover Dataset [29].
   Although not considered in this study, impervious surfaces from urban
   development influence temperature-dependent butterfly phenology in Ohio
   through the urban heat island effect, which may not be fully captured
   in these gridded temperature interpolations [30].
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 1. Transect locations monitored by volunteers with the Ohio
   Lepidopterists.

   Of the 147 sites, this analysis used the 104 sites monitored for three
   or more years.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.g001

Monitoring surveys

   Trained volunteers contributed 24,405 butterfly surveys from 1996 to
   2016 as part of the Ohio Lepidopterists Long-term Monitoring of
   Butterflies program. Volunteers surveyed on fixed paths at
   approximately weekly intervals during the entire growing season from
   April through October (median 23 of 30 weeks surveyed per year per
   site) and count every species within an approximate 5-meter buffer
   around the observer [10]. Surveys are constrained to times of good
   weather to increase the detectability of butterflies and last a mean 85
   minutes in duration. The annual number of monitored sites ranged from
   13 in 1996 to a maximum of 80 in 2012. We limited our analysis of
   abundance trends to the 104 sites with three or more years of
   monitoring data and 10 or more surveys per year at each site (Fig 1).
   We included observations of all sites with at least 5 surveys per year
   in phenology models that we used to interpolate missing counts before
   estimating abundance [31].

   All 102 species with population indices estimated by phenology models
   contributed to the total abundance analysis. We limited
   species-specific analysis to 81 species with sufficient population
   indices for estimating trends (present at five or more sites and for 10
   or more years). Species naming conventions in the monitoring program
   follow those used in [25,32] except for combining all observations of
   Celastrina ladon (Spring Azure) and Celastrina neglecta (Summer Azure)
   as an unresolved species complex.

Population indices

   We estimated population indices for each site x year x species by
   adapting methods established for the UKBMS that account for missing
   surveys and butterfly phenology over the season [31,33]. We used
   generalized additive models for each species to estimate variation in
   counts in order to interpolate missing surveys with model predictions
   [31,34]. To account for seasonal, spatial, and interannual variation in
   species phenology, we extended the regional generalized additive model
   approach (12, Supplement 1) by including spatially-explicit site
   locations and converting calendar dates of observations to degree-days
   [35], which can improve butterfly phenology predictions [36]. We
   calculated the population index by integrating over the weekly counts
   and missing survey interpolations using the trapezoid method [31].

Controlling for confounding factors

   We accounted for differences in sampling across sites and years so that
   our modeled trends would capture changes in abundance rather than
   changes in detection probability [37]. True abundance is confounded
   with detection probability when using counts from Pollard walks [38].
   Butterfly monitoring protocols that account for detection probability
   like distance sampling are commonly used for single-species studies
   [39], but untenable for scaling up to a regional program. Most analyses
   of Pollard walks assume no systematic change in detectability (but see
   [40]) because counts correlate closely with true abundance estimates
   from distance sampling [41,42]. We used two covariates to account for
   variation in sampling and its influence on population indices for each
   site x year [20,37,43]. We tracked the mean number of species reported
   in each survey, or list-length, which is a synthetic measure of factors
   influencing detectability such as weather conditions, site quality, and
   observer effort [20,44,45]. We treated the total duration of surveys in
   minutes as an offset in the models of population trends. Because we
   interpolated missing surveys for the population indices, we projected
   what the total duration would be if all 30 weeks had been surveyed at
   the mean duration reported for that site x year.

   Sampling across the state is nonrandom because participants choose
   transect locations, a common practice in volunteer-based monitoring
   programs. Since sites generally cluster near human population centers
   with a greater proportion of developed land-use and a lesser proportion
   of agriculture, we assumed that population trends at the 104 sites
   across the state sufficiently capture the broader statewide trends
   [37]. Comparisons between the UKBMS volunteer-placed transects and a
   broader survey with stratified, random sampling show congruence between
   species trends estimated from each monitoring strategy [46].

Population trends

   We used generalized linear mixed models to estimate temporal trends in
   relative abundance for 81 species from their population indices [47].
   We modeled population indices at each site and year as an
   over-dispersed Poisson random variable with covariates on the log-link
   scale. [journal.pone.0216270.e001] (1)

   We included the numeric year and mean list length for each population
   index as covariates, which were centered to aid in model fitting and
   interpretation [48]. We used the coefficient for year (β[2]) as the
   annual trend in population indices as our main result. We controlled
   for changes in sampling by using the total duration of surveys as a
   model offset, converting the dependent variable to a rate of
   butterflies counted per minute. Random effects of individual sites and
   years account for spatial and temporal variation in population counts
   deviating from the statewide trend. We accounted for over-dispersion in
   the Poisson-distributed counts with the random effect siteyearID for
   each unique observation [49]. We modeled trends in total abundance
   using the same modeling approach, but summed across 102 species’
   population indices for each site x year observation. We interpreted
   trends as an annual rate by taking the geometric mean rate of change
   between the predicted abundance between two points in time after
   setting the list-length covariate to its mean and excluding the random
   effects [47]. For comparisons with other monitoring programs, we used a
   p-value threshold of 0.05 to classify trends as positive, negative, or
   stable.

   Our approach is similar to that used by the UKBMS and other European
   monitoring programs which use generalized linear models in TRIM
   software [50]. One key difference is that our site and annual
   fluctuations from the temporal trend were derived from random effects
   rather than fixed effects, which reduces spurious detection of trends
   [43]. Another key difference is that TRIM does not allow for continuous
   covariates, which we used to account for sampling variation instead of
   assuming no confounding pattern in sampling effort. To validate that
   our modeling choices did not unreasonably influence the results, we
   used three alternative approaches: (1) a Poisson-based generalized
   linear model (Eq 1 without the random effect siteyearID); (2) a
   nonlinear generalized additive mixed model with a smoothing spline
   replacing the linear temporal trend [43]; and (3) a TRIM model with
   over-dispersion and serial temporal correlation but no sampling
   covariates or offsets [50]. We compared similarity in the total
   abundance trends, the correlation of species’ trends between model
   alternatives, and the classification of species’ trends as positive,
   stable, or negative.

Comparison with other studies

   We compare our findings to three European long-term, regional butterfly
   monitoring programs with systematic Pollard walks that publish regular
   updates on total abundance and species’ trends [40,51,52]. Although all
   programs analyzed counts with Poisson regression, we had to standardize
   them differently depending on the data available and their modeling
   approaches. The UKBMS reports total abundance indicators as the
   geometric mean of species trends from two groups: specialist and
   countryside species [51]. We used the reported smoothed annual index
   values for these indicators because the first year of monitoring is an
   outlier that exaggerates declines (UK Biodiversity Indicators 2018,
   http://jncc.defra.gov.uk/page-4236). We used the Dutch Butterfly
   Monitoring Scheme’s reported cumulative annual trend in total
   butterflies counted across all transects after correction for missing
   surveys [52]. For the Catalan Butterfly Monitoring Scheme, we extracted
   annual population indices from the 2015–2016 annual report [53] with
   WebPlotDigitizer 4.1 [54] and performed a Poisson regression over time
   with annual random effects to obtain a comparable abundance trend. We
   converted total abundance trends into annual percent rates for
   comparison. We tallied the increases and decreases in species’ trends
   for each region reported by the monitoring program, without accounting
   for differences in their statistical approaches.

Species’ traits

   To explore potential mechanisms that might explain species-level
   variation in abundance trends, we modeled the estimates of species’
   temporal trends (β[1]) as a response to life history traits [20,30]. Of
   the 81 species, we classified 14 as migratory species and 67 as
   year-round residents of Ohio. We analyzed traits models both across all
   species and after excluding migratory species, which would have
   population trends driven by factors outside of Ohio. We collected
   traits that relate to insect responses to climate change and habitat
   change, as these are two primary drivers of butterfly community changes
   [7,20,21].

   We tested if butterflies with traits making them more adaptive to a
   warming climate have more positive population trends. We compared
   species with different range distributions, assuming that species
   distributed in warmer, Southern regions would be more likely to
   increase in Ohio as the climate warms. We assigned species’ ranges as
   Southern, core, or Northern by range maps and county records [25,32].
   Voltinism, or the number of generations per year, increases in warmer
   years and warmer regions within many species in Ohio [55], compared
   with obligate univoltine species that do not adjust their lifecycle
   based on changing growing season length. We assigned voltinism observed
   in Ohio as univoltine, bivoltine, or multivoltine (3+ generations per
   year) based on visualization of phenology models and [25]. The life
   stage in which species overwinter, obtained from [25], contributes to
   its ability to respond to warming with shifts in phenology [20,56].

   We would expect more generalist species, in host plant requirements and
   habitat preferences, to have more positive population trends in a
   landscape heavily modified by human use [21,51]. For host plant
   requirements, we gathered two traits from the literature that describe
   host plant category (forb, graminoid, or woody) and whether the
   butterfly’s host plant requirements span multiple plant families or are
   limited to one plant family or genus [25]. Mean wing size from [32] was
   used as a surrogate of dispersal ability between habitats, which is
   expected to increase ability to access resources in a fragmented
   landscape. Three of the authors assigned species as wetland-dependent
   or human-disturbance tolerant species, which we aggregated into two
   binary variables to test if these specialist or generalist habitat
   preferences correlate with abundance trends.

   We used univariate linear models for each life history trait both for
   all 81 species and with the 14 migratory species excluded. To account
   for the phylogenetic relatedness and the non-independence across
   species, we also used phylogenetic generalized least squares models
   that estimated branch length transformations with Pagel’s lambda by
   maximum likelihood [57]. The phylogenetic models excluded three species
   without gene sequences available.

Phylogenetic tree

   We obtained coding sequences for the most widely used DNA barcoding
   locus, the mitochondrial cytochrome c oxidase subunit I gene COI-5P,
   from GenBank [58]. For species not found in GenBank, we obtained coding
   sequences from The Barcode of Life Data System [59]. When possible, we
   obtained sequences from multiple sampling locations in North America.

   Owing to the relatively small size of our multiple-species
   alignment—i.e. a single mtDNA locus, 651 base pairs in length—we
   decided to take both a constrained and unconstrained maximum likelihood
   approach to estimate the genealogical relationships of our samples.
   Some of the species from our analysis, though not all, were recently
   used in a more comprehensive phylogenetic analysis of butterflies [60],
   thus prompting us to constrain the phylogenetic backbone of our tree
   using family-level relationships. We report details of our workflow in
   Supplement 1.

Statistical analysis

   We used R 3.5.2 for analysis [61] and share the data and our code on
   Dryad. We fit generalized additive models with the mgcv package [34],
   generalized linear mixed models with the lme4 package [62], generalized
   additive mixed models with the poptrend package [43], and phylogenetic
   generalized least squares models with the ape and caper packages
   [63,64]. Confidence intervals for the temporal trends were estimated
   with bootstrapped model fits with the merTools and poptrend packages
   [43,65]. For models of population trends, we estimated the goodness of
   fit with R^2 developed for generalized linear mixed models that give
   marginal and conditional R^2 values for the fixed effects and the fixed
   + random effects, respectively [66,67]. For trait models, we reported
   the adjusted R^2 values from the univariate models.

Results

   The statewide relative abundance summed across all species declined at
   an annual rate of 2.0% (β[1] = -0.020, std. err. 0.005, p < 0.001),
   accumulating a 33% decline over 1996–2016 (Table 1, Fig 2). Among
   population trends, more than three times as many species are declining
   than increasing in abundance at our threshold of p < 0.05 (32 versus 9,
   respectively) (Table 2, Fig 3 for migratory species and Fig 4 for
   resident species). Positive and negative species trends are distributed
   across the phylogenetic tree (Figure A in S1 Appendix).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 1. Generalized linear mixed model of total abundance across all
   species.

   The natural logarithm of the total survey duration across the
   monitoring season was an offset in the model. The model’s marginal R^2
   was 0.20 for its fixed effects and its conditional R^2 was 0.61 when
   including variation in sites, years, and over-dispersion with random
   effects parameters.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.t001
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 2. Species’ abundance trends over time.

   Trends are the coefficient of year in our generalized linear mixed
   models with the accompanying standard error and p-value for the
   coefficient (Eq 1). We show the data available for each species’ model:
   total number of butterflies recorded for all years, number of sites,
   number of years, and the number of population indices calculated for
   each species for use in abundance model (Site x year).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.t002
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 2. The statewide relative abundance of butterflies (all species
   aggregated) in Ohio declined by 33% over 1996–2016.

   Plotted are model predictions for each year based on the fixed effects
   of year (solid line) and annual random effects (dots) to show annual
   variation about the trend line. Shading shows the 95% confidence
   interval based on bootstrapped model fits for the temporal trend.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.g002
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 3. Statewide trends of 14 migratory species with annual variation.

   Plotted are model predictions for each year based on the fixed effects
   of year (solid line) and annual random effects (dots) to show annual
   variation about the trend line. Shading shows 95% confidence intervals
   based on bootstrapped model fits in the poptrend package [43] for the
   temporal trend and for the annual random effects. The first year’s
   estimate is set to a value of 1 as a baseline for relative population
   changes.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.g003
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 4. Statewide trends of 67 resident species with annual variation.

   Plotted are model predictions for each year based on the fixed effects
   of year (solid line) and annual random effects (dots) to show annual
   variation about the trend line. Shading shows 95% confidence intervals
   based on bootstrapped model fits in the poptrend package [43] for the
   temporal trend and for the annual random effects. The first year’s
   estimate is set to a value of 1 as a baseline for relative population
   changes.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.g004

   Both in the total trend in abundance and in the proportion of species
   with declines, these results are similar to three European butterfly
   monitoring schemes (Table 3). Although the longer-running programs show
   larger cumulative declines, the annual rate of change in total
   abundance ranges from -2.0% to -2.6% for Ohio, Catalonia, and the
   Netherlands. The United Kingdom total abundance trends are split
   between generalist species (-0.8%) and specialist species (-2.4%).
   Across monitoring programs, declining species outnumber increasing
   species by a factor of two to three (Table 3).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 3. Comparison of this study’s results to European monitoring
   programs for rates of change in total abundance and classification of
   species trends as positive or negative.

   Number of sites represents those reported to contribute to the
   analysis, but may no longer be active. Number of butterflies counted
   per year is an approximation based on the most recent years of
   monitoring described in the references.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.t003

   In general, traits associated with species’ responses to climate were
   more important, based on the predictive ability (adjusted R^2) of
   univariate models, than traits associated with habitat and host plant
   restrictions (Fig 5, Tables A and B in S1 Appendix). Phylogenetic
   signal was included for most traits’ models, so we focus on the
   phylogenetic generalized least squares results. The Monarch (Danaus
   plexippus) was the only migratory species in decline, although the
   others had erratic annual fluctuations that make trend estimation
   difficult (Fig 3). Species with more northern geographic ranges were
   associated with more negative population trends. Univoltine species had
   more negative population trends than bivoltine or multivoltine species.
   Overwintering stage did not have a strong effect on trend. Species
   eating forb host plants had negative trends on average, but there was
   no effect of host plant specialization on population trends. Wing
   length, wetland habitat preference, or human-disturbed habitat
   preference were not associated with trends.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 5. Species’ traits are associated with variation in the statewide
   trends in abundance.

   We plot each species’ trend compared to the six most important traits
   for the 78 species included in the phylogenetic GLS models with full
   results in Table A in S1 Appendix. Squares represent the regression
   coefficients with 95% confidence intervals shown in lines. Dots show
   trend estimates for each species from Table 1 uncorrected for
   phylogeny, jittered for visualization.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.g005

   Our choice of modeling approach did not change the overall evidence of
   defaunation. Generalized linear mixed models with Poisson-distributed
   errors and generalized additive mixed models estimated declines in
   total abundance similar in magnitude at -1.83% and -2.13% annual rates,
   respectively. The annual trend estimate from TRIM, without sampling
   covariates, was half the magnitude at -0.87%. Species’ trends had high
   correlations between pairwise comparisons, but TRIM models estimated
   notably more positive trends compared to the other three approaches
   (Table C in S1 Appendix).

Discussion

   We show that the total butterfly abundance has declined by 33% over 20
   years in Ohio. This rate is faster than the global abundance trend
   estimated for Lepidoptera (35% over 40 years) and corresponds more
   closely to the steeper declines (45% over 40 years) estimated for all
   insects [1]. The Ohio butterfly monitoring program, judged by the
   weekly frequency, 20-year time period, and statewide spatial extent of
   its surveys, is the most extensive systematic insect survey in North
   America and comparable to three exemplary European butterfly monitoring
   schemes. The annualized 2% rate of decline in this study aligns closely
   with trends from European butterfly monitoring, confirming the decline
   of the most closely monitored group of insects in both Europe and North
   America (Table 3). With less known about other insect taxa, butterflies
   provide a necessary, if imperfect, surrogate to understand the
   trajectory and potential mechanisms behind broader insect trends [13].
   Extensive in both time and space, the decline in butterfly abundance
   reported here is the best estimate for the current rate of insect
   defaunation in North America.

   The proportion of butterfly species with population declines compared
   to population increases is similar between Ohio (negative trends three
   times more numerous) and European studies (negative trends 2–3 times
   more numerous) (Table 3). In other taxa, moths in the United Kingdom
   show a similar proportion of species declines [68]. Long-term
   monitoring in protected areas, although less extensive in space, shows
   more positive species trends for moths in Finland (at 67.7° latitude)
   and across pollinators in Spain (at 850–1750 m. elevations) [69,70].
   These counterexamples show how insect communities may shift at
   high-latitude or high-elevation sites with anthropogenic climate
   warming [21] or may persist in more remote areas. However, butterfly
   monitoring in populated areas show a consistency in observed declines
   (Table 3) that we argue would generalize to other landscapes dominated
   by human use.

   We demonstrate abundance declines in species that are generalist,
   widespread, and not considered vulnerable to extinction [25,71].
   Although few may share concern for the most widespread, invasive
   butterfly in the world’s agricultural and urban settings [72], declines
   in Pieris rapae could be indicative of persistent environmental
   stressors that would affect other species as well. Generalist species
   that exploit human-disturbed habitat with annual rates of decline of
   more than 5% include Lycaena phlaeas, Thymelicus lineola (non-native),
   Cercyonis pegala, and Colias eurytheme (Table 2, Fig 4). We would
   expect negative environmental changes to disproportionately affect rare
   species prone to the demographic dangers of small populations or
   specialist species that rely on a narrow range of resources or habitat
   (UKBMS in Table 3, [24]). This pattern of species declines would lead
   to biotic homogenization as rarer species are lost and common,
   disturbance-tolerant species remain [73,74]. However, our study adds
   another example of declines in common butterfly species thought to be
   well-suited to human-modified habitat [11,21,75].

   The Eastern North American migratory Monarch (Danaus plexippus)
   abundance in Ohio is declining by 7% per year. The Monarch is the only
   declining migratory species out of 14 in our analysis. Despite
   disagreements about whether summer abundance trends have tracked winter
   colony declines [76,77], our study shows that the long-term trends
   correspond. However, our study’s first two years have very high Monarch
   population indices which could be outliers (Fig 3) following the two
   largest recorded winter population counts [16,78]. With these two years
   removed, the statewide Monarch trend is a 4% decline per year, showing
   that the magnitude of summer abundance trends are sensitive to the
   years of data included. Our results align with a study using Illinois
   systematic monitoring data that shows a summer abundance decline for
   monarchs over two decades, but only during the period from 1994–2003,
   not from 2004–2013 [79]. A more recent study showed no decline during
   the summer during 2004–2016 using a population index from NABA counts
   [78]. The trend we document comes from the sum of multiple summer
   breeding generations and fall migratory butterflies returning to
   Mexico; estimates of abundance for these separate generations may be
   required to model how different stages of the lifecycle contribute to
   the long-term decline in the winter colonies [78].

   Our statewide analysis has potential limitations when used to evaluate
   individual species for potential conservation interventions or
   forecasts of population trajectories. Even with systematic monitoring,
   accurate estimates of insect abundance are missing from many species—a
   fifth of regularly observed species in Ohio did not meet our minimum
   data requirements to for us to estimate trends. None of these species
   are considered to be of conservation concern, but this also means that
   we would be limited in our ability to determine if their populations
   have reached threatened status. Targeted surveys of selected species,
   non-adult life stages, or rarely-sampled habitats can expand the
   monitoring to data-deficient species commonly excluded by protocols
   designed to monitor many species efficiently [51] and can be used to
   estimate demographic responses to environmental drivers not apparent
   from adult butterfly counts [80]. Additional targeted species
   assessments could inform how worried we should be about the extreme
   population declines estimated for species observed at fewer than 10
   monitoring sites (Table 2). However, more data and more complex
   population models may not always lead to accurate predictions for
   insect population trajectories [81]. Rather than recommending other
   systematic monitoring programs accumulate decades of data before
   assessing insect declines, we would advocate sharing data across
   regional programs to increase statistical power, as in [11], and
   integrating systematic monitoring with historical records and
   opportunistic observations to assess insect vulnerability more rapidly
   by using all potential sources of data [82,83].

   Insect declines have multifaceted causes, and the relative impact of
   these causes is still unknown [84]. Although analysis of the causes of
   site differences in abundance or species trends is beyond the scope of
   this study, we discuss three environmental drivers commonly associated
   with global insect declines: habitat loss and fragmentation, climate
   change, and agricultural intensification [84,85]. If species’ traits
   are associated with population trends, then their relationships may
   suggest which environmental changes affect population responses in
   species sharing these traits [47,84,86]. In this study, life-history
   traits were weakly predictive of population trends, but their
   associations provide hypotheses that could be tested further [47].

Habitat loss and fragmentation

   In Ohio, habitat loss and fragmentation plateaued well before butterfly
   monitoring started, with human population growth slowing by 1970. In
   common with other Midwestern states, Ohio had already lost tallgrass
   prairie species, such as the Regal Fritillary (Speyeria idalia), due to
   habitat conversion to agriculture [25,26]. Land-use has changed slowly
   over the course of the monitoring program; fewer than 10% of monitoring
   sites have had more than 2.5% change in the surrounding (2-km radius)
   developed, agriculture, or forest land cover from 2001–2011 [29]. The
   persistence of butterfly populations in a landscape of habitat
   fragments are mediated by species’ traits that permit them to either
   move between more isolated resources or persist in smaller, localized
   populations [85,87]. Wing size is one life history trait associated
   with dispersal ability, but it had no association with species’
   population trends (Tables A and B in S1 Appendix). However, defining
   habitat patches by land-use classes overlooks how mobile insect
   populations are bound by resources, varying across the lifecycle,
   rather than area [88,89]. Although there has been little wholesale
   habitat conversion around our study transects, degradation of the
   remaining habitat could be a cause of the general decline in butterfly
   abundance.

Climate change

   Species trends are associated with two life-history traits, voltinism
   and range distribution, which suggest that the butterfly community is
   changing with the warming climate. Species that only complete one
   annual generation, or univoltine species, had more negative abundance
   trends. This aligns with obligate univoltine species becoming less
   common in Massachusetts [20], but is the opposite of the findings in
   Spain where multivoltine species are in steeper declines with exposure
   to increasingly dry summers [40]. Multivoltine species may be more
   adaptive to annual and spatial variation in growing season length as
   many have plasticity in the voltinism observed within Ohio [25]. For
   many species with flexible voltinism in Ohio, adding an extra
   generation in warmer summers increases their annual population growth
   rates [55]. Northern-distributed species have more negative population
   trends compared to widely distributed or southern species. This
   corresponds with findings from Massachusetts and Europe that
   warm-adapted species are replacing cool-adapted species as range
   distributions shift [20,90]. Even though these two traits should
   increase abundance for some species as the climate warms, it has not
   been enough to prevent the overall decline in butterfly abundance.

Agricultural intensification

   Cropland and pasture make up half of Ohio’s land area, so we would
   expect agricultural practices to affect statewide insect abundance. One
   assessment of pollinator habitat suitability based on land-use,
   conservation reserve program acreage, and crop type estimated an
   increase in resources in Ohio from 1982 through 2002, followed by a
   stable trend [91]. However, agricultural practices can decrease insect
   abundance with systemic insecticides, herbicide use on host plants or
   nectar resources, and nitrogen fertilization that alters the
   composition of surrounding plant communities.

   In Ohio, the use of neonicotinoids rapidly increased after 2004 when
   they became widely used on corn and soybeans [92,93]. The mechanistic
   link between neonicotinoid insecticides and insect declines is
   established and observational studies have shown widespread impacts of
   their use [94–96]. Even though seed-coatings with neonicotinoids reduce
   broadcast spraying, the mechanical planting of these seeds exposes
   widespread areas around farms to contaminated dust that exposes
   non-target plants and insects to biologically-relevant concentrations
   [97,98]. In the United Kingdom and California, neonicotinoids are
   associated with butterfly declines [22,99] and hinder butterfly larval
   development on host plants [100]. We did not design this study to test
   whether neonicotinoids affect butterfly abundance in Ohio. However, the
   observed declines across common and generalist species, which we
   otherwise would expect to exploit an agricultural or human-altered
   landscape, would be consistent with widespread exposure to
   insecticides.

   Species that eat forbs as larvae have negative population trends (Fig
   5). Both herbicide use and nitrogen deposition may alter plant
   communities to favor grasses over forbs [101]. In Ohio, glyphosate use
   has increased linearly, and is now applied at 6 times the rate it was
   in 1996 [92,93]. Milkweed losses, attributed to increased glyphosate
   use in the Midwest, contribute to declines in Monarch butterfly
   abundance [79,80]. Nitrogen increases, which may come from
   fertilization or atmospheric deposition, have been linked to declines
   in grassland butterfly species adapted to low-nitrogen environments
   [102–104] and to higher mortality during larval development on enriched
   host plants [105].

Conclusions

   Systematic, long-term surveys of butterflies provide the most rigorous
   estimate for the rate of insect declines. This study demonstrates that
   defaunation is happening in North America similarly to Europe. In
   landscapes comprising natural areas amid heavy human land-use,
   butterfly total abundance is declining at 2% per year and 2–3 times
   more species have population trends declining rather than increasing.
   Additional Pollard-based monitoring programs in North America, listed
   in [9], will enable tracking insect trends over larger spatial extents
   as will efforts to integrate data across European monitoring schemes
   [11]. The rates for other insect groups may deviate from this baseline
   and were previously estimated to be declining more rapidly than
   Lepidoptera [1]. Expanded monitoring and support for taxonomists are
   imperative for other taxa and under sampled regions, like the Tropics
   where most insect diversity resides. Besides the evaluation if
   butterfly trends generalize to other insects, the most urgent research
   needs are understanding the causes of decline and testing mitigation
   strategies. As butterflies are the best-monitored insect taxa, they are
   the best indicator of the baseline threat to the 5.5 million insect
   species, the most diverse group of animals on earth.

Supporting information

S1 Appendix. Supplementary methods and results.

   Includes detailed methods for phenology models and phylogenetic trees,
   a figure of species trends plotted on a cladogram, two tables of model
   results from the trait analysis, and a table comparing our trend
   estimates with three other approaches.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0216270.s001

   (DOCX)

Acknowledgments

   We thank the volunteers and directors who contribute their time and
   expertise to the Ohio butterfly monitoring program. The Ohio Department
   of Natural Resources provides support, the Cleveland Museum of Natural
   History provides data entry and archiving, and the Ohio Lepidopterists
   provides training and coordination for the Ohio butterfly monitoring
   program. We thank Marjorie Weber for advice on our phylogenetic
   analysis. The Department of the Interior Southeast Climate Adaptation
   Science Center and North Carolina State University supported TW during
   earlier work with Ohio butterflies that grew into this analysis.

References

    1. 1. Dirzo R, Young HS, Galetti M, Ceballos G, Isaac NJB, Collen B.
       Defaunation in the Anthropocene. Science. 2014;345: 401–406.
       pmid:25061202
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    2. 2. May RM. How many species are there on earth? Science. 1988;241:
       1441–1449. pmid:17790039
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    3. 3. Conrad KF, Fox R, Woiwod IP. Monitoring biodiversity: measuring
       long-term changes in insect abundance. Insect conservation biology.
       2007; 203–225.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    4. 4. Hallmann CA, Sorg M, Jongejans E, Siepel H, Hofland N, Schwan H,
       et al. More than 75 percent decline over 27 years in total flying
       insect biomass in protected areas. Lamb EG, editor. PLOS ONE.
       2017;12: e0185809. pmid:29045418
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    5. 5. Lister BC, Garcia A. Climate-driven declines in arthropod
       abundance restructure a rainforest food web. PNAS. 2018;115:
       E10397–E10406. pmid:30322922
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    6. 6. Winfree RW. Fox J, Williams NM, Reilly JR, Cariveau DP.
       Abundance of common species, not species richness, drives delivery
       of a real-world ecosystem service. Shea K, editor. Ecology Letters.
       2015;18: 626–635. pmid:25959973
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    7. 7. Warren MS, Hill JK, Thomas JA, Asher J, Fox R, Huntley B, et al.
       Rapid responses of British butterflies to opposing forces of
       climate and habitat change. 2001;414: 5.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    8. 8. Parmesan C. Ecological and Evolutionary Responses to Recent
       Climate Change. Annual Review of Ecology, Evolution, and
       Systematics. 2006;37: 637–669.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    9. 9. Taron D, Ries L. Butterfly Monitoring for Conservation. In:
       Daniels JC, editor. Butterfly Conservation in North America.
       Dordrecht: Springer Netherlands; 2015. pp. 35–57.
   10. 10. Pollard E, Yates TJ. Monitoring butterflies for ecology and
       conservation: the British butterfly monitoring scheme. Springer
       Science & Business Media; 1994.
   11. 11. Van Swaay C, Van Strien A, Aghababyan K, Astrom S, Botham M,
       Brereton T, et al. The European Butterfly Indicator for Grassland
       species: 1990–2013. 2015;
   12. 12. Schmucki R, Pe’er G, Roy DB, Stefanescu C, Van Swaay CAM,
       Oliver TH, et al. A regionally informed abundance index for
       supporting integrative analyses across butterfly monitoring
       schemes. Müller J, editor. Journal of Applied Ecology. 2016;53:
       501–510.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   13. 13. Thomas JA. Monitoring change in the abundance and distribution
       of insects using butterflies and other indicator groups.
       Philosophical Transactions of the Royal Society B: Biological
       Sciences. 2005;360: 339–357. pmid:15814349
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   14. 14. Brereton T, Roy DB, Middlebrook I, Botham M, Warren M. The
       development of butterfly indicators in the United Kingdom and
       assessments in 2010. Journal of Insect Conservation. 2011;15:
       139–151.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   15. 15. Dennis EB, Morgan BJT, Roy DB, Brereton TM. Urban indicators
       for UK butterflies. Ecological Indicators. 2017;76: 184–193.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   16. 16. Agrawal AA, Inamine H. Mechanisms behind the monarch’s decline.
       Science. 2018;360: 1294–1296. pmid:29930122
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   17. 17. Schultz CB, Brown LM, Pelton E, Crone EE. Citizen science
       monitoring demonstrates dramatic declines of monarch butterflies in
       western North America. Biological Conservation. 2017;214: 343–346.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   18. 18. Belitz MW, Hendrick LK, Monfils MJ, Cuthrell DL, Marshall CJ,
       Kawahara AY, et al. Aggregated occurrence records of the federally
       endangered Poweshiek skipperling (Oarisma poweshiek). Biodiversity
       data journal. 2018;
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   19. 19. Haddad NM. Resurrection and resilience of the rarest
       butterflies. PLOS Biology. 2018;16: e2003488. pmid:29408908
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   20. 20. Breed GA, Stichter S, Crone EE. Climate-driven changes in
       northeastern US butterfly communities. Nature Climate Change.
       2013;3: 142–145.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   21. 21. Forister ML, McCall AC, Sanders NJ, Fordyce JA, Thorne JH,
       O’Brien J, et al. Compounded effects of climate change and habitat
       alteration shift patterns of butterfly diversity. Proceedings of
       the National Academy of Sciences. 2010;107: 2088–2092.
       pmid:20133854
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   22. 22. Forister ML, Cousens B, Harrison JG, Anderson K, Thorne JH,
       Waetjen D, et al. Increasing neonicotinoid use and the declining
       butterfly fauna of lowland California. Biology Letters. 2016;12:
       20160475. pmid:27531159
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   23. 23. Schlicht D, Swengel A, Swengel S. Meta-analysis of survey data
       to assess trends of prairie butterflies in Minnesota, USA during
       1979–2005. Journal of Insect Conservation. 2009;13: 429–447.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   24. 24. Swengel SR, Schlicht D, Olsen F, Swengel AB. Declines of
       prairie butterflies in the midwestern USA. Journal of Insect
       Conservation. 2011;15: 327–339.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   25. 25. Iftner DC, Shuey JA, Calhoun JV. Butterflies and skippers of
       Ohio. College of Biological Sciences, Ohio State University; 1992.
   26. 26. Shuey JA, Calhoun JV, Iftner DC. Butterflies that are
       endangered, threatened, and of special concern in Ohio. 1987;
   27. 27. Bigelow D, Borchers A. Major uses of land in the United States,
       2012 [Internet]. USDA Economic Research Service; 2017. Report No.:
       EIB-178.
       https://www.ers.usda.gov/publications/pub-details/?pubid=84879
   28. 28. Thornton PE, Running SW, White MA. Generating surfaces of daily
       meteorological variables over large regions of complex terrain.
       Journal of Hydrology. 1997;190: 214–251.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   29. 29. Homer C, Dewitz J, Yang L, Jin S, Danielson P, Xian G, et al.
       Completion of the 2011 National Land Cover Database for the
       conterminous United States–representing a decade of land cover
       change information. Photogrammetric Engineering & Remote Sensing.
       2015;81: 345–354.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   30. 30. Diamond SE, Cayton H, Wepprich T, Jenkins CN, Dunn RR, Haddad
       NM, et al. Unexpected phenological responses of butterflies to the
       interaction of urbanization and geographic temperature. Ecology.
       2014;95: 2613–2621.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   31. 31. Dennis EB, Freeman SN, Brereton T, Roy DB. Indexing butterfly
       abundance whilst accounting for missing counts and variability in
       seasonal pattern. O’Hara RB, editor. Methods in Ecology and
       Evolution. 2013;4: 637–645.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   32. 32. Opler PA, Krizek GO. Butterflies east of the Great Plains: an
       illustrated natural history. Johns Hopkins Univ Pr; 1984.
   33. 33. Dennis EB, Morgan BJT, Freeman SN, Brereton TM, Roy DB. A
       generalized abundance index for seasonal invertebrates: A
       Generalized Abundance Index for Seasonal Invertebrates. Biometrics.
       2016;72: 1305–1314.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   34. 34. Wood SN. Generalized Additive Models: An Introduction with R.
       2nd ed. Chapman and Hall/CRC; 2017.
   35. 35. Cordano EE& E. Interpol.T: Hourly interpolation of multiple
       temperature daily series [Internet]. 2013.
       https://CRAN.R-project.org/package=Interpol.T
   36. 36. Cayton HL, Haddad NM, Gross K, Diamond SE, Ries L. Do growing
       degree days predict phenology across butterfly species? Ecology.
       2015;96: 1473–1479.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   37. 37. Link WA, Sauer JR. Estimating Population Change from Count
       Data: Application to the North American Breeding Bird Survey.
       Ecological Applications. 1998;8: 258.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   38. 38. Pellet J, Bried JT, Parietti D, Gander A, Heer PO, Cherix D, et
       al. Monitoring Butterfly Abundance: Beyond Pollard Walks. Schweiger
       O, editor. PLoS ONE. 2012;7: e41396. pmid:22859980
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   39. 39. Henry EH, Anderson CT. Abundance estimates to inform butterfly
       management: double-observer versus distance sampling. Journal of
       Insect Conservation. 2016;20: 505–514.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   40. 40. Melero Y, Stefanescu C, Pino J. General declines in
       Mediterranean butterflies over the last two decades are modulated
       by species traits. Biological Conservation. 2016;201: 336–342.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   41. 41. Haddad NM, Hudgens B, Damiani C, Gross K, Kuefler D, Pollock K.
       Determining Optimal Population Monitoring for Rare Butterflies:
       Monitoring Rare Butterflies. Conservation Biology. 2008;22:
       929–940.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   42. 42. Isaac NJB, Cruickshanks KL, Weddle AM, Marcus Rowcliffe J,
       Brereton TM, Dennis RLH, et al. Distance sampling and the challenge
       of monitoring butterfly populations: Distance sampling and
       monitoring butterflies. Methods in Ecology and Evolution. 2011;2:
       585–594.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   43. 43. Knape J. Decomposing trends in Swedish bird populations using
       generalized additive mixed models. Siriwardena G, editor. Journal
       of Applied Ecology. 2016;53: 1852–1861.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   44. 44. Szabo JK, Vesk PA, Baxter PWJ, Possingham HP. Regional avian
       species declines estimated from volunteer-collected long-term data
       using List Length Analysis. Ecological Applications. 2010;20:
       2157–2169. pmid:21265449
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   45. 45. van Strien AJ, van Swaay CAM, Termaat T. Opportunistic citizen
       science data of animal species produce reliable estimates of
       distribution trends if analysed with occupancy models. Devictor V,
       editor. Journal of Applied Ecology. 2013;50: 1450–1458.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   46. 46. Roy DB, Ploquin EF, Randle Z, Risely K, Botham MS, Middlebrook
       I, et al. Comparison of trends in butterfly populations between
       monitoring schemes. Journal of Insect Conservation. 2015;19:
       313–324.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   47. 47. Soykan CU, Sauer J, Schuetz JG, LeBaron GS, Dale K, Langham GM.
       Population trends for North American winter birds based on
       hierarchical models. Ecosphere. 2016;7: e01351.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   48. 48. Kraemer HC, Blasey CM. Centring in regression analyses: a
       strategy to prevent errors in statistical inference. International
       Journal of Methods in Psychiatric Research. 2004;13: 141–151.
       pmid:15297898
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   49. 49. Harrison XA. Using observation-level random effects to model
       overdispersion in count data in ecology and evolution. PeerJ.
       2014;2: e616. pmid:25320683
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   50. 50. Pannekoek J, Van Strien A. Trim 3 Manual (TRends & Indices for
       Monitoring data)–Statistics Netherlands. Voorburg; 2001.
   51. 51. Brereton T, Botham M, Middlebrook I, Randle Z, Noble D, Harris
       S, et al. United Kingdom Butterfly Monitoring Scheme report for
       2017 [Internet]. Centre for Ecology & Hydrology & Butterfly
       Conservation; 2018.
       http://www.ukbms.org/docs/reports/2017/UKBMS%20Butterfly%20Ann%20Re
       port%202017_Low%20Res.pdf
   52. 52. Van Swaay CAM, Bos G, Van Grunsven RHA, Kok J, Huskens K, Van
       Deijk JR, et al. Vlinders en libellen geteld: Jaarverslag 2017
       [Internet]. De Vlinderstichting, Wageningen; 2018. Report No.:
       Rapport VS2018.006.
       https://assets.vlinderstichting.nl/docs/6d51f174-b497-4777-b84a-362
       e344c3528.pdf
   53. 53. Stefanescu C. Resum de les temporades 2015 i 2016. Cynthia:
       Butlletí del Butterfly Monitoring Scheme a Catalunya. 2018;14.
       http://www.catalanbms.org/es/cynthia/
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   54. 54. Rohatgi A. WebPlotDigitizer [Internet]. 2019.
       https://automeris.io/WebPlotDigitizer
   55. 55. Wepprich TM. Effects of Climatic Variability on a Statewide
       Butterfly Community. [Internet]. North Carolina State University.
       2017. http://www.lib.ncsu.edu/resolver/1840.20/34345
   56. 56. Diamond SE, Frame AM, Martin RA, Buckley LB. Species’ traits
       predict phenological responses to climate change in butterflies.
       2011;92: 8.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   57. 57. Pagel M. Inferring the historical patterns of biological
       evolution. Nature. 1999;401: 877–884. pmid:10553904
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   58. 58. Clark K, Karsch-Mizrachi I, Lipman DJ, Ostell J, Sayers EW.
       GenBank. Nucleic Acids Res. 2016;44: D67–D72. pmid:26590407
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   59. 59. Ratnasingham S, Hebert PD. BOLD: The Barcode of Life Data
       System (http://www.barcodinglife.org). Molecular ecology notes.
       2007;7: 355–364. pmid:18784790
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   60. 60. Espeland M, Breinholt J, Willmott KR, Warren AD, Vila R,
       Toussaint EFA, et al. A Comprehensive and Dated Phylogenomic
       Analysis of Butterflies. Current Biology. 2018;28: 770–778.e5.
       pmid:29456146
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   61. 61. R Core Team. R: A Language and Environment for Statistical
       Computing [Internet]. Vienna, Austria: R Foundation for Statistical
       Computing; 2018. https://www.R-project.org/
   62. 62. Bates D, Mächler M, Bolker B, Walker S. Fitting Linear
       Mixed-Effects Models Using lme4. Journal of Statistical Software.
       2015;67.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   63. 63. Orme D, Freckleton R, Thomas G, Petzoldt T. The caper package:
       comparative analysis of phylogenetics and evolution in R. R package
       version. 2013;5.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   64. 64. Paradis E, Schliep K. ape 5.0: an environment for modern
       phylogenetics and evolutionary analyses in R. Bioinformatics.
       2018;xx: xxx–xxx.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   65. 65. Knowles JE, Frederick C. merTools: Tools for Analyzing Mixed
       Effect Regression Models [Internet]. 2018.
       https://CRAN.R-project.org/package=merTools
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   66. 66. Nakagawa S, Schielzeth H. A general and simple method for
       obtaining R^2 from generalized linear mixed-effects models. O’Hara
       RB, editor. Methods in Ecology and Evolution. 2013;4: 133–142.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   67. 67. Barton K. MuMIn: Multi-Model Inference [Internet]. 2018.
       https://CRAN.R-project.org/package=MuMIn
   68. 68. Conrad KF, Woiwod IP, Parsons M, Fox R, Warren MS. Long-term
       population trends in widespread British moths. Journal of Insect
       Conservation. 2004;8: 119–136.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   69. 69. Hunter MD, Kozlov MV, Itämies J, Pulliainen E, Bäck J, Kyrö
       E-M, et al. Current temporal trends in moth abundance are counter
       to predicted effects of climate change in an assemblage of
       subarctic forest moths. Global Change Biology. 2014;20: 1723–1737.
       pmid:24421221
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   70. 70. Herrera CM. Complex long-term dynamics of pollinator abundance
       in undisturbed Mediterranean montane habitats over two decades.
       Ecological Monographs. 2019;89: e01338.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   71. 71. Cech R, Tudor G, others. Butterflies of the east coast.
       Princeton University Press; 2005.
   72. 72. Ryan SF, Lombaert E, Espeset A, Vila R, Talavera G, Dincă V, et
       al. Global invasion history of the world’s most abundant pest
       butterfly: a citizen science population genomics study. bioRxiv.
       2018; 506162.
   73. 73. McKinney ML, Lockwood JL. Biotic homogenization: a few winners
       replacing many losers in the next mass extinction. Trends in
       ecology & evolution. 1999;14: 450–453.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   74. 74. Clavel J, Julliard R, Devictor V. Worldwide decline of
       specialist species: toward a global functional homogenization?
       Frontiers in Ecology and the Environment. 2011;9: 222–228.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   75. 75. Van Dyck H, Van Strien AJ, Maes D, Van Swaay CAM. Declines in
       Common, Widespread Butterflies in a Landscape under Intense Human
       Use. Conservation Biology. 2009;23: 957–965. pmid:19637406
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   76. 76. Ries L, Oberhauser K, Taron D, Battin J, Rendon-Salinas E,
       Altizer S, et al. Connecting eastern monarch population dynamics
       across their migratory cycle. Monarchs in a changing world: Biology
       and conservation of an iconic insect Cornell University Press,
       Ithaca, NY. 2015; 268–281.
   77. 77. Pleasants JM, Williams EH, Brower LP, Oberhauser KS, Taylor OR.
       Conclusion of No Decline in Summer Monarch Population Not
       Supported. Ann Entomol Soc Am. 2016;109: 169–171.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   78. 78. Saunders SP, Ries L, Neupane N, Ramírez MI, García-Serrano E,
       Rendón-Salinas E, et al. Multiscale seasonal factors drive the size
       of winter monarch colonies. Proceedings of the National Academy of
       Sciences. 2019; 201805114. pmid:30886097
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   79. 79. Saunders SP, Ries L, Oberhauser KS, Thogmartin WE, Zipkin EF.
       Local and cross-seasonal associations of climate and land use with
       abundance of monarch butterflies Danaus plexippus. Ecography.
       2018;41: 278–290.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   80. 80. Pleasants JM, Oberhauser KS. Milkweed loss in agricultural
       fields because of herbicide use: effect on the monarch butterfly
       population: Herbicide use and monarch butterflies. Insect
       Conservation and Diversity. 2013;6: 135–144.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   81. 81. Oliver TH, Roy DB. The pitfalls of ecological forecasting.
       Biological Journal of the Linnean Society. 2015;115: 767–778.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   82. 82. Dennis EB, Morgan BJ, Brereton TM, Roy DB, Fox R. Using citizen
       science butterfly counts to predict species population trends.
       Conservation biology. 2017;31: 1350–1361. pmid:28474803
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   83. 83. Pagel J, Anderson BJ, O’Hara RB, Cramer W, Fox R, Jeltsch F, et
       al. Quantifying range-wide variation in population trends from
       local abundance surveys and widespread opportunistic occurrence
       records. McMahon S, editor. Methods in Ecology and Evolution.
       2014;5: 751–760.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   84. 84. Fox R. The decline of moths in Great Britain: a review of
       possible causes: The decline of moths in Great Britain. Insect
       Conservation and Diversity. 2013;6: 5–19.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   85. 85. Thomas JA. Butterfly communities under threat. Science.
       2016;353: 216–218. pmid:27418487
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   86. 86. Wong MKL, Guénard B, Lewis OT. Trait-based ecology of
       terrestrial arthropods. Biological Reviews. 2018;0. pmid:30548743
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   87. 87. Habel JC, Schmitt T. Vanishing of the common species: Empty
       habitats and the role of genetic diversity. Biological
       Conservation. 2018;218: 211–216.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   88. 88. Dennis RLH, Shreeve TG, Dyck HV. Towards a Functional
       Resource-Based Concept for Habitat: A Butterfly Biology Viewpoint.
       Oikos. 2003;102: 417–426.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   89. 89. Curtis RJ, Brereton TM, Dennis RLH, Carbone C, Isaac NJB.
       Butterfly abundance is determined by food availability and is
       mediated by species traits. Diamond S, editor. Journal of Applied
       Ecology. 2015;52: 1676–1684.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   90. 90. Parmesan C, Ryrholm N, Stefanescu C, Hill JK, Thomas CD,
       Descimon H, et al. Poleward shifts in geographical ranges of
       butterfly species associated with regional warming. Nature.
       1999;399: 579–583.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   91. 91. Daniel Hellerstein, Claudia Hitaj, David Smith, Amerlie Davis.
       Land Use, Land Cover, and Pollinator Health: A Review and Trend
       Analysis [Internet]. USDA Economic Research Service; 2017 Jun p.
       47. https://ageconsearch.umn.edu/record/263074
   92. 92. Baker NT, Stone WW. Estimated annual agricultural pesticide use
       for counties of the conterminous United States, 2008–12: U.S.
       Geological Survey Data Series 907 [Internet]. US Geological Survey;
       p. 9. https://dx.doi.org/10.3133/ds907.
   93. 93. Stone WW. Estimated annual agricultural pesticide use for
       counties of the conterminous United States, 1992–2009. US
       Geological Survey; 2013.
   94. 94. Goulson D. REVIEW: An overview of the environmental risks posed
       by neonicotinoid insecticides. Kleijn D, editor. Journal of Applied
       Ecology. 2013;50: 977–987.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   95. 95. Hallmann CA, Foppen RPB, van Turnhout CAM, de Kroon H,
       Jongejans E. Declines in insectivorous birds are associated with
       high neonicotinoid concentrations. Nature. 2014;511: 341–343.
       pmid:25030173
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   96. 96. Pisa L, Goulson D, Yang E-C, Gibbons D, Sánchez-Bayo F,
       Mitchell E, et al. An update of the Worldwide Integrated Assessment
       (WIA) on systemic insecticides. Part 2: impacts on organisms and
       ecosystems. Environ Sci Pollut Res. 2017; pmid:29124633
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   97. 97. Douglas MR, Tooker JF. Large-Scale Deployment of Seed
       Treatments Has Driven Rapid Increase in Use of Neonicotinoid
       Insecticides and Preemptive Pest Management in U.S. Field Crops.
       Environmental Science & Technology. 2015;49: 5088–5097.
       pmid:25793443
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   98. 98. Krupke CH, Holland JD, Long EY, Eitzer BD. Planting of
       neonicotinoid-treated maize poses risks for honey bees and other
       non-target organisms over a wide area without consistent crop yield
       benefit. Diamond S, editor. Journal of Applied Ecology. 2017;54:
       1449–1458.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   99. 99. Gilburn AS, Bunnefeld N, Wilson JM, Botham MS, Brereton TM, Fox
       R, et al. Are neonicotinoid insecticides driving declines of
       widespread butterflies? PeerJ. 2015;3: e1402. pmid:26623186
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   100. 100. Basley K, Goulson D. Effects of Field-Relevant Concentrations
       of Clothianidin on Larval Development of the Butterfly Polyommatus
       icarus (Lepidoptera, Lycaenidae). Environ Sci Technol. 2018;52:
       3990–3996. pmid:29553241
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   101. 101. Kleijn D, Snoeijing GIJ. Field Boundary Vegetation and the
       Effects of Agrochemical Drift: Botanical Change Caused by Low
       Levels of Herbicide and Fertilizer. Journal of Applied Ecology.
       1997;34: 1413–1425.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   102. 102. Weiss SB. Cars, cows, and checkerspot butterflies: nitrogen
       deposition and management of nutrient-poor grasslands for a
       threatened species. Conservation Biology. 1999;13: 1476–1486.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   103. 103. Öckinger E, Hammarstedt O, Nilsson SG, Smith HG. The
       relationship between local extinctions of grassland butterflies and
       increased soil nitrogen levels. Biological Conservation. 2006;128:
       564–573.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   104. 104. WallisDeVries MF, van Swaay CAM. A nitrogen index to track
       changes in butterfly species assemblages under nitrogen deposition.
       Biological Conservation. 2017;212: 448–453.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   105. 105. Kurze S, Heinken T, Fartmann T. Nitrogen enrichment in host
       plants increases the mortality of common Lepidoptera species.
       Oecologia. 2018;188: 1227–1237. pmid:30288608
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar

   Download PDF

     * Citation
     * XML

   Print
     * Print article
     * EzReprint

   Share
     * Reddit Reddit
     * Google+ Google+
     * Facebook Facebook
     * LinkedIn LinkedIn
     * Mendeley Mendeley
     * PubChase PubChase
     * Twitter Twitter
     * Email Email

     [CROSSMARK_BW_horizontal.svg]
   Advertisement

Subject Areas

   ?

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.
   We want your feedback. Do these Subject Areas make sense for this
   article? Click the target next to the incorrect Subject Area and let us
   know. Thanks for your help!
     * Moths and butterflies
       Is the Subject Area "Moths and butterflies" applicable to this
       article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Insects
       Is the Subject Area "Insects" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Ohio
       Is the Subject Area "Ohio" applicable to this article? (BUTTON) Yes
       (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Europe
       Is the Subject Area "Europe" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Plants
       Is the Subject Area "Plants" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Climate change
       Is the Subject Area "Climate change" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Habitats
       Is the Subject Area "Habitats" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Species diversity
       Is the Subject Area "Species diversity" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.

Archived Tweets

   Load more
   View all tweets

     * Publications
     * PLOS Biology
     * PLOS Medicine
     * PLOS Computational Biology
     * PLOS Genetics
     * PLOS Pathogens
     * PLOS ONE
     * PLOS Neglected Tropical Diseases

     * Home
     * Blogs
     * Collections
     * Give feedback
     * LOCKSS

     * Privacy Policy
     * Terms of Use
     * Advertise
     * Media Inquiries
     * Contact

   PLOS is a nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation, #C2354500, based in San
   Francisco, California, US
   PLOS
   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TP26BH

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MQQMGF

   Advertisement

     * plos.org
     * create account
     * sign in

PLOS Biology

     * Browse
          + Current Issue
          + Journal Archive
          + Collections
          + Find and Read Articles
     * Publish
          + Submissions
               o Submission Guidelines
               o Figures
               o Tables
               o Supporting Information
               o LaTeX
               o Other Article Types
               o Preprints
               o Revising Your Manuscript
               o Submit Now
          + Policies
               o Best Practices in Research Reporting
               o Human Subjects Research
               o Animal Research
               o Competing Interests
               o Disclosure of Funding Sources
               o Licenses and Copyright
               o Data Availability
               o Materials and Software Sharing
               o Ethical Publishing Practice
               o Authorship
               o Downloads and Translations
          + Manuscript Review and Publication
               o Editorial and Peer Review Process
               o Guidelines for Reviewers
               o Accepted Manuscripts
               o Corrections and Retractions
               o Comments
               o Article-Level Metrics

Submit Your Manuscript
       PLOS Biology provides an Open Access platform to showcase your best
       research and commentary across all areas of biological science.
       Submit Now
     * About
          + Journal Information
          + Staff Editors
          + Editorial Board
          + Publishing Information
          + Publication Fees
          + Press and Media
          + Contact
     *

       Search

       Search
       ____________________ (BUTTON)

       advanced search

     * Loading metrics

   Open Access

   Peer-reviewed

   Research Article

Mismatch Between Birth Date and Vegetation Phenology Slows the Demography of
Roe Deer

     * Floriane Plard,
       Affiliation Laboratoire “Biométrie et Biologie Évolutive,” Unité
       Mixte de Recherche 5558, Université Claude Bernard Lyon 1, Lyon,
       France
       ⨯
     * Jean-Michel Gaillard ,
       * E-mail: jean-michel.gaillard@univ-lyon1.fr
       Affiliation Laboratoire “Biométrie et Biologie Évolutive,” Unité
       Mixte de Recherche 5558, Université Claude Bernard Lyon 1, Lyon,
       France
       ⨯
     * Tim Coulson,
       Affiliation Department of Zoology, The Tinbergen Building,
       University of Oxford, Oxford, United Kingdom
       ⨯
     * A. J. Mark Hewison,
       Affiliation INRA, UR035 CEFS, B.P. 52627, Castanet-Tolosan cedex,
       France
       ⨯
     * Daniel Delorme,
       Affiliation Centre National d'Études et de Recherches Appliquées
       Cervidés-Sangliers, Office National de la Chasse et de la Faune
       Sauvage, Paris, France
       ⨯
     * Claude Warnant,
       Affiliation Centre National d'Études et de Recherches Appliquées
       Cervidés-Sangliers, Office National de la Chasse et de la Faune
       Sauvage, Paris, France
       ⨯
     * Christophe Bonenfant
       Affiliation Laboratoire “Biométrie et Biologie Évolutive,” Unité
       Mixte de Recherche 5558, Université Claude Bernard Lyon 1, Lyon,
       France
       ⨯

Mismatch Between Birth Date and Vegetation Phenology Slows the Demography of
Roe Deer

     * Floriane Plard,
     * Jean-Michel Gaillard,
     * Tim Coulson,
     * A. J. Mark Hewison,
     * Daniel Delorme,
     * Claude Warnant,
     * Christophe Bonenfant

   PLOS
   x
     * Published: April 1, 2014
     * https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828

     * Article
     * Authors
     * Metrics
     * Comments
     * Media Coverage

     * Reader Comments (0)
     * Media Coverage
     * Figures

Figures

   Figure 1
   Figure 2
   Figure 3

Abstract

   Marked impacts of climate change on biodiversity have frequently been
   demonstrated, including temperature-related shifts in phenology and
   life-history traits. One potential major impact of climate change is
   the modification of synchronization between the phenology of different
   trophic levels. High phenotypic plasticity in laying date has allowed
   many bird species to track the increasingly early springs resulting
   from recent environmental change, but although changes in the timing of
   reproduction have been well studied in birds, these questions have only
   recently been addressed in mammals. To track peak resource
   availability, large herbivores like roe deer, with a widespread
   distribution across Europe, should also modify their life-history
   schedule in response to changes in vegetation phenology over time. In
   this study, we analysed the influence of climate change on the timing
   of roe deer births and the consequences for population demography and
   individual fitness. Our study provides a rare quantification of the
   demographic costs associated with the failure of a species to modify
   its phenology in response to a changing world. Given these fitness
   costs, the lack of response of roe deer birth dates to match the
   increasingly earlier onset of spring is in stark contrast with the
   marked phenotypic responses to climate change reported in many other
   mammals. We suggest that the lack of phenotypic plasticity in birth
   timing in roe deer is linked to its inability to track environmental
   cues of variation in resource availability for the timing of
   parturition.

Author Summary

   Climate change can alter the synchronization of life cycles between
   organisms at different points in the food chain. If species do not
   respond to climate change, the timing of peak resource availability may
   fail to match the timing of peak energy expenditure. Many bird species
   have been able to advance their laying date to match a change in the
   timing of caterpillar abundance. Herbivores are similarly expected to
   track changes in the timing of vegetation growth. In this study, we
   combine statistical analysis with demographic modeling to analyze the
   influence of a climate-driven shift in the timing of the spring
   vegetation flush on the birth date and demography of roe deer. In
   recent years, climate change has generated a marked increase in local
   temperatures and a progressively earlier vegetation flush. Despite
   these changes, we observed no shift in timing of the birth date of roe
   deer over the 27-year study period. This failure to track environmental
   change resulted in a mismatch between vegetation flush and birth date,
   which in turn caused a decrease in survival of the young, and hence a
   reduction in roe deer fitness. Birth date was under strong directional
   selection, but was not strongly heritable, suggesting that any
   evolutionary response of birth date to climate change might be limited.
   We suggest that a plastic response in birth date did not occur because
   reproduction is triggered by day length rather than resource
   availability in roe deer.

   Citation: Plard F, Gaillard J-M, Coulson T, Hewison AJM, Delorme D,
   Warnant C, et al. (2014) Mismatch Between Birth Date and Vegetation
   Phenology Slows the Demography of Roe Deer. PLoS Biol 12(4): e1001828.
   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828

   Academic Editor: Georgina M. Mace, University College London, United
   Kingdom

   Received: August 30, 2013; Accepted: February 19, 2014; Published:
   April 1, 2014

   Copyright: © 2014 Plard et al. This is an open-access article
   distributed under the terms of the Creative Commons Attribution
   License, which permits unrestricted use, distribution, and reproduction
   in any medium, provided the original author and source are credited.

   Funding: The sources of funding that supported the work presented in
   this paper include grants from the Office National de la Chasse et de
   la Faune Sauvage (to FP, JMG, CB, DD, and CW), from the Institut
   National de la Recherche Agronomique (to MH), from the Centre National
   de la Recherche Scientifique (to CB and JMG), and from the European
   Research Council (TC). The funders had no role in study design, data
   collection and analysis, decision to publish, or preparation of the
   manuscript.

   Competing interests: The authors have declared that no competing
   interests exist.

   Abbreviations: IPM, Integral Projection Model

Introduction

   Marked impacts of climate change on biodiversity have frequently been
   demonstrated, including temperature-related shifts in phenology and
   life-history traits [1]. Species living at high altitudes or latitudes
   are particularly affected by climate change [2],[3], but widespread
   species inhabiting temperate areas are also responding [4]. Global
   temperatures have risen by 0.89°C since 1901 [5], and this has led to
   an advance in the timing of key life-history events by, on average, 2.8
   d per decade [6]. Earlier springs have caused phenological
   modifications in most taxonomic groups [1],[7]. The phenology of
   vegetation, particularly trees, has advanced with time (by 3.3 d per
   decade [6]). A failure of species to track these changes may have
   important demographic consequences that, in turn, could impact
   conservation and management issues. Changes in the timing of
   reproduction have been well studied in birds [8]–[10], but have only
   recently been considered in mammals [3],[4],[11]. These studies suggest
   that a change in the timing of peak resource availability typically
   generates a change in median laying or breeding date [9],[12],[13].
   This response ensures that individuals can synchronize their energetic
   demands for offspring production and provisioning [14] with the period
   when environmental conditions are the most favorable [15].

   A key question about the consequences of global change is which species
   can respond and how [16]. Although most studied species have responded
   to match resource availability with energy requirements, the response
   is not always exact or immediate [17],[18]. Phenotypic plasticity may
   play a major role in the adjustment of reproductive timing to earlier
   springs [19]. In a population of great tits, those individuals that
   could vary their reproductive timing the most had higher fitness [20].
   But for individuals to shift their reproductive cycle in order to track
   environmental modifications, they require a reliable environmental cue
   [21],[22]. The timing of breeding is influenced by photoperiod in many
   species of birds and mammals [23]–[25], a cue that is clearly
   unaffected by climate change. Nonetheless, some species, including the
   great tit and red deer, rely on temperature [26],[27] to minimize the
   mismatch between birth timing and the peak resource availability. If
   earlier breeding increases fitness, selection could also drive a
   micro-evolutionary change in terms of advanced reproductive timing [8]
   as long as birth date is heritable. The relative role of phenotypic
   plasticity and micro-evolutionary change remains largely unquantified
   [28], although Réale et al. [4] showed that the advance in birth timing
   in red squirrel was mostly due to phenotypic plasticity rather than
   micro-evolution. Although some species have advanced their birth timing
   in response to increasing temperature, some species have not [29]
   whereas others have delayed their reproductive phenology [1]. For
   instance, Columbian ground squirrels have delayed their breeding
   phenology by 0.47 d per year over a period of 20 y, leading to a
   reduction in fitness by a half between 1993 and 2003 [3]. On the other
   hand, birth timing in caribou advanced at a much slower rate than the
   vegetation flush over a period of 33 years, so that the mismatch
   between birth timing and peak resource availability increased, causing
   calf production to decline [30],[31].

   Births are highly seasonal and synchronous in most large herbivores
   [32], including roe deer [33],[34], in which more than 90% occur within
   1 mo [35]. Roe deer females are income breeders and selectively feed on
   highly digestible and nutritious young shoots, especially during early
   lactation when energetic demand peaks [14]. Synchrony between births
   and the peak availability of high-quality vegetation is expected to be
   crucial for successful recruitment. The reproductive cycle of roe deer
   is unique among ungulates, including a phase of embryonic diapause that
   appears not to vary in duration among females [36]. As in reindeer
   where reproductive timing may be driven by day length [37], both
   ovulation and conception dates appear to be under the control of
   photoperiod [38], which could explain the lack of variation in
   parturition date across years for a given female [33],[35].

   Focusing on the mismatch between birth date and plant phenology, we
   investigate how climate change is currently affecting roe deer fitness.
   Our study on the intensively monitored roe deer population at Trois
   Fontaines, eastern France, spans 27 y, from 1985 to 2011. We tested the
   three following predictions: (i) As most mammals studied so far have
   shown a response to climate change, we expected that roe deer births
   should occur earlier in response to the advance in vegetation
   phenology. (ii) Because parturition date varies little across years for
   a given roe deer female [35], indicating limited phenotypic plasticity,
   but because it has been shown to be heritable in mammals [39],[40], and
   markedly influences early offspring survival [40], we expected any
   change in birth timing to be mainly the result of natural selection.
   And (iii) because such micro-evolutionary responses are often delayed,
   we expected that despite any advance in birth timing, the mismatch
   between peak energetic demand and peak resource availability should
   likely increase over time, leading to negative impacts on roe deer
   performance. Our study provides a unique quantification, to our
   knowledge, of the demographic costs associated with the failure of a
   species to modify its phenology in response to a warming world.

Results

Climate Change and Birth Date

   Analysis of local weather variables revealed a strong local impact of
   climate change that translated into increasingly earlier and warmer
   springs over time. Annual spring (April to June) temperature increased
   by 0.07°C per year (SE = 0.02, p = 0.001, Figure 1) at Trois Fontaines
   over the study period. Analysis of flowering date in the vineyards of
   the Champagne region indicated that annual timing of plant phenology in
   the region had advanced by 0.6 d per year (SE = 0.18, p = 0.002, Figure
   1) over this period, so that the peak in availability of high-quality
   resources for roe deer was increasingly early from 1985 to 2011. Spring
   mean temperature and flowering date in the Champagne region were
   negatively correlated over this period (ρ = −0.89, p<0.001). We
   therefore used flowering date as a proxy of the vegetation flush and
   compared it to annual variation in the timing of roe deer births. Roe
   deer give birth about 1 mo before the onset of flowering in Champagne
   because they preferentially feed on leaves and young shoots that become
   available before flowering. The mismatch between median birth date and
   vegetation phenology was estimated from the difference between median
   birth date and annual flowering date in the Champagne vineyards. We
   standardized this measure (by subtracting the observed value of
   mismatch in the first year (1985) from this variable) to obtain a
   relative measure of mismatch ranging from 0 in 1985 to 36 d in 2011.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Figure 1. Temporal variation in spring temperature (A), flowering date
   in the vineyards of the Champagne region (B), the observed population
   mean of the mismatch between flowering date and median parturition date
   (C), and mean individual fitness predicted from the IPM (D) in the roe
   deer population of Trois Fontaines, France from 1985 to 2011.

   The mismatch was estimated as the difference between median birth date
   and annual flowering date in the Champagne vineyards. We standardized
   this measure (by subtracting the observed value of the mismatch in the
   first year of study (1985) from this variable) to obtain a relative
   measure of mismatch ranging from 0 in 1985 to 36 d in 2011. Predicted
   trends are presented as black lines with 95% confidence intervals
   (dashed lines). Geometric means of mean individual fitness were
   calculated over periods of 4 y (black squares).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.g001

   In contradiction with our first prediction, annual median birth date
   did not occur earlier over time. Both the mean and median birth dates
   of roe deer at Trois Fontaines remained remarkably stable among years
   (based on 1,095 birth dates, mean = 136.1, SE = 8.56; time trend,
   t = −0.82, p = 0.421; and median = 136, the 16th of May, t = −1.23,
   p = 0.232 for mean and median birth dates, respectively, Figure S4A).
   Neither the spring mean temperature nor flowering date in the Champagne
   region had a detectable influence on median birth date (Pearson's
   product moment, ρ = −0.07, p = 0.730 and ρ = 0.11, p = 0.575 for spring
   mean temperature and flowering date, respectively). Consequently, the
   mismatch between median birth date and vegetation phenology increased
   by 0.54 d per year (SE = 0.20, p = 0.011, Figure 1) between 1985 and
   2011. We did not find any correlation between median birth date and
   other environmental drivers (Table S1), suggesting that roe deer
   females are unable to track these potential environmental cues.

Parturition Date, a Trait Under Strong Selection Pressure

   We investigated whether birth date of roe deer fulfilled the three
   necessary conditions for evolutionary change to occur: variability,
   heritability, and a selection pressure [41]. First, variation in
   parturition date among roe deer females has been recently quantified
   and found to be consistently high within several populations [35], with
   long-lived and/or heavier females (i.e., high-quality individuals)
   giving birth earlier than low-quality females [42]. Second, we found no
   strong statistical support for heritability in parturition date when
   estimated from the parent–offspring relationship based on 28
   daughter–mother pairs (β = 0.234, SE = 0.13, p = 0.094, h^2 = 0.127).
   Third, we identified directional selection favoring early births, with
   a strong negative relationship between individual birth date and
   individual early survival from May 12th onwards (on a logit scale
   β = −0.06, SE = 0.01, p<0.001, Figure S1). Note that year was included
   as a categorical variable in this model to control for interannual
   variation in environmental conditions affecting early survival. A model
   including a threshold effect of individual birth date on individual
   early survival provided a better fit than a linear (ΔAIC = 6.12) or a
   quadratic (ΔAIC = 0.50) model. Thus, a fawn born before May 12th had,
   on average, a 50% chance of surviving to 8 mo of age, whereas a fawn
   born on May 31st had, on average, only a 24% chance of surviving to
   that age. Adding a term describing interactive effects between birth
   date and year did not improve the fit of the model (ΔAIC = 9.28),
   indicating that the response of individual early survival to individual
   birth date was consistent across cohorts. Taken together these results
   suggest that we should not expect a strong micro-evolutionary response
   of parturition date in roe deer.

Demographic Consequences

   At the population level, cohort-specific survival (measured as the
   proportion of fawns that survived to the onset of winter each year) was
   negatively correlated with our index of mismatch (arcsine-square root
   transformation: β = −0.009, SE = 0.003, p = 0.012). Adding a quadratic
   term (ΔAIC = 1.95) or a threshold effect (ΔAIC = 1.86) of mismatch did
   not improve model fit. Early cohort-specific survival of juveniles
   decreased by 40% with an increase in mismatch of 1 mo (Figure 2).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Figure 2. Variation in mean cohort-specific early survival in relation
   to the mismatch between annual median birth date and vegetation
   phenology in the roe deer population of Trois Fontaines, France.

   The predicted relationship is represented by a black line with 95%
   confidence intervals (dashed lines). Data used to fit the models are
   represented by black squares whose size is proportional to the standard
   error of mean cohort-specific early survival.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.g002

   At the individual level, the mismatch was a better predictor of early
   survival (R^2 = 0.037) than birth date (R^2 = 0.025) (ΔAIC = 8.90,
   Table S2; note that year was not included in these models because
   interannual variation was integrated within the mismatch variable).
   Individual early survival was constant when the mismatch was 16 d or
   less, but then decreased linearly beyond 16 d of mismatch (Table S2,
   Figure 3). When birth occurred at least 1 mo (35 d) before flowering
   date in Champagne's vineyards, a fawn had an expected probability of
   0.5 of surviving to 8 mo of age, whereas this probability was only 0.25
   when birth occurred 2 wk prior to flowering (Figure 3).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Figure 3. Influence of the mismatch (measured as the difference in days
   between individual birth date and flowering date in Champagne) on
   individual early survival in the roe deer population of Trois
   Fontaines, France.

   The predicted values are presented after back-transformation from a
   logit scale with 95% confidence intervals (dashed lines). Data used to
   fit the model are represented by black squares whose size is
   proportional to the number of observed births within periods of 2.5 d
   (examples in the figures: 1 (in white), 82 fawns; 2 (in white), 115
   fawns).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.g003

   We built an IPM describing the temporal dynamics of parturition date in
   our roe deer population to quantify the impact of this increasing
   mismatch on roe deer fitness. The distribution of parturition date in
   the population at time t+1 depends on the distribution of parturition
   date at time t and on the four relationships linking parturition date
   with survival, recruitment, transition between two successive
   parturition events, and inheritance of parturition date between mother
   and offspring (see Text S1, Tables S2, S3, S4, and Figure S2 for
   further details [43],[44]). Annual flowering date in the vineyards of
   the Champagne region was included in the IPM to model the local shift
   in plant phenology. As most roe deer females give birth to two fawns
   [45] and the sex ratio is close to 0.5 at birth at Trois Fontaines
   [46], the recruitment function linking the number of female offspring a
   mother has successfully weaned given its parturition date was modeled
   by individual early survival (Table S5, Figure 3).

   The IPM predicted mean parturition date to occur on the 17th of May
   each year, with a very slight, but statistically significant, advance
   of just 0.27 d over the whole 27-y study period (β = −0.010,
   SE = 0.003, p = 0.006, Figure S4B). The model also predicted earlier
   parturition as females aged, with 2-y-old females giving birth, on
   average, 5 d later than older females (Figure S5). The estimated
   population growth rate, and so the mean fitness of females in the
   population, decreased by 6% on average over the study period
   (β = −0.003, SE = 0.001, p = 0.008, Figure 1), from 1.23 in 1985 to
   1.06 in 2011. Marked variability in environmental conditions between
   successive years often leads to a decrease in the arithmetic mean
   population growth rate [47]. Consequently, we estimated the geometric
   mean of population growth rate for successive periods of 4 y. The
   geometric mean population growth rate also decreased over the study
   period (β = −0.009, SE = 0.002, p = 0.002). Thus, the IPM allowed us to
   demonstrate a clear impact of the mismatch between energy demand and
   peak resource availability on mean fitness, which declined in this
   population of roe deer over the entire study period. In accordance with
   these results, we also observed a decrease in mean annual female
   reproductive success over the study period (β = −0.027, SE = 0.005,
   p<0.001; note that these data are independent of those used to build
   the IPM, see Figure S3).

Discussion

   This study has demonstrated that mean fitness is currently decreasing
   in this roe deer population due to the lack of response in parturition
   date to the increasingly early availability of high-quality resources
   induced by climate change. Warming at Trois Fontaines over the last 27
   y (0.46°C per decade) was more than threefold greater than the average
   global expectation from the 2013 IPCC report on climate change (0.12
   [0.08–0.14] per decade since 1951, [5]). This local warming has led to
   an advance in spring plant phenology [48] demonstrated by the advance
   in flowering date in Champagne's vineyards. In contrast to most other
   studied mammals that have been able to track resource availability by
   advancing their birth timing [3],[4],[13],[49], the median birth date
   of roe deer remained constant over years. This generated an increased
   mismatch between mean birth date and phenology of the vegetation such
   that at the end of the study period fawns were born relatively later
   with respect to the peak in availability of high quality resources.
   Post and Forchhammer [30] were the first to describe a negative impact
   of a mismatch between resource availability and birth timing on calf
   production in Greenland caribou. In our study, climate change over
   recent decades has had a similarly negative impact on early survival
   (i.e., a “climatic debt” [16]), both at the individual and at the
   population levels. Furthermore, we were able to show that this mismatch
   between parturition and the availability of highly digestible forage
   led to a decline in mean fitness of 6% over the study period, and of
   14% between 1985 and those years when the vegetation flush was
   particularly early (2007 and 2011). This link between plant phenology
   and roe deer population dynamics, mostly driven through recruitment, is
   the likely mechanism for the observed decrease in population growth
   rate over time [50].

   Our study provides an illustration of the probable fitness costs for
   species which do not respond to climate change. Indeed, the increasing
   mismatch between the peak of roe deer births and the onset of the
   vegetation flush in recent years had a negative impact on both early
   survival and mean fitness. Previous studies have reported an impact of
   climate change on recruitment [30],[51],[52]. However, the influence of
   mismatch on fitness and population dynamics has received much less
   attention. IPMs allow the phenotypic consequences of climate change to
   be explored (see also [49]), which is not possible using classical
   statistical methods. In contrast to a recent study on birds [53], we
   found that population growth rate of roe deer was not buffered against
   phenological mismatch. Mean fitness was most strongly affected during
   years when plant phenology was particularly early, for example, in 2007
   and 2011 (λ = 1.07 versus λ = 1.23 for the first year of the study). We
   can therefore predict that this increasing mismatch will further
   increase the energetic costs of breeding for females [54] as spring
   phenology continues to advance in the future.

   The lack of response in roe deer birth date to climate change provides
   a stark contrast with the previous findings on most mammalian species
   studied to date, which have shown phenotypic responses to climate
   change [3],[4],[13],[49]. Despite the clear selection pressure that we
   demonstrated, which should favor earlier births over time, we showed
   that a strong evolutionary change is not expected in roe deer. Indeed,
   we found no strong statistical support for heritability of birth date,
   despite the fact that parent–offspring regressions are known to
   overestimate heritabilities [55]. However, as the number of
   mother–daughter pairs (N = 28) available to assess heritability of
   birth date was low, further work on a much larger sample size is
   required to explore this question. Nonetheless, both the classical
   statistical approach and the IPM provided similar results and clearly
   indicated no change in roe deer reproductive timing. Although roe deer
   did not exhibit an evolutionary response to climate change, why have
   they not responded plastically [4],[20]?

   Roe deer females appear unable to track environmental cues such as
   temperature to time their birth event. Birth timing in mammals is
   mainly driven by the date of conception and gestation length. Ovulation
   and, thereby, conception date is mainly under the control of
   photoperiod in roe deer [38]. Gestation begins with a phase of
   embryonic diapause that probably originally evolved to increase
   gestation length [56], but we expected this historical selection
   pressure for delayed birth to be counterbalanced by selection for
   earlier birth date in response to climate change over recent times.
   However, diapause appears to be triggered by an intrinsic mechanism
   involving the mother or even the embryo itself, and the 5-mo duration
   appears not to vary among females [36]. In many species, adaptive
   phenotypic plasticity has generated a response to changes in phenology
   (great tit [57], red squirrel [4]). In red deer, a species related to
   roe deer that is able to track earlier plant phenology [13], gestation
   length decreased with increasing average temperature in March [58]. In
   contrast, in roe deer, we have shown that parturition timing is
   independent of changes in temperature and in the onset of the
   vegetation flush, suggesting this lack of phenotypic plasticity in
   birth timing is associated with an inability to track environmental
   cues of variation in resource availability for the timing of
   parturition.

   Earlier plant phenology is likely the main cause of the observed
   decrease in early survival, and thereby in mean fitness, in this roe
   deer population. Although the roe deer population consistently
   displayed positive growth over the 27-y study period (i.e., λ
   consistently higher than 1), population growth rate (and therefore
   average individual fitness) decreased in a continuous fashion by 6%
   over this period. Moreover, temperatures are expected to increase
   further in the future, causing the phenology of vegetation to advance
   still further. We suggest that these combined effects could impose a
   brake on the demographic and geographical expansion of roe deer, a
   common and previously successful species across all Europe [59].

Materials and Methods

Studied Site and Population

   Trois Fontaines (48°43N, 2°61W) is an enclosed 1,360 ha forest located
   near Saint-Dizier, at the border of Marne and Haute-Marne counties in
   north-eastern France. In spring (from mid-March to mid-June), the
   number of rainy days averaged 31.5 (ranging between 18 and 52 d during
   the study period 1985–2011) and the temperature averaged 10.4°C
   (ranging between −6.06°C and 15.00°C). The forest is dominated by oak
   (Quercus sp.) and beech (Fagus sylvatica). Roe deer feed mainly on
   coppice and the understory is dominated by hornbeam (Carpinus betulus),
   ivy (Hedera helix), and bramble (Rubus sp.).

Data Collection

   The roe deer population at Trois Fontaines has been intensively
   monitored for more than 35 y by the Office National de la Chasse et de
   la Faune Sauvage based on a detailed Capture-Mark-Recapture program.
   Roe deer are individually marked using numbered collars and ear-tags. A
   systematic search for newborn fawns was conducted every year from late
   April to mid-June between 1985 and 2010 [60]. In 2011, searches ended
   earlier and the last fawn was found on May 20th. Fawns were handled by
   experienced people, ear-tagged, and weighed. Their sex was recorded and
   their age estimated to the nearest day using umbilicus characteristics
   and behaviour at marking [61]. Birth dates were back-calculated using
   these estimated ages and the day of capture. The average age at marking
   was about 5 d, and all fawns were marked within 20 d. The identity of
   the mother for a given fawn was established, when possible, through
   direct observations of lactating behavior or by the identification of
   an escaping female in the vicinity of the fawn. From January to March,
   annual capture sessions took place, with capture of more than 50% of
   the roe deer population each year, providing reliable information on
   the fate of animals marked at birth. Individual early survival was
   defined as the probability of survival of a fawn from birth to the next
   winter (see [62] for further details). At Trois Fontaines, fawn
   mortality was most likely associated with shortage of high-quality food
   because this population is not subject to marked predation or hunting
   pressure. At the population level, mean cohort-specific early survival
   was estimated using Capture-Recapture analyses [63] from 1985 to 2011.
   Cohort-specific early survival could not be estimated with accuracy for
   2012 (see [62]), so these data were not included here. Data are
   available from Table S6.

Climate Change and Parturition Date

   The local daily temperature was collected from the Météo-France weather
   station of Saint-Dizier located at less than 5 km from the study site.
   Spring temperature (April to June) was used to assess the magnitude of
   climate warming at the local scale. To measure annual changes in
   vegetation phenology, we used the mean flowering date of vineyards in
   the Champagne region collected by the Comité Interprofessionnel du Vin
   de Champagne and available on the website of the French Observatoire
   National sur les Effets du Réchauffement Climatique
   (http://www.developpement-durable.gouv.fr/-Impacts-et-adaptation-ONERC-
   .html). Flowering date is little influenced by human activity and
   reliably reflects the phenology of the vegetation of that year.
   Moreover, flowering date in Champagne is highly correlated with the
   local sum of degree-days (ρ = −0.61, p<0.001), which is often used to
   index vegetation growth [13],[64], with spring temperature (ρ = −0.83,
   p<0.001) and with annual mean temperature (ρ = −0.57, p<0.001). As a
   consequence, flowering date in Champagne reliably indexes the overall
   changes in plant phenology over years. When flowering date in Champagne
   was early in the year, we assumed that the availability of high-quality
   resources for roe deer provided by spring vegetation was also early.
   Consequently, we used the difference between birth date and flowering
   date in Champagne as a measure of the mismatch between birth date and
   peak resource availability.

   To assess temporal trends in local temperature, vegetation phenology,
   and birth date, we fitted linear regressions with a Gaussian error.
   Subsequently, we examined the relationships of cohort-specific median
   birth date with mean spring temperature and with flowering date in
   Champagne to test whether birth date tracked climate change. To
   quantify the mismatch between median birth date and the vegetation
   flush at the population level, we subtracted the median birth date from
   the annual flowering date.

Birth Date: A Trait Under Selection?

   Available data were not detailed enough to build pedigrees, so we
   measured heritability using the weighted regression of the median
   parturition date of each daughter against the median parturition date
   of her mother [65]. To assess whether roe deer birth date was under
   selection, we analyzed the relationship between birth date and early
   survival at the level of the individual with a generalized linear model
   and a logit link. We included year in the model to control for
   interannual variation in environmental conditions. We tested for
   linear, quadratic, and threshold effects of birth date on individual
   early survival. Finally, we tested for an interaction between birth
   date and year to investigate whether the selection pressure was similar
   over time.

Demographic Consequences of the Mismatch

   To assess whether roe deer exhibited a phenotypic response to climate
   change, both at the population and individual levels, we used mean
   cohort-specific early survival after an arcsine-square root
   transformation; we investigated the relationships between
   cohort-specific early survival and the mismatch, testing for linear,
   quadratic, and threshold effects of the mismatch. Each point of the
   regression was weighted (using the inverse of the variance of
   cohort-specific early survival) to account for uncertainty in the
   estimates of cohort-specific survival. Then, we investigated whether
   the mismatch was a better predictor of early survival than birth date
   at the individual level. We did not include year in this model as
   among-year variations were integrated within the mismatch variable. We
   tested for linear, quadratic, and threshold effects of birth date or
   the birth date–vegetation phenology mismatch on individual early
   survival with a generalized linear model and a logit link. We compared
   the relative fit of the different models using the Akaike Information
   Criterion (AIC).

   To investigate the influence of plant phenology on mean fitness, we
   built an Integral Projection Model (IPM, [43],[44]) describing the
   dynamics of parturition date in the population. Selection and
   estimations for the models describing the four functions defining the
   IPM (survival, recruitment, transition, and inheritance) are detailed
   in the Supporting Information section. This IPM allowed us to
   investigate the influence of the timing of peak resource availability
   on the outputs of the model: the annual asymptotic population growth
   rate, in other words, annual mean fitness over the study period. As
   previous studies in this population have revealed no effect of density
   dependence on any of the demographic parameters, we did not include
   density in our demographic analysis (supplementary material of [50]).

Supporting Information

Figure S1.

   Influence of individual birth date (expressed as the day of year
   between 110 (20th April) and 161 (10th June)) on individual early
   survival in the roe deer population of Trois Fontaines, France. The
   predicted values are presented after back-transformation from a logit
   scale with 95% confidence intervals (dashed lines). Data used to fit
   the model are represented by black squares whose size is proportional
   to the number of observed births within periods of 2 d.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s001

   (EPS)

Figure S2.

   Recruitment, survival, transition, and inheritance functions in the roe
   deer population of Trois Fontaines, France, used to build the IPM.
   Parturition date varies between the days of the year of 110 (20th
   April) and 161 (10th June).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s002

   (EPS)

Figure S3.

   Temporal variation in mean annual reproductive success (measured in
   fall) of roe deer females in the population of Trois Fontaines from
   1985 to 2010. Reproductive success was estimated by direct observations
   of the maternal group (mother and fawns) between September and December
   to determine the number of fawns successfully weaned. Predicted trends
   are presented as black lines with 95% confidence intervals (dashed
   lines). The size of the circle is proportional to the number of females
   for which reproductive success was recorded each year.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s003

   (EPS)

Figure S4.

   Annual median parturition dates in the population of roe deer from
   Trois Fontaines, France, from 1985 to 2011. (A) Observed and (B)
   predicted (from the IPM) parturition dates. Standard errors of median
   observed and mean predicted parturition dates are provided.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s004

   (EPS)

Figure S5.

   Stable distribution of parturition date (A) and mean parturition date
   in relation to age (B) predicted from the IPM in the population of roe
   deer from Trois Fontaines, France. Parturition date varies between the
   days of the year of 91 (1st April) and 181 (30th June).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s005

   (EPS)

Table S1.

   Influence of environmental variables on annual median birth date. We
   investigated the influence of flowering date in the vineyards of the
   Champagne region (Flow. date), annual mean temperature (Annual T), mean
   spring (April, May, and June) temperature (Spring T), sum of spring
   precipitation (Spring Prec), sum of degree-days above 7°C before the
   birth season (SDD), mean winter (January, February, March) temperature
   (Winter T), sum of winter precipitation (Winter Prec), mean fall
   (October, November, December) temperature (Fall T), sum of fall
   precipitation (Fall Prec), mean summer (July and August) temperature
   (Summer T), and sum of summer precipitation (Summer Prec). These
   periods where chosen in relation to the reproductive cycle of roe deer:
   births occur in spring, true gestation occurs during winter, embryonic
   diapause occurs in fall, and the rut takes place in summer. *The
   correlation between median birth date and sum of degree-days was
   performed excluding the outlier year of 1986.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s006

   (PDF)

Table S2.

   Individual early survival (recruitment function) in the roe deer
   population of Trois Fontaines, France.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s007

   (PDF)

Table S3.

   Transition function between two successive parturition dates in the roe
   deer population of Trois Fontaines, France.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s008

   (PDF)

Table S4.

   Inheritance function of parturition date between mother and daughter in
   the roe deer population of Trois Fontaines, France.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s009

   (PDF)

Table S5.

   Models of the functions used to build the IPM describing the
   distributions of parturition date (PD). M, Mother; D, Daughter.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s010

   (PDF)

Table S6.

   Datafile. Year of birth, sex (1, male; 2, female), birth date (day of
   the year), family (0, single fawns; >0, identity of the twin pair) and
   early survival (0, died; 1, survived until 8 mo of age).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s011

   (XLSX)

Text S1.

   Integral Projection Model on parturition date.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.1001828.s012

   (DOC)

Acknowledgments

   We thank the Office National de la Chasse et de la Faune Sauvage and
   the many volunteers and colleagues who participated in catching and
   monitoring fawns on the study site of Trois Fontaines. We are grateful
   to the Comité Interprofessionnel du Vin de Champagne for collecting the
   data on the flowering date of the vineyards in the Champagne region and
   we thank Jean-Luc Dupouey for consultation during the analysis design.

Author Contributions

   The author(s) have made the following declarations about their
   contributions: Conceived and designed the experiments: JMG TC MH CB FP.
   Performed the experiments: DD CW. Analyzed the data: FP. Contributed
   reagents/materials/analysis tools: JMG TC MH CB FP DD CW. Wrote the
   paper: JMG TC MH CB FP DD CW.

References

    1. 1. Root TL, Price JT, Hall KR, Schneider SH, Rosenzweig C, et al.
       (2003) Fingerprints of global warming on wild animals and plants.
       Nature 421: 57–60.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    2. 2. Post E, Forchhammer MC, Bret-Harte MS, Callaghan TV, Christensen
       TR, et al. (2009) Ecological dynamics across the Arctic associated
       with recent climate change. Science 325: 1355–1358.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    3. 3. Lane JE, Kruuk LEB, Charmantier A, Murie JO, Dobson FS (2012)
       Delayed phenology and reduced fitness associated with climate
       change in a wild hibernator. Nature 489: 554–557.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    4. 4. Réale D, McAdam AG, Boutin S, Berteaux D (2003) Genetic and
       plastic responses of a northern mammal to climate change. Proc R
       Soc B 270: 591–596.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    5. 5. IPCC (2013) Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change: Fifth
       Assessment Report.
    6. 6. Parmesan C (2007) Inuences of species, latitudes and
       methodologies on estimates of phenological response to global
       warming. Glob Chang Biol 13: 1860–1872.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    7. 7. Parmesan C, Yohe G (2003) A globally coherent fingerprint of
       climate change impacts across natural systems. Nature 421: 37–42.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    8. 8. Price T, Kirkpatrick M, Arnold SJ (1988) Directional selection
       and the evolution of breeding date in birds. Science 240: 798–799.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    9. 9. Dunn PO, Winkler DW (1999) Climate change has affected the
       breeding date of tree swallows throughout North America. Proc R Soc
       B 266: 2487–2490.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   10. 10. Crick HQP (2004) The impact of climate change on birds. Ibis
       146: 48–56.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   11. 11. Coulson T, Kruuk LEB, Tavecchia G, Pemberton JM, Clutton-Brock
       TH (2003) Estimating selection on neonatal traits in red deer using
       elasticity path analysis. Evolution 57: 2879–2892.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   12. 12. Reed TE, Warzybok P, Wilson AJ, Bradley RW, Wanless S, et al.
       (2009) Timing is everything: exible phenology and shifting
       selection in a colonial seabird. J Anim Ecol 78: 376–387.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   13. 13. Moyes K, Nussey DH, Clements MN, Guinness FE, Morris A, et al.
       (2011) Advancing breeding phenology in response to environmental
       change in a wild red deer population. Glob Chang Biol 17:
       2455–2469.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   14. 14. Clutton-Brock TH, Albon SD, Guinness FE (1989) Fitness costs of
       gestation and lactation in wild mammals. Nature 337: 260–262.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   15. 15. Van Noordwijk AJ, McCleery RH, Perrins CM (1995) Selection for
       the timing of great tit breeding in relation to caterpillar growth
       and temperature. J Anim Ecol 64: 451–458.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   16. 16. Devictor V, van Swaay C, Brereton T, Brotons L, Chamberlain D,
       et al. (2012) Differences in the climatic debts of birds and
       butteries at a continental scale. Nature Clim Change 2: 121–124.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   17. 17. Stenseth NC, Mysterud A (2002) Climate, changing phenology, and
       other life history traits: nonlinearity and matchmismatch to the
       environment. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA 99: 13379–13381.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   18. 18. Visser ME, Both C, Lambrechts MM, A Moller WF (2004) Global
       climate change leads to mistimed avian reproduction. Adv Ecol Res
       35: 89–110.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   19. 19. Przybylo R, Sheldon BC, Merilä J (2000) Climatic effects on
       breeding and morphology: evidence for phenotypic plasticity. J Anim
       Ecol 69: 395–403.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   20. 20. Nussey DH, Postma E, Gienapp P, Visser M (2005) Selection on
       heritable phenotypic plasticity in a wild bird population. Science
       310: 304–306.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   21. 21. Visser ME, Both C (2005) Shifts in phenology due to global
       climate change: the need for a yardstick. Proc R Soc B 272:
       2561–2569.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   22. 22. Reed TE, Waples RS, Schindler DE, Hard JJ, Kinnison MT (2010)
       Phenotypic plasticity and population viability: the importance of
       environmental predictability. Proc R Soc B 277: 3391–3400.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   23. 23. Lambrechts MM, Blondel J, Maistre M, Perret P (1997) A single
       response mechanism is responsible for evolutionary adaptive
       variation in a birds laying date. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA 94:
       5153–5155.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   24. 24. Goldman BD (2001) Mammalian photoperiodic system: formal
       properties and neuroendocrine mechanisms of photoperiodic time
       measurement. J Biol Rhythm 16: 283–301.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   25. 25. Dawson A, King VM, Bentley GE, Ball GF (2001) Photoperiodic
       control of seasonality in birds. J Biol Rhythm 16: 365–380.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   26. 26. Visser ME, Schaper SV, Holleman LJM, Dawson A, Sharp P, et al.
       (2011) Genetic variation in cue sensitivity involved in avian
       timing of reproduction. Funct Ecol 25: 868–877.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   27. 27. Caro SP, Schaper SV, Hut RA, Ball GF, Visser ME (2013) The case
       of the missing mechanism: how does temperature influence seasonal
       timing in endotherms? PLoS Biol 11: e1001517.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   28. 28. Gienapp P, Teplitsky C, Alho JS, Mills JA, Merilä J (2008)
       Climate change and evolution: disentangling environmental and
       genetic responses. Mol Ecol 17: 167–178.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   29. 29. Visser ME, van Noordwijk AJ, Tinbergen JM, Lessells CM (1998)
       Warmer springs lead to mistimed reproduction in great tits (Parus
       major). Proc R Soc B 265: 1867–1870.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   30. 30. Post E, Forchhammer MC (2008) Climate change reduces
       reproductive success of an Arctic herbivore through trophic
       mismatch. Philos Trans R Soc Lond B Biol Sci 363: 2369–2375.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   31. 31. Kerby JT, Post E (2013) Advancing plant phenology and reduced
       herbivore production in a terrestrial system associated with sea
       ice decline. Nat Commun 4: 2514.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   32. 32. Bronson FH (1989) Mammalian reproductive biology. Chicago:
       University of Chicago Press.
   33. 33. Gaillard JM, Delorme D, Jullien JM, Tatin D (1993) Timing and
       synchrony of birth in roe deer. J Mammal 74: 738–744.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   34. 34. Linnell JDC, Andersen R (1998) Timing and synchrony of birth in
       a hider species, the roe deer Capreolus capreolus. J Zool 244:
       497–504.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   35. 35. Plard F, Gaillard JM, Bonenfant C, Hewison AJM, Delorme D, et
       al. (2013) Parturition date for a given female is highly repeatable
       within five roe deer populations. Biol Lett 9: 20120841.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   36. 36. Aitken R (1975) Ultrastructure of blastocyst and endometrium of
       roe deer Capreolus capreolus during delayed implantation. J Anat
       119: 369–384.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   37. 37. Lu W, Meng QJ, Tyler NJC, Stokkan KA, Loudon ASI (2010) A
       circadian clock is not required in an Arctic mammal. Curr Biol 20:
       533–537.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   38. 38. Sempéré AJ, Blanvillain C, Mauget R, Chemineau P (1993) Deer in
       China: biology and management. In N. Ohtaishi and H.I. Sheng eds.
       The role of the photoperiod in the sexual cycle in female roe deer
       (Capreolus capreolus). pp. 364–371.
   39. 39. Réale D, Berteaux D, McAdam AG, Boutin S (2003) Lifetime
       selection on heritable life-history traits in a natural population
       of red squirrels. Evolution 57: 2416–2423.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   40. 40. Feder C, Martin JGA, Festa-Bianchet M, Bérubé C, Jorgenson J
       (2008) Never too late? Consequences of late birthdate for mass and
       survival of bighorn lambs. Oecologia 156: 773–781.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   41. 41. Fisher RA (1930) The genetical theory of natural selection.
       Oxford, UK: The Clarendon Press.
   42. 42. Plard F, Gaillard JM, Coulson T, Hewison AJM, Delorme D, et al.
       (in press) Long-lived and heavier females give birth earlier in roe
       deer. Ecography
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   43. 43. Ellner S, Rees M (2006) Integral projection models for species
       with complex demography. Am Nat 167: 410–428.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   44. 44. Coulson T (2012) Integral projections models, their
       construction and use in posing hypotheses in ecology. Oikos 121:
       1337–1350.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   45. 45. Gaillard JM, Andersen R, Delorme D, Linnell JDC (1998) Family
       effects on growth and survival of juvenile roe deer. Ecology 79:
       2878–2889.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   46. 46. Hewison AJM, Andersen R, Gaillard JM, Linnell JDC, Delorme D
       (1999) Contradictory findings in studies of sex ratio variation in
       roe deer (Capreolus capreolus). Behav Ecol Sociobiol 45: 339–348.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   47. 47. Tuljapurkar S (1989) An uncertain life: demography in random
       environments. Theor Popul Biol 35: 227–294.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   48. 48. Schwartz MD, Ahas R, Aasa A (2006) Onset of spring starting
       earlier across the Northern Hemisphere. Glob Chang Biol 12:
       343–351.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   49. 49. Ozgul A, Childs DZ, Oli MK, Armitage KB, Blumstein DT, et al.
       (2010) Coupled dynamics of body mass and population growth in
       response to environmental change. Nature 466: 482–485.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   50. 50. Gaillard JM, Hewison AJM, Klein F, Plard F, Douhard M, et al.
       (2013) How does climate change influence demographic processes of
       widespread species? Lessons from the comparative analysis of
       contrasted populations of roe deer. Ecol Lett 16: 48–57.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   51. 51. Burthe S, Butler A, Searle KR, Hall SJ, Thackeray SJ, et al.
       (2011) Demographic consequences of increased winter births in a
       large aseasonally breeding mammal (Bos taurus) in response to
       climate change. J Anim Ecol 80: 1134–1144.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   52. 52. Reed TE, Jenouvrier S, Visser ME (2012) Phenological mismatch
       strongly affects individual fitness but not population demography
       in a woodland passerine. J Anim Ecol 82: 131–144.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   53. 53. Reed TE, Grotan V, Jenouvrier S, Saether BE, Visser ME (2013)
       Population growth in a wild bird is buffered against phenological
       mismatch. Science 340: 488–491.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   54. 54. Thomas DW, Blondel J, Perret P, Lambrechts MM, Speakman JR
       (2001) Energetic and fitness costs of mismatching resource supply
       and demand in seasonally breeding birds. Science 291: 2598–2600.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   55. 55. Merilä J, Sheldon BC, Kruuk LEB (2001) Explaining stasis:
       microevolutionary studies in natural populations. Genetica 112–113:
       199–222.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   56. 56. Sandell M (1990) The evolution of seasonal delayed
       implantation. Q Rev Biol 65: 23–42.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   57. 57. Charmantier A, McCleery RH, Cole LR, Perrins C, Kruuk LEB, et
       al. (2008) Adaptive phenotypic plasticity in response to climate
       change in a wild bird population. Science 320: 800–803.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   58. 58. Clements MN, Clutton-Brock TH, Albon SD, Pemberton JM, Kruuk LE
       (2011) Gestation length variation in a wild ungulate. Funct Ecol
       25: 691–703.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   59. 59. Andersen R, Duncan P, Linnell JDC (1998) The European Roe Deer:
       the biology of Success. Oslo, Norway: Scandinavian University
       Press.
   60. 60. Delorme D, Gaillard JM, Jullien JM (1988) Intérêt de l'étude de
       la période juvénile pour le suivi de l'évolution d'une population
       de chevreuils (Capreolus capreolus). Gibier Faune Sauvage 5: 15–26.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   61. 61. Jullien JM, Delorme D, Gaillard JM (1992) Détermination de
       l'âge chez le faon de chevreuil (Capreolus capreolus) dans son
       premier mois de vie. Mammalia 56: 307–311.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   62. 62. Pettorelli N, Gaillard JM, Yoccoz NG, Duncan P, Maillard D, et
       al. (2005) The response of fawn survival to changes in habitat
       quality varies according to cohort quality and spatial scale. J
       Anim Ecol 74: 972–981.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   63. 63. Lebreton JD, Burnham KP, Clobert J, Anderson DR (1992) Modeling
       survival and testing biological hypotheses using marked animals: a
       unified approach with case studies. Ecol Monogr 62: 67–118.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   64. 64. Bonhomme R (2000) Bases and limits to using ‘degree.day’ units.
       Eur J Agron 13: 1–10.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   65. 65. Falconer DS, Mackay TFC (1996) Introduction to quantitative
       genetics. Longman.

   Download PDF

     * Citation
     * XML

   Print
     * Print article
     * EzReprint

   Share
     * Reddit Reddit
     * Google+ Google+
     * Facebook Facebook
     * LinkedIn LinkedIn
     * Mendeley Mendeley
     * PubChase PubChase
     * Twitter Twitter
     * Email Email

     [CROSSMARK_BW_horizontal.svg]

Related PLOS Articles

     * Will Roe Deer Persist in a Warmer World?

   Advertisement

Subject Areas

   ?

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.
   We want your feedback. Do these Subject Areas make sense for this
   article? Click the target next to the incorrect Subject Area and let us
   know. Thanks for your help!
     * Deer
       Is the Subject Area "Deer" applicable to this article? (BUTTON) Yes
       (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Climate change
       Is the Subject Area "Climate change" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Spring (season)
       Is the Subject Area "Spring (season)" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * France
       Is the Subject Area "France" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Mammals
       Is the Subject Area "Mammals" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Population growth
       Is the Subject Area "Population growth" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Birds
       Is the Subject Area "Birds" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Heredity
       Is the Subject Area "Heredity" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.

Archived Tweets

   Load more
   View all tweets

     * Publications
     * PLOS Biology
     * PLOS Medicine
     * PLOS Computational Biology
     * PLOS Genetics
     * PLOS Pathogens
     * PLOS ONE
     * PLOS Neglected Tropical Diseases

     * Home
     * Blogs
     * Collections
     * Give feedback
     * LOCKSS

     * Privacy Policy
     * Terms of Use
     * Advertise
     * Media Inquiries
     * Contact

   PLOS is a nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation, #C2354500, based in San
   Francisco, California, US
   PLOS
   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TP26BH

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MQQMGF

   Advertisement

     * plos.org
     * create account
     * sign in

PLOS ONE

     * Publish
          + Submissions
               o Getting Started
               o Submission Guidelines
               o Figures
               o Tables
               o Supporting Information
               o LaTeX
               o Preprints
               o Revising Your Manuscript
               o Submit Now
               o Calls for Papers
          + Policies
               o Best Practices in Research Reporting
               o Human Subjects Research
               o Animal Research
               o Competing Interests
               o Disclosure of Funding Sources
               o Licenses and Copyright
               o Data Availability
               o Materials and Software Sharing
               o Ethical Publishing Practice
               o Authorship
               o Downloads and Translations
          + Manuscript Review and Publication
               o Criteria for Publication
               o Editorial and Peer Review Process
               o Editor Center
               o Guidelines for Reviewers
               o Accepted Manuscripts
               o Corrections and Retractions
               o Comments
               o Article-Level Metrics

Submit Your Manuscript
       Discover a faster, simpler path to publishing in a high-quality
       journal. PLOS ONE promises fair, rigorous peer review, broad scope,
       and wide readership – a perfect fit for your research every time.
       Learn More Submit Now
     * About
          + Why Publish with PLOS ONE
          + Journal Information
          + Staff Editors
          + Editorial Board
          + Section Editors
          + Advisory Groups
          + Find and Read Articles
          + Publishing Information
          + Publication Fees
          + Press and Media
          + Contact
     * Browse
     *

       Search

       Search
       ____________________ (BUTTON)

       advanced search

   Browse Subject Areas
   ?

   Click through the PLOS taxonomy to find articles in your field.

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.

     * Loading metrics

   Open Access

   Peer-reviewed

   Research Article

Understanding climate change from a global analysis of city analogues

     * Jean-Francois Bastin ,
       Roles Conceptualization, Formal analysis, Methodology, Supervision,
       Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       * E-mail: bastin.jf@gmail.com
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0003-2602-7247
       ⨯
     * Emily Clark,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Thomas Elliott,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Simon Hart,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Plant Ecology, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Johan van den Hoogen,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0001-6624-8461
       ⨯
     * Iris Hordijk,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0002-6302-6254
       ⨯
     * Haozhi Ma,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Sabiha Majumder,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Gabriele Manoli,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Department of Civil, Environmental and Geomatic
       Engineering, Institute of Environmental Engineering, ETH Zürich,
       Zürich, Switzerland
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0002-9245-2877
       ⨯
     * Julia Maschler,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Lidong Mo,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Devin Routh,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Kailiang Yu,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Constantin M. Zohner,
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯
     * Thomas W. Crowther
       Roles Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Crowther Lab, Department of Environmental Systems
       Science, Institute of Integrative Biology, ETH Zürich, Zürich,
       Switzerland
       ⨯

Understanding climate change from a global analysis of city analogues

     * Jean-Francois Bastin,
     * Emily Clark,
     * Thomas Elliott,
     * Simon Hart,
     * Johan van den Hoogen,
     * Iris Hordijk,
     * Haozhi Ma,
     * Sabiha Majumder,
     * Gabriele Manoli,
     * Julia Maschler

   PLOS
   x
     * Published: July 10, 2019
     * https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592

     * Article
     * Authors
     * Metrics
     * Comments
     * Media Coverage

     * Reader Comments (3)
     * Media Coverage
     * Figures

Figures

   Fig 1
   Fig 2
   Fig 3
   Fig 4

Abstract

   Combating climate change requires unified action across all sectors of
   society. However, this collective action is precluded by the ‘consensus
   gap’ between scientific knowledge and public opinion. Here, we test the
   extent to which the iconic cities around the world are likely to shift
   in response to climate change. By analyzing city pairs for 520 major
   cities of the world, we test if their climate in 2050 will resemble
   more closely to their own current climate conditions or to the current
   conditions of other cities in different bioclimatic regions. Even under
   an optimistic climate scenario (RCP 4.5), we found that 77% of future
   cities are very likely to experience a climate that is closer to that
   of another existing city than to its own current climate. In addition,
   22% of cities will experience climate conditions that are not currently
   experienced by any existing major cities. As a general trend, we found
   that all the cities tend to shift towards the sub-tropics, with cities
   from the Northern hemisphere shifting to warmer conditions, on average
   ~1000 km south (velocity ~20 km.year^-1), and cities from the tropics
   shifting to drier conditions. We notably predict that Madrid’s climate
   in 2050 will resemble Marrakech’s climate today, Stockholm will
   resemble Budapest, London to Barcelona, Moscow to Sofia, Seattle to San
   Francisco, Tokyo to Changsha. Our approach illustrates how complex
   climate data can be packaged to provide tangible information. The
   global assessment of city analogues can facilitate the understanding of
   climate change at a global level but also help land managers and city
   planners to visualize the climate futures of their respective cities,
   which can facilitate effective decision-making in response to on-going
   climate change.

   Citation: Bastin J-F, Clark E, Elliott T, Hart S, van den Hoogen J,
   Hordijk I, et al. (2019) Understanding climate change from a global
   analysis of city analogues. PLoS ONE 14(7): e0217592.
   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592

   Editor: Juan A. Añel, Universidade de Vigo, SPAIN

   Received: February 14, 2019; Accepted: May 8, 2019; Published: July 10,
   2019

   Copyright: © 2019 Bastin et al. This is an open access article
   distributed under the terms of the Creative Commons Attribution
   License, which permits unrestricted use, distribution, and reproduction
   in any medium, provided the original author and source are credited.

   Data Availability: All relevant data are within the manuscript and its
   Supporting Information files.

   Funding: Author TWC is supported by grant from DOB Ecology. The funders
   had no role in study design, data collection and analysis, decision to
   publish, or preparation of the manuscript. The authors received no
   specific funding for this work.

   Competing interests: The authors have declared that no competing
   interests exist.

Introduction

   The gap between the scientific and public understanding of climate
   change, referred to as the “Consensus Gap”, is largely attributed to
   failures in climate change communication[1]. Often limited to ad-hoc
   reporting of extreme weather events or intangible, long-term climate
   impacts (e.g. changes in average temperature by 2100). Despite an
   exhaustive list of risks associated to climate change [2] (e.g. heat
   stress, air and water quality, food supply, distribution of vectors of
   diseases, social factors), the intangible nature of reporting on
   climate change fails to adequately convey the urgency of this issue to
   a public audience on a consistent basis[3]. It is hard for most people
   to envision how an additional 2°C of warming might affect daily life.
   This ineffective communication of climate change facts, compounded by
   uncertainty about the extent of expected changes, has left the door
   open for widespread misinterpretation about the existence of this
   global phenomenon.

   History has repeatedly shown us that data and facts alone do not
   inspire humans to change their beliefs or act [3]. Increased scientific
   literacy has no correlation with the acceptance of climate change facts
   [4]. A growing body of research demonstrates that visualization—the
   ability to create a mental image of the problem—is the most effective
   approach for motivating behavior change [5,6]. Several studies have
   analyzed ‘geographic shifts’ to better illustrate climate change. For
   example, Seidel and colleagues (2008) [7,8] showed that climate change
   has driven a widening of the tropical belt, by ~2 to 4.8 latitudinal
   degrees in recent decades. Similarly, the changing conditions of cities
   around the world provides another tangible example of shifting climate
   regimes. Given that over 50% of the global population exists within
   cities [9], these urban environments potentially valuable tool to
   visualize the impact of climate change at a global scale. As iconic
   locations, cities are associated with distinct sets of environmental
   conditions. As such, shifts in the climate conditions of these urban
   areas could provide a unique opportunity for people to visualize the
   impacts of climate change, and to establish effective response
   strategies to address the effects.

   Several studies [10–15] and press reports [16,17] have shown that the
   use of ‘cities geographic shift’ or “city analogues” can help to
   understand and visualize the effects of climate change. In particular,
   cities can serve as useful climate analog, enabling people to visualize
   their own climate future via comparison with other cities that
   currently experience those climate conditions. However, until now,
   existing research have been focused on regional- or continent-scale
   analyses in North America or Europe [10–15], and we lack a unifying
   global perspective. These regional trends suggest that cities are
   likely to resemble those at lower latitudes as the climate continues to
   warm. However, it remains unclear if this trend holds at a global
   scale, as other climate drivers such as changing precipitation regimes
   may obscure these latitudinal trends. As such, Southern Hemisphere or
   tropical cities, which already exist in warm conditions and are likely
   to experience considerable changes in precipitation and extreme climate
   variation, may show independent geographic shifts under changing
   climate conditions. Generating a unified understanding of the shifts in
   the climate conditions of the world’s cities is critical if we are
   going to visualize the impacts of climate change in any biogeographic
   region. Generating this understanding requires a global perspective and
   the use of a full range of climate variables to represent the entire
   climate regime of those regions.

   In this study, we evaluate the global shifts in the climate conditions
   of cities by taking current climate data for the world’s 520 major
   cities (Current Cities), and project what they will most closely
   resemble in 2050 (Future Cities). Rather than describing the
   quantitative changes in climate variables [18], we propose to quantify
   city climate analogs at a global scale [10–12], i.e. assessing which
   Current Cities will most closely resemble the climate conditions of
   Future Cities. To tackle previous limitations, we explore these
   patterns at a global scale using 19 bioclimatic variables, to include
   climate variability and seasonality in addition to climate averages.

   Specifically, we aim to test three questions: (i) What proportion of
   the world’s major cities of the future most closely resemble their own
   current climate conditions vs. the climate conditions of other cities
   in different geographic regions? (ii) What proportion of cities will
   experience novel climate conditions that are outside the range
   experiences by cities today? (iii) If cities do shift their climate
   conditions, is this spatial shift uniform in direction across the
   planet?

Materials and methods

Selection of major cities

   We selected these “major” cities of the world from the “LandScan (2016)
   High Resolution global Population Data Set” created by the Oak Ridge
   National Laboratory [19]. By “major” cities, we considered cities that
   are an administrative capital or that account more than 1,000,000
   inhabitants. In total, 520 cities were selected.

The climate database

   To characterize the current climate conditions among these major cities
   of the world, we extracted 19 bioclimatic variables from the latest
   Worldclim global raster layers (Version 2; period 1970–2000) at 30
   arc-seconds resolution [20]. These variables captured various climatic
   conditions, including yearly averages, seasonality metrics, and monthly
   extremes for both precipitation and temperature at every location.

Future data: GCMs, downscaling and future scenarios

   For the future projections, the same 19 bioclimatic variables were
   averaged from the outputs of three general circulation models (GCM)
   commonly used in ecology [21,22]. Two Community Earth System Models
   (CESMs) were chosen as they investigate a diverse set of earth-system
   interactions: the CESM1 BGC (a coupled carbon–climate model accounting
   for carbon feedback from the land) and the CESM1 CAM5 (a community
   atmosphere model) [21]. Additionally, the Earth System component of the
   Met Office Hadley Centre HadGEM2 model family was used as the third and
   final model [22]. To generate the data, we chose Representative Common
   Pathway 4.5 (RCP 4.5) scenario from the Coupled Model Intercomparison
   Project Phase 5 (CMIP5) as the input. It is a stabilization scenario,
   meaning that it accounts for a stabilization of radiative forcing
   before 2100, anticipating the development of new technologies and
   strategies for reducing greenhouse gas emissions [23]. By using this
   optimistic climate change scenario, we represent conservative changes
   in climate conditions that are likely to occur even if substantial
   climate change mitigation occurs. For each output, a delta downscaling
   method developed by the CGIAR Research Program on Climate Change,
   Agriculture and Food Security (CCAFS) was applied to reach a resolution
   of 30 arc-seconds [24], using current conditions Worldclim 1.4 as a
   reference. Downscaling approach were necessary to assess climate
   conditions at the cities’ scale even if it induces a risk of pixel
   mismatch and consequently, a lower level of confidence for local scale
   analyses [25,26].

Summarizing the current climate among the major cities through a principal
component analysis

   The 19 current and future bioclimatic variables were extracted from the
   coordinates of the 520 major cities (i.e., the city centroids), meaning
   each city had two sets of bioclimatic metrics: the current climate data
   for the world’s major cities (Current Cities) and the equivalent 2050
   projection (Future Cities) according to the average of the three RCP
   4.5 GCMs.

   A scaled principal components analysis (PCA) was performed on current
   bioclimatic data in order to account for correlation between climate
   variables and to standardize their contributions to the subsequent
   dissimilarity analysis [27]. As the first four principal components
   accounted for more than 85% of the total variation of climate data
   (40.2%, 26.9%, 10.5% and 7.6%, respectively), the remaining principal
   components were dropped from later analyses. The main contributing
   variables to the four components are the temperature seasonality (axis
   1), the minimum temperature of the coldest month (axis 1), the maximum
   temperature of the warmest month (axis 2), the precipitation
   seasonality (axis 2), the precipitation of the driest (axis 4) and of
   the wettest (axis 3) month, and the temperature diurnal range (axis 4,
   Fig 1).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 1. Distribution of current and future cities along the first 4
   principal component axes.

   The seven major climate variables contributing to the Principal
   Component Analysis (PCA) are superposed on each figure. The figure at
   the top (a) shows the distribution of current (blue) and future (red)
   cities on the space defined by the first two principal components. The
   first two axes explain, respectively, 40.2 and 26.9% of climate
   variations. The first axis is mainly driven by differences in
   temperature seasonality and in minimum temperature of the coldest
   month, while the second axis is mainly driven by differences in
   precipitation seasonality. The figure at the bottom (b) shows the same
   current (green) and future (orange) cities on the space defined by the
   third and fourth principal components. They explain respectively 10.5
   and 7.6% of climate variations. The third axis is mainly driven by
   changes in precipitation of the wet season, while the fourth axis is
   mainly driven by changes in the mean diurnal temperature range.
   Boxplots illustrates the distribution of the points along each of the 4
   axes. The continuous line in the boxes represents the median of the
   distribution, the extremities of the boxes the 1^st and the 3^rd
   quartile and the continuous lines go up to 1.5 times the difference
   between the 3^st and the 1^rd quartile.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592.g001

Calculating the extent of the covered climate domain

   For further interpretation of the results, a convex hull was computed
   from the coordinates of the Current Cities within the multivariate
   space defined by the first four principal components axes [28]. For
   reference, a convex hull of a set of N-dimensional points forms the
   smallest possible hypervolume (in N-dimensions) containing all points
   defined in that set; in this case, it defines the bounds of climatic
   combinations that Earth currently experiences in these 520 cities. All
   Future Cities falling outside the hypervolume of this convex hull
   represent currently non-existent bioclimatic assemblies in these
   cities, i.e. cities with no current climate analog [29].

Pairing cities based on the similarity between current and future climate
conditions

   Euclidean distances (i.e., dissimilarity indices) were calculated for
   every combination of Current and Future City based on their coordinates
   within the multivariate space defined by the first four principal
   components axes, creating a symmetric dissimilarity matrix with
   pairwise comparisons for all cities (S1 Table). The Euclidean distance
   was calculated using the vegan package on R (RCran version 3.3.2) [30].
   Each Future City was then paired with its three closest Current Cities
   based on the dissimilarity values (S1 Table, S2 Table). Three cities
   are kept for each Future city in order to facilitate comparison between
   Current and Future climate, as all cities are not necessarily known by
   the reader. To avoid un-realistic shifts or shifts due to pixel
   mismatch between Current and Future climate conditions, the final
   analysis was performed keeping shift values between the 5^th and the
   95^th percentile, i.e. keeping 477 out of the original 520 cities.

Calculating the absolute latitudinal shift

   To illustrate and summarize the shifts between Current and Future
   Cities, we calculated the importance of absolute latitudinal shift for
   each city. Shifts in latitude were standardized for both hemisphere, so
   that a shift south in the northern hemisphere is equal to a shift north
   in the southern hemisphere, i.e. referred as the absolute latitudinal
   shift. In other words, the absolute latitudinal shift expresses a
   geographic shift in relation to the equatorial line (shifting away from
   or towards the equator).

   Analyses and figures were performed using R, maps were built using
   Q-GIS 3.0.

Results

Analysis of changes between current and future cities from the PCA

   The future climate of each city was projected within the four principal
   components (using the PCA eigenvectors derived from the bioclimatic
   variables of the current climate) to allow for direct comparison
   between Current and Future Cities (Fig 1). On the plane defined by the
   first two components of the PCA (Fig 1A), explaining respectively 40.2
   and 26.9% of climate variations, we observe changes towards less
   temperature seasonality, with higher maximal and minimal temperatures
   during the year, as well as higher precipitation seasonality, with
   higher precipitation in the wettest month but lower precipitation in
   the driest one. While no clear trend can be observed along the third
   axis (10.5% of climate variation), the changes along the fourth axis
   (7.6% of climate variation) show higher temperature diurnal range (Fig
   1B), i.e. the daily difference between cities’ maximum and minimum
   temperatures will increase. In brief, cities of the world become
   hotter, in particular during the winter and the summer. Wet seasons
   become wetter and dry season drier.

What proportion of cities will resemble their own current climate vs. other
cities by 2050?

   We characterized the climate of the world’s 520 major cities using 19
   climatic variables that reflect the variability in temperature and
   precipitation regimes for current and future conditions. Future
   conditions are estimated using an optimistic Representative
   Concentration Pathway (RCP4.5), which considers a stabilization of
   CO[2]emissions by mid-century (see Material and Methods). This model
   was chosen to show the extent of the changes we would be facing even
   considering the implementation of effective mitigation policies. Using
   a multivariate analysis, we analyzed the climate similarity of all
   Current and Future cities to one another (S1 Table). This simple
   analysis enables us to estimate which major cities of the world will
   remain relatively similar, and which will shift to reflect the climate
   of another city by 2050. Overall, our analysis shows that 77% of the
   world’s Current Cities will experience a striking change in climate
   conditions, making them more similar to the conditions of another
   existing city than they are to their own current climate conditions (S1
   Table, S2 Table). The climate conditions of remaining 23% of cities
   remained most closely associated with their current climate conditions.

What proportion of cities will experience novel climate conditions?

   Overall 78% of the 520 Future Cities studied present a climate within
   the hypervolume representing covered combinations of climate
   conditions. Therefore, 22% of the Future Cities’ climate conditions
   would disappear from this current climatic domain (Fig 2A). As such,
   22% of the world’s cities are likely to exist in a climatic regime that
   does current exist on the planet today. The situation is even more
   pronounced in the tropics, with 30% of cities experiencing novel
   climate conditions essentially because the climate will get drier.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 2. Extent of climate changes in major cities of the world by 2050.

   a, b, the extent of change in climate conditions. Cities predicted to
   have climates that no major city has experienced before are colored in
   red (mostly within the tropics). Cities for which future climate
   conditions reflect current conditions in other major cities of the
   world are shown in green. The size of the dots represents the magnitude
   of change between current and future climate conditions. b, The
   proportion of cities shifting away from the covered climate domain
   (concentrated in the tropics). c,d, The extent of latitudinal shifts in
   relation to the equatorial line. Cities shifting towards the equator
   are colored with a blue gradient (mostly outside the tropics), while
   cities shifting away from the equator are colored with a yellow to red
   gradient (mostly within the tropics). d, A summary of the shift by
   latitude is illustrated in a barchart, with shifts averaged by bins of
   5 degrees. The background of the maps are a combination rasters
   available in the public domain, i.e. of USGS shaded relief only and
   hydro cached.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592.g002

Is this spatial shift uniform in direction across the planet?

   The proportion of shifting cities varied consistently across the world.
   Cities in northern latitudes will experience the most dramatic shifts
   in extreme temperature conditions (Fig 2C and Fig 2D). For example,
   across Europe, both summers and winters will get warmer, with average
   increases of 3.5°C and 4.7°C, respectively. These changes would be
   equivalent to a city shifting ~1,000 km further south towards the
   subtropics, i.e. a velocity ~20 km.year^-1, under current climate
   conditions (Fig 2C and Fig 2D). Consequently, by 2050, striking changes
   will be observed across the northern hemisphere: Madrid’s climate in
   2050 will be more similar to the current climate in Marrakech than to
   Madrid’s climate today; London will be more similar to Barcelona,
   Stockholm to Budapest; Moscow to Sofia; Portland to San Antonio, San
   Francisco to Lisbon, Tokyo to Changsha, etc(Fig 3, S2 Table).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 3. Future cities and similar current climate counterpart.

   Difference between future and current climate for four cities and an
   example of their similar current counterpart. Illustration of the
   results of the analysis for London (a; counterpart: Barcelona), Buenos
   Aires (b; counterpart: Sidney), Nairobi (c; counterpart:Beirut) and
   Portland (d; counterpart:San Antonio). The red bar represents the
   difference between the current climate of the city of interest (e.g.
   London in (a)) and the current climate of the city to which the city of
   interest (e.g. London in (a)) will have the most similar climate by
   2050 (e.g. Barcelona in (a)). The yellow bar the difference between the
   current and future climate of the city of interest (e.g. current London
   and London 2050 in (a)). The green bar represents the difference
   between the future climate of the city of interest (London 2050) and
   the current climate of the most similar counterpart (e.g. Barcelona in
   (a)). Images of Barcelona and London were obtained on Pixabay, shared
   under common creative CC0 license.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592.g003

   Cities in the tropical regions will experience smaller changes in
   average temperature, relative to the higher latitudes. However, shifts
   in rainfall regimes will dominate the tropical cities. This is
   characterized by both increases in extreme precipitation events (+5%
   rainfall wettest month) and, the severity and intensity of droughts
   (-14% rainfall driest month). With more severe droughts, tropical
   cities will move towards the subtropics, i.e. towards drier climates
   (Fig 2C and Fig 2D). However, the fate of major tropical cities remains
   highly uncertain because many tropical regions will experience
   unprecedented climate conditions. Specifically, of all 22% of cities
   that will experience novel climate conditions, most (64%) are located
   in the tropics. These include Manaus, Libreville, Kuala Lumpur,
   Jakarta, Rangoon, and Singapore (Fig 2A and Fig 2B, S2 Table).

   In summary, at a global level, we observe a global geographic shift
   towards the subtropics, i.e. towards ~20 degrees of latitude (Fig 2B
   and Fig 4).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 4. Latitudinal shift of cities relative to their distance to the
   equator (in degrees).

   Cities below 20 degrees North/South tend to move away from the equator
   (positive latitudinal shift) while cities beyond 20 degrees North/South
   tend to move closer to the equator (negative latitudinal shift). Cities
   are colored according to the aggregated ecoregion of the world [36] to
   which they belong, with the tropical in red, the subtropical in orange,
   the temperate in green and the boreal in blue.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592.g004

Discussion

   Our analysis reveals consistent global patterns in the climate shifts
   of future major cities around the world over the next 30 years. Despite
   our use of a highly optimistic climate change scenario (i.e. RCP 4.5),
   we show that the climate conditions of over 77% of world’s major cities
   will change to such a great extent that they will resemble more closely
   the conditions of another major city. The projected shifts showed
   consistent biogeographic trends, with all city climates (both southern
   and northern hemisphere) generally shifting towards the conditions in
   warmer, low-latitude regions. The extent and consistency of these
   patterns provides a stark reminder of the global scale of this climate
   change threat and associated risks for human health. In contrast to
   previous analyses, our analysis also reveals that 22% of the world’s
   cities are likely to exist in a climatic regime that does not current
   exist on the planet today. These trends highlight the extreme
   vulnerability of tropical and sub-tropical cities, 30% of which will
   experience shifts into entirely novel climate regimes with no existing
   analogues across the world’s major cities. This lends support to the
   idea of novel climates, which are expected to emerge in many tropical
   and sub-tropical regions [29]. It should be noted that, by defining the
   climate envelope using a convex-hull (i.e. by defining a volume from
   simplices (“triangles”) that form the smallest convex simplicial
   complex of a set of input points in 4-dimensional space), we applied a
   conservative method for evaluating future change. Indeed, because it
   includes the smallest level of extrapolation and generating the
   smallest possible shapes, this approach has a low-risk of incorrectly
   identifying novel climate conditions, relative to a concave-hull
   approach [31]. However, this approach necessarily comes with the high
   likelihood of missing some novel climates. The 22% of cities
   experiencing a novel climate must therefore be seen as a highly
   conservative estimate.

   Our findings also support previous studies conducted in Europe [10,11]
   and north America [13], stressing the current trend of north-to-south
   geographical shift across the northern hemisphere. Yet, using an
   optimistic climate change scenario, we found that the velocity (i.e.
   the speed of geographical shift) risks to be higher in the near future
   than in the second half of the 21th century [10] passing from 15 km
   year^-1 to 20 km year^-1. Our study also allows the extension of such
   observations to the global scale, showing that observations for Europe
   can be generalized for the entire Northern Hemisphere and for a part of
   the southern hemisphere (Fig 2B). At the global scale, our study
   reveals that geographical shift tend to converge towards the subtropics
   (Fig 4), going to warmer climate conditions from boreal and temperate
   regions and to drier conditions from tropical regions. While this lends
   support to previous observations of a “tropical belt widening” due to
   the expected warmer conditions [7,8], it also shows that tropical
   biomes tend to shrink in many areas due to drier conditions. We
   therefore suggest here to refer to a “sub-tropical widening” compared
   to the previous “tropical widening” due to climate change.

   While our findings are necessarily dependent on the methodology used to
   identify the climatic shifts, it is widely recognized that the choice
   of the metric to assess the similarity-dissimilarity of the climate
   conditions between cities has an extremely minor effect, compared to
   the choice of the climate model and scenario[32]. That is, our results
   are unlikely to be affected whatever method we use to calculate
   dissimilarity, as the variation between climate projections is far
   greater. Nonetheless, Mahony and colleagues [31] highlighted the need
   to standardize the contribution of each climate variable to the
   dissimilarity matrix and to account for correlation between them to
   avoid any bias[31]. In the present study, we address this using a
   scaled principal component analysis to summarize the main bioclimatic
   variations among the 520 major cities. This approach simply follows
   classic dissimilarity analysis recommendations for ecological
   studies[27], applying an Euclidean distance matrix on the main
   dimensions of the principal component analysis to assess the similarity
   between cities. This method was preferred to the sigma-dissimilarity
   developed by Mahony and colleagues[31] for its simplicity and it broad
   use in ecological sciences.

   Our analysis allows us to visualize a tangible climate future of the
   world’s major cities. These results enable decision makers from all
   sectors of society, to envision changes that are likely to occur in
   their own city, within their own lifetime. Londoners, for example, can
   start to consider how their 2050 equivalents (e.g. Barcelona today)
   have taken action to combat their own environmental challenges. In
   2008, Barcelona experienced extreme drought conditions, which required
   the importation of €22m of drinking water. Since then, the municipal
   government has implemented a series of ‘smart initiatives‘ to manage
   the city’s water resources (including the control of park irrigation
   and water fountain levels). The Mayor of London has factored drought
   considerations into his Environment Strategy aims for 2050 [33], but
   this study can provide the context to facilitate the development of
   more targeted climate strategies. In addition, this information can
   also empower local citizens to evaluate proposed environmental
   policies. By allowing people to visualize their own climate futures, we
   hope that this information can facilitate efforts to mitigate and adapt
   to climate change.

   Our study is not a novel model revealing updated climate projections or
   expectations by 2050. Instead, our analysis is intended to illustrate
   how complex climate data can be effectively summarized into tangible
   information that can be easily interpreted by anyone. Of course, the
   climate scenarios that we have used are based on predictions from a few
   climate models, run under a single (business as usual) climate
   scenario. We recognize that these models are characterized by huge
   amounts of uncertainty [34], and the predicted Future Cities may change
   as these Earth System Models are refined, in particular in light of
   urban climate specificities [35]. However, our results are likely to
   reflect the qualitative direction of climate changes within cities and
   so meet our primary goal, which is to communicate predicted climate
   changes to a non-specialist audience in order to motivate action. When
   model projections are updated, we would recommend communicating any new
   results with this goal in mind.

Conclusion

   To our knowledge, our study represents the first global analysis of the
   shifts in climate conditions of the world’s major cities under climate
   change. Our analysis revealed that over 77% of the world’s cities are
   likely to experience a shift towards the climate conditions of another
   major city by 2050, while 22% will shift to climate conditions that are
   not currently present for any major cities on the planet. Across the
   globe, the direction of movement is generally trending towards the
   subtropics, providing unifying patterns that support trends observed in
   Europe and North America. In addition, this analysis revealed new
   insights for cities in equatorial regions, many of which are likely to
   move to entirely new climate conditions that are not currently
   experienced by any of the other global cities today. These city
   analogues, and the data we openly share, can help land managers and
   city planners to visualize the climate futures of their respective
   cities, facilitating efforts to establish targeted climate response
   strategies. As well as facilitating our basic understanding of climate
   change effects, our analysis highlights the value of using cities to
   visualize the tangible effects of climate change across the globe.

Supporting information

S1 Table. Dissimilarity between current and future climate of the major
cities of the world.

   The dissimilarity is expressed as the Euclidean distance matrix
   performed on the 4 main axes of the PCA analysis that summarizes the
   climate variation (19 bioclimatic variables) among the major cities of
   the world.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592.s001

   (ODS)

S2 Table. Summary statistics of the global analysis of city analogues.

   The table provides the three cities for which current climate is the
   most similar to the future climate of each city. It also provides the
   associated latitudinal shift for the most similar city and the expected
   changes in climate conditions by 2050 for the mean annual temperature,
   the annual precipitations, the temperature of the warmest month, the
   temperature of the coldest month and the precipitation of the wettest
   month.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0217592.s002

   (ODS)

Acknowledgments

   This work was supported by grants to T.W.C. from DOB Ecology,
   Plant-for-the-Planet and the German Federal Ministry for Economic
   Cooperation and Development. Images of cities were obtained on Pixabay,
   and openly shared under CC0 common creative license.

References

    1. 1. Nisbet EC, Cooper KE, Garrett RK. The Partisan Brain. Suhay E,
       Druckman JN, editors. Ann Am Acad Pol Soc Sci. SAGE
       PublicationsSage CA: Los Angeles, CA; 2015;658: 36–66.
       https://doi.org/10.1177/0002716214555474
    2. 2. Haines A, Ebi K. The Imperative for Climate Action to Protect
       Health. Solomon CG, editor. N Engl J Med. 2019;380: 263–273.
       pmid:30650330
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    3. 3. Zaval L, Cornwell JFM. Effective education and communication
       strategies to promote environmental engagement. Eur J Educ.
       2017;52: 477–486.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    4. 4. Kahan DM. Climate-Science Communication and the Measurement
       Problem. Polit Psychol. Wiley/Blackwell (10.1111); 2015;36: 1–43.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    5. 5. Marx SM, Weber EU, Orlove BS, Leiserowitz A, Krantz DH, Roncoli
       C, et al. Communication and mental processes: Experiential and
       analytic processing of uncertain climate information. Glob Environ
       Chang. Pergamon; 2007;17: 47–58.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    6. 6. Sheppard SRJ. Visualizing Climate Change. Routledge; 2012.
       https://doi.org/10.4324/9781849776882
    7. 7. Seidel DJ, Fu Q, Randel WJ, Reichler TJ. Widening of the
       tropical belt in a changing climate. Nat Geosci. Nature Publishing
       Group; 2008;1: 21–24.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    8. 8. Lu J. Tropical expansion by ocean swing. Nat Geosci. Nature
       Publishing Group; 2014;7: 250–251.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    9. 9. United Nations. World Urbanization Prospects: The 2018 Revision,
       Key Facts. 2018. (ST/ESA/SER.A/366)
   10. 10. Beniston M. European isotherms move northwards by up to 15 km
       year −1: using climate analogues for awareness-raising. Int J
       Climatol. Wiley-Blackwell; 2014;34: 1838–1844.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   11. 11. Rohat G, Goyette S, Flacke J. Twin climate cities—an
       exploratory study of their potential use for awareness-raising and
       urban adaptation. Mitig Adapt Strateg Glob Chang. Springer
       Netherlands; 2017;22: 929–945.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   12. 12. Rohat G, Goyette S, Flacke J. Characterization of European
       cities’ climate shift–an exploratory study based on climate
       analogues. Int J Clim Chang Strateg Manag. 2018;
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   13. 13. Fitzpatrick MC, Dunn RR. Contemporary climatic analogs for 540
       North American urban areas in the late 21st century. Nat Commun.
       Nature Publishing Group; 2019;10: 614. pmid:30755612
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   14. 14. Kopf S, Ha-Duong M, Hallegatte S. Using maps of city analogues
       to display and interpret climate change scenarios and their
       uncertainty. Nat Hazards Earth Syst Sci. 2008;8: 905–918.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   15. 15. Hallegatte S, Hourcade J-C, Ambrosi P. Using climate analogues
       for assessing climate change economic impacts in urban areas. Clim
       Change. Kluwer Academic Publishers; 2007;82: 47–60.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   16. 16. Vox. Climate change report 2018 cities 2050 [Internet]. 2018.
       Available:
       https://www.vox.com/energy-and-environment/2018/11/30/18117953/clim
       ate-change-report-2018-cities-2050
   17. 17. Central C. Summer temperatures co2 emissions 1001 cities. In:
       2018 [Internet]. Available:
       https://www.climatecentral.org/news/summer-temperatures-co2-emissio
       ns-1001-cities-16583
   18. 18. IPCC. an IPCC special report on the impacts of global warming
       of 1.5°C above pre-industrial levels and related global greenhouse
       gas emission pathways. 2018.
   19. 19. Bright EA, Rose AN, Urban ML, McKee JJ. LandScan 2016
       High-Resolution Global Population Data Set. 2017.
   20. 20. Fick SE, Hijmans RJ. WorldClim 2: new 1-km spatial resolution
       climate surfaces for global land areas. Int J Climatol. 2017;37:
       4302–4315.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   21. 21. Hurrell JW, Holland MM, Gent PR, Ghan S, Kay JE, Kushner PJ, et
       al. The Community Earth System Model: A Framework for Collaborative
       Research. Bull Am Meteorol Soc. American Meteorological Society;
       2013;94: 1339–1360.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   22. 22. Bellouin N, Collins WJ, Culverwell ID, Halloran PR, Hardiman
       SC, Hinton TJ, et al. The HadGEM2 family of Met Office Unified
       Model climate configurations. Geosci Model Dev. 2011;4: 723–757.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   23. 23. Thomson AM, Calvin K V., Smith SJ, Kyle GP, Volke A, Patel P,
       et al. RCP4.5: A pathway for stabilization of radiative forcing by
       2100. Clim Change. 2011;109: 77–94.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   24. 24. Ramirez Villegas J, Jarvis A. Downscaling Global Circulation
       Model Outputs: The Delta Method Decision and Policy Analysis
       Working Paper No. 1. International Center for Tropical Agriculture
       (CIAT); 2010;
   25. 25. Fowler HJ, Blenkinsop S, Tebaldi C. Linking climate change
       modelling to impacts studies: recent advances in downscaling
       techniques for hydrological modelling. Int J Climatol. John Wiley &
       Sons, Ltd; 2007;27: 1547–1578.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   26. 26. Smid M, Costa AC. Climate projections and downscaling
       techniques: a discussion for impact studies in urban systems. Int J
       Urban Sci. Routledge; 2018;22: 277–307.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   27. 27. Legendre P, Legendre L, Legendre L, Legendre P. Numerical
       ecology. Elsevier; 2012.
   28. 28. Barber CB, Dobkin DP, Huhdanpaa H, Huhdanpaa H. The quickhull
       algorithm for convex hulls. ACM Trans Math Softw. ACM; 1996;22:
       469–483.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   29. 29. Williams JW, Jackson ST. Novel climates, no-analog communities,
       and ecological surprises. Front Ecol Environ. John Wiley & Sons,
       Ltd; 2007;5: 475–482.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   30. 30. Cormack RM, Legendre L, Legendre P. Numerical Ecology.
       Biometrics. Elsevier; 2006;40: 280. https://doi.org/10.2307/2530779
   31. 31. Mahony CR, Cannon AJ, Wang T, Aitken SN. A closer look at novel
       climates: new methods and insights at continental to landscape
       scales. Glob Chang Biol. John Wiley & Sons, Ltd (10.1111); 2017;23:
       3934–3955. pmid:28145063
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   32. 32. Grenier P, Parent A-C, Huard D, Anctil F, Chaumont D, Grenier
       P, et al. An Assessment of Six Dissimilarity Metrics for Climate
       Analogs. J Appl Meteorol Climatol. 2013;52: 733–752.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   33. 33. London M of. London Environment Strategy. 2018;
       https://doi.org/10.1016/j.bbabio.2006.11.011
   34. 34. Woldemeskel FM, Sharma A, Sivakumar B, Mehrotra R.
       Quantification of precipitation and temperature uncertainties
       simulated by CMIP3 and CMIP5 models. J Geophys Res Atmos.
       Wiley-Blackwell; 2016;121: 3–17.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   35. 35. Zhao L, Lee X, Smith RB, Oleson K. Strong contributions of
       local background climate to urban heat islands. Nature. Nature
       Publishing Group; 2014;511: 216–219. pmid:25008529
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   36. 36. Olson DM, Dinerstein E, Wikramanayake ED, Burgess ND, Powell
       GVN, Underwood EC, et al. Terrestrial Ecoregions of the World: A
       New Map of Life on EarthA new global map of terrestrial ecoregions
       provides an innovative tool for conserving biodiversity.
       Bioscience. Oxford University Press; 2001;51: 933–938.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar

   Download PDF

     * Citation
     * XML

   Print
     * Print article
     * EzReprint

   Share
     * Reddit Reddit
     * Google+ Google+
     * Facebook Facebook
     * LinkedIn LinkedIn
     * Mendeley Mendeley
     * PubChase PubChase
     * Twitter Twitter
     * Email Email

     [CROSSMARK_BW_horizontal.svg]
   Advertisement

Subject Areas

   ?

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.
   We want your feedback. Do these Subject Areas make sense for this
   article? Click the target next to the incorrect Subject Area and let us
   know. Thanks for your help!
     * Climate change
       Is the Subject Area "Climate change" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Principal component analysis
       Is the Subject Area "Principal component analysis" applicable to
       this article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Northern Hemisphere
       Is the Subject Area "Northern Hemisphere" applicable to this
       article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Latitude
       Is the Subject Area "Latitude" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Europe
       Is the Subject Area "Europe" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Southern Hemisphere
       Is the Subject Area "Southern Hemisphere" applicable to this
       article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * North America
       Is the Subject Area "North America" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Urban areas
       Is the Subject Area "Urban areas" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.

Archived Tweets

   Load more
   View all tweets

     * Publications
     * PLOS Biology
     * PLOS Medicine
     * PLOS Computational Biology
     * PLOS Genetics
     * PLOS Pathogens
     * PLOS ONE
     * PLOS Neglected Tropical Diseases

     * Home
     * Blogs
     * Collections
     * Give feedback
     * LOCKSS

     * Privacy Policy
     * Terms of Use
     * Advertise
     * Media Inquiries
     * Contact

   PLOS is a nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation, #C2354500, based in San
   Francisco, California, US
   PLOS
   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TP26BH

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MQQMGF

   Advertisement

     * plos.org
     * create account
     * sign in

PLOS Biology

     * Browse
          + Current Issue
          + Journal Archive
          + Collections
          + Find and Read Articles
     * Publish
          + Submissions
               o Submission Guidelines
               o Figures
               o Tables
               o Supporting Information
               o LaTeX
               o Other Article Types
               o Preprints
               o Revising Your Manuscript
               o Submit Now
          + Policies
               o Best Practices in Research Reporting
               o Human Subjects Research
               o Animal Research
               o Competing Interests
               o Disclosure of Funding Sources
               o Licenses and Copyright
               o Data Availability
               o Materials and Software Sharing
               o Ethical Publishing Practice
               o Authorship
               o Downloads and Translations
          + Manuscript Review and Publication
               o Editorial and Peer Review Process
               o Guidelines for Reviewers
               o Accepted Manuscripts
               o Corrections and Retractions
               o Comments
               o Article-Level Metrics

Submit Your Manuscript
       PLOS Biology provides an Open Access platform to showcase your best
       research and commentary across all areas of biological science.
       Submit Now
     * About
          + Journal Information
          + Staff Editors
          + Editorial Board
          + Publishing Information
          + Publication Fees
          + Press and Media
          + Contact
     *

       Search

       Search
       ____________________ (BUTTON)

       advanced search

     * Loading metrics

   Open Access

   Peer-reviewed

   Research Article

Widespread winners and narrow-ranged losers: Land use homogenizes
biodiversity in local assemblages worldwide

     * Tim Newbold ,
       Roles Conceptualization, Data curation, Formal analysis, Funding
       acquisition, Investigation, Methodology, Software, Supervision,
       Validation, Visualization, Writing – original draft, Writing –
       review & editing
       * E-mail: t.newbold@ucl.ac.uk
       Affiliation Centre for Biodiversity and Environment Research,
       Department of Genetics, Evolution and Environment, University
       College London, London, United Kingdom
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0001-7361-0051
       ⨯
     * Lawrence N. Hudson,
       Roles Conceptualization, Data curation, Investigation, Methodology,
       Software, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation Department of Life Sciences, Natural History Museum,
       London, United Kingdom
       ⨯
     * Sara Contu,
       Roles Data curation, Project administration, Writing – review &
       editing
       Affiliation Department of Life Sciences, Natural History Museum,
       London, United Kingdom
       ⨯
     * Samantha L. L. Hill,
       Roles Data curation, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliations Department of Life Sciences, Natural History Museum,
       London, United Kingdom, UN Environment World Conservation
       Monitoring Centre, Cambridge, United Kingdom
       ⨯
     * Jan Beck,
       Roles Conceptualization, Resources, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation University of Colorado, Museum of Natural History,
       Boulder, Colorado, United States of America
       ⨯
     * Yunhui Liu,
       Roles Data curation, Resources, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliation College of Agricultural Resources and Environmental
       Sciences, China Agricultural University, Beijing, China
       ⨯
     * Carsten Meyer,
       Roles Conceptualization, Data curation, Resources, Writing – review
       & editing
       Affiliations German Centre for Integrative Biodiversity Research
       (iDiv), Leipzig, Germany, Faculty of Biosciences, Pharmacy and
       Psychology, University of Leipzig, Leipzig, Germany
       ⨯
     * Helen R. P. Phillips,
       Roles Conceptualization, Methodology, Writing – review & editing
       Current address: German Centre for Integrative Biodiversity
       Research (iDiv) Halle-Jena-Leipzig, Leipzig, Germany
       Affiliations Department of Life Sciences, Natural History Museum,
       London, United Kingdom, Department of Life Sciences, Imperial
       College London, London, United Kingdom
       ⨯
     * Jörn P. W. Scharlemann,
       Roles Conceptualization, Funding acquisition, Supervision, Writing
       – original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliations UN Environment World Conservation Monitoring Centre,
       Cambridge, United Kingdom, School of Life Sciences, University of
       Sussex, Brighton, United Kingdom
       ⨯
     * Andy Purvis
       Roles Conceptualization, Data curation, Funding acquisition,
       Methodology, Project administration, Supervision, Writing –
       original draft, Writing – review & editing
       Affiliations Department of Life Sciences, Natural History Museum,
       London, United Kingdom, Department of Life Sciences, Imperial
       College London, London, United Kingdom
       ⨯

Widespread winners and narrow-ranged losers: Land use homogenizes
biodiversity in local assemblages worldwide

     * Tim Newbold,
     * Lawrence N. Hudson,
     * Sara Contu,
     * Samantha L. L. Hill,
     * Jan Beck,
     * Yunhui Liu,
     * Carsten Meyer,
     * Helen R. P. Phillips,
     * Jörn P. W. Scharlemann,
     * Andy Purvis

   PLOS
   x
     * Published: December 4, 2018
     * https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841

     * Article
     * Authors
     * Metrics
     * Comments
     * Media Coverage

     * Reader Comments (0)
     * Media Coverage
     * Figures

Figures

   Fig 1
   Fig 2
   Fig 3
   Fig 4
   Fig 5

Abstract

   Human use of the land (for agriculture and settlements) has a
   substantial negative effect on biodiversity globally. However, not all
   species are adversely affected by land use, and indeed, some benefit
   from the creation of novel habitat. Geographically rare species may be
   more negatively affected by land use than widespread species, but data
   limitations have so far prevented global multi-clade assessments of
   land-use effects on narrow-ranged and widespread species. We analyse a
   large, global database to show consistent differences in assemblage
   composition. Compared with natural habitat, assemblages in disturbed
   habitats have more widespread species on average, especially in urban
   areas and the tropics. All else being equal, this result means that
   human land use is homogenizing assemblage composition across space.
   Disturbed habitats show both reduced abundances of narrow-ranged
   species and increased abundances of widespread species. Our results are
   very important for biodiversity conservation because narrow-ranged
   species are typically at higher risk of extinction than widespread
   species. Furthermore, the shift to more widespread species may also
   affect ecosystem functioning by reducing both the contribution of rare
   species and the diversity of species’ responses to environmental
   changes among local assemblages.

Author summary

   Previous studies have shown that human use of the land, mainly for
   agriculture and settlements, causes a detectable but relatively small
   net loss of biodiversity. However, not all species are affected
   equally, and some species even benefit from the new habitats we create.
   One group of species of particular concern for biodiversity
   conservation are those that inhabit only a small area. These
   narrow-ranged species are at higher risk of extinction because it is
   more likely that any threats to the species (including human land use)
   will affect their entire range. Such species can also play a unique
   role in the healthy functioning of ecosystems. Here, we show that the
   observed small declines in biodiversity in human-disturbed land can be
   broken down into large declines in narrow-ranged species, offset by
   increases in wide-ranged species. All else being equal, this finding
   means that ecological communities are losing their distinctive,
   narrow-ranged species and are becoming dominated by the same species
   everywhere, leading to a reduction in global biodiversity. The
   divergent effects of human land use on narrow-ranged and widespread
   species are important for the conservation of already threatened,
   narrow-ranged species and may lead to a negative effect on the
   functioning of ecosystems.

   Citation: Newbold T, Hudson LN, Contu S, Hill SLL, Beck J, Liu Y, et
   al. (2018) Widespread winners and narrow-ranged losers: Land use
   homogenizes biodiversity in local assemblages worldwide. PLoS Biol
   16(12): e2006841. https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841

   Academic Editor: Hélène Morlon, Ecole Normale Superieure, France

   Received: May 31, 2018; Accepted: October 29, 2018; Published: December
   4, 2018

   Copyright: © 2018 Newbold et al. This is an open access article
   distributed under the terms of the Creative Commons Attribution
   License, which permits unrestricted use, distribution, and reproduction
   in any medium, provided the original author and source are credited.

   Data Availability: The underlying data are all publicly available. The
   PREDICTS database is published as DOI: 10.5519/0066354. Species’
   distributional data are available from GBIF (https://www.gbif.org/),
   the IUCN (http://www.iucnredlist.org/), or from Birdlife International
   (http://datazone.birdlife.org/home). Furthermore, the processed data
   underlying all of the results shown in the paper are freely available
   as DOI: 10.6084/m9.figshare.7262732 and DOI:
   10.6084/m9.figshare.7262738.

   Funding: UK Natural Environment Research Council https://nerc.ukri.org/
   (grant number NE/J011193/2; NE/M014533/1). Received by AP, JPWS and TN.
   The funder had no role in study design, data collection and analysis,
   decision to publish, or preparation of the manuscript. The Royal
   Society https://royalsociety.org/ (grant number UF150526). Received by
   TN. The funder had no role in study design, data collection and
   analysis, decision to publish, or preparation of the manuscript.
   Volkswagen Foundation https://www.volkswagenstiftung.de/en (grant
   number Freigeist Fellowship). Received by CM. The funder had no role in
   study design, data collection and analysis, decision to publish, or
   preparation of the manuscript. Hans Rausing PhD scholarship (grant
   number). Received by HRPP. The funder had no role in study design, data
   collection and analysis, decision to publish, or preparation of the
   manuscript.

   Competing interests: The authors have declared that no competing
   interests exist.

   Abbreviations: CV, coefficient of variation; GBIF, Global Biodiversity
   Information Facility; H, highest values in the dataset for each
   continuous effect; PREDICTS, Projecting Responses of Ecological
   Diversity In Changing Terrestrial Systems; RAR, Relative Average Range
   Size; RCAR, Relative Community Average Range Size

Introduction

   Human impacts on the biosphere are substantially reducing the global
   number of species [1,2], and many scientists argue that we have entered
   a new, human-dominated geological era, the ‘Anthropocene’ [3]. Land use
   is currently among the predominant pressures on biodiversity globally
   [4], with substantial net losses of species in land-use types dominated
   by human activities [5]. However, not all species are equally impacted,
   and many species benefit from human creation of novel habitats [6].
   This results in strong turnover in community composition between
   land-use types [5,7]. Understanding the characteristics of species that
   are most impacted by human land use is essential for guiding
   conservation actions and also for assessing the consequences of
   land-use change and biodiversity loss for the functioning of
   ecosystems.

   Geographic range size is a fundamental property of species. Crucially,
   small range size is a key determinant of species’ extinction risk
   [8–10], and therefore a disproportionate impact of human land use on
   small-ranged species would have important consequences for biodiversity
   conservation. Furthermore, rare species (including geographically
   restricted species) tend to have unique combinations of functional
   traits and are therefore likely to make an important contribution to
   ecosystem functioning [11], meaning that a disproportionate loss of
   small-ranged species would have implications beyond their immediate
   conservation interest. A few geographically and taxonomically
   restricted studies have shown that narrow-ranged species are more
   likely than wide-ranged species to be absent in human land uses
   [12–15], leading—all else being equal—to a homogenization of assemblage
   composition across space [16]. A global, multi-clade analysis for
   terrestrial ecosystems has so far been prevented by a lack of suitable
   global datasets (but see [17] for a global freshwater analysis), and
   thus the generality of this pattern remains unclear.

   We present the first global synthesis of the effect of land use on an
   abundance-weighted measure of the average range size of species in
   ecological assemblages of plants, invertebrates, and vertebrates. We
   refer to this measure as Relative Community Average Range Size (RCAR).
   Since samples of abundance are uncertain, and any patterns in measures
   of average range size that are weighted by species’ abundance could be
   driven by the few most abundant species, we also present results for a
   range-size measure unweighted by abundance, which we refer to as
   Relative Average Range Size (RAR). Range sizes were log[10]-transformed
   prior to averaging to reduce the influence on the measures of the few
   very widespread species. Increases in RCAR or RAR, which reflect an
   increased dominance of more widespread species within communities,
   would indicate that community composition is tending to become
   homogenized globally [16]. Our broad-scale synthesis enables us to
   assess geographic and taxonomic variation, as well as quantify overall
   patterns.

   Homogenization of ecological assemblages has traditionally been
   assessed as a reduction in spatial turnover (beta diversity) in
   assemblage composition [18,19]. However, this approach has limitations
   because the effects of land conversion on beta diversity are scale
   dependent [20]. For example, partial conversion of a natural landscape
   can increase beta diversity at the landscape scale while decreasing it
   globally. In contrast, measures based on the average range size of
   species within a community, such as RCAR and RAR used here, are always
   expected to increase whenever homogenization occurs.

   We combined a dataset of 1.1 million records from 445 surveys (Fig 1
   and S1 Fig) that compared the abundance of 19,334 species of
   terrestrial plants (7,111 species), invertebrates (7,048 species), and
   vertebrates (5,175 species) among different land uses [21], with
   occupancy- or extent-based estimates of all species’ range sizes using
   records from the Global Biodiversity Information Facility (GBIF;
   https://www.gbif.org) or from expert-drawn extent-of-occurrence maps
   for vertebrates only, to calculate RCAR and RAR at 13,292 sites in
   different land uses (see Materials and methods for full details).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 1. Locations of surveys whose data were used in the analysis, by
   major taxonomic group of study.

   Shown in the Lambert cylindrical equal area projection. Point diameters
   are proportional to the (log[e]) number of sites sampled by each
   survey, and are translucent so areas of opaque colour indicate
   overlapping points. Studies are coloured according to the taxa sampled
   within the study. The outline map is based on the World Bank map of
   river basins (https://bit.ly/2J86Kbq), which is published under a CC-BY
   4.0 license. The site-level data underlying this figure are freely
   available (DOI: 10.6084/m9.figshare.7262732).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.g001

   Estimates of global range size are uncertain for most terrestrial
   species [22,23], with both taxonomic and geographic patterns of
   underrecording hampering broad comparisons of absolute range-size
   estimates [22,24]. These problems are mitigated to some extent in our
   analyses because each of the individual biodiversity surveys—from which
   the abundance data were taken—sampled within relatively restricted
   taxonomic groups and geographic regions, and our hierarchically
   structured models account for differences in average range sizes
   between surveys. Therefore, our models only require good estimates of
   relative range size within the taxonomic groups and geographic regions
   of the individual studies. Nevertheless, to test the robustness of our
   results, we repeat all of our analyses for 3 different metrics of range
   size based on 2 fundamentally different underlying datasets: the
   occupancy of grid cells based on records in the GBIF database, the
   extent of land area encompassed by records in the GBIF database
   (excluding outlying records), and the total area within expert-drawn
   maps of species ranges for amphibians, mammals, and birds (see
   Materials and methods for full details). We also test the sensitivity
   of our results to variation in the resolution of the grid used to
   estimate range occupancy and extent, and to variation in the
   completeness of the underlying GBIF records.

   RCAR and RAR were modelled as a function of land-use type and land-use
   intensity, human population density, distance to the nearest road, and
   coarse landscape-scale land-use history. Land-use type and land-use
   intensity were classified based on the description of the habitat where
   assemblages were sampled, as given in the underlying papers (see S1
   Text). Responses may also be shaped by current land use in the
   surrounding landscape and by the detailed local history of land use,
   but reliable estimates of these factors were not available for the vast
   majority of sites included in our analyses. We used mixed-effects
   models to control for differences in sampling methods, sampling effort,
   average estimated range size, and climate among surveys, and for
   spatial patterns in the sampled sites within each survey. Average range
   sizes and the prevalence of different land uses are both likely to vary
   with elevation, so we also fitted elevation in the models as a fixed
   effect. In separate models, we tested whether responses differed
   geographically—as a function of the division between the tropical and
   temperate realms or as a function of climatic and topographic
   differences—and taxonomically, by comparing plants, invertebrates,
   amphibians, reptiles, mammals and birds.

   Homogenization is one explanation that can reconcile large rates of
   global extinction of species with relatively small net changes in local
   species richness [25]. In this case, we would expect responses of
   species richness and of RCAR and RAR to be more or less decoupled from
   one another. To test this, we assessed whether local (per-survey)
   responses of RCAR and RAR to land-use type were correlated with
   responses of species richness to land use in the same locations (i.e.,
   the same surveys; see Materials and methods for details).

   An increase in RCAR or RAR (and thus homogenization) could be caused by
   the loss of species with narrow geographic ranges [26,27], which tend
   also to be ecologically specialized [28], and/or by the gain of
   widespread species [26,27], which are often either species introduced
   from elsewhere [29] or ruderal, pioneer, or generalist native species
   able to exploit anthropogenic habitats [30]. To test whether either or
   both of these processes explain observed land-use effects on RCAR and
   RAR, we split the species recorded within each taxonomic Class and
   within each survey into 3 equal groups based on their range sizes. We
   then modelled both the total abundance and species richness of each of
   these groups as a function of land-use type and land-use intensity.

Results

Overall effects of land use and related pressures

   Overall, land use had a strong effect on both RCAR and RAR. Assemblages
   in all human-dominated land uses (plantation forests, croplands,
   pasture, and urban environments) have higher average RCAR than those in
   natural vegetation types (Fig 2) Even within natural vegetation, RCAR
   was higher in secondary vegetation (especially secondary vegetation in
   an early stage of recovery) than in primary vegetation (Fig 2) The
   effects of land use on RCAR were strong, significant, and very
   similar—qualitatively and quantitatively—regardless of which measure of
   range size was used. The results were also very similar whether average
   range size was weighted by abundance (RCAR) or not (RAR) (all
   likelihood ratio tests: χ^2 > 153, P < 0.001; Fig 2), showing that the
   patterns were not driven by responses of a few very abundant species.
   The consistency in the modelled effects of land use across range-size
   metrics occurred despite the underlying site-level RCAR values not
   always correlating strongly (R^2 values between 0.26 and 0.66; S2 Fig).
   The low correlations are unsurprising given that the metrics were
   chosen to reflect very different properties of species’ ranges and are
   based on completely different underlying datasets. Within land-use
   categories, RCAR increased significantly with increasing human land-use
   intensity (χ^2 > 7.0; P < 0.03), to an extent that differed among
   land-use types (interaction between land-use type and intensity: χ^2 >
   249, P < 0.001; Fig 2). Additionally, RCAR also independently increased
   significantly with human population density in 7 of the 8 models (for
   which χ^2 > 6.2; P < 0.012), although the relationships were much
   weaker (Fig 2) and differed among land-use types with strong increases
   only in cropland and pasture (interactions with land-use type: for all
   models, χ^2 > 68; P < 0.001; S3 Fig). The effects of proximity to roads
   (in all models, χ^2 < 1.4, P > 0.23) and in most cases duration of
   human use of a landscape (in 6 out of 8 models, χ^2 < 3.1, P > 0.08)
   did not affect RCAR on their own. However, both effects often
   interacted significantly with land-use type (interaction between
   land-use type and proximity to roads: in 6 out of 8 models, χ^2 > 26.6,
   P < 0.022; interaction between land-use type and duration of landscape
   use: for all models, χ^2 > 15.3, P < 0.033; S3 Fig). Specifically, a
   longer history of human domination of landscapes was associated with a
   strong increase in RCAR in urban environments but with decreased RCAR
   in cropland, plantation forest, pasture, and mature secondary
   vegetation (S3 Fig); RCAR increased with increasing proximity to roads
   in most land-use types, except young and mature secondary vegetation
   (S3 Fig). The per-survey strength of response of species richness to
   land-use type was weakly negatively correlated with the response of
   RCAR to land-use type (F[1,426] = 7.09, P = 0.008; R^2 = 0.016; S4
   Fig).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 2. Modelled effects of human pressures on RCAR.

   Effects are shown as a percentage difference from the value in
   minimally used primary vegetation, and were taken from the best-fitting
   models among those having no interactions between explanatory variables
   (results including interactions are shown in S3 Fig). Human pressures
   considered were as follows: land-use type and intensity, proximity to
   roads, and human population density. Error bars show 95% confidence
   intervals. Land-use type was classified as: primary vegetation, mature
   secondary vegetation, intermediate secondary vegetation, young
   secondary vegetation, plantation forest, cropland, pasture, and urban.
   We considered 3 alternative approaches for estimating species’ range
   size: range occupancy based on GBIF records (opaque points in A and B),
   range extent based on GBIF records with outliers removed (translucent
   points in A and B), and, for vertebrates only, range extent based on
   expert-drawn range maps (opaque points in C and D). For comparison, we
   also show estimates based on range occupancy from GBIF records for
   vertebrates (translucent points in C and D). We considered
   community-average range sizes both weighted (RCAR; A and C) and
   unweighted (RAR; B and D) by species’ abundance. For the models of all
   taxonomic groups (A and B), each land-use class was subdivided into 3
   levels of human intensity of use—minimal, light, and intense (see S4
   Table)—as indicated by different plotting symbols (light and intense
   intensity levels were combined for the secondary-vegetation classes).
   Effects of proximity to roads, vegetation removal, and human population
   density are shown here at the lowest, median, and highest values in the
   modelled dataset. Proximity to roads as shown here is the reverse of
   the distance to nearest road measure that was fitted in the models.
   Minimally used primary vegetation furthest from a road, and at the
   lowest level of vegetation removal and human population density, was
   used as the baseline. The site-level data underlying the models shown
   here are freely available (DOI: 10.6084/m9.figshare.7262732). GBIF,
   Global Biodiversity Information Facility; H, highest values in the
   dataset for each continuous effect; HPD, human population density; ISV,
   intermediate secondary vegetation; L, lowest values in the dataset for
   each continuous effect; M, median values in the dataset for each
   continuous effect; MSV, mature secondary vegetation; Plantation,
   plantation forest; PR, proximity to roads; Primary, primary vegetation;
   RCAR, Relative Community Average Range Size; YSV, young secondary
   vegetation.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.g002

Geographic and taxonomic variation in responses

   There was a significant difference in the responses of RCAR and RAR to
   land use between the tropical and temperate realms (χ^2 > 196, P <
   0.001). RCAR increased much more strongly in human-dominated land uses
   in the tropics than in the temperate realm (Fig 3). This result was
   qualitatively and quantitatively very similar across all range-size
   measures and for both RCAR and RAR. The tropical-temperate difference
   could be explained by the fact that increases in RCAR and RAR in human
   land uses were stronger in locations with lower climate seasonality:
   temperature seasonality in the case of RCAR (Fig 3; full statistical
   results in S1 Table) and precipitation seasonality in the case of RAR
   (Fig 3; full statistical results in S2 Table). Climate seasonality has
   previously been shown to be important in determining species’ range
   sizes [31] and responses to land-use change [7]. RCAR and RAR also
   increased more strongly in secondary vegetation in the tropics across
   all species in the dataset (Fig 3). However, for vertebrates, responses
   in secondary vegetation were more strongly positive in the temperate
   realm (Fig 3).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 3. Geographical variation in the response of RCAR to land use.

   We first tested for tropical-temperate differences in observed
   responses to disturbed land uses (A–D), and then whether responses to
   human land use vary with climatic seasonality or topographic
   heterogeneity (significant results are shown in E–F). All effects are
   shown as a percentage difference from values in primary vegetation.
   Error bars (A–D) and shading around lines (E–F) show 95% confidence
   intervals. For the analyses shown here, the land-use classification was
   coarsened to 3 classes: primary vegetation, secondary vegetation (all
   stages of recovery), and human-dominated (plantation forest, cropland,
   pasture, and urban). Land-use intensity was not considered. For the
   tropical-temperate models (A–D), as in the main models, we considered 3
   measures of range size, with community-average range size both weighted
   (RCAR; A, C, and E) and unweighted (RAR; B, D, and F) by species’
   abundance; these different combinations are plotted as in Fig 2. The
   site-level data underlying the models shown here are freely available
   (DOI: 10.6084/m9.figshare.7262732). CV, Coefficient of variation; RAR,
   Relative Average Range Size; RCAR, Relative Community Average Range
   Size.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.g003

   There were also significant differences in the responses of RCAR and
   RAR to land use among different taxonomic groups (χ^2 > 219; P <
   0.001). RCAR and RAR increased in human-dominated land uses most
   strongly for reptiles, plants, and mammals, and least for invertebrates
   (Fig 4). We caution that differences among taxonomic groups may partly
   reflect differences in the quality of range-size estimates (see
   Discussion).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 4. Differences among taxonomic groups in the response of RCAR to
   land use.

   Effects are shown as a percentage difference relative to primary
   vegetation. Error bars show 95% confidence intervals. For these
   analyses, the land-use classification was coarsened to 3 classes:
   primary vegetation, secondary vegetation (all stages of recovery), and
   human-dominated (plantation forest, cropland, pasture, and urban).
   Land-use intensity was not considered. Primary vegetation was used as
   the baseline. As in the main models, we considered community-average
   range size both weighted (RCAR; A and C) and unweighted (RAR; B and D)
   by species’ abundance; these different combinations are plotted as in
   Fig 2. The site-level data underlying the models shown here are freely
   available (DOI: 10.6084/m9.figshare.7262732). RAR, Relative Average
   Range Size; RCAR, Relative Community Average Range Size.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.g004

Responses of species with different relative range sizes

   Homogenization implies that narrow-ranged species tend to decline in
   occurrence or abundance, that widespread species tend to increase, or
   both. Splitting each survey’s species into 3 equal groups based on
   their range sizes revealed that land use and related pressures cause
   both of these changes (Fig 5). Narrow-ranged species have much lower
   local abundances on average (often by 30%–50%) under nearly all
   land-use classes compared with primary vegetation, while already
   widespread species increased in abundance by a similar amount. Species
   with mid-sized ranges also tended to have lower abundances in
   nonprimary land-use classes, although not by as much as narrow-ranged
   species (Fig 5). As with the previous results, modelled patterns were
   qualitatively and quantitatively similar across all range-size metrics,
   and for both total abundance and species richness differences (Fig 5).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 5. Effects of land-use type and land-use intensity on the total
   abundance or species richness of species with different range sizes.

   Effects are shown as a percentage difference relative to minimally used
   primary vegetation. Total abundance (A, C) and richness (B, D) are
   back-transformed to their original scales. For clarity, error bars here
   show ±1 standard error. The species sampled within each taxonomic Class
   within each survey were separated into 3 equal groups by range size
   into those with the widest ranges (upward-facing triangles),
   medium-sized ranges (circles), and narrowest ranges (downward-facing
   triangles). As in the main models, we either considered species’
   abundance (i.e., modelling total abundance: A and C) or not (i.e.,
   modelling species richness: B and D); we also considered 3 different
   metrics of range size for all species or for vertebrates only, with
   these combinations plotted as in Fig 2. The site-level data underlying
   the models shown here are freely available (DOI:
   10.6084/m9.figshare.7262738). ISV, intermediate secondary vegetation;
   MSV, mature secondary vegetation; Plantation, plantation forest;
   Primary, primary vegetation; YSV, young secondary vegetation.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.g005

Sensitivity analyses

   In addition to being consistent across the different methods of
   calculating both RCAR and RAR, our results were also generally very
   robust in sensitivity tests, in which we used subsets of the vertebrate
   and plant data with range-size estimates restricted to taxa and regions
   with successively more complete GBIF data ([22]; see S5 and S6 Figs).
   The magnitude of land-use effects on RCAR was reduced—but still
   significant—in the most stringent subsets of the data (S5 Fig).
   However, the step at which this change occurred was associated with the
   loss of almost all tropical sites (S7 Fig), which we show above to be
   the most strongly affected by human land use. Nevertheless, if the
   large effects seen in the tropics were caused by poor estimates of
   range size, they entailed uncertainty only in the degree to which
   widespread species had higher abundance in disturbed habitats (S6 Fig);
   the reduced abundance of narrow-ranged species was consistent across
   all data subsets (S6 Fig).

   The results were also very similar when we used different spatial
   resolutions to grid the GBIF data in order to estimate range sizes (S8
   Fig). If anything, the effects of land use were stronger when we used a
   finer-resolution grid than that used for the results presented in the
   main text (S8 Fig). We tested for spatial autocorrelation in the
   residuals associated with each of the underlying surveys (as in [5]),
   finding significant spatial autocorrelation no more often than expected
   by chance (S9 Fig; one-sided equality of proportions test: χ^2 < 1.52,
   P > 0.10). Furthermore, the residuals of the model showed no pattern
   with respect to latitude (S10 Fig), despite geographic gradients in
   average range size [32].

Discussion

   In most parts of the world, human populations are growing [33],
   human-dominated land uses and secondary vegetation are increasing at
   the expense of primary vegetation [34], and the road network is being
   expanded [35]. Our models show that each of these pressures leads to an
   increase in the average range size of species within ecological
   assemblages, confirming the global—and in most cases
   taxonomic—generality of a pattern previously demonstrated by
   smaller-scale, single-clade studies [12–15], consistent with a similar
   global synthesis for freshwater fish assemblages [17]. The results have
   important implications for the conservation of species, sustainable
   land-use practices, and likely also for ecosystem functioning.

   The increases in RCAR and RAR in disturbed habitats also suggest a
   homogenization of local ecological assemblages worldwide. Previous
   detailed studies across well-studied regions have shown that human land
   use homogenizes biodiversity, increasing the similarity between
   neighbouring communities [19]. Our results imply that human land use is
   causing a similar homogenization of community composition for many
   different taxonomic groups globally. Although the surveys with the most
   negative responses of local species richness to human land use tended
   also to show the strongest increases of RCAR in human land uses (S4
   Fig), the weakness of this relationship (R^2 = 0.016) suggests that
   changes in richness and RCAR are largely decoupled. This combination of
   results is consistent with homogenization as a mechanism that
   reconciles the observed large global losses of biodiversity—as well as
   the regional and national declines in many species—with the relatively
   small average net change in local diversity [5,25]. Whereas the balance
   between species loss and species gain may depend on context,
   homogenization is occurring in all disturbed habitats.

   Our results have important implications for species conservation. In
   general, species with narrow ranges are the most likely to be
   threatened with extinction because the drivers of threat are more
   likely to affect the entire range of these species [8]. More
   specifically, narrow ranges will tend to reflect more specific climatic
   requirements and thus greater sensitivity to climate change. Given
   this, our results suggest that the same species are likely to be
   sensitive to both land use and climate change. The contrasting effects
   of land use on the abundance of narrow- and wide-ranged species
   highlights the importance of primary vegetation for species with small
   ranges [36]. Even mature secondary vegetation—whose assemblages may
   approach those in primary vegetation in terms of species richness
   [5,37], total abundance [5], and biomass [37]—has a substantially
   reduced abundance of narrow-ranged species compared with primary
   vegetation (Fig 5). Our study adds new weight to calls for larger
   investments in the study and conservation of narrow-ranged species. It
   also highlights the additional insight available from using
   biodiversity metrics that reflect assemblage composition as well as
   numbers of taxa or individuals [38,39].

   The changes in community-average range size also have implications at
   the ecosystem level. Because widespread species tend to be ecological
   generalists [28], the increases in RCAR and RAR that we show probably
   indicate functional homogenization at a global scale. Previous studies
   have suggested that narrow-ranged species may be functionally distinct,
   potentially making an important contribution to resilient ecosystem
   function [11]. The increased abundance of widespread species may also
   drive spatial synchrony among assemblages and populations within
   landscapes, increasing the risk of extreme dynamics [40].

   Increases in RCAR and RAR were strongest in the tropical realm. There
   are three possible—likely interconnected—reasons for this difference.
   First, native tropical species tend to have smaller average ranges than
   temperate species [32], increasing the contrast with wide-ranging
   newcomers. Second, tropical species—especially narrow-ranged
   species—may be more specialized, on average, than temperate species
   [41]. Third, temperate regions have experienced a longer history of
   large-scale human disturbance than most tropical regions, which has
   likely already filtered out the most sensitive species from assemblages
   and expanded the range of disturbance-tolerant species [42]. The first
   two explanations may be associated with disproportionately strong
   responses in environments with low climatic seasonality or topographic
   heterogeneity because climatically stable environments are
   characterized by species with smaller average range sizes [31] and more
   specialized species [43]. Indeed, we showed that the stronger responses
   of average community range sizes in tropical areas could be better
   explained by the lower climatic seasonality of these environments than
   by the tropical-temperate division alone (Fig 3). The disproportionate
   increases in RCAR and RAR in the tropics have important implications
   for the future conservation of biodiversity, given that most
   species—and especially narrow-ranged species—are found in the tropics
   and that most future land conversion is predicted to occur here [44].

   Responses of community-average range sizes varied strongly among
   taxonomic groups, with the largest increases in RCAR and RAR in
   human-modified land uses for reptiles, plants, and mammals, and the
   weakest for invertebrates. The reasons for these taxonomic differences
   are not clear, and we caution that they may to some extent reflect
   variation in the quality of range-size estimates. Varying quality of
   range-size estimates is especially likely to explain the weak responses
   for invertebrate species, given that invertebrate ranges are likely to
   be the most incompletely defined, and narrow-ranged invertebrates have
   been shown to be less likely to be captured in incomplete surveys [45].
   However, the particularly strong responses of reptiles highlight the
   conservation concern of a group that—among vertebrates—has already been
   shown to respond most strongly to human land use and whose species are
   likely to have their ranges most reduced by future climate change [46].
   The broadly consistent responses across most taxonomic groups,
   especially for those groups that likely have better-characterized
   ranges, provide further evidence that the overall results are not
   likely to be an artefact of poor range-size estimates.

   Such a broad-scale analysis necessarily entails many uncertainties. The
   greatest challenge here was in the estimation of range sizes. For most
   species, highly accurate range-size estimates will not be available for
   the foreseeable future. Therefore, we selected estimates of range size
   that were as different as possible in nature (e.g., occupancy versus
   extent) and in the underlying data and methodology, which resulted—by
   design—in site-level RCAR and RAR measures that were not always very
   strongly correlated (S2 Fig). Nevertheless, the modelled effects of
   land use were generally very robust to (a) using different range-size
   metrics (including expert-drawn range maps, which suffer less from the
   biases that characterize GBIF data) (Figs 2–5), (b) the choice of
   whether or not to weight by recorded species abundances (Figs 2–5), (c)
   the removal of sites where the underlying range-size estimates may be
   less reliable (S5 and S6 Figs), and (d) the use of different grid
   resolutions to estimate range sizes (S8 Fig). Improved knowledge of
   species’ ranges will in time refine estimates of RCAR and RAR.

   As with any correlative analysis, it is impossible to determine the
   mechanisms behind observed patterns with confidence. For example, the
   disproportionate sensitivity of narrow-ranged species to land use may
   reflect the fact that these species tend also to be rare in other ways,
   such as having low abundance or being habitat specialists [47]. How
   different forms of rarity interact to determine sensitivity to land use
   is an important question for future studies. Our analyses also ignore
   how responses to land-use change unfold over time, though these
   dynamics will often be important [48]. Spatial comparisons of RCAR and
   RAR among land uses do not provide a direct measure of the temporal
   homogenization of biodiversity.

   All studies based on samples of biodiversity in different land uses are
   potentially biased by differences in detection probability among
   species and among locations. We expect numerically rare species to be
   undersampled relative to abundant species, especially in the more
   closed habitats typical of natural vegetation. If anything, numerically
   rare species are likely also to have narrow ranges ([49], but see e.g.
   [50]), in which case our modelled effects of land use on RCAR will be
   conservative. We have expressed changes in RCAR and abundance relative
   to values from assemblages in minimally used primary vegetation, but
   even such ‘pristine’ assemblages will have been influenced by humans in
   many cases [51,52]; any bias caused by unrecognised past human
   influence will—by introducing widespread species into sites treated as
   pristine—have diluted rather than strengthened the effects we see.
   Another potential issue is that range sizes show biogeographical
   patterns that are unrelated to land-use differences, in particular
   tending to increase with latitude [31]. However, sites within most of
   the surveys in our dataset span a very small latitudinal range (the
   sites sampled in more than 92% of surveys ranged over less than 1° of
   latitude), and the residuals from our main model showed no latitudinal
   (or longitudinal) pattern (S10 Fig).

   Overall, our results provide strong and consistent evidence that land
   use and related pressures reduce the abundance of narrow-ranged species
   while increasing the abundance of widespread species. This will, on
   average, lead to a homogenization of terrestrial ecological assemblages
   worldwide. The disproportionate loss of narrow-ranged species in human
   land uses is of concern for biodiversity conservation and ecosystem
   functioning, given that these species tend to be at the greatest risk
   of extinction and may play unique functional roles.

Materials and methods

Assemblage composition data

   We extracted data from the Projecting Responses of Ecological Diversity
   In Changing Terrestrial Systems (PREDICTS) database [21,53] on 28 April
   2015. This database is a collation of individual studies that compared
   species presence/absence or abundance among different types of land
   use. The data used in this study consisted of a total of 1,127,401
   records of abundance (presence/absence records were excluded) that
   could be matched to a corresponding estimate of range size (see below).
   These records were taken from 368 sources—published or in-press papers,
   or unpublished datasets with published methods (a full reference list
   is given in S1 Text)—that contained data from 445 surveys, collectively
   sampling 13,292 sites (S1 Fig), spread across all but one of the
   world’s terrestrial biomes (flooded grasslands/savannas were not
   sampled), approximately in proportion to total productivity (S1 Fig).
   The dataset contained records for 19,334 species in total, with no
   strong taxonomic bias, and records for over 1% of described species in
   many major taxonomic groups (S1 Fig). Abundance records were corrected
   for any variation in sampling effort within studies (which affected 16%
   of studies) by assuming that recorded abundance increases linearly with
   effort [54]. More sophisticated methods for correcting the abundance
   estimates could not be used because most of the underlying studies did
   not make repeat visits to each site. However, for uncertainty in the
   abundance estimates to bias our results would require that recorded
   abundances were biased with respect to both range size and land use.
   This type of bias seems unlikely, and so we expect any uncertainty in
   the recorded abundances simply to add noise to the modelled
   relationships. We obtained geographic coordinates for all sites from
   the source publications or their authors.

Estimating range size

   Estimates of the global range size of species always contain
   considerable uncertainty. In this study, we estimated range size using
   3 different metrics and repeated the analyses with each metric. The
   measures used were as follows: (1) the area occupied by species based
   on records in the GBIF database—‘GBIF occupancy’ (the measure focused
   on in the main text); (2) an estimate of the extent of species’ ranges
   based on GBIF records—‘GBIF extent’; and (3) an estimate of range
   extent based on expert-drawn extent-of-occurrence maps (available only
   for vertebrate species)—‘Expert extent’. Metric 1 captures a different
   aspect of range size (occupancy) than that captured by metrics 2 and 3
   (extent). All GBIF records for plants, arthropods, vertebrates,
   molluscs, and annelids were downloaded (http://www.gbif.org) on 25 June
   2015. These raw extracts were then filtered to contain only species
   also found in the PREDICTS database.

   GBIF occupancy was estimated by summing the total area of the grid
   cells containing a record in the GBIF database. This approach will
   underestimate ranges when recording is incomplete but avoids
   overestimating ranges of species with poor range filling and is much
   less affected by incorrectly located records than extent-based
   measures. Estimates obtained in this way will vary depending upon the
   spatial resolution of the grid used. Using a finer resolution should
   better represent the range sizes of narrow-ranged species but also
   increases the influence of biases and incompleteness in GBIF records.
   To ensure the robustness of our results to the choice of grid, we
   generated estimates using equal-area grids with 3 different grid sizes:
   110 km × 110 km, 55 km × 55 km, and 11 km × 11 km. We focus in the main
   text on the results using the 110-km grid because, at finer resolution,
   the patchiness of the GBIF data is likely to create greater
   discrepancies across species.

   To estimate GBIF extent, we first defined a rectangle bounded by the
   pair of longitudes that encompassed the central 95% of GBIF records in
   a longitudinal direction as well as the pair of latitudes that
   encompassed the central 95% of GBIF records in a latitudinal direction.
   This exclusion of outlying records mitigates to some extent the effect
   of the incorrectly located records present within GBIF. The rectangle
   was defined as a grid of cells of flexible resolution. We clipped the
   gridded rectangle using a gridded land-sea mask to represent only
   terrestrial areas. The land-sea mask grid was derived from the World
   Borders dataset (www.thematicmapping.org) using the rasterize function
   in the raster package Version 2.3–12 [55] in R Version 3.1.2 [56]. The
   total range extent was then calculated as the sum of the area of all of
   the land cells within the rectangle. Grid cell area was calculated as
   above. To test the robustness of the range-extent estimates to the use
   of different grids, we used 3 spatial resolutions (as above): 110 km,
   55 km, and 11 km. We used this simple measure of range extent rather
   than more sophisticated extent measures based on, for example, minimum
   convex polygons because the latter measures would be sensitive to gaps
   and biases in the GBIF records to a much higher degree than both simple
   latitudinal and longitudinal extent and the main occupancy-based
   measure based on GBIF data. In a well-recorded arthropod group (the
   sphingid moths), range estimates based on simple latitudinal and
   longitudinal extent have been shown to correlate strongly (R^2 = 0.94)
   with those based on minimum convex polygons [57].

   Records in the GBIF database are biased geographically [22], biasing
   relative estimates of range size, and possibly also comparisons of
   average assemblage range sizes among land uses. For comparison with our
   GBIF occupancy and extent estimates, we also used expert-derived
   estimates of extent, based on expert-drawn extent-of-occurrence maps
   for amphibians [58], mammals [58], and birds [59]. Three steps were
   used to process the extent-of-occurrence maps, using the arcpy Python
   module associated with ArcMap Version 10.3 [60] (steps 1 and 2) and
   using R Version 3.1.2 [56] (step 3). First, the polygon maps were
   projected onto a Behrmann equal-area projection using the
   ‘Project_management’ function. Second, the area of each polygon within
   a species’ range map was calculated using the ‘CalculateAreas_stats’
   function. Finally, for each species, the areas for every polygon were
   summed.

   The average range size of species within assemblages was measured in
   two ways: first, as the community-weighted mean (log[10]-transformed)
   range size (the average log[10]-transformed range size of species in an
   assemblage, weighted by the species’ raw untransformed abundance within
   the assemblage), which we refer to as RCAR; and second, as the simple
   average of log[10]-transformed range size of species in an assemblage,
   unweighted by abundance, which we refer to as RAR. The second measure
   was used to test whether the observed patterns in the
   abundance-weighted metric were driven by a few very abundant species.

Sensitivity analyses

   In addition to using different measures of range size, we also tested
   the sensitivity of our main measure (GBIF-based occupancy, on a 110-km
   grid) to variation in estimated completeness of the underlying GBIF
   data. To estimate the completeness of range-size estimates for
   particular taxonomic groups across particular geographic regions, we
   took grid-based (110 km × 110 km grid) estimates of inventory
   completeness for trachaeophytes [61], amphibians, mammals, and birds
   [22]. These inventory completeness estimates indicate the percentage of
   those species estimated to be present within a grid cell—as inferred
   from overlaid extent-of-occurrence maps (vertebrates) or a co-kriged
   environment-richness model (trachaeophytes)—that are represented by
   GBIF records. The grid-based estimates for each taxonomic group were
   spatially averaged across broad biogeographical regions (combinations
   of biogeographic realm and biome). Note that, even with perfect
   sampling, the completeness estimates based on overlaid range maps are
   not always expected to reach 100% because, even at the coarse grid
   resolution used, a species’ area of occupancy will regularly be
   overestimated by its extent of occurrence [62]. Nevertheless, we
   anticipate that they will provide a reasonable, broad-scale
   approximation of the relative completeness of GBIF data.

   For each study in our dataset that focused on one of the 4 taxonomic
   groups with estimates of inventory completeness, we matched each site
   to the mean inventory completeness of all grid cells within the
   combination of biogeographical biome and realm where that site’s
   location is situated. We then constructed models, first based on sites
   with any nonzero estimate of inventory completeness, and then with
   successively reduced sets of sites with inventory completeness
   exceeding 5%, 10%, 15%, 20%, and 25% (this last value was exceeded by
   only 18% of the sites in our dataset).

   For the sensitivity analyses, the reduced dataset for trachaeophytes
   and vertebrates, and then the successive reductions in the size of the
   dataset for increasingly stringent estimates of completeness, meant
   that we had to employ a coarser land-use classification than used for
   the main results: secondary vegetation in all stages of recovery was
   combined into a single class, and all human land-use types (plantation
   forest, cropland, pasture, and urban) were aggregated.

Human pressure data

   We used 5 pressure variables related to human land use and hypothesized
   as potentially influencing the average range size of species within
   ecological assemblages: land-use type, land-use intensity, land-use
   history, human population density, and distance to the nearest road.
   Land-use type was classified into one of 8 categories: primary
   vegetation, mature secondary vegetation, intermediate secondary
   vegetation, young secondary vegetation, plantation forest, cropland,
   pasture, and urban (see S3 Table and ref. [21] for full definitions).
   Within each of these classes, each site was assigned a 3-level ordinal
   measure of intensity, depending on the extent and magnitude of human
   use of the site (S4 Table and ref. [21]). Criteria for classifying
   land-use intensity varied according to land-use type. For example,
   increased intensity in natural (primary and secondary) vegetation could
   reflect logging or bushmeat hunting, whereas increased intensity in
   agricultural sites reflected, for example, reduced crop diversity,
   increased chemical inputs, and increased livestock density (see S4
   Table for full criteria).

   Land-use history was measured as the number of years since 30% of the
   land surface within the 5-arc-minute grid cell containing the site
   became converted to human land uses (cropland, pasture, or urban). We
   used this threshold because the effects of loss of natural habitat on
   biodiversity appear to accelerate above 30% [63]. We inferred historic
   land use from the HYDE model, Version 3.1, at 5-arc-minute spatial
   resolution [64]. Therefore, the available estimates of land-use history
   were at much coarser spatial resolution than the local-scale
   classification of land-use type, which was based on habitat information
   in the papers that sampled biodiversity. Human population density, at
   30-arc-second resolution, was derived from the Global Rural-Urban
   Mapping Project Version 1 dataset [65]. Distance to the nearest road
   was calculated from the Global Roads Open Access Data Set Version 1
   [66], using the arcpy Python module for ArcMap Version 10.3 [60]: the
   roads maps was first projected onto an equal-area (Behrmann) projection
   using the ‘Project_management’ function; then, distance to nearest road
   (in metres) for each site was calculated using the ‘Near_analysis’
   function.

Statistical analysis

   We conducted all statistical analyses in R Version 3.3.2 [67]. Each
   measure of mean range size (RCAR and RAR) was modelled as a function of
   the pressure variables using linear mixed-effects models in the lme4
   package Version 1.1–14 [68]. We included random intercepts for study
   identity (to account for among-study differences in sampling methods,
   sampling effort, measure of abundance used, climatic conditions, and
   average range-size estimates) and spatial block within study (to
   account for the spatial structure of sites). It was not feasible to
   include random slopes in this analysis because of model-convergence
   issues. Fixed effects considered were each of the 5 pressure variables
   described above, the two-way interaction between land-use type and
   land-use intensity, all two-way interactions among the 3 continuous
   pressure variables (land-use history, human population density, and
   distance to nearest road), and all two-way interactions between
   land-use type and each of the continuous pressure variables. Range
   sizes might show elevational patterns, and it is likely that land use
   is nonrandom with respect to elevation in some of the surveys. To
   account for any biases caused by elevational effects, we fitted
   elevation as an additional fixed effect in the models. The variables
   describing human population density, distance to nearest road, land-use
   history, and elevation were log[e]-transformed prior to analysis. The
   best fixed-effects structure for explaining variation in
   community-weighted mean range size was obtained by backward stepwise
   model selection based on likelihood-ratio tests.

   To assess whether spatial autocorrelation might bias modelled
   estimates, we used Moran’s I tests for spatial
   autocorrelation—implemented in the ‘spdep’ package Version 0.7–4
   [69]—on the model residuals associated with each study from which data
   were obtained. By chance, we expect significant (P < 0.05) spatial
   autocorrelation in the residuals for 5% of studies. To test whether the
   observed percentage of studies with significant spatial autocorrelation
   was significantly greater than 5%, we used a one-sided test for
   equality of proportions, using the ‘prop.test’ function in R. Average
   range sizes vary geographically for reasons unrelated to land use. This
   biogeographical variation should be accounted for by the random
   intercept of study identity in our models, coupled with the fact that
   most individual studies span only a small geographic area. To check
   that this was the case, we conducted a spatial analysis of all of the
   residuals from the main model of RCAR. We tested for an effect of both
   longitude and latitude (both fitted as cubic polynomials) and their
   interaction.

   To test whether the responses of RCAR and RAR to land use varied
   geographically or taxonomically, we conducted separate analyses
   dividing sites between the tropical and temperate realms and dividing
   species into major taxonomic groups. Tropical sites were defined as
   those falling between the tropics of Cancer and Capricorn (23.5°N and
   23.5°S, respectively), with all other sites considered ‘temperate’ (21
   sites fell north of the Arctic Circle at 66.5°N). Taxonomic groups were
   defined as follows: ‘plants’ for all species in the Kingdom Plantae,
   ‘invertebrates’ for all annelids, arthropods, and molluscs; and
   separate divisions for each of the vertebrate Classes, which have more
   complete range-size estimates (‘amphibians’, ‘birds’, ‘mammals’, and
   ‘reptiles’).

   Any tropical-temperate differences in responses of RCAR and RAR to land
   use may reflect differences in average climatic variability and
   topographic heterogeneity between tropical and temperate sites. A
   previous study using the PREDICTS data showed that turnover in species
   composition between natural and human land uses is stronger in areas
   with lower climatic seasonality [7], and other studies have shown that
   climatic seasonality and topographic heterogeneity are important in
   determining the range sizes of species [31]. Therefore, we tested
   whether the strength of the responses of RCAR and RAR to human land use
   are determined by climatic seasonality and topographic heterogeneity.
   To do so, we first estimated response strength by fitting mixed-effects
   models of RCAR and RAR as a function of land-use type, where land-use
   type was divided simply into natural (primary and secondary vegetation)
   or human-dominated (plantations, cropland, pasture, and urban sites).
   As in the main models (see above), we fitted study identity as a random
   intercept, but in this case also with a random slope of land-use type
   nested within study identity. These random slopes for human land use
   were used as the estimate of response strength and were modelled (using
   simple multiple regression) as a function of the same variables
   considered in [7]: temperature and precipitation seasonality, derived
   from WorldClim Version 1.4 [70]; and topographic heterogeneity as the
   topographic ruggedness index [71], using elevation data from WorldClim
   Version 1.4 [70]. Both linear and quadratic terms were considered for
   each of these continuous variables. The simple classification of sites
   as tropical or temperate was also considered in this analysis but was
   found to be nonsignificant alongside the more refined variables for
   both RCAR and RAR (see Results).

   To test whether any changes in the average range size of ecological
   communities (RCAR and RAR) were driven by increases in the abundance of
   wide-ranging species or by decreases in the abundance of narrow-ranged
   species (or both), we divided the sampled species within each
   underlying study—and within taxonomic Classes where studies sampled
   more than one Class—into 3 equally sized groups based on their range
   sizes. We then constructed separate generalized linear mixed-effects
   models of the total (log[e]-transformed) sampled abundance (with a
   Gaussian error distribution) or species richness (with a Poisson error
   distribution) of each of these 3 groups as a function of land-use type
   and land-use intensity. As with the models of RCAR, random intercepts
   of study identity and spatial block within study were included. We used
   within-study and within-Class divisions of range size to control, to
   some extent, for geographic and taxonomic variation in the quality of
   range-size estimates, and also because the distribution of actual range
   sizes will vary geographically and taxonomically, and we were
   interested in whether relatively more widespread species in a given
   locality respond more positively than more narrow-ranged related
   species. Only 10% of species in the analysis appear in different
   range-size categories across studies, and the results were very robust
   to the exclusion of these species (results not shown).

   Spatial homogenization of biodiversity, which will manifest in our
   models as an increase in the average range size of species within
   ecological communities, is one possible explanation that reconciles the
   large observed declines in global biodiversity despite relatively small
   (or even no) changes in local species richness [5,25]. If this were the
   case, we would expect species richness changes and changes in average
   range size not to be strongly coupled. To test this, we fitted a model
   with only land-use type as a fixed effect, using a coarser
   classification of land-use type into natural (primary and secondary
   vegetation) or human (plantation forests, croplands, pastures, and
   urban habitats). We fitted in this model a random slope of land-use
   type nested within study identity to obtain an estimate of how strongly
   average range size responds to human land use. We also fitted a
   separate model with the same structure but with species richness as a
   response variable. We then correlated, across studies, the strength of
   the response of RCAR in human land uses with the strength of the
   response of species richness.

Supporting information

S1 Fig. Locations of surveys, and taxonomic and geographic representativeness
of the data.

   The location of each survey whose data were included in the analysis
   (A), shown in the Lambert cylindrical equal area projection. Point
   diameters are proportional to the (log[e]) number of sites sampled by
   each survey and are translucent so areas of opaque color indicate
   overlapping points. The outline map is based on the World Bank map of
   river basins (https://bit.ly/2J86Kbq), which is published under a CC-BY
   4.0 license. The total number of species in the analysed dataset in
   major taxonomic groups (B), in relation to estimated numbers of
   described species in the same groups (422). The distribution of sites
   among terrestrial biomes in relation to the distribution of total
   terrestrial Net Primary Production (C). The grey line in panel C shows
   the 1:1 relationship. Letters in this plot indicate the biomes as
   follows: A, tundra; B, boreal forests and taiga; C, temperate conifer
   forests; D, temperate broadleaf and mixed forests; E, montane
   grasslands and shrublands; F, temperate grasslands, savannahs, and
   shrublands; G, Mediterranean forests, woodlands, and scrub; H, deserts
   and xeric shrublands; J, tropical and subtropical grasslands,
   savannahs, and shrublands; K, tropical and subtropical coniferous
   forests; M, tropical and subtropical dry broadleaf forests; N, tropical
   and subtropical moist broadleaf forests; P, mangroves. The site-level
   data underlying this figure are freely available (DOI:
   10.6084/m9.figshare.7262732).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s001

   (TIF)

S2 Fig. Correspondence between estimates of RCAR based on different estimates
of species’ range size.

   Estimates of range occupancy derived from records in the GBIF database
   were gridded at spatial resolutions of 110 km × 110 km, 55 km × 55 km,
   and 11 km × 11 km (A–C). A measure of range extent (a conceptually
   different measure of range size compared with the occupancy measure
   featured in the main text) was also calculated using GBIF records
   gridded at the same spatial resolutions (D–F). Finally, we extracted
   range-size estimates from expert-drawn extent-of-occurrence maps for
   birds, mammals, and amphibians (G–I), the groups whose ranges are best
   known. The red lines show 1:1 relationships.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s002

   (TIF)

S3 Fig. Effects of proximity to roads, human population density, and length
of landscape use by humans on RCAR.

   Separate effects are shown for each land use because interaction terms
   were significant (all P < 0.05). For clarity, shading shows ±0.5 ×
   standard error rather than the 95% confidence interval. Distance to the
   nearest road is shown here as the raw values rather than the inverse
   ‘proximity to road’ shown in Fig 1 The site-level data underlying the
   models shown here are freely available (DOI:
   10.6084/m9.figshare.7262732).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s003

   (TIF)

S4 Fig. Comparison of the effects of human land use on RCAR and on species
richness, for individual underlying studies.

   Separate models were fitted for species richness and RCAR as a function
   of land use. For these models, land use was classified coarsely as
   either natural (primary or secondary vegetation) or human (plantation
   forests, croplands, pastures, and urban environments). A random slope
   of land use nested within study identity was fitted for each model. The
   random slope coefficients for human land use were extracted as an
   estimate of the relative strength of effect of human land use on
   species richness and RCAR within each individual study. The
   relationship between the estimates for species richness and RCAR are
   shown here (black points). A linear model was fitted to test the
   correspondence, showing a significant but weak negative relationship
   (R^2 = 0.014; P = 0.008; solid red line = mean fitted relationship;
   dashed red lines = 95% confidence intervals). The site-level data
   underlying the models shown here are freely available (DOI:
   10.6084/m9.figshare.7262732).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s004

   (TIF)

S5 Fig. Sensitivity of the estimated effect of land use on RCAR to variation
in quality of underlying range-size estimates.

   Because sample size was much reduced in the most stringent subsets of
   the data, land use in these models was classified more coarsely than in
   the main models into primary vegetation, secondary vegetation, and
   human land uses (combining plantation forests, croplands, pastures, and
   urban environments). Open triangles show the results based on the
   complete dataset. Solid triangles of increasing size show results from
   increasingly stringent subsets of the data, with increasing data
   quality. Data quality reflected variation in the quality of species’
   range-size estimates, and was measured as the estimated inventory
   completeness of GBIF records for each of 4 taxonomic groups
   (trachaeophytes, amphibians, mammals, and birds) across different
   biogeographic regions (combinations of biogeographic realm and biome).
   Note that inventory completeness is not expected to reach 100% (see
   Materials and methods, above). Inventory completeness exceeded 25% for
   only 18% of sites in our dataset. Error bars show 95% confidence
   intervals. The site-level data underlying the models shown here are
   freely available (DOI: 10.6084/m9.figshare.7262732).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s005

   (TIF)

S6 Fig. Sensitivity of the estimated effect of land use on the abundance of
widely and narrowly distributed species to variation in quality of underlying
range-size estimates.

   Because sample size was much reduced in the most stringent subsets of
   the data, land use in these models was classified more coarsely than in
   the main models, into primary vegetation, secondary vegetation, and
   human land uses (combining plantation forests, croplands, pastures, and
   urban environments). Open triangles show the results based on the
   complete dataset. Solid triangles of increasing size show results from
   increasingly stringent subsets of the data, with increasing data
   quality. Data quality reflected variation in the quality of species’
   range-size estimates, and was measured as the estimated inventory
   completeness of GBIF records for each of 4 taxonomic groups
   (trachaeophytes, amphibians, mammals, and birds) across different
   biogeographic regions (combinations of biogeographic realm and biome).
   Note that inventory completeness is not expected to reach 100% (see
   Materials and methods, above). Inventory completeness exceeded 25% for
   only 18% of sites in our dataset. Error bars show 95% confidence
   intervals. The site-level data underlying the models shown here are
   freely available (DOI: 10.6084/m9.figshare.7262738).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s006

   (TIF)

S7 Fig. Locations of sites for subsets of the data of increasing stringency
in terms of the quality of underlying range-size estimates.

   Data quality reflected variation in the quality of species’ range-size
   estimates and was measured as the estimated inventory completeness of
   GBIF records for each of 4 taxonomic groups (trachaeophytes,
   amphibians, mammals, and birds) across different biogeographic regions
   (combinations of biogeographic realm and biome). Note that inventory
   completeness is not expected to reach 100% (see Materials and methods,
   above). Inventory completeness exceeded 25% for only 18% of sites in
   our dataset. The outline maps are based on the World Bank map of river
   basins (https://bit.ly/2J86Kbq), which is published under a CC-BY 4.0
   license. The site-level data underlying the models shown here are
   freely available (DOI: 10.6084/m9.figshare.7262732).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s007

   (TIF)

S8 Fig. Effects of land use on RCAR, estimated based on GBIF-based measures
of range size gridded at different resolutions.

   Effects of land use and land-use intensity using RCAR based on range
   occupancy using GBIF records, gridded at a spatial resolution of 110 km
   × 110 km (A), 55 km × 55 km (B), and 11 km × 11 km (C). Based on range
   extent using GBIF records at 110 km × 110 km (D), 55 km × 55 km (E),
   and 11 km × 11 km (F) resolution. Error bars show 95% confidence
   intervals. Land use was classified into primary vegetation, mature
   secondary vegetation, intermediate secondary vegetation, young
   secondary vegetation, plantation forest, cropland, pasture, and urban.
   Each land-use class was subdivided into 3 levels of human intensity of
   use—minimal, light, and intense. The plots show the interaction between
   land use and land-use intensity, with increasing intensity shown toward
   the right-hand side for each land use. The site-level data underlying
   the models shown here are freely available (DOI:
   10.6084/m9.figshare.7262732). ISV, intermediate secondary vegetation;
   MSV, mature secondary vegetation; Plantation, plantation forest;
   Primary, primary vegetation; YSV, young secondary vegetation.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s008

   (TIF)

S9 Fig. Spatial autocorrelation in the model residuals.

   A Moran’s I test was applied to the residuals from the final models,
   dividing the residuals into the individual underlying surveys. The
   distribution of P values across the tests for each of the surveys is
   shown here, for measures of RCAR and RAR based on different underlying
   estimates of range size—range occupancy based on GBIF records (A and
   B), range extent based on GBIF records (C and D), range occupancy based
   on GBIF records for vertebrates (E and F), and range extent based on
   expert-drawn range maps for vertebrates (G and H); and for measures of
   average range size both weighted (i.e., RCAR; A, C, E, and G) and
   unweighted (i.e., RAR; B, D, F, and H) by species’ recorded abundances.
   The red line shows P = 0.05. The site-level data underlying the models
   shown here are freely available (DOI: 10.6084/m9.figshare.7262732).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s009

   (TIF)

S10 Fig. Spatial patterns in the residuals of the final model of RCAR as a
function of human pressures.

   A map of each site included in the final model, where point colours
   represent the value of the model residuals for each site (blue = low;
   red = high), showing no discernible spatial pattern (A). The outline
   map is based on the World Bank map of river basins
   (https://bit.ly/2J86Kbq), which is published under a CC-BY 4.0 license.
   Model residuals for each site as a function of latitude (B). There was
   no significant relationship between the value of the model residual for
   a site and either longitude, latitude, or their interaction. The
   site-level data underlying the models shown here are freely available
   (DOI: 10.6084/m9.figshare.7262732).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s010

   (TIF)

S1 Table. Statistics explaining geographical variation in the strength of the
response of RCAR to human land use.

   Linear models were used to explain the strength of the response of RCAR
   as a function of variables hypothesized to drive observed
   tropical-temperate differences. Variables considered were geographic
   zone (tropical versus temperate) itself, and 3 more refined measures of
   climatic or topographic variability: temperature seasonality,
   precipitation seasonality, and the topographic ruggedness index. Both
   linear and quadratic terms were considered for all of the continuous
   variables (i.e., all variables except geographic zone). Quadratic terms
   are denoted in this table by a superscript 2. The final model was
   obtained by backward stepwise model selection, with the significance of
   terms assessed using analysis of variance. PS, precipitation
   seasonality; TRI, topographic ruggedness index; TS, temperature
   seasonality.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s011

   (DOCX)

S2 Table. Statistics explaining geographical variation in the strength of the
response of RAR to human land use.

   Linear models were used to explain the strength of the response of RAR
   as a function of variables hypothesized to drive observed
   tropical-temperate differences. Variables considered were geographic
   zone (tropical versus temperate) itself, and 3 more refined measures of
   climatic or topographic variability: temperature seasonality,
   precipitation seasonality, and the topographic ruggedness index. Both
   linear and quadratic terms were considered for all of the continuous
   variables (i.e., all variables except geographic zone). Quadratic terms
   are denoted in this table by a superscript 2. The final model was
   obtained by backward stepwise model selection, with the significance of
   terms assessed using analysis of variance. PS, precipitation
   seasonality; TRI, topographic ruggedness index; TS, temperature
   seasonality.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s012

   (DOCX)

S3 Table. Definitions of the major land-use classes.

   Each site was classified into one of these classes based on the
   description of the habitat where the biodiversity sample was taken, as
   given in the underlying papers from which the biodiversity data were
   obtained (see S1 Text).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s013

   (DOCX)

S4 Table. Criteria used to classify land use and land-use intensity.

   The classification was made based on the description of the habitat
   given in the underlying papers from which the data were obtained (see
   S1 Text).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s014

   (DOCX)

S1 Text. List of all references for underlying community data.

   These references are a subset of those in the PREDICTS database [21].

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pbio.2006841.s015

   (DOCX)

Acknowledgments

   This is a contribution from the Imperial College Grand Challenges in
   Ecosystems and the Environment Initiative. We thank Tim Robertson and
   Rebecca A. Senior for assistance in generating the range-size
   estimates; Adriana De Palma, Luca Börger and Claudia L. Gray for
   contributions to discussion about this work; all of the students who
   helped collate the data used in these analyses; the many field
   researchers who shared their data with us; and Ian Kitching for
   valuable comments on an early draft of the manuscript. This study is
   part of the PREDICTS Project, which is endorsed by GEO-BON. The
   biodiversity data underlying this study are publicly available at
   http://dx.doi.org/10.5519/0066354.

References

    1. 1. Barnosky AD, Matzke N, Tomiya S, Wogan GOU, Swartz B, Quental
       TB, et al. Has the Earth’s sixth mass extinction already arrived?
       Nature. 2011;471:51–57. pmid:21368823
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    2. 2. Ceballos G, Ehrlich PR, Barnosky AD, García A, Pringle RM,
       Palmer TM. Accelerated modern human—induced species losses:
       Entering the sixth mass extinction. Sci Adv. 2015;1:e1400253.
       pmid:26601195
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    3. 3. Crutzen PJ. Geology of mankind. Nature. 2002;415:23.
       pmid:11780095
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    4. 4. Maxwell SL, Fuller RA, Brooks TM, Watson JEM. Biodiversity: the
       ravages of guns, nets and bulldozers. Nature. 2016;536:143–145.
       pmid:27510207
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    5. 5. Newbold T, Hudson LN, Hill SLL, Contu S, Lysenko I, Senior RA,
       et al. Global effects of land use on local terrestrial
       biodiversity. Nature. 2015;520: 45–50. pmid:25832402
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    6. 6. Thomas CD. Local diversity stays about the same, regional
       diversity increases, and global diversity declines. Proc Natl Acad
       Sci U S A. 2013;110:19187–8. pmid:24248347
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    7. 7. Newbold T, Hudson LN, Hill SLL, Contu S, Gray CL, Scharlemann
       JPW, et al. Global patterns of terrestrial assemblage turnover
       within and among land uses. Ecography. 2016;39:1151–1163.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    8. 8. Collen B, Dulvy NK, Gaston KJ, Gärdenfors U, Keith DA, Punt AE,
       et al. Clarifying misconceptions of extinction risk assessment with
       the IUCN Red List. Biol Lett. 2016;12:20150843. pmid:27072401
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
    9. 9. Purvis A, Gittleman JL, Cowlishaw G, Mace GM. Predicting
       extinction risk in declining species. Proc R Soc Lond B Biol Sci.
       2000;267:1947–1952. pmid:11075706
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   10. 10. Ripple WJ, Wolf C, Newsome TM, Hoffmann M, Wirsing AJ, McCauley
       DJ. Extinction risk is most acute for the world’s largest and
       smallest vertebrates. Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A.
       2017;114:10678‒10683 pmid:28923917
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   11. 11. Mouillot D, Bellwood DR, Baraloto C, Chave J, Galzin R,
       Harmelin-Vivien M, et al. Rare species support vulnerable functions
       in high-diversity ecosystems. PLoS Biol. 2013;11:e1001569.
       pmid:23723735
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   12. 12. Kitahara M, Sei K. A comparison of the diversity and structure
       of butterfly communities in semi-natural and human-modified
       grassland habitats at the foot of Mt. Fuji, central Japan.
       Biodivers Conserv. 2001;10:331–351.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   13. 13. Thomas CD. Habitat use and geographic ranges of butterflies
       from the wet lowlands of Costa Rica. Biol Conserv. 1991;55:269–281.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   14. 14. Spitzer K, Novotný V, Tonner M, Leps J. Habitat preferences,
       distribution and seasonality of the butterflies (Lepidoptera,
       Papilionoidea) in a montane tropical rain forest, Vietnam. J
       Biogeogr. 1993;20:109–121.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   15. 15. Horner-Devine MC, Daily GC, Ehrlich PR, Boggs CL. Countryside
       biogeography of tropical butterflies. Conserv Biol.
       2003;17:168–177.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   16. 16. McKinney ML, Lockwood JL. Biotic homogenization: a few winners
       replacing many losers in the next mass extinction. Trends Ecol
       Evol. 1999;14:450–453. pmid:10511724
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   17. 17. Toussaint A, Beauchard O, Oberdorff T, Brosse S, Villéger S.
       Worldwide freshwater fish homogenization is driven by a few
       widespread non-native species. Biol Invasions. 2016;18:1295–1304.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   18. 18. Baiser B, Olden JD, Record S, Lockwood JL, McKinney ML. Pattern
       and process of biotic homogenization in the New Pangaea. Proc R Soc
       Lond B Biol Sci. 2012;279:4772–4777. pmid:23055062
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   19. 19. Gossner MM, Lewinsohn TM, Kahl T, Grassein F, Boch S, Prati D,
       et al. Land-use intensification causes multitrophic homogenization
       of grassland communities. Nature. 2016;540:266–269. pmid:27919075
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   20. 20. Barton PS, Cunningham SA, Manning AD, Gibb H, Lindenmayer DB,
       Didham RK. The spatial scaling of beta diversity. Glob Ecol
       Biogeogr. 2013;22:639–647.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   21. 21. Hudson LN, Newbold T, Contu S, Hill SLL, Lysenko I, De Palma A,
       et al. The database of the PREDICTS (Projecting Responses of
       Ecological Diversity In Changing Terrestrial Systems) project. Ecol
       Evol. 2017;7:145–188. pmid:28070282
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   22. 22. Meyer C, Kreft H, Guralnick R, Jetz W. Global priorities for an
       effective information basis of biodiversity distributions. Nat
       Commun. 2015;6:8221. pmid:26348291
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   23. 23. Herkt KMB, Skidmore AK, Fahr J. Macroecological conclusions
       based on IUCN expert maps: a call for caution. Glob Ecol Biogeogr.
       2017;26:930–941.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   24. 24. Hortal J, de Bello F, Diniz-Filho JAF, Lewinsohn TM, Lobo JM,
       Ladle RJ. Seven shortfalls that beset large-scale knowledge of
       biodiversity. Annu Rev Ecol Evol Syst. 2015;46:523–549.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   25. 25. McGill BJ, Dornelas M, Gotelli NJ, Magurran AE. Fifteen forms
       of biodiversity trend in the Anthropocene. Trends Ecol Evol.
       2015;30:104–113. pmid:25542312
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   26. 26. Cleary DFR, Mooers AO. Burning and logging differentially
       affect endemic vs. widely distributed butterfly species in Borneo.
       Divers Distrib. 2006;12:409–416.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   27. 27. Phalan B, Onial M, Balmford A, Green RE. Reconciling food
       production and biodiversity conservation: land sharing and land
       sparing compared. Science. 2011;333:1289–1291. pmid:21885781
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   28. 28. Slatyer RA, Hirst M, Sexton JP. Niche breadth predicts
       geographical range size: a general ecological pattern. Ecol Lett.
       2013;16:1104–1114. pmid:23773417
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   29. 29. van Kleunen M, Dawson W, Essl F, Pergl J, Winter M, Weber E, et
       al. Global exchange and accumulation of non-native plants. Nature.
       2015;525:100–103. pmid:26287466
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   30. 30. Tabarelli M, Peres CA, Melo FPL. The “few winners and many
       losers” paradigm revisited: emerging prospects for tropical forest
       biodiversity. Biol Conserv. 2012;155:136–140.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   31. 31. Morueta-Holme N, Enquist BJ, McGill BJ, Boyle B, Jørgensen PM,
       Ott JE, et al. Habitat area and climate stability determine
       geographical variation in plant species range sizes. Ecol Lett.
       2013;16:1446–1454. pmid:24119177
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   32. 32. Stevens GC. The latitudinal gradient in geographic range: how
       so many species coexist in the tropics. Am Nat. 1989;133:240‒256.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   33. 33. Cohen JE. Human population: the next half century. Science.
       2003;302:1172–1175. pmid:14615528
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   34. 34. Ellis EC. Anthropogenic transformation of the terrestrial
       biosphere. Philos Trans A Math Phys Eng Sci. 2011;369:1010–1035.
       pmid:21282158
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   35. 35. Laurance WF, Clements GR, Sloan S, O’Connell CS, Mueller ND,
       Goosem M, et al. A global strategy for road building. Nature.
       2014;513:229–232. pmid:25162528
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   36. 36. Gibson L, Lee TM, Koh LP, Brook BW, Gardner TA, Barlow J, et
       al. Primary forests are irreplaceable for sustaining tropical
       biodiversity. Nature. 2011;478:378–381. pmid:21918513
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   37. 37. Martin PA, Newton AC, Bullock JM. Carbon pools recover more
       quickly than plant biodiversity in tropical secondary forests. Proc
       R Soc Lond B Biol Sci. 2013;280:20132236.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   38. 38. Hillebrand H, Blasius B, Borer ET, Chase JM, Downing JA,
       Eriksson BK, et al. Biodiversity change is uncoupled from species
       richness trends: consequences for conservation and monitoring. J
       Appl Ecol. 2018;55:169–184.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   39. 39. Purvis A, Newbold T, De Palma A, Contu S, Hill SLL,
       Sanchez-Ortiz K, et al. Modelling and projecting the response of
       local terrestrial biodiversity worldwide to land use and related
       pressures: the PREDICTS project. Adv Ecol Res. 2018;58:201–241.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   40. 40. Blüthgen N, Simons NK, Jung K, Prati D, Renner SC, Boch S, et
       al. Land use imperils plant and animal community stability through
       changes in asynchrony rather than diversity. Nat Commun.
       2016;7:10697. pmid:26869180
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   41. 41. Forister ML, Novotny V, Panorska AK, Baje L, Basset Y,
       Butterill PT, et al. The global distribution of diet breadth in
       insect herbivores. Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A. 2015;112:442–447.
       pmid:25548168
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   42. 42. Balmford A. Extinction filters and current resilience: the
       significance of past selection pressures for conservation biology.
       Trends Ecol Evol. 1996;11:193–196. pmid:21237807
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   43. 43. Janzen DH. Why Mountain Passes are Higher in the Tropics. Am
       Nat. 1967;101:233–249.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   44. 44. van Vuuren DP, Edmonds J, Kainuma M, Riahi K, Thomson A,
       Hibbard K, et al. The representative concentration pathways: an
       overview. Clim Change. 2011;109:5–31.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   45. 45. Beck J, Takano H, Ballesteros-Mejia L, Kitching IJ, McCain CM.
       Field sampling is biased against small-ranged species of high
       conservation value: a case study on the sphingid moths of East
       Africa. Biodivers Conserv. in press;
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   46. 46. Newbold T. Future effects of climate and land-use change on
       terrestrial vertebrate community diversity under different
       scenarios. Proc R Soc Lond B Biol Sci. 2018;285:20180792.
       pmid:29925617
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   47. 47. Gaston KJ, Blackburn TM, Lawton JH. Interspecific
       abundance-range size relationships: an appraisal of mechanisms. J
       Anim Ecol. 1997;66:579–601.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   48. 48. Socolar JB, Gilroy JJ, Kunin WE, Edwards DP. How should
       beta-diversity inform biodiversity conservation? Trends Ecol Evol.
       2015;31:67–80. pmid:26701706
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   49. 49. Brown JH. On the relationship between abundance and
       distribution of species. Am Nat. 1984;124:255–279.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   50. 50. Novosolov M, Rodda GH, North AC, Butchart SHM, Tallowin OJS,
       Gainsbury AM, et al. Population density-range size relationship
       revisited. Glob Ecol Biogeogr. 2017;26:1088–1097.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   51. 51. Lyons SK, Amatangelo KL, Behrensmeyer AK, Bercovici A, Blois
       JL, Davis M, et al. Holocene shifts in the assembly of plant and
       animal communities implicate human impacts. Nature. 2016;529:80–83.
       pmid:26675730
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   52. 52. van Zonneveld M, Larranaga N, Blonder B, Coradin L, Hormaza JI,
       Hunter D. Human diets drive range expansion of megafauna-dispersed
       fruit species. Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A. 2018;115:3326–3331.
       pmid:29531027
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   53. 53. Hudson LN, Newbold T, Contu S, Hill SLL, Lysenko I, De Palma A,
       et al. Dataset: The 2016 release of the PREDICTS database. 2016.
       10.5519/0066354
   54. 54. Newbold T, Hudson LN, Phillips HRP, Hill SLL, Contu S, Lysenko
       I, et al. A global model of the response of tropical and
       sub-tropical forest biodiversity to anthropogenic pressures. Proc R
       Soc Lond B Biol Sci. 2014;281:20141371.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   55. 55. Hijmans RJ. raster: Geographic data analysis and modeling.
       2014. http://cran.r-project.org/package=raster
   56. 56. R Core Team. R: A Language and Environment for Statistical
       Computing. R Foundation for Statistical Computing; 2014.
       http://www.r-project.org/
   57. 57. Beck J, Kitching IJ, Linsenmair KE. Measuring range sizes of
       South-East Asian hawkmoths (Lepidoptera: Sphingidae): effects of
       scale, resolution and phylogeny. Glob Ecol Biogeogr.
       2006;15:339–348.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   58. 58. IUCN. The IUCN Red List of Threatened Species. Version 2013.7.
       2013. http://www.iucnredlist.org. [cited 12 Nov 2018].
   59. 59. Birdlife International, NatureServe. Bird species distribution
       maps of the world. Version 2.0. 2012.
       http://www.birdlife.org/datazone/info/spcdownload. [cited 12 Nov
       2018].
   60. 60. ESRI. ArcGIS Desktop: Version 10.3. Environmental Systems
       Research Institute; 2015.
   61. 61. Meyer C, Weigelt P, Kreft H. Multidimensional biases, gaps and
       uncertainties in global plant occurrence information. Ecol Lett.
       2016;19:992–1006. pmid:27250865
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   62. 62. Hurlbert AH, Jetz W. Species richness, hotspots, and the scale
       dependence of range maps in ecology and conservation. Proc Natl
       Acad Sci U S A. 2007;104:13384–9. pmid:17686977
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   63. 63. Andrén H. Effects of habitat fragmentation on birds and mammals
       in landscapes with different proportions of suitable habitat: a
       review. Oikos. 1994;71:355–366.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   64. 64. Klein Goldewijk K, Beusen A, Van Drecht G, De Vos M. The HYDE
       3.1 spatially explicit database of human-induced global land-use
       change over the past 12,000 years. Glob Ecol Biogeogr.
       2011;20:73–86.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   65. 65. Center for International Earth Science Information Network
       (CIESIN) Columbia University, International Food Policy Research
       Institute (IFPRI), The World Bank, Centro Internacional de
       Agricultura Tropical (CIAT). Global Rural-Urban Mapping Project,
       Version 1 (GRUMPv1): Population Density Grid. NASA Socioeconomic
       Data and Applications Center (SEDAC); 2011.
       http://sedac.ciesin.columbia.edu/data/dataset/grump-v1-population-d
       ensity
   66. 66. Center for International Earth Science Information Network
       (CIESIN) Columbia University, Information Technology Outreach
       Services (ITOS) University of Georgia. Global Roads Open Access
       Data Set, Version 1 (gROADSv1). NASA Socioeconomic Data and
       Applications Center (SEDAC); 2013.
       http://dx.doi.org/10.7927/H4VD6WCT
   67. 67. R Core Team. R: A Language and Environment for Statistical
       Computing. R Foundation for Statistical Computing; 2016.
       https://www.r-project.org/
   68. 68. Bates D, Mächler M, Bolker B, Walker S. Fitting linear
       mixed-effects models using {lme4}. J Stat Softw. 2015;67:1–48.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   69. 69. Bivand R, Hauke J, Kossowski T. Computing the Jacobian in
       Gaussian spatial autoregressive models: an illustrated comparison
       of available methods. Geogr Anal. 2013;45:150–179.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   70. 70. Hijmans RJ, Cameron SE, Parra JL, Jones PG, Jarvis A. Very high
       resolution interpolated climate surfaces for global land areas. Int
       J Climatol. 2005;25:1965–1978.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   71. 71. Wilson MFJ, O’Connell B, Brown C, Guinan JC, Grehan AJ.
       Multiscale terrain analysis of multibeam bathymetry data for
       habitat mapping on the continental slope. Mar Geod. 2007;30:3–35.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar

   Download PDF

     * Citation
     * XML

   Print
     * Print article
     * EzReprint

   Share
     * Reddit Reddit
     * Google+ Google+
     * Facebook Facebook
     * LinkedIn LinkedIn
     * Mendeley Mendeley
     * PubChase PubChase
     * Twitter Twitter
     * Email Email

     [CROSSMARK_BW_horizontal.svg]
   Advertisement

Subject Areas

   ?

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.
   We want your feedback. Do these Subject Areas make sense for this
   article? Click the target next to the incorrect Subject Area and let us
   know. Thanks for your help!
     * Land use
       Is the Subject Area "Land use" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Biodiversity
       Is the Subject Area "Biodiversity" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Taxonomy
       Is the Subject Area "Taxonomy" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Species diversity
       Is the Subject Area "Species diversity" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Biogeography
       Is the Subject Area "Biogeography" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Forests
       Is the Subject Area "Forests" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Vertebrates
       Is the Subject Area "Vertebrates" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Conservation science
       Is the Subject Area "Conservation science" applicable to this
       article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.

Archived Tweets

   Load more
   View all tweets

     * Publications
     * PLOS Biology
     * PLOS Medicine
     * PLOS Computational Biology
     * PLOS Genetics
     * PLOS Pathogens
     * PLOS ONE
     * PLOS Neglected Tropical Diseases

     * Home
     * Blogs
     * Collections
     * Give feedback
     * LOCKSS

     * Privacy Policy
     * Terms of Use
     * Advertise
     * Media Inquiries
     * Contact

   PLOS is a nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation, #C2354500, based in San
   Francisco, California, US
   PLOS
   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TP26BH

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MQQMGF

   Advertisement

     * plos.org
     * create account
     * sign in

PLOS ONE

     * Publish
          + Submissions
               o Getting Started
               o Submission Guidelines
               o Figures
               o Tables
               o Supporting Information
               o LaTeX
               o Preprints
               o Revising Your Manuscript
               o Submit Now
               o Calls for Papers
          + Policies
               o Best Practices in Research Reporting
               o Human Subjects Research
               o Animal Research
               o Competing Interests
               o Disclosure of Funding Sources
               o Licenses and Copyright
               o Data Availability
               o Materials and Software Sharing
               o Ethical Publishing Practice
               o Authorship
               o Downloads and Translations
          + Manuscript Review and Publication
               o Criteria for Publication
               o Editorial and Peer Review Process
               o Editor Center
               o Guidelines for Reviewers
               o Accepted Manuscripts
               o Corrections and Retractions
               o Comments
               o Article-Level Metrics

Submit Your Manuscript
       Discover a faster, simpler path to publishing in a high-quality
       journal. PLOS ONE promises fair, rigorous peer review, broad scope,
       and wide readership – a perfect fit for your research every time.
       Learn More Submit Now
     * About
          + Why Publish with PLOS ONE
          + Journal Information
          + Staff Editors
          + Editorial Board
          + Section Editors
          + Advisory Groups
          + Find and Read Articles
          + Publishing Information
          + Publication Fees
          + Press and Media
          + Contact
     * Browse
     *

       Search

       Search
       ____________________ (BUTTON)

       advanced search

   Browse Subject Areas
   ?

   Click through the PLOS taxonomy to find articles in your field.

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.

     * Loading metrics

   Open Access

   Peer-reviewed

   Research Article

Critical Decline of the Eastern Caribbean Sperm Whale Population

     * Shane Gero ,
       * E-mail: shane.gero@bios.au.dk
       Affiliation Zoophysiology, Institute for Bioscience, Aarhus
       University, Aarhus, Denmark
       ORCID logo http://orcid.org/0000-0001-6854-044X
       ⨯
     * Hal Whitehead
       Affiliation Dept. of Biology, Dalhousie University, Halifax, Canada
       ⨯

Critical Decline of the Eastern Caribbean Sperm Whale Population

     * Shane Gero,
     * Hal Whitehead

   PLOS
   x
     * Published: October 5, 2016
     * https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0162019

     * Article
     * Authors
     * Metrics
     * Comments
     * Media Coverage

     * Reader Comments (0)
     * Media Coverage
     * Figures

Figures

   Table 1
   Fig 1
   Table 2
   Fig 2

Abstract

   Sperm whale (Physeter macrocephalus) populations were expected to
   rebuild following the end of commercial whaling. We document the
   decline of the population in the eastern Caribbean by tracing
   demographic changes of well-studied social units. We address hypotheses
   that, over a ten-year period of dedicated effort (2005–2015), unit
   size, numbers of calves and/or calving rates have each declined. Across
   16 units, the number of adults decreased in 12 units, increased in two,
   and showed no change in two. The number of adults per unit decreased at
   -0.195 individuals/yr (95% CI: -0.080 to -0.310; P = 0.001). The number
   of calves also declined, but the decline was not significant. This
   negative trend of -4.5% per year in unit size started in about 2010,
   with numbers being fairly stable until then. There are several natural
   and anthropogenic threats, but no well-substantiated cause for the
   decline.

   Citation: Gero S, Whitehead H (2016) Critical Decline of the Eastern
   Caribbean Sperm Whale Population. PLoS ONE 11(10): e0162019.
   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0162019

   Editor: Songhai Li, Institute of Deep-sea Science and Engineering,
   Chinese Academy of Sciences, CHINA

   Received: March 2, 2016; Accepted: August 16, 2016; Published: October
   5, 2016

   Copyright: © 2016 Gero, Whitehead. This is an open access article
   distributed under the terms of the Creative Commons Attribution
   License, which permits unrestricted use, distribution, and reproduction
   in any medium, provided the original author and source are credited.

   Data Availability: The photoidentification data used in this study have
   been made available through the Figshare repository (DOI:
   10.6084/m9.figshare.3829617).

   Funding: SG received an FNU fellowship from the Danish Council for
   Independent Research, supplemented by a Sapere Aude Research Talent
   Award (http://ufm.dk/en/), Carlsberg Foundation Field Expedition Grant
   (http://www.carlsbergfondet.dk/?sc_lang=en), and Killam Trusts (CA). HW
   received operating and equipment grants from the Natural Sciences and
   Engineering Research Council of Canada (http://www.nserc-crsng.gc.ca/).
   The funders had no role in study design, data collection and analysis,
   decision to publish, or preparation of the manuscript.

   Competing interests: The authors have declared that no competing
   interests exist.

Introduction

   When a well-defined existential threat is removed, we expect population
   recovery. Following the 1986 moratorium on commercial whaling, some
   populations of heavily-exploited species increased, but some did not
   [1]. Sperm whales (Physeter macrocephalus) were expected to increase
   [2], but there is little clear evidence for regrowth [3,4]. There are a
   range of current threats that may be affecting population growth rates
   [4]. Sperm whales have an especially low rate of increase [5], giving
   threats with quite small proximate impacts (on, say, feeding,
   reproduction or mortality) population-level salience, and also making
   the detection of population trends challenging. Thus their status is
   generally uncertain as very small rates of change (~±1–3% per year),
   which are extremely hard to identify using most cetacean population
   assessment methods, can be of major significance.

   The world’s best-studied sperm whale population is that which uses
   waters near the volcanic islands of the Lesser Antilles in the eastern
   Caribbean [6]. Their social [6–9] and vocal [10–14] behaviour has been
   characterised in detail and their population monitored at the
   individual level for over a decade [15–18]. Female and immature sperm
   whale live in social units that are matrilineally based and have
   largely stable membership, other than birth, death and dispersal of
   adolescent males [19,20]. Off the island of Dominica in the eastern
   Caribbean, members of 17 social units have been repeatedly
   photoidentified since 2005 [20], with many units being documented as
   far back as 1984 from opportunistic data collected off seven islands in
   the Lesser Antilles [across a linear distance of ~670 km, 17]. Although
   there are occasional encounters with less-known units [20], the
   presence of sperm whales off Dominica is dominated by units that are
   well known by the standards of cetacean demographic studies.

   This study was prompted first by observations in 2014 and 2015 that
   some of the well-known units were reduced in size; and secondly, by the
   conflicting results of our recent population study [9]. Mark-recapture
   analysis indicated a population increasing at +3.4% per year, and
   contrasted strongly with a parallel life history stage-based estimate
   of the projected rate of increase for the same population of −2.7% per
   year. We suggested that immigration from surrounding regions coupled
   with a high local mortality could explain this discrepancy, making the
   study area an effective attractive sink [15].

   Here, we address the hypotheses that, over the ten-year period of
   dedicated effort (2005–2015), the well-studied units have declined in
   membership, and that numbers of calves and/or calving rates have
   declined.

Methods

   Photo-identifications of sperm whale adults [21] and calves [20] were
   taken off the islands of the Lesser Antilles, particularly Dominica and
   Guadeloupe, between 2005 and 2012 as described by Gero et al. [20],
   with the addition of data from 2014 and 2015 which were collected using
   similar methods (S1 and S2 Tables). Mature males were excluded from
   analyses because they are not permanent members of any unit, and, being
   primarily based in high-latitude waters, are not part of the eastern
   Caribbean population itself.

   We allocated individuals to units as in [20], and then considered units
   only in those years in which there were a total of at least 30
   photoidentifications of members of the unit by the primary research
   group, and there was no ambiguity about whether individuals were adults
   or calves. The resultant data set (numbers of adults and calves in each
   unit each year) is as in Table 1. The probability that an individual in
   a unit with 7 members (mean unit size [20]) is identified in at least
   one of 30 identifications of the unit in a year is 0.99 [1-(1-1/7)^30],
   so that our estimates of unit size in the different years are extremely
   precise. Specifically, encounters off Dominica are almost always of a
   single unit of whales, such that there are only 7 individual whales in
   the surrounding kilometers. As such, during encounters each individual
   whale is generally identified at a minimum of every other surfacing
   (every two hours), if not every surfacing (each hour) [see 20]. As a
   result, for these well-studied units, membership is easily established
   for each year in which there was sufficient time spent with the unit.
   It is, therefore, very unlikely that members of units are missed in
   years with 30 or more identifications of the unit.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 1. Number of adults (plus calves) identified in each year for
   each social unit, where data were sufficient.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0162019.t001

   For each unit in each year, we calculated four measures: number of
   adults, number of calves, total size (adults plus calves), and calf
   rate (the number of calves in the population relative to the number of
   adults, i.e. calves/adults). For each measure and each unit, we
   regressed the measure against year to give a trend estimate. The
   overall trend was estimated from a mixed effects model with the measure
   for a unit in a particular year being predicted by the continuous
   independent variable year for the slope and the random grouping
   variable unit for the intercept. The significance of the trend was
   measured in two ways, representing two rather different null
   hypotheses:
    1. there was no overall trend in the measure over time, using the
       significance of the trend parameter in the mixed effects model;
    2. units were as likely to have increased as decreased in the measure
       over time, using a sign test on the trends for the different units.

   Although the observations that generated this quantitative study were
   an apparent decline of unit size, we used two-sided tests as the
   hypothesis was developed during the same field observations that
   generated the photoidentification data, and two-sided tests are more
   conservative. As sperm whale reproduction has a broad seasonal
   component [22], we checked whether the mean (over units) of the
   difference between the number of calves, or the calf rate, observed in
   any year and the overall mean for that unit (the “*”‘s in Fig 1) was
   related to the Julian date of the midpoint of the field season (S1
   Table). There was no significant correlation of either mean residual
   number of calves, or mean residual calf rate, with the midpoint of the
   field season (P = 0.5502, P = 0.2713 respectively).
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 1. For number of adults, calves, total unit size and proportion of
   calves, the residual from the unit mean (over years) is plotted against
   the study year (dots).

   Also shown are the means for each year over units (star) and a
   regression through the residuals (line).

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0162019.g001

   We estimated survival within these well-studied units using maximum
   likelihood (S5 Table). We also quantify the sighting trend of
   rarely-seen individuals and updated the overall mark-recapture analysis
   described in [15] to include 2014 and 2015 data (S4 and S5 Tables; S1
   Fig).

Ethical Statement

   Data collected in Dominica under scientific research permits: SCR
   013/05-02, RP-2/12 IW-1, RP-09/014 IW-1, RP-01/079W-2, RP-03/059W-4,
   P-122/4W-2, and P-40/2W-7. Field protocols were approved by the
   University Committee on Laboratory Animals of Dalhousie University.

Results

   There were 16 units with two or more reliable estimates of size in
   different years between 2005 and 2015 (range: 2–9 years). Of those, the
   number of adults decreased in 12 units, increased in 2 units, and
   showed no change in two (Table 2). Overall, the number of adults
   decreased at a rate of -0.195 individuals/yr (95% CI: -0.080 to
   -0.310). This trend and the sign test were both significant (P =
   0.0010, P = 0.0012 respectively). The number of calves also declined,
   but at a lower and less significant rate, while the total unit size
   showed a strong and significant decline (Table 2; Fig 1). The data also
   showed a decline in the proportion of calves over the study period, but
   this was not statistically significant (Table 2). These results were
   almost identical if only the 12 units identified with four or more
   reliable estimates of size in different years were included (S3 Table).
   If divided by the mean number of adults, calves or both we get
   percentage decreases of about -4.5% per year in the numbers of adults,
   calves and total population size. It is apparent in Fig 1 that these
   negative trends start in about 2010, with numbers being fairly stable
   until then. The overall mark-recapture analysis (S4 Table) generally
   supports this trend; however this method has less power to detect
   trends than our principal analysis (Table 2; Fig 1). This is because
   trends are much more apparent in the known membership of well-studied
   units than in the population as a whole, which includes the confounding
   influence of members of rarely-sighted units.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Table 2. Trends for each unit (from linear regression) and overall
   (from linear mixed effects model), together with the significance tests
   of overall trend and the sign test.

   Means over all years, overall percent trends, and 95% confidence
   intervals.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0162019.t002

   Biannual maximum-likelihood estimates of survival (including dispersal
   of maturing males, and infrequent changes of unit membership) indicate
   high mortality in the middle years of the study, roughly 2008–2013 (Fig
   2). The perfect survival for 2014–2015 is based upon the 13 individuals
   identified in both 2014 and 2015 from 4 units, and no adults from these
   units being sighted in 2014 but not 2015.
   thumbnail
   Download:
     * PPT
       PowerPoint slide
     * PNG
       larger image
     * TIFF
       original image

   Fig 2. Maximum-likelihood estimates of survival rates for well-studied
   units off Dominica.

   Confidence intervals are from 1000 bootstrap replicate samples of
   units.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0162019.g002

Discussion

   Our analyses indicate a population under threat, perhaps in crisis. The
   numbers of animals in well-studied units has shown a startling decline,
   seemingly caused by a substantial drop in survival starting in about
   2008. Reproductive rates also seem to be falling. If overall trends
   continue, by 2030 there will be very few animals left. Our earlier
   analyses [15] suggested that an influx of new whales was compensating
   for the demographic decline of the residents. But, off Dominica, the
   proportion of rarely-seen animals has also declined since about 2012
   (S1 Fig), indicating that this source of population rescue is drying
   up. It is unlikely that what we have documented is a reduction in
   abundance of whales in the study area off Dominica relative to those in
   the habitat of the population as a whole, e.g., [23]. Given general
   long-term stability of units [19,20], this could only have occurred if
   the sperm whales’ social structure broke down causing fission of
   virtually all of the units. Fission of units has only been observed
   once in over 30 years of research in the Pacific and never in the 11
   years off Dominica [19,20]; therefore it seems unlikely that fission of
   the vast majority of units studied here over such a short period of
   time is the mechanism driving this trend.

   An analysis of defecation rates—used as a proxy for feeding success in
   sperm whales—found no decline over the study period, and a generally
   higher rate than studies in other regions (S2 Fig). This strongly
   suggests that lack of food, which could be caused by environmental
   changes or a density-dependent response following population rebound,
   is not implicated. However, the Eastern Caribbean population is subject
   to a number of anthropogenic threats that have proven to be fatal for
   this or other cetacean species, including:
    1. 1). Ship Strikes: Collisions with ships can directly impact the
       viability of a species (e.g. North Atlantic right whales, Eubalaena
       glacialis [24]) or subpopulations of a species (e.g. sperm whales
       in the Mediterranean Sea [25]). This risk is particularly acute in
       the Caribbean where the vast majority of goods are imported and
       there are high levels of marine traffic surrounding islands.
       Additionally, inter-island transits by high speed (>25 knots)
       ferries are increasing. These have proven to be a significant
       source of mortality for sperm whales off the Canary Islands
       [26,27], a similar deep-water archipelago. The eastern Caribbean is
       among the most urban parts of sperm whale habitat, routes of
       high-speed ferries, cruise ships, and other shipping pass directly
       through the areas used by sperm whales off the islands.
    2. 2). Tourism: Traditional vessel-based whale watching has been a
       growth industry in the Caribbean since the early 1990’s and
       Dominica was an early leader [28]. In addition, since at least
       2008, several commercial swim-with-whales operations focused on
       sperm whales have rapidly expanded increasing both the pressure on
       the individual whales and the amount of time whales encounter
       vessels. Both of these industries remain poorly regulated in much
       of the eastern Caribbean.
    3. 3). Fishing: While the majority of fishing effort in the eastern
       Caribbean uses small-scale light gear, such as Fish Attraction
       Devices (FAD) and gillnets, entanglements have previously caused
       sperm whale fatalities [29]. There were two reported entanglements
       in 2015 involving sperm whales (C. Rinaldi, pers. comm. and S.
       Gero, unpublished). Detection rates for entangled cetaceans are
       low, perhaps 8–10% [30], and may well be less in the eastern
       Caribbean where search effort is low. Thus 20 or more sperm whale
       entanglements (not necessarily all fatal) may have occurred in the
       eastern Caribbean in 2015.
    4. 4). Research: The research required to document this decline by
       necessity increased the whales’ overall exposure to small vessels.
       However, our methods have predominantly been non-invasive, been
       consistent since the start of the project in 2005, and research
       vessels have been shown to cause less disturbance to the focal
       animals than whale watching vessels [31,32].
    5. 5). Pollutants: Both physical and chemical pollutants create
       increased mortality for cetaceans. Marine debris has been cited as
       among the principal threats to marine mammals in the Caribbean and
       ingestion can prove fatal for sperm whales [33]. Organochlorines
       commonly used in agriculture, such as chlordecon used in banana
       plantations, have been documented in coastal marine fish and
       lobster species in the Caribbean [34]. Analysis of sperm whale
       tissue biopsies for pollutants and heavy metals using existing
       sperm whale biopsy samples is currently underway.
    6. 6). Ocean Noise: Whales rely on their acoustic modality to
       communicate, navigate, and forage. Changes in their acoustic
       environment may have both chronic and acute impacts, including
       increased stress [35], masking of communication and echolocation
       [36,37], and other behavioural responses [38–40].

   There are also potential natural causes of the decline including:
    1. 7). Disease: Successful carcass recovery of pelagic cetaceans is
       very low (around 3% for sperm whales generally [41]). Without
       detailed analysis of carcasses or biopsy samples it is difficult to
       determine the impact of natural illnesses.
    2. 8). Predation: While the threat of predation from orcas (Orcinus
       orca) is thought to be higher in the Pacific [42], recent
       observations suggest predation occurs in the Gulf of Mexico [43],
       around the Caribbean [44], and off Dominica (S.Gero, unpublished
       data).

   Currently, none of these anthropogenic or natural causes can be ruled
   out; and the documented decline may be the result of a complex
   combination of threats. Unless the effects we document are the results
   of a temporary factor operating primarily during 2009–2014, or a
   statistically-unlikely burst of “natural” mortality during the same
   period, we expect the decline to continue in the absence of effective
   mitigation of ongoing threats.

Conclusions

   Detailed individual-identification data document a decline in the
   eastern Caribbean sperm whales. These animals form a small (<300
   adults; S4 Table) population that is largely isolated (no
   photoidentification matches with well-studied populations in the Gulf
   of Mexico, the Sargasso Sea, and the Bahamas [15,17]) and behaviourally
   distinctive, at least in vocal repertoire and rates of allosuckling
   [7,11]. If extirpated, this population cannot be replaced. The data
   presented here call for a regional assessment of this population by the
   International Union for Conservation of Nature, urgent assessment of
   likely causes for its decline, and mitigation measures to be put in
   place.

Supporting Information

S1 Fig. Sighting trend of rarely-seen animals.

   Number of individuals identified from often-seen social units (units
   identified with a good sighting record in four or more years during
   2005–2015), from occasionally-seen units (units identified with a good
   sighting record in two years during 2005–2015; there were no units
   identified in just three years), and rarely-seen animals (social unit
   identified in less than two years 2005–2015, or not assigned to units)
   in each year from 2005–2015. The number of days at sea by the dedicated
   research group in each year is given above each bar.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0162019.s001

   (DOCX)

S2 Fig. Defecation rates.

   Defecation rates (number of defecations at fluke-ups divided by number
   of fluke-ups observed) for years with more than 50 observations. Bars
   represent approximate 95% confidence intervals from binomial
   distribution.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0162019.s002

   (DOCX)

S1 Table. Field Effort.

   Field effort across years.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0162019.s003

   (DOCX)

S2 Table. Supplementary Data.

   Details of field projects contributing opportunistic data.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0162019.s004

   (DOCX)

S3 Table. Alternative methods and impacts on results.

   Trends in numbers of adults, calves, adults+calves and calves/adults
   for each unit for which we had reliable estimates in 4 or more years
   (from linear regression) and overall (from linear mixed effects model),
   together with results of two-sided tests of null hypotheses that the
   overall trend is zero, and that units were equally likely to increase
   as decrease in size during the study period (sign test). The final
   three lines give the mean value of each measure over all years and
   units with available data, the overall percent trend and 95% confidence
   intervals.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0162019.s005

   (DOCX)

S4 Table. Overall mark-recapture population trend.

   Mark-recapture models fit to identifications of adult sperm whales in
   the eastern Caribbean, 1984–2015 sorted by decreasing ΔAIC.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0162019.s006

   (DOCX)

S5 Table. Survival of well-studied units using maximum likelihood.

   Models of Survival in best-studied social units, 2005–2015.

   https://doi.org/10.1371/journal.pone.0162019.s007

   (DOCX)

Acknowledgments

   We thank Chief Fisheries Officer Mr. Sebastien and the Dominica
   Fisheries Division, as well as, our contributors for their
   opportunistic data and our local partners for logistical support while
   in Dominica. This manuscript emanates from The Dominica Sperm Whale
   Project: http://www.thespermwhaleproject.org Follow: @DomWhale

Author Contributions

    1. Conceptualization: SG HW.
    2. Data curation: SG.
    3. Formal analysis: HW.
    4. Funding acquisition: SG HW.
    5. Investigation: SG HW.
    6. Methodology: HW.
    7. Visualization: HW.
    8. Writing – original draft: SG HW.
    9. Writing – review & editing: SG HW.

References

    1. 1. Baker CS, Clapham PJ, Munn T. Marine Mammal Exploitation: Whales
       and Whaling Exploitation: Whales and Whaling. 2002;3: 446–450.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    2. 2. Whitehead H. Estimates of the current global population size and
       historical trajectory for sperm whales. Mar Ecol Ser. 2002;242:
       295–304.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    3. 3. Moore JE, Barlow JP. Improved abundance estimates and trend
       estimtates for sprem whales in the eastern North Pacific from
       Bayesian hierarchical modeling. Endanger Species Res. 2014;25:
       141–150.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    4. 4. Carroll G, Hedley S, Bannister J, Ensor P, Hardcourt R. No
       evidence for recovery in the population of sperm whale bulls off
       Western Australia, 30 years post-whaling. Endanger Species Res.
       2014;24: 33–43.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    5. 5. Chiquet RA, Ma B, Ackleh AS, Pal N, Sidorovskaia N. Demographic
       analysis of sperm whales using matrix population models. Ecol
       Modell. 2013;248: 71–79.
       doi:https://doi.org/http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ecolmodel.2012.09.0
       23
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    6. 6. Gero S, Engelhaupt D, Rendell L, Whitehead H. Who Cares?
       Between-group variation in alloparental caregiving in sperm whales.
       Behav Ecol. 2009;20: 838–843.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    7. 7. Gero S, Engelhaupt D, Whitehead H. Heterogeneous social
       associations within a sperm whale, Physeter macrocephalus, unit
       reflect pairwise relatedness. Behav Ecol Sociobiol. 2008;63:
       143–151.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    8. 8. Gero S, Gordon JCD, Whitehead H. Individualized social
       preferences and long-term social fidelity between social units of
       sperm whales. Anim Behav. 2015;102: 15–23.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
    9. 9. Gero S, Whitehead H. Suckling behavior in sperm whale calves:
       observation and hypotheses. Mar Mammal Sci. 2007;23: 398–413.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   10. 10. Antunes R, Schulz T, Gero S, Whitehead H, Gordon JCD, Rendell
       L. Individually distinctive acoustic features in sperm whale codas.
       Anim Behav. 2011;81: 723–730.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   11. 11. Gero S, Whitehead H, Rendell L. Individual, unit and vocal clan
       level identity cues in sperm whale codas. R Soc Open Sci. The Royal
       Society; 2016;3: 150372. pmid:26909165
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   12. 12. Schulz TM, Whitehead H, Gero S, Rendell L. Individual vocal
       production in a sperm whale (Physeter macrocephalus) social unit.
       Mar Mammal Sci. 2011;27: 149–166.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   13. 13. Schulz TM, Whitehead H, Gero S, Rendell L. Overlapping and
       matching of codas in vocal interactions between sperm whales:
       insights into communication function. Anim Behav. 2008;76:
       1977–1988.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   14. 14. Gero S, Bøttcher A, Whitehead H, Madsen PT. Socially
       Segregated, Sympatric Sperm Whale Clans in the Atlantic Ocean. R
       Soc Open Sci. 2016;3: 160061. pmid:27429766
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   15. 15. Whitehead H, Gero S. Conflicting rates of increase in the sperm
       whale population of the eastern Caribbean: positive rates do not
       reflect a health population. Endanger Species Res. 2015;27:
       207–218.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   16. 16. Engelhaupt D, Hoelzel AR, Nicholson C, Frantzis A, Mesnick SL,
       Gero S, et al. Female philopatry in coastal basins and male
       dispersion across the North Atlantic in a highly mobile marine
       species, the sperm whale (Physeter macrocephalus). Mol Ecol.
       2009;18: 4193–4205. pmid:19769692
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   17. 17. Gero S, Gordon JCD, Carlson C, Evans P, Whitehead H. Population
       estimate and inter-island movement of sperm whales, Physeter
       macrocephalus, in the Eastern Caribbean. J Cetacean Res Manag.
       Report to the Scientific Committee of the International Whaling
       Commission; 2007;9: 143–150.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   18. 18. Whitehead H, Gero S. Using social structure to improve
       mortality estimates; an example with sperm whales. Methods Ecol
       Evol. 2013;5: 27–36.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   19. 19. Christal J, Whitehead H, Lettevall E. Sperm whale social units:
       variation and change. Can J Zool. 1998;76: 1431–1440.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   20. 20. Gero S, Milligan M, Rinaldi C, Francis P, Gordon JCD, Carlson
       C, et al. Behavior and social structure of the sperm whales of
       Dominica, West Indies. Mar Mammal Sci. 2014;30: 905–922.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   21. 21. Arnbom T. Individual identification of sperm whales. Rep to Int
       Whal Comm. 1987;37: 201–204.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   22. 22. Best PB, Canham PAS, MacLeod N. Patterns of reproduction in
       sperm whales, Physeter macrocephalus. Rep to Int Whal Comm (Special
       Issue). 1984;6: 51–79.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   23. 23. Bejder L, Samuels A, Whitehead H, Gales N, Mann J, Connor RC,
       et al. Decline in relative abundance of bottlenose dolphins
       (Tursiops sp.) exposed to long-term anthropogenic disturbance.
       Conserv Biol. 2006;20: 1791–1798. pmid:17181814
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   24. 24. Kraus SD, Brown MW, Caswell H, Clarke CW, Fujiwara M, Hamilton
       PK, et al. North Atlantic right whales in crisis. Science (80-).
       2005;309: 561–562. pmid:16040692
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   25. 25. Panigada S, Pesante G, Zanardelli M, Capoulade F, Gannier A,
       Weinrich MT. Ship strikes in the Mediterranean Sea: Assessment and
       identification of mitigation measures. Rep to Int Whal Comm IWC Sci
       Comm. 2009;SC/61/BC2.
   26. 26. Carrillo M, Ritter F. Increasing numbers of ship strikes in the
       Canary Islands: proposals for immediate action to reduce risk of
       vessel-whale collisions. J Cetacean Res Manag. 2010;11: 121–138.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   27. 27. Fais A, Lewis TP, Zitterbart DP, Álvarez O, Tejedor A, Aguilar
       Soto N. Abundance and Distribution of Sperm Whales in the Canary
       Islands: Can Sperm Whales in the Archipelago Sustain the Current
       Level of Ship-Strike Mortalities? PLoS One. Public Library of
       Science; 2016;11: e0150660. pmid:26999791
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   28. 28. Hoyt E, Hvenegaard GT. A review of whale-watching and whaling
       with applications for the Caribbean. Coast Manag. 2002;30: 381–399.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   29. 29. Vidal O, Van Waerebeek K, Findley LT. Cetaceans and Gillnet
       Fisheries in Mexico, Central America and the Wider Caribben: a
       priliminary review. Rep to Int Whal Comm Spec Issue. 1994;15:
       221–233.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   30. 30. Robbins J, Mattila DK. Estimating humpback whale (Megaptera
       novaeangliae) entanglement rates on the basis of scar evidence. Rep
       to Northeast Fish Sci Center, Natl Mar Fish Serv. 2004;
       43EANF030121.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   31. 31. Lusseau D. Male and female bottlenose dolphins Tursiops sp.
       have different strategies to avoid interactions with tour boats in
       Doubtful Sound, New Zealand. Mar Ecol Prog Ser. 2003;257: 267–274.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   32. 32. Constantine R, Brunton DH, Dennis T. Dolphin-watching tour
       boats change bottlenose dolphin (Tursiops truncatus) behaviour.
       Biol Conserv. 2004;117: 299–307.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   33. 33. Jacobsen JK, Massey L, Gulland FMD. Fatal ingestion of floating
       net debris by two sperm whales (Physeter macrocephalus). Mar Pollut
       Bull. 2010;60: 765–767. pmid:20381092
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   34. 34. Coat S, Bocquené G, Godard E. Contamination of some aquatic
       species with the organochlorine pesticide chlordecone in
       Martinique. Aquat Living Resour. EDP Sciences; 2006;19: 181–187.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   35. 35. Rolland RM, Parks SE, Hunt KE, Castellote M, Corkeron PJ,
       Nowacek DP, et al. Evidence that ship noise increases stress in
       right whales. Proc R Soc B. 2012;279: 2363–8. pmid:22319129
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   36. 36. Veirs S, Veirs V, Wood JD. Ship noise extends to frequencies
       used for echolocation by endangered killer whales. PeerJ. PeerJ
       Inc.; 2016;4: e1657. pmid:27004149
          + View Article
          + PubMed/NCBI
          + Google Scholar
   37. 37. Aguilar Soto N, Johnson M, Madsen PT, Tyack PL, Bocconcelli A,
       Fabrizio Borsani J. Does intense ship noise disrupt foraging in
       deep-divin Cuvier’s beaked whale (Ziphius cavirostris)? Mar Mammal
       Sci. Blackwell Publishing Inc; 2006;22: 690–699.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   38. 38. Weilgart LS. The impacts of anthropogenic ocean noise on
       cetaceans and implications for management. Can J Zool. NRC Research
       Press; 2007;85: 1091–1116.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   39. 39. Tyack PL. Implications for marine mammals of large-scale
       changes in the marine acoustic environment. J Mammal. The Oxford
       University Press; 2008;89: 549–558.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   40. 40. Nowacek DP, Thorne LH, Johnston DW, Tyack PL. Responses of
       cetaceans to anthropogenic noise. Mamm Rev. 2007;37: 81–115.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   41. 41. Williams R, Gero S, Bejder L, Calambokidis J, Kraus SD, Lusseau
       D, et al. Underestimating the damage: interpreting cetacean carcass
       recoveries in the context of the Deepwater Horizon/BP incident.
       Conserv Lett. Blackwell Publishing Inc; 2011;4: 228–233.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   42. 42. Whitehead H, Antunes R, Gero S, Wong SNP, Engelhaupt D, Rendell
       L. Multilevel societies of female sperm whales (Physeter
       macrocephalus) in the Atlantic and Pacific: Why are they so
       different? Int J Primatol. Springer Netherlands; 2012;33:
       1142–1164.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   43. 43. Whitt AD, Baran M a., Bryson M, Rendell LE. First Report of
       Killer Whales Harassing Sperm Whales in the Gulf of Mexico. Aquat
       Mamm. 2015;41: 252–255.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar
   44. 44. Bolaños-Jiménez J, Mignucci-Giannoni A a., Blumenthal J,
       Bogomolni A, Casas JJ, Henríquez A, et al. Distribution, feeding
       habits and morphology of killer whales Orcinus orca in the
       Caribbean Sea. Mamm Rev. 2014;44: 177–189.
          + View Article
          + Google Scholar

   Download PDF

     * Citation
     * XML

   Print
     * Print article
     * EzReprint

   Share
     * Reddit Reddit
     * Google+ Google+
     * Facebook Facebook
     * LinkedIn LinkedIn
     * Mendeley Mendeley
     * PubChase PubChase
     * Twitter Twitter
     * Email Email

     [CROSSMARK_BW_horizontal.svg]
   Advertisement

Subject Areas

   ?

   For more information about PLOS Subject Areas, click here.
   We want your feedback. Do these Subject Areas make sense for this
   article? Click the target next to the incorrect Subject Area and let us
   know. Thanks for your help!
     * Sperm whales
       Is the Subject Area "Sperm whales" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Caribbean
       Is the Subject Area "Caribbean" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Right whales
       Is the Subject Area "Right whales" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Dominica
       Is the Subject Area "Dominica" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Islands
       Is the Subject Area "Islands" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Defecation
       Is the Subject Area "Defecation" applicable to this article?
       (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Behavior
       Is the Subject Area "Behavior" applicable to this article? (BUTTON)
       Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.
     * Population dynamics
       Is the Subject Area "Population dynamics" applicable to this
       article? (BUTTON) Yes (flagno) No
       Thanks for your feedback.

Archived Tweets

   Load more
   View all tweets

     * Publications
     * PLOS Biology
     * PLOS Medicine
     * PLOS Computational Biology
     * PLOS Genetics
     * PLOS Pathogens
     * PLOS ONE
     * PLOS Neglected Tropical Diseases

     * Home
     * Blogs
     * Collections
     * Give feedback
     * LOCKSS

     * Privacy Policy
     * Terms of Use
     * Advertise
     * Media Inquiries
     * Contact

   PLOS is a nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation, #C2354500, based in San
   Francisco, California, US
   PLOS
   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TP26BH

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MQQMGF

   PLOS Journals

Explore PLOS

   All PLOS content is free to access, distribute, reuse and remix

   [0bnvLttcR8M7eRvsBAt5B4K1HwDsIvPUIeAeBt9D+S4ABAHtyGtpP0PvGAAAAAElFTkSuQ
   mCC] [E4jjgEPIHAY4+AJxB47BHwBAKP4fh3AQYAxY9hofr7jXUAAAAASUVORK5CYII=]

   [JcAAK54YQfc3ciMAAAAASUVORK5CYII=]
   [5KEC9EOABM4FmCeCHCAf7ewbNEYiVRDvD39vcPEomVyBxAJpAgXpA5AEzgeYJ4IcIBaAKJ
   xEyiFpAgjghZQGICsbeAxARibwGJCcQQrwUYABN6pkzd73EOAAAAAElFTkSuQmCC]

   [fa7ueuZuqbaAIbA3Hi2xlQbQBD4y9x4tsY0GwAIzF3P2DUdAXPjWRw+CJiDwDOPgDkIPPM
   ImIPAMzj+W4ABANjHKPOR66VJAAAAAElFTkSuQmCC]
   [eAJ+QeAfnoBfEPgHHP+fAAMAA6uaDNhljbIAAAAASUVORK5CYII=]

   [a+1mSkckwAAAABJRU5ErkJggg==]
   [8CJgLgQmJiYmJib+HvgDcSL594p9yBgAAAAASUVORK5CYII=]

   PLOS


     * Privacy Policy
     * Terms of Use
     * Advertise
     * Media Inquiries

   Publications
     * PLOS Biology
     * PLOS Medicine
     * PLOS Computational Biology
     * PLOS Currents
     * PLOS Genetics
     * PLOS Pathogens
     * PLOS ONE
     * PLOS Neglected Tropical Diseases

   plos.org

   Blogs

   Collections

   Send us feedback

   LOCKSS

   PLOS is a nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation, #C2354500, and is based in
   San Francisco, California, US
